Bringing down interest rates and reducing fuel costs will help, but increasing farm income is better. With the cooperation of Secretary Block, Trade Representative Brock, and all relevant agencies and departments, that's exactly what we're trying to do -- not by increasing subsidies or Federal controls, but instead, by opening markets and introducing alternatives in order to overcome excessive surpluses.

We believe in free trade, but we're no longer going to play patsy for those who would use this commitment as leverage against us. Free trade means access for those trading with us, and it also means access for Americans to their markets, those foreign markets. Our Trade Representative must do everything it takes to tear down trade barriers and end unfair trade practices.

In the meantime, we've sent trade teams around the world -- and they included your Secretary -- to Europe, to Africa, to Latin America, the Middle East, and the Far East. The intent was to seek new markets, and these efforts are paying off. We expect to ship more grain to Iraq and Morocco, to have sizable grain sales to India, and, of course, we have a deal with Egypt that represents one-sixth of the world's wheat flour trade.

American farmer. It's called the PIK, and you know that's the Payment-In-Kind program. And under this crop-swap agreement, farmers -- or concept -- farmers are given a certain amount of grain or cotton, rather than money, in payment for not planting. The self-help nature of PIK makes farmers themselves, not government, the solution. It leaves them with much more personal freedom, and it has the potential of whittling down a surplus problem that's been a serious drag on the entire farming community.

The final tally on farmer participation won't be known until 3 o'clock tomorrow afternoon, but from the reports that I've been getting from Secretary Block, the program is being received with open arms.

Although our large surplus remains a problem, we can be grateful that even in economic downturns America has an abundance of food. This bittersweet situation afforded us the opportunity, early last year, to initiate a program to help those hard-hit by the recession by giving away surplus cheese and other dairy products. Your Department has given away over 250 million pounds of cheese and dairy products, valued at nearly $400 million, to 10 million needy people during these past 14 months.

Those of you who work here at the Department of Agriculture are aware of other surplus commodities held by the Federal Government. Now, I personally believe that we shouldn't keep agricultural commodities locked up in storage that needy people require and can't afford to buy.

So, I'm asking the Secretary to explore ways some of the other commodities in government warehouses can be distributed to the needy to alleviate unusual hardship, without disrupting our farmers' markets. The Secretary informs me he's already taken the first steps to make milled rice and cornmeal available.

These have been difficult times, and while we're encouraged that recovery is underway -- and that it looks like it'll be long and strong -- we haven't ignored those who, through no fault of their own, are suffering. Emotional and often politically motivated attacks notwithstanding, overall nutrition assistance provided to the unemployed and the needy of this country is at a higher level now than ever before. This assistance takes the form of food stamps, school lunches, child and nutrition activities, and donated commodities.

Comprehending the pain and the deprivation resulting from this recession should bolster us in our resolve never to be lured back into the irresponsible policies of tax and spend and inflate that caused this suffering in the first place. The ultimate solution to these heartrending problems remains a healthy economy. Yet, while heading toward that goal we have not, as some would like you to believe, permitted people to go hungry. In times like these we must use our heads to make things get better, but we must never forget our hearts, either.

I grew up in farming country during the dark days of the Great Depression. And in the last few months, there have been stories reminiscent of those days -- farmers losing their land, foreclosures, and tears. Now obviously, we've been unable to rescue all of them, but the Farmers Home Administration has been operating under instructions to work with farmers on a case-by-case basis, taking every responsible measure to help individual farmers get back on their feet.

There is a Federal role in agriculture. Consistent with this, we've increased money for agricultural research and expanded the Federal Crop Insurance program. We've strengthened the Department of Agriculture's market-development program, implemented the blended credit program to finance U.S. agricultural exports, increased the level of agricultural export credit guarantees to the highest level in history -- $4.8 billion.

By the end of this year, we will have cut income taxes by 25 percent across the board and, beginning in 1985, indexing will prevent people from being pushed into higher and higher tax brackets by inflation.

We also, as you've been told, ended the Soviet grain embargo and have pledged never again to single out agriculture from the rest of the economy for use as an economic weapon. In addition, I signed into law legislation that assures the sanctity of agricultural export sales contracts.

Jeffersonian vision of free men working their own land is still rooted in our consciousness. So in many ways, we look to agriculture not just for sustenance of the body, but also to prove to ourselves that our ideals are still alive.

Recently, farmers in States across the Nation, in spite of their troubles, donated thousands of bushels of wheat to help feed the unemployed in hard-hit urban and industrial areas. In North Dakota the goal was set at 2,600 bushels, and on the first day of the project, 6,000 bushels were donated. The wheat was ground at a State-owned mill and pressed into macaroni. That North Dakota project alone provided enough food for more than 1,700,000 meals. Every aspect of the project was a product of voluntary contributions -- the wheat, the baking, the bags and boxes, as well as the trucks and fuel. All of this done at a time when the wheat farmers, as I said before, are themselves in a bind.

Dakota, and Washington. This isn't just a story of good farmers; this is the story of good people and good Americans. No matter how industrialized we become, America's heart, her soul, her sense of justice and decency will remain strong as long as the American farmer continues to be an integral part of our national life.

As a young boy growing up in that small town on the plains of Illinois, I remember those farming families. They were proud, church-going people. They were independent and yet always ready to lend a hand to a neighbor. We can all be grateful that these folks and their ideals are still with us today.

The tragedy of Afghanistan continues as the valiant and courageous Afghan freedom fighters persevere in standing up against the brutal power of the Soviet invasion and occupation. The Afghan people are struggling to reclaim their freedom, which was taken from them when the Soviet Union invaded Afghanistan in December of 1979.

In this three-year period the Soviet Union has been unable to subjugate Afghanistan. The Soviet forces are pitted against an extraordinary people who, in their determination to preserve the character of their ancient land, have organized an effective and still spreading country-wide resistance. The resistance of the Afghan freedom fighters is an example to all the world of the invincibility of the ideals we in this country hold most dear, the ideals of freedom and independence.

Millions have gone into exile as refugees. We will probably never know the numbers of people killed and maimed, poisoned and gased, of the homes that have been destroyed, and of the lives that have been shattered and stricken with grief.

It is, therefore, incumbent upon us as Americans to reflect on the events in Afghanistan, to think about the agony which these brave people bear, and to maintain our condemnation of the continuing Soviet occupation. Our observance again this year of Afghanistan Day on March 21, the Afghan New Year, will recall for all the world America's unflagging sympathy for a determined people, its support for their refugees and commitment to achieving a political settlement for Afghanistan which will free that country from tyranny's yoke.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-first day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

One of the most magnificent presents that one human being can bestow upon another is the gift of sight. Incredible as it may seem, it is within the power of each of us to give this precious gift simply by making arrangements to donate our eyes after death.

Thanks to advances in eye research, donor eyes can be stored and the preserved corneal tissues transplanted into the eyes of people who would otherwise be unable to see the beautiful and exciting world in which we live.

Each year some 30,000 people lose vision because their corneas have been damaged by injury, disease, or an inherited condition. Where the cornea has become so clouded that vision is lost, sight usually can be restored through a replacement cornea provided by a cornea donor.

Tragically, some visually impaired people who could benefit from this operation cannot be helped because suitable corneal tissue is not always available when needed. Donor eyes are also needed for vision research so that we may learn more about how this organ functions and develop ways to prevent and treat the many disorders which threaten sight.

It is appropriate that we as a Nation encourage eye donations and increase public awareness of the need for such donations. By filling out a uniform donor card and carrying it, we may give the gift of sight to people who now suffer from corneal blindness and benefit others from eye research.

Today, March 21st, is New Years Day in much of the Moslem world. New years, of course, should be an occasion for celebration. But for the Moslem people of Afghanistan, whose country was attacked and is occupied by the Soviet Army, it is a bitter reminder of a national calamity that befell their nation more than 3 years ago. To focus the world's attention on this crime against an innocent and brave nation, we observe today the second annual Afghanistan Day.

In Afghanistan, tens of thousands of people have been killed, millions have lost their homes and their livelihood. Others have been subjected to torture and other atrocities, and many have been victims of the grisly chemical and biological weapons, including yellow rain -- weapons the Soviets have used in violation of solemn international agreements. The consequences of this calamity extend to Pakistan, which has assumed the burden of sheltering and feeding nearly 3 million refugees.

Yet, while we condemn what has happened in Afghanistan, we are not without hope. To watch the courageous Afghan freedom fighters battle modern arsenals with simple hand-held weapons is an inspiration to those who love freedom. Their courage teaches us a great lesson -- that there are things in this world worth defending.

The Soviet people have known great suffering -- more than other people. They should be able to sympathize with the terrible suffering of the Afghan people. To the Soviet leaders, I urge you in the name of humanity to end the bloodshed so that an independent Afghanistan can again take its place in the community of nations. The West has no designs upon Afghanistan. We do not threaten you there or anywhere on the globe. All we seek is the restoration of peace and freedom for a noble and brave people whom we remember today.

The current discussion of Ambassador Ed Rowny and the talking points prepared for his use in a meeting with the President's nominee for the position of Director of the Arms Control and Disarmament Agency is a disservice to all concerned. Ambassador Rowny has disavowed the points, indicating that he did not sign or subscribe to them.

Unjustified attacks on Ed Rowny -- a dedicated, experienced, competent public servant who has devoted his life's work to our nation's security -- do little to serve the country. Ambassador Rowny's skill and wisdom have been critical factors in the preparation of the President's START proposals and in presenting them at the table in Geneva. This proposal is part of the most comprehensive arms reduction initiative in the recent history of arms negotiations, and the President believes that the progress we have seen in START is due in large measure to the statesmanlike and vigorous actions of Ed Rowny.

Until a few days ago, it appeared that an omnibus bill to make social security solvent and extend supplemental unemployment benefits would be enacted this week. I would have gladly signed this vital measure to relieve legitimate worries about the economic security of so many.

Now, however, a selfish special interest group and its congressional allies are attempting to make this vital economic security bill a legislative hostage. But let me make absolutely clear that an unrelated rider amendment -- based on a campaign of distortion and designed to prove that the banks and other financial institutions can still have their own way in Washington -- has no place in the bill pending before the Senate.

The social security and unemployment insurance lifeline that extends to millions of Americans across the breadth and width of our land cannot be permitted to be severed by the obstructionist tactics of a Washington lobby and its congressional friends. As I said last week, it would be far better if the bankers spent less time lobbying and more time lowering interest rates.

Well, to get the meeting under way -- and I don't want it to remain a monolog. It's going to be a dialog when we get going. But the subject of the meeting is the budget that was passed on a straight party-line basis of the Democrats out of their committee, their version of a budget which they have declared is a restatement of Democratic tradition. And I'm afraid it is.

But I don't see any way that we can, with our own proposal of a budget, that there could be any effort to compromise or find a meeting ground. This budget that has been proposed by them must be defeated.

Increasing that spending that much, increasing the taxes that much, it also will reduce the defense budget down to a point that is some $31 billion below the defense budget that had been planned by President Carter, and which we're trying to rectify and get our defenses to recover from.

But when all that is done, they will have wound up with an $8 billion addition to the deficit for the years '83, '84. In other words, all of this will be done to simply achieve tens of billions of dollars of new spending. As a matter of fact, they have introduced some 10 new social domestic programs, in addition to reducing all the -- or eliminating the savings that we've made.

Now, the taxes that they're going to increase call for canceling the third year of the income tax cut and canceling indexing. The truth of the matter is that in both of these taxes, the bulk of them, 72 percent of one -- the third-year cut -- and 78 percent of the indexing, the savings there goes to people below the $50,000 mark. Middle-income and lower middle-income earners are the ones that will pay the bulk of that tax. Obviously, indexing is strictly for the working man and woman in this country, because they're the ones that, when they get a cost-of-living pay raise, are moved up into a higher tax bracket. Well, it can't be a benefit to the rich, because they're already in the top bracket. There's no place to push them.

And I just feel that this thing is such a throwback that we have to make it plain to the people what this would result in. This is going back to the type of government program that caused the problems that we're facing today.

Well, the main thing is we're in a recovery. There's no question about it and that the word that came out yesterday with regard to the growth in the gross national product. And to do things of this kind, the taxes would be almost $30 billion in the first year of the tax increase. That's no way to keep a recovery going. That is going to cut off recovery.

And I make one last point, and then we will turn it over just for conversation here and for more detail on this. But when we went for the tax increase that we did a year or so ago -- and many of us, as we said then, had to swallow hard to do it -- we did that on a kind of bipartisan agreement that we were going to get $3 in spending cuts for every $1 of increase in taxes. And this is a complete repudiation of that agreement to now turn around and offer this kind of a proposal.

So, again, as I say, our job -- I know we're outnumbered in the House -- but our job is to find those Democrats that I'm sure are there who are responsible and who will go along with repudiating a proposal of this kind.

Consumer prices actually fell in February by 0.2 percent, and for the past year, we have reduced the inflation rate to 3.5 percent -- the best record in more than a decade. This steady progress confirms once again that we are putting inflation back in its cage and that our economy is on the mend.

Now it is more vital than ever that America's elected leaders here in Washington work together to hold down spending and taxes and restrain the growth of government. This message must not be lost on the House of Representatives as it prepares for a major vote today on the budget.

Designed to coordinate the work of those Federal agencies with existing responsibilities and capabilities for interdiction of seaborne, airborne, and cross-border importation of narcotics, NNBIS will complement but not replicate the duties of the regional Drug Enforcement task forces operated by the Department of Justice.

NNBIS will monitor suspected smuggling activity originating outside national borders and destined for the United States and will coordinate agencies' seizure of contraband and arrests of persons involved in illegal drug importation.

Well, I think America's heart is on display here. This exhibit explores both the reality and the myth of the American West. And both are important. Here are more than the bits and pieces of a rough and gritty life, but the tangible remnants of a national legend.

Among the horsehair lassoes and Remington sculptures and Gene Autry songs is a part of our national identity. Tails of Wild West men and women from Kit Carson to Wild Bill Hickok to Calamity Jane to Annie Oakley are woven into the dreams of our youths and the standards we aim to live by in our adult lives. Ideals of courageous and self-reliant heroes, both men and women, are the stuff of Western lore.

It all comes back as you browse through this exhibit. The difference between right and wrong seems as clear as the white hats that the cowboys in Hollywood pictures always wore so you'd know right from the beginning who was the good guy. Integrity, morality, and democratic values are the resounding themes.

While this exhibit is here, I hope all of Washington takes time to get to know the American cowboy again. And as the exhibit travels from city to modern city, I hope it reinforces the glue of a very good society, born and bred in the wide open spaces.

Considerable progress has been made in removing unnecessary regulatory constraints which contribute to inefficiency and increased costs of our shipping and shipbuilding. These efforts will continue and will greatly enhance our maritime posture. Over the next few years, new generations of efficient and productive merchant ships will improve the competitiveness of our fleet.

These and other announced policy initiatives are part of my firm commitment to provide the foundation upon which to build and maintain the strong merchant marine needed to serve the Nation's waterborne commerce and national defense requirements.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Ellen F. Paul to be the Representative of the United States of America on the Commission for Social Development of the Economic and Social Council of the United Nations. She will succeed Ruth Schachter Morgenthau.

For all our senior citizens who worried about receiving their social security benefits and for the present-day workers concerned about the solvency of that system, I think a dark cloud has been lifted. Shortly after 2 o'clock this morning, the Congress completed action on the bipartisan social security solvency program. And by working together in our best bipartisan tradition, we have passed reform legislation that brings us much closer to ensuring the integrity of the social security system.

As you know, I've pledged repeatedly that no American who depends on social security would ever be denied his or her check. But I warned those who were making this issue a political football that the system did have real problems and that only through hard work, not demagoguery, would we be able to solve them. Well, for the sake of our people, I'm gratified that great good sense did prevail over partisan concerns.

I was also pleased to sign last evening a bill that guarantees continued unemployment insurance benefits and that provides funds to expand employment opportunities available in Federal programs during the present Federal [fiscal] year.

Now, this bipartisan legislation approves supplemental appropriations totaling $4.6 billion for various construction, renovation, and repair activities. And it provides authority for humanitarian assistance through food donations and other related efforts. By accelerating various Government projects already budgeted for future years, this legislation avoids the costly error of creating a multibillion-dollar, make-work job program, the sort of expensive mistake the Federal Government made too often in the past. In fact, all of the employment-generating activities funded under this bill will add virtually nothing to the Federal deficit, if the higher spending in 1983 is offset by compensating reductions in future appropriations for these same activities.

Let there be no confusion on one essential point. Even as this bill becomes law, the signs are clear that economic recovery is already underway, a recovery that'll bring far more jobs to unemployed Americans than could ever be created by new Federal jobs programs. Make-work jobs are just temporary at best. And we know that from past experience. More government spending for such jobs will only crowd out private borrowing for private jobs, raise the deficit and reverse our dramatic progress in bringing down inflation and interest rates.

Why cannot we have just as concentrated a program on trying to solve the mess by seeking better human relations, U.S.A.-style, with the Soviet Union and other countries? Why don't we sell for cash some of the 190,000 tons of butter we're paying to store daily and daily adding to? The Soviets need butter desperately; the starving babies in Africa, who can drink the milk reprocessed from the butter. We have other surplus commodities. Why cannot we explore whether better living through sharing of food and consumer goods will make people turn from their warlords and bring about peace?

First of all, we are going to continue not only in the area of disarmament but every other way we can to convince those who seem to be expansionists today that there is a better course if they're willing to come forth and join the family of nations that want to go forward together in peace and freedom.

With regard to the food, the only restraint on that -- we are adding to the commodities that we've held in storage under our own laws and regulations here -- we're adding to the number of those -- the amount of those that is going to be redistributed to the people of need, whether here or worldwide. But the one restraint that I mentioned is, we have to be sure that in doing that, we don't just add further problems to the agricultural community by, in that disposing, interfering with or wiping out their potential markets.

So, it's a line that has to be walked. And we've been very careful with that. We have internationally made some of these things and these dairy products available, but in each time we have had to work very carefully so as not to either deprive our own farmers or deprive other allies and friends of ours of their commercial markets.

Q. Mr. President, why did you make that proposal now, in the light of the arms race that is going on with the Soviet Union, so to speak, and the negotiations over in Geneva, at a time when the budget is being beaten up in Congress because of the higher defense spending that you want? Why would you put that proposal out now?

The President. I put it out now, because what better time? I've been having this idea, and it's been kicking around in my mind for some time here recently. And constantly I have thought about the fact that the nuclear missile seems to be one of the only major weapon systems in history that has never produced or brought about a defense against itself. And I brought this up  one day in a meeting which the Chiefs of Staff were present and others, and we talked about it and discussed it and then discussed it some more. And since we don't know how long it will take or if -- or ever, that we have to start -- the quicker we start, the better.

But it is inconceivable to me that we can go on thinking down the future, not only for ourselves and our lifetime but for other generations, that the great nations of the world will sit here, like people facing themselves across a table, each with a cocked gun, and no one knowing whether someone might tighten their finger on the trigger.

There is one way, and the way we're pursuing, which is to see if we can get mutual agreement to reduce these weapons and, hopefully, to eliminate them, as we're trying in INF. There is another way, and that is if we could, the same scientists who gave us this kind of destructive power, if they could turn their talent to the job of, perhaps, coming up with something that would render these weapons obsolete. And I don't know how long it's going to take, but we're going to start, because I'm going to be signing an executive directive very shortly, when I get out of here.

Q. Mr. President, the Soviets don't see it your way at all in terms -- they say that you are, in fact, accelerating the arms race, that we are violating the ABM treaty, and that it's almost that you've thrown down the gauntlet.

First of all, it doesn't violate the ABM treaty. We've just extended that for 5 years. The ABM treaty has to do with deployment. There is nothing in it that prohibits research, which is what we're calling for. I'm quite sure that whatever time it would take and whatever President would be in the White House when, maybe 20 years down the road, somebody does come up with an answer, I think that that would then bring to the fore the problem of, all right, why not now dispose of all these weapons since we've proven that they can be rendered obsolete?

The President. Yes, but that's it -- it's, as I say, it's like those two fellows with the loaded guns, cocked and ready. Yes, we have. I think that -- but remember that, for a great part of that period, we proved, I think pretty definitely, that we are not expansionists, that we're not aggressive, because we had, to begin with, a monopoly. And then, for a number of those 30 years, we had such a superiority, as witness the Cuban missile crisis.

When they blinked I think it's safe to say it was because our superiority at that time was about eight to one. And, if you'll recall, the Russian involved in those, are very high up in the Politburo, involved in that particular incident said within the hearing of his counterparts on our side that they would never again be caught in that position. And they started their dramatic military buildup.

So, you can't say that we have sat here even and with the great amount of weapons that both sides have today for those 30 years. For a long time, and as I say again, we proved -- you have to ask yourself how many nations in the world could have had the monopoly that we had and not have taken advantage of it, and we didn't.

I don't believe that we should be looking at tax increases right now. With this recovery at the stage it is, I think we've proven our point that our system, in spite of all the maligning that took place before it was even underway and having a chance to operate, has proven its success. We are definitely into a recovery. And to pick this time now to raise taxes in any way is risking setting back this recovery.

Q. As a followup to that, do you also oppose even the standby taxes that you previously agreed to? Do you want Congress to put in place this year a mechanism for standby taxes next year, or have you also backed off of that?

Protection Agency. These are all people who've been caught up one way or another in the congressional allegations. Doesn't this really look bad? And how can you reassure the people that the agency is operating properly?

The President. I don't think it necessarily looks bad. I think what is happening there and with the new director coming in, there is -- some of these individuals that have been through this whole thing. And I know that some of them, just as Anne Burford did, and all of those who implied that some way this was engineered -- no. I never would have asked for her resignation.

Anne Burford, for one, and some of these others feel that there will be far more chance of success of the Agency continuing to function, that they can contribute by leaving. And I think that, as I thought of her, that it was a very generous thing and thought for her to have. And it's true, because I think with all of the allegations and all of the accusations, in spite of the fact that no proof of any wrongdoing has been presented in all of this fuss as yet, that this is what's back of -- some of those, I can't speak for all, but some of those have let us know for quite some time that they wanted out. They wanted to leave.

Q. Mr. President, are you going to offer a proposal for interim arms reduction in Europe next week? And are you going to continue to stick with Mr. Adelman, your nominee for Arms Control Director, even though he appears to have been talking about personnel matters in the memos that were released?

The President. All right. But isn't this natural, that someone who is in a position of assuming the directorship of an agency or department or commission or whatever it might be is going to make inquiries of people on the scene with regard to personnel and so forth?

And it was perfectly natural -- I've done it myself -- that, when the letter came, he passed it to an aide for one who is collecting all the information that he would, then, have to deal with when he was in the job.

And I think he is excellently qualified. And I think that the fuss that has been raised about him, again, smacks of people smaller than the person they're attacking -- attacking someone who's bigger than they are.

The President. Well, welcome here to the Executive Office Building, and I want the viewers to know that you and I have just met and not even individually met but just in this ways, and I don't have any idea what you're going to ask. But we'll get right to it, and I understand someone has been designated to ask the first question.

Hazardous amounts of lead were found in a Dallas schoolyard and hundreds of young children have toxic levels of lead in their blood. This morning you fired Mr. Hernandez, who stopped the cleanup of this waste site. Under the new EPA headed by Mr. William Ruckelshaus, how will these tragedies be avoided in the future? And how will the Agency reconcile the mistakes of the EPA under Mrs. Burford?

The President. Well, first of all, may I simply correct the basis for your question -- and yet, I understand the base for it, because you're repeating the way the story has been reported. And the reporting leaves something to be desired.

First of all, Mr. Hernandez was not fired. Mr. Hernandez has been wanting to resign and, I think, understandably so, because of all the thing that's been going on on the part of the congressional committees and so forth. And Mrs. Burford resigned only -- not by anyone else's decision, but her own, because she felt that as long as she was there they were going to keep on this harassing of the Agency.

I believe the Agency's been doing a good job. But let me explain about Dallas and the nearby plant and the belief that there is this increase in lead pollution because of the smoke emissions from that particular plant.

You have to recognize that many of these things were done -- such as the toxic waste dumps -- at a time when no one was knowingly exposing people to a hazardous substance. We just didn't understand those things. It wasn't too many years ago that one of our most noted scientists received the annual gold medal for discovering that if you put lead in the gasoline, the automobile engines would run better. Then a few years later we discover that it's hazardous and we have to take the lead out. Well, the same thing is true of many toxic wastes.

The EPA -- I don't know what the delay has been with that particular installation, but you have to recognize that we're discovering now that there are thousands and thousands of dumps, some of them abandoned from years past. And we're trying to catalog and find all of them. And then you have to find out are they definitely hazardous now to people and what is the degree of hazard.

And so far, I know that the department has named, as to hazardous waste dumps, about 450 or so. And they've worked it down to about a hundred that they believe require the most urgent attention, immediate attention. But this is the explanation back of all of this, and actually the record is very good on the part of the Agency.

The thing that kicked it up -- and I just can't help but get this one line in. When these congressional committees began their oversight and wanted to know what was going on, we made available to them some 800,000 documents and withheld less than a hundred documents, because they were already -- these were documents pertaining to legal cases, litigation involving some concern, individual, or company that might be involved in a suit over pollution. We invoked executive privilege, because that kind of a document, if you make it public, you may prejudice your case and you may not be able to proceed with the litigation and because the information in there is very confidential and is the kind that, say, a prosecutor develops when he's getting ready to prosecute a case. And the whole fuss was raised over that.

Well, finally, when the people began to suspect and feel that there was some wrongdoing, that's when we said, ``Well, wait a minute. We'll make all of them available so they haven't got any complaints.'' And this is what we've done.

The President. Well, the question of Taiwan and the People's Republic of China will remain a sore spot in our developing of relations with the People's Republic. We've explained our position. And it isn't that we've recognized Taiwan as a nation. The problem is that the Government of Taiwan fled there in the face of the Communist revolution in Mainland China some years ago. So, you've got a government that still claims it was the legitimate Government of China. And you've now got the new Communist Government of China that claims it's the Government of the People's Republic.

And we have said -- because for a number of years, the government that fled to Taiwan had been allies in World War II, an ally of the United States, and they had remained a very firm ally and friend of ours -- and we have said to the Government of the People's Republic of China we believe that we can be friends to both. And the decision as to how you, between you, resolve this is an internal problem belonging to the Chinese people to settle that question.

But as far as we're concerned, we don't believe that in order to make another friend, we should discard a long-time ally and friend -- the people on Taiwan. And as a matter of fact, I myself have said to some of the representatives of the People's Republic that we would think that they would have more confidence in us if they knew that we didn't discard one friend in order to make another. That should indicate to them that we'd be a good friend to them, too.

And the controversy still goes on. I think it's been eased somewhat. But neither side wants to give in. And as we've said, hands off as to what the ultimate decision is. That's up to them to work out.

Michigan. And my question is, last night you signed a new jobs bill which was, hopefully, to eliminate the unemployment. My question is: Will the jobs bill help alleviate the unemployment among black teenagers, which have been hit the hardest?

The President. We think, yes, it will because of some provisions that are in that bill as well as some other programs we have. And what those programs are aimed at is retraining for the newer kind of jobs that we're going to have to have in this country.

Unfortunately, there's been a structural change. Many people that have been laid-off in certain industries will find that their jobs will never again exist. But at the same time, if you read the Sunday papers and read the help wanted ads, you'll find employers in all this time of unemployment advertising for people to come work. But if you read the qualifications, you find that these are for the newer type jobs like in high technology. And there just aren't people trained for those jobs. So, we have training programs aimed at the presently unemployed, aimed at young people and so forth to train people in the various communities and sections of the country in connection with private enterprise and local authorities for the jobs that are going unfilled in those areas.

And that is the recovery from the recession. The other month ago when unemployment dropped four-tenths of a percentage point just in that 1 month -- that was just due to the improvement in the economy -- that would have taken a $5 billion jobs project of the Government to try and make the same number of people employed.

The President. Well, number one, we are taking care of our own people first. The social reform, the social programs, domestic programs in this country have grown at a fantastic rate over the last decade or so. And today, we're providing meals, 95 million meals a day, the Government is. There are more people by some 4 million receiving food stamps as received them 1980, before we came here.

You have to, when you make a -- give a budget, under the law, you have to project for 5 years where these programs and where this budget is going to go and what it will be in 1985, '6, '7, and '8, in addition to 1984. All that we have done since we've been here is cut the increase in growth of the budget. Each one of our budgets has been bigger than the one before. But when we came here, the Government was increasing its spending by 17 percent a year. And this is why the taxes kept on having to be increased. We have reduced that by about half or better, that rate of increase.

Now, the foreign aid connection. All of the free world is engaged in that, and not only the free world, the People's Republic of China, also. This is aid to the developing countries. And, since the figures you gave went back to 1946, remember, that includes the Marshall plan. We were the only nation, when World War II ended, that had not been devastated by war -- factories blown up and railroads gone and powerplants and so forth, no longer existing because of the bombing and destruction. And we came up with the Marshall plan, a program to not only help our allies rebuild but to help even our enemies.

Tokyo -- I remember my first time there a few years ago, standing there and looking out a window at the whole skyline, and a Japanese gentleman telling me that when the war ended, that was just devastation, ruins. There was no city. Our firebombings had done that. And then he told me -- and, literally, with tears in his eyes -- how we, the enemy that they had attacked, we came in with the funds and the money to rebuild and to reopen factories and to bring in food for their people.

Now, what we're trying to do is, as we develop or help these other countries develop, they then can join the family of nations, and they become not only an exporter of things that they can produce, they become consumers of the things that we have to sell. And I think that this has been a fine thing, as well as a humanitarian thing, that we're doing. But we're joined in this, to the limit of their ability, by our allies, by other countries in the world. It's a worldwide thing that's going on.

With regard to El Salvador, the money is going there for one reason. El Salvador, after a half a century of being a military dictatorship -- no human rights as we see them and believe in them -- a few years ago elected a government democratically and started on the road to becoming more like the democracies. A year ago, they held another election, in the time of all this strife with the guerrillas.

The guerrillas are not a group of peasants who just have taken their muskets in hand and wanted to stage a revolution because the government was tyrannical. They are trained military personnel, armed by way of the Soviet Union and Cuba, through Nicaragua, which has become a Communist base in this country, by its own admission. One of the leaders of the guerrilla fighters the other day publicly stated, yes, they were a friend of the Soviet Union; yes, they intended to bring communism to the Western hemisphiere.

Eighty-three percent of the people turned out in the election a year ago. The guerrillas threatened to shoot people for going to the polls. The people weren't intimidated. They demanded their right to vote, and they did vote. So, the government is there reflects the will of the people.

We're trying to help that government against this assault by the guerrillas, the armed guerrillas, and help its economy so that it can become more democratic, as Costa Rica and Honduras have become. And this is why we're sending that aid there. And we're sending $2 dollars in aid, for economic aid, to every $1 of military aid.

That is an astounding figure. And we've got to go back a lot of years before we find anything comparable. Inflation, which was 12.4 percent, has for the last 6 months been running at only four-tenths of 1 percent. And last month there was no inflation rate; in fact, there was deflation by two-tenths of 1 percent. Interest rates that were 21\1/2\ are now down to 10\1/2\, and they're still going lower. The automobile industry is recovering and showing growth. The building of new houses has picked up to what it was several years ago. Incidentally, this deflationary figure -- also in December we had deflation instead of inflation -- this is the first time this has happened since 1965.

In the decade of the seventies, we let our military go down, as I said in my speech, to the place that there was a dangerous window of vulnerability. We have set out, in these 2 years past, to close that window of vulnerability. At the same time, we have three teams in Europe -- two in Geneva and one in, I think, Vienna, that one is working on getting the Soviet Union to join us in the reduction of conventional weapons. The other two are trying to persuade them to join us in reducing and, hopefully, eliminating nuclear missiles entirely. In order to get them to come to that negotiating table -- they are so far in front of us, ahead of us in military strength, that it was only that when they saw that we were determined to rebuild our defenses -- and they know that they cannot over a long period of time match us in that; they are no match for our industrial might -- this is why they came to the table and are willing to negotiate with us. They're being stubborn, but they're there and they're talking.

I didn't have any illusions about it. Having been Governor for 8 years of California, which is not only the most populous State in the Union but, you know, it's the closest thing to the Federal Government -- great difference, of course, in scale. But California, if it were a nation, would be the seventh ranking economic power in the world. So, I thought that I had a pretty good idea of what I'd be up against. There weren't too many surprises in this job.

Now, what were the high and the low points. Well, I think -- I couldn't single one high point out. I would say that the succeeding in the first 2 years in getting most of the economic program we wanted -- remember, for those people that are criticizing our economic program, they never gave us all we want. In the House of Representatives the other party is in control, and we do have a majority in the Senate. But to see the program actually get underway -- much of it based on things that we'd done in California in what was a tough economic time there, too -- that was a high spot.

Another high spot for me is the very subject we've been talking on in the military. When we came here we had airplanes that couldn't fly for lack of spare parts. We had ships that couldn't leave harbor, because they either lacked spare parts or crew -- didn't have enough crew to sail. Our volunteer military was supposed to be a failure; we couldn't keep people in the service, and the career officers and so forth were resigning. And today we have a waiting line. Today we have the highest percentage of high school graduates we've ever had in the military, at the present. They're proud to be there. And we can provide the gasoline and the ammunition for training and so forth.

And the third high spot is, in all this time of trouble with so many people suffering because of the recession, we turned to the private sector with what we called a private sector initiative, and we had a nationwide committee to go out and see how could we develop the private sector to take over some of these things and do some of these things as they alway used to do it -- neighbor helping neighbor. And it has been so successful that in all this time of economic distress, private giving to worthy causes, to charity, to helping neighbors, has never been greater in the history of the United States than this.

The low point -- there've been several of those, but I suppose, if you don't mind my saying it, maybe the low point came when I got out of the car and walked into the emergency room of George Washington Hospital -- [laughter] -- and was told I'd been shot. [Laughter] I thought that the Secret Service man piling in on top of me in the car had maybe broken a rib. I knew I hurt, but I didn't know I'd been hit. And I had a bullet just about 1 inch from my heart.

The President. No, there are several individuals over there who have been feeling -- and now that we have named a new director -- have been feeling that -- like Mrs. Burford felt -- that as long as they're there, they're going to be a focus for this kind of attention, which is interfering with the Agency's doing its job.

But let me again call to your attention: There has been no proof provided by any of those committees that there has been any wrongdoing at all. And if there is any wrongdoing, I want to be the first to know about it, because you, the people, have a right to expect that your government -- I consider should be as moral and be as sacred as the temples of worship in this country. But so far, as I say, there has been no proof of anything of that kind.

I don't know why he failed to show up for an address. Maybe it was because one of those committees called for him to appear before the committee. That takes precedence in this government of ours, whether it's a Cabinet member or who it is, whenever it happens.

The President. Every allegation -- I would have to say yes, for this reason: that every allegation and accusation that has been voiced by the Congress I have ordered the Justice Department and the FBI to investigate. So, that doesn't imply guilt. That just implies our willingness to show that we want all of the facts and all of the truth.

Divine Child High School. In your first State of the Union address, you explicitly stated that you'd protect the poor and the needy. Yet, your social security cutbacks have directly and dramatically placed further burden on the widows and orphans you promised to protect. And at the same time, you continue to channel enormous sums of money out of the country. Should we not provide for our own here at home before we attempt to provide for antidemocratic systems abroad?

The President. Well, we're not providing for antidemocratic systems abroad. But also, here again, the drumbeat of propaganda that takes place in the political arena has, again, contributed to misundestanding on all of your parts. And I understand that -- I mean, when you're out there, and you have to depend on the news that you get and that you hear people say.

There has never been any cutback in social security. From the very first, I said that those people dependent on it would receive it, but that we had to do something about the program to restore fiscal integrity because social security was going broke.

The first time I said it, at about the time of that first speech that you're talking about, opponents in the government challenged that I was not telling the truth. I had said that we would not be able to get by July of 1983 in social security if we did not do something to rectify that imbalance. And they said that was false. Well, they, in passing -- and they have just passed the commission's report that I asked for to see how we could make social security sound -- that has now been passed and I will be signing it today or tomorrow. In that thing of making that, they then had to admit, yes. And we had to borrow money beginning in July of this year -- or already, before July, to pay some of the checks.

Now, the first time I ever referred to the fiscal problem of social security was long before I ever thought I'd even be a Governor. Never had any idea of anything of the kind. I was making pictures in Hollywood. But when you don't sing or dance in Hollywood, you usually wind up as an after-dinner speaker. [Laughter] And at one of those after-dinner speeches in 1964, I called attention to the fact that social security then, that many years ago, was out of balance actuarially by $300 billion. And no one did anything about it down through all these years.

Now, we believe that the measure that has just passed by a bipartisan agreement between both parties in the Congress, that we have resolved that problem. But, in the meantime, it became such a political football that I saw all the charges that I had cut benefits. There was no way I could cut benefits. They would have had to -- that would have to take legislation passed by Congress. Nor did I ever ask for such a thing. There has been no cut at any time in the benefits. But I know that the charge has been made. And many senior citizens dependent on social security were frightened into believing that this was going to happen to them. And I think it was cruel and unusual punishment to deceive these people for political purposes.

The President. I'm not sure that -- I can't organize something new. But I'm not sure that we shouldn't take a long-term look at the structure of social security with the proviso that those dependent on the program will contine to get their checks; that there will be no reform, but to go back and look at what's going to happen to you when you get out on the job market.

The payroll tax for social security has become so huge that for most of the workers in this country, it's a bigger tax than the income tax. And I'm not sure that the benefits that you will receive when you come to the point of retiring from the work force will justify the amount of that tax. And I think that while we protect the people presently dependent on the program -- and those who may be in the next several years and who've based their plans on that -- I don't think there would be anything wrong if we had some solid studies made as to whether we could improve that program for all of you so that it would be more fair for you and for the younger workers in the work force today in the future.

Today the President issued a National Security Decision Directive addressing his intent to direct the development of an intensive effort to define a long-term research and development program aimed at an ultimate goal of eliminating the threat posed by nuclear ballistic missiles as announced in his speech of March 23, 1983.

It is my policy to take every opportunity to reduce world tensions and enhance stability. Our efforts to achieve significant reductions in strategic offensive forces and to eliminate LRINF land-based missiles are one approach to that aim. However, it is my long-range goal to go beyond this. I would like to decrease our reliance on the threat of retaliation by offensive nuclear weapons and to increase the contribution of defensive systems to our security and that of our allies. To begin to move us toward that goal, I have concluded that we should explore the possibility of using defensive capabilities to counter the threat posed by nuclear ballistic missiles.

In order to provide the necessary basis for this effort, I further direct a study be completed on a priority basis to assess the roles that ballistic missile defense could play in future security strategy of the United States and our allies. Among other items, the study will provide guidance necessary to develop research and development funding commitments for the FY 85 Departmental budgets and the accompanying Five-Year Defense Program (FYDP).

The Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs is assigned the responsibility to formulate detailed instructions for implementing this NSDD including organization, assignment of responsibilities, and completion dates.

The President regards the report as an example of the serious and substantive work that can result from the summit process. He welcomes its emphasis on technology as a key to industrial competitiveness and economic growth, which will be the subject of important discussions at the Williamsburg summit on May 28 - 30.

The report considers the opportunities, problems, and challenges presented by technology and analyzes the relationship between technology, economic growth, and employment. It offers a number of recommedations on shared problems, such as achieving sustained, noninflationary growth, lowering trade barriers among summit nations in high technology products, and restricting transfer of militarily significant technology to Soviet bloc countries.

In addition, the report identifies 18 new projects for international cooperation. The U.S. has proposed five of them and will serve as the lead country for their implementation. These are high energy physics, remote sensing from space, solar system exploration, fast breeder reactors, and controlled thermonuclear fusion.

The work was carried out under the auspices of the Personal Representatives of the heads of state and government that meet at the annual economic summit. Dr. George A. Keyworth, Science Adviser to the President and Director of the Office of Science and Technology Policy, served as the U.S. Representative for this activity and John M. Marcum, his Assistant Director for Energy and Natural Resources, served as the Alternate U.S. Representative.

Mental health counselors provide 50 percent of the mental health services delivered in this country. They work with adults and children whose self-doubts or distorted perceptions of the world interfere with their capacities to fulfill their obligations or to enjoy the pleasures that life can offer. They work with the chronically mentally ill, the depressed, the suicidal, the anxious, the phobic, the juvenile delinquent, the abused, and the deprived.

Through utilization of individual and group counseling techniques, mental health counselors help individuals to develop self-understanding, make life decisions, and adjust to the everyday demands of a complex world.

Mental health counselors apply skills gained through years of education and training in a multitude of settings -- hospitals, community agencies, clinics, and in the private practice sector. They play an important role in our Nation's health care system.

In recognition of their service in behalf of others to save lives and reduce suffering, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 35, has designated the week beginning March 20, 1983, as National Mental Health Counselors Week, and has requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of that week.

The strength of America lies in our free enterprise system, and the spirit of our great Nation grows out of the richness of our diverse cultural heritage and the hard work and convictions of our citizens.

Americans who have come to this land from Asian and Pacific countries have overcome great adversity and supreme challenges to make outstanding contributions to our Nation's progress in a wide range of fields -- science, the arts, medicine, law, literature, agriculture, industry, commerce, and government.

As we celebrate the accomplishments of Asian and Pacific Americans, we are grateful to them for bringing to our shores the strong and varied traditions of their homelands and for greatly enriching our culture and our institutions. We appreciate and value their presence and treasure their enduring commitment to the unalienable right to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness.

As I'm sure you heard, the majority in the House of Representatives passed its budget resolution this week. Since the vote on that budget was announced by those who supported it, they've proclaimed it a great victory over me. You, the people, are treated as mere spectators in the contest. But you weren't. You were down on the field very much in that game. And if those proposals ever become law, you'll find you're on the losing team.

Let me remind you what lies at the heart of that liberal budget -- a $315 billion tax increase over the next 5 years, falling squarely on the backs of you who work and earn to support your families and pay the government's bills. It's not just a coincidence that that $315 billion they want to raise would require canceling the third year of your tax cut, due in July, and tax indexing.

Indexing is an historic reform that'll put an end to bracket creep. The unfair thing about our present income tax system is that it's based on the number of dollars you earn, not their value. As you earn a greater number of dollars, you're pushed into a higher tax bracket, and the government takes a higher percentage of your paycheck, even though you might only be receiving a cost-of-living raise to stay even with inflation.

How can those who talk so much about fairness and compassion turn around and take away the third year of your tax cut and the indexing? How can they justify hitting the median-income family with a $3,550 tax increase over the next 5 years? How can they pretend to help you cope with your bills, put money aside for education, and save for your retirement when they're reaching deeper and deeper into your pockets?

They can't. And they won't, if we don't let them. It's not right for them to overtax you just so they can spend more. And they do want to spend more -- a lot more. Their budget would cancel virtually all the savings we've made in the last 2 years. It would turn back the clock to the high inflation, high interest rate nightmare of 1980 by giving a green light to at least 10 brand new government spending programs. At the same time, it would allow a program of crucial importance to our senior citizens -- Medicare -- to go bankrupt. It would wipe out our initiatives to reduce food stamp waste, despite documented evidence that food stamp rip-off artists plunder the system and cost taxpayers hundreds of millions of dollars a year.

In all, the liberal alternative budget would approve nearly $200 billion in additional inflationary spending. Make no mistake, this money cannot be retrieved and the deficit reduced, as they claim, by slashing defense spending authority by more than $200 billion. Once you begin reducing personnel in our armed services, closing down aircraft plants, decommissioning ships, fighter squadrons, and one weapons program after another, you not only gamble with America's security, you create a new army of unemployed. And that means the deficit would go up, not down.

It's this simple: If you liked the 21-percent prime interest rate, 18-percent mortgage rates, double-digit inflation, and sky-is-the-limit tax increases of 2 years ago, you'll love their budget, because that's what it would bring back. Those who fought to get this budget passed are the same people who began saying our economic program had failed almost the day it was passed. That was more than a year ago, and much of our tax reduction program is still not in place today. But more and more evidence is coming in that proves America is on the mend and recovery has definitely begun.

Last Monday the Commerce Department estimated that during these first 3 months of 1983, our economy will grow at an annual rate of 4 percent. And we believe the recovery will pick up strength as the year goes on. The double-digit inflation of 1980, which drove up costs and robbed you of your earnings, has been knocked all the way down to four-tenths of 1 percent in the last 6 months -- the lowest 6-month rate in 22 years. This February consumer prices actually declined for only the second time since 1965. The first time was in December.

Those towering interest rates which closed factory gates and industries like autos and steel, leveled the housing industry, and brought so many small businesses to their knees have now been knocked down themselves. The prime rate was 21\1/2\ percent in 1980; today it's down to 10\1/2\. I believe interest rates can, should, and will go lower.

Together we still have time to beat back the unfair tax increases, hold the line on spending, and keep America strong. If you can't make the big spenders see the light, you can make them feel the heat. Please tell your Representatives not to turn back the clock and squander America's future.

Could I just volunteer that a lot of the speculation that I've been reading, however, is -- yes, we've been in consultation -- as we promised from the very first in this administration that we would be on everything with our NATO allies -- but there has been no change in my position or ultimate goal.

Q. Okay. All right. Regardless of what you tell us tomorrow, it seems like judging from your past statements and the statements of some of your advisers, any sort of a deal would involve the dismantling of some SS - 20's on the part of the Soviet Union. Is there any reason to believe the Soviets are at all interested in that sort of a deal? Could Mr. Andropov get his generals to buy off on that sort of an arrangement?

The President. Well, there is one thing you have to remember: that, as they themselves made public, that while they made a proposal that we could not find acceptable, it was based on their making a sizable reduction in the number of their missiles.

The President. Yes. I've seen these remarks, also, as to the return to a cold war. We remain in communication with them. And the very fact that we're sitting in three separate negotiating tables with them on three different subjects of disarmament -- I don't think there's anything particularly new in the rhetoric that was used by Andropov and has been used by other Russian leaders before him. In the United States, we have to be used to being called ``imperialists'' and several other things and charges made that we're trying to seek some advantage or something. I don't think there's really been any escalation of that at all.

Q. Of course, sir, some critics would say there has been escalation on your part in recent speeches, in calling the Soviet Union an ``evil empire,'' and in some of the language that you've used. Do you think that's done any harm in the effort to reach an agreement with the Soviet Union?

The President. No. I think the thing that I said in speaking to that audience was that in pointing out, on the basis of the comparison of our two social structures, the traditions, and what our ideologies were, that in contrast to what we viewed as proper -- religious freedom and even belief in religion and in a God -- as contrasted to their own anti-religious position, their own refusal to believe in individual rights and so forth. I didn't think that there were many polemics in that particular message.

Q. Mr. President, back to the interim proposal that you're going to make tomorrow. Without asking you to reveal the details further, I'd like to ask a little bit about how we got there, because as recently as your last press conference in the East Room, which was the 16th of February, you rather firmly rejected any idea of an interim proposal. Both Larry Barrett [Time Inc. correspondent] and I asked you questions, and you indicated that you did not at all intend to make any new proposal; that if there was an interim proposal, it would have to come from the other side. What's changed to lead you to change that?

The President. Well, I think when you refer back in that other question, the way it came at the time had to do with asking things that would have required me to state in advance negotiating positions. And I've had a lot of years experience in negotiating. Before I was ever in public life, I negotiated for about a quarter of a century the basing contracts of our union, the Screen Actors Guild, with management. And you can't talk about negotiating positions, because if you do, then they're no longer positions; you've compromised your own strategy. And this is what caused me, and has caused me in the past, to make answers about -- that you're really making the answer with the knowledge that the other fellow is going to read it or hear it.

Press Club, public, the first statement about the zero-zero option, I very specifically said that we would negotiate in good faith on any legitimate proposal. Now, we had stated our goal and what it was that we would like to have. But I made that other statement deliberately so that it would not be taken by -- everyone has, well, a complete take-it or leave-it proposition. In that instance, then, there is no negotiation. They either give in or you go home.

Q. On that same subject, Mr. President, do you subscribe to the view held by some European leaders and by some in your own administration that the Russians won't bargain in earnest until we deploy the Pershing and cruise missiles in Europe?

The President. Well, I believe one of our problems in the past and why, during the period -- a decade or so in the seventies -- when we were unilaterally disarming and they were at fever pitch in the rebuilding or the building of probably the greatest buildup of military strength in world history, that one of the reasons why there was no prospect -- if you will remember, President Carter sent his Secretary of State to make an arms reduction proposal in Moscow, and he was home in 48 hours. And I have always felt that there's no reason for the other side to negotiate if they're out ahead and we are apparently disarming ourselves without asking any compensatory reduction on their part. And I believe that the reason we have three negotiating teams now at three different tables negotiating with them has been our determination over these little more than 2 years to refurbish our own military.

And I've said before -- I think it was summed up in a cartoon about the late Leonid Brezhnev when he was cartooned in one of your publications. The cartoonist had him speaking to a Russian general, and he said, ``I liked the arms race better when we were the only ones in it.'' I think that you have to -- if you're going to negotiate -- you have to have some strength on your side. You have to have some reason for them to look at and weigh the value of reducing their own weaponry.

But no, I made it plain that we are going to continue, and I am determined to continue doing everything I can to persuade them that legitimate arms reduction is the only path to follow. To look down to an endless future with both of us sitting here with these horrible missiles aimed at each other and the only thing preventing a holocaust is just so long as no one pulls the trigger -- this is unthinkable.

Q. But what would you expect the Soviets to do in this period while we are developing this weapon? They're not just going to sit idly by and let the United States make itself invulnerable to their missiles.

The President. I've just been reading a collection of them over there. There have been charges that this was a smoke screen on my part to avoid a discussion of the arms buildup. Some of them have charged that in my speech the other night on television, that I did not give any facts, that I obscured the truth. Well, I think those charts were pretty factual and based on actual count and actual figures.

Other statements -- that I was proposing something that never was and never could be a defensive weapon. And I had to remember that Vannevar Bush, one of our truly great scientists was asked by President Eisenhower with regard to the feasibility of creating a missile in which the delivery of an atomic weapon could be by missile. And this great scientist, after his own study, said to the President that the image of a missile that could be launched from a silo, pre-targeted on a target on another continent, just was an impossibility and could never happen.

Well today, the thing we're talking about are thousands of those on both sides of the ocean, targeted on each other. And so for someone to say that what I was talking about was a fairytale -- they even used that term -- that it could never take place, I think is irresponsible.

Q. Mr. President, can I ask you just one question about that program that you announced last week? The cost of it -- everybody seems to be sort of moving around it. Nobody's really getting into what it's going to cost. If we spend a billion dollars, we don't know what it's going to cost in the out-years.

One, do you know what it's going to cost in the next few years or what kind of money has been put aside for it? And two, because of the trouble you've been having on the Hill with the defense budget as it is being too high, why should the Congress go along with approving a program like this that's going to cost a lot more money, presumably? Do you have a cost figure on it?

The President. No, because first of all, this is not a crash program. There, I think you would have to have -- well, a crash program was the development of the atom bomb in wartime. I have said I don't know how long this would take. I don't know in what direction that research would go. To all of those who also editorialized that this was truly ``outer space'' and so forth, I don't know. I'm not a scientist.

The President. Yes. Well, we already have about a billion dollars that is in the budget for research in the defense budget now, and some of that would be diverted to this research. Now, you would have to see what direction this took and what was needed to further that research. But I don't think that it would be the tremendous immediate cost that a crash program would be.

Q. You mentioned just a minute ago, Mr. President, that some future President might have the option of providing this defensive weapon to the Soviets if he so chose. What about some sort of an interim arrangement now? Do you think there's any merit to the idea of some sort of a joint venture where the United States might be willing to share the research data on this system with the Soviets to reduce any chance of escalating tensions in this area?

The President. I have to tell you, I haven't given that any thought. That's something to think about and look at. And incidentally, Gary, as for our defense budget being too high, I think your paper editorialized that it isn't.

Q. Well, that may be, sir, but the Congress has to vote on it. And I'm still curious on what you think the congressional reaction will be to a program like this that some have said, including the Speaker and others, that it's ``pie in the sky.'' Why should we vote for funding for a program like this? They're going to be called on to do it, and you can propose it, but they may dispose of it as fast as you do that.

The President. Well, I would assume that it would take the same place in the budget. It would be part of the -- in every defense budget there is a sum, as I've said before, there's already in this one about a billion dollars in various research, and it's just a case, then, of the direction of the research and where you direct it to go.

Q. Mr. President, could we move on to another area -- Central America? You've consistently refused to discuss reports of covert U.S. aid to antigovernment forces in Nicaragua. In recent days, a number of our allies have indicated at the U.N. that they believe the United States is working to overthrow the Nicaraguan Government. My question is, why don't you either acknowledge or deny these reports of U.S. activity? Aren't you in danger of losing credibility in the same way that the U.S. Government did with its secret war in Cambodia?

The President. Well, I think this is something -- intelligence matters and covert or overt activity, whatever, are things that are never discussed, and I'm not going to discuss them now. But we have tried to get along with the Government of Nicaragua and tried from the first. As a matter of fact, they had in these efforts some time ago, when the new revolutionary government was installed, they made pledges to us that they would not involve themselves in El Salvador. And we found them in direct violation of that which they could not deny -- that they were arming the guerrillas in El Salvador.

Now, what we're seeing in Nicaragua is the fact that it was a revolution by a coalition of groups that were all opposed to the dictatorial Somoza rule. And as happens so often in that kind of a coalition, when the revolution was over, one faction -- and it turned out to be the extreme leftist faction -- simply took control and ousted the other revolutionary partners and created a Marxist-Leninist government, openly acknowledging their ties to Cuba and the Soviet Union, openly arming and providing weapons and supplies and training to the guerrillas in El Salvador.

Q. Sir, but my question was don't you think that the recent events at the U.N. in which our allies have indicated that they don't believe that we are not involved and this continued proliferation of reports from the area that say that there is some involvement, isn't this damaging the credibility of the U.S. Government?

The President. I don't think so, because some of the few allies who have been critical of this -- others of them understand very well what's going on in El Salvador and all -- but some of the others have even been critical of what we're doing in El Salvador. We have made every effort to point out to them that they've been subjected to quite a wave of worldwide propaganda based on the Salvadoran conflict. And I think we have convinced a number of them that what we're doing is valid.

The President. Yes, and this was not one of the three I was thinking of. I was thinking of START, the INF, and then our negotiation on conventional weapons. But yes, we had proposed some improvements to the testing treaty and so forth, and they rejected our proposals.

The President. It isn't all that important, because the treaty as it is now -- and this is what we want to strengthen -- is so restricted as to verification that we have reason to believe that there have been numerous violations. And yet, because of the lack of verification capacity, we could not make such a charge and sustain it. We just were wanting to improve it so that maybe both sides could be sure.

Domenici, saying while you couldn't promise anything, you might be willing to show some flexibility on defense after the Easter break. The House has cut real growth from 10 percent, in your proposal, to 4 percent. Domenici's people are talking about 7\1/2\ percent. They're talking about making a compromise with the House at 5 or 6 percent. Could you settle for that? Would that be flexible enough? Could you be flexible enough?

The President. I think it would be violating what the government is intended to do. The one prime responsibility of government is to protect the lives and freedom of its citizens. The budget we submitted, and the budget figure, we believed was the absolute minimum that was necessary to continue redressing our defensive capability which had been allowed to deteriorate so badly in the previous decade.

When I spoke to the Senators with regard to some flexibility, this was because we were still reviewing every possibility and some things that, without actually reducing our capability, that there might be some reason to believe that we could come up with a changed figure, not to the extent they're suggesting changing it. And I don't have the answer, and I can't comment yet.

We will by the time they come back, I think, know whether there is any flexibility or not. I was very careful not to make a promise, and whatever -- if we have been able to find this flexibility, we certainly will give them the figure on it.

Q. Just to follow up on that, couldn't -- this might be decided for you, in a sense, in that if the mood of the Congress is that we have to cut below the 10 percent, you're not going to have any choice, are you, sir?

The President. Well, I'm going to fight as hard as I can for what we've proposed in the line of a defense buildup. We could not go back down to those figures without reducing our readiness, reducing even the size of our military, the number of men, and without eliminating and cutting back on weapons systems that I believe are necessary.

Q. Can we switch back to domestic policy, Mr. President? I want to ask you about your support for withholding of interest and dividends. Stories are running around, or circulating, I should say, that the Republican leaders came down here last week and almost pleaded with you to bail out on that one. There are some stories to the effect that they told you that if you persist, and if you persist in vetoing it, that you'll lose an override vote. Is that what they said, and what's your reaction to that?

The President. Well, they were telling me the reaction that they were getting from many people, the mail count and so forth. We have to recognize that there was a very successful lobbying effort going on, still going on, for that matter. The truth of the matter is -- and I told them -- that probably the majority of the people that they were hearing from as opposed to this were people who were actually so mislead that they believed that either this was a new tax being imposed or that they were all going to be victimized in great losses in their interest and so forth. Well, it isn't a new tax. Interest and dividends are taxed now. We're only asking for withholding of this tax in order to close a gap through which people who legitimately owe a tax are able to avoid payment of that income tax.

Q. But, Mr. President, if it looked like you were going to lose on that fight -- you would veto it and it would be overridden -- would you agree to some other way to close that gap -- for instance, to hiring more IRS agents?

The President. Well, the thing is, before we ever came up with the proposal was when we explored all those ways, and the cost was so tremendous. It gets down in this age of computers to a really hand-to-hand, personal comparison of reports and so forth. We're talking anywhere from $5 billion to $7\1/2\ billion a year that is being lost.

But the other thing that the people don't realize yet -- and we're going to try to inform them as much as we can -- they don't realize that the bulk of these people who are protesting are not going to be affected. We're not withholding on the bulk of dividend and interest holdings because we have set a limit below which we don't go.

And where the senior citizens are concerned -- and they are very much concerned because so many of them now are counting on savings and so forth -- where they're concerned, they're not going to be affected at all. They're exempt. So, there's only a limited number of people.

Now, the other thing is this fear of some loss of return on their interest. Someone with $10,000 of savings and a 9-percent interest rate -- the withholding of their interest a little in advance, as this would do, thus maybe reducing the compound interest return, would amount to about $4.25 a year on a savings account of $10,000 at 9-percent interest.

The President. Well, I don't know. We've talked about all the things we can do. We're trying to refute this. I've been encouraged by some surveying that's been done that revealed that the people out there are more evenly split than they seem to realize. The only trouble is they're only hearing from one side. We're trying to get them to hear from the other side.

The President. No, I don't. And what I see as very necessary is that -- a perception that has been created, that is absolutely false. I will match this administration's record with regard to environmental matters against that of any other administration. And we have been far more successful. We're spending more money on parks and on acquisition of parks and so forth than the previous administration had spent in all its 4 years, in these 2 so far.

I think I'm one -- but the victim of those professionals in some of the various organizations who make me wonder sometimes whether they really want the problem solved or whether they haven't recognized that as long as they can keep the people impressed that there is a problem, their careers will go on.

Q. But utilities are really legal monopolies. There is no competition, so to speak. I mean, prices don't come down like they do for sugar or coffee or anything else. Would you be opposed to the legislation that is now going around on the Hill to postpone from 1985 to 1987 the decontrol of half the natural gas supply and also roll back the prices?

The President. No, we've made a proposal, and it's based on the fact that control resulted in increases. They weren't even depending on where the gas came from and so forth throughout the country. But there are something like some 28 different price levels in natural gas now, and the most recent increase for much of the country was 20 percent. And this is with controls.

Q. Without talking about your own re-election plans, do you think that it -- does it cause you any concern that this country has had a succession of Presidents who have not been reelected to a second term, the succession of one-term Presidents? Is that the cause of any concern, do you think?

I think it creates an instability. And it should be, the whole subject should be looked at. Having been 8 years as a Governor -- and this isn't in any way to tip off what I may or may not do, because it's going to have to depend on each individual and whether that individual thinks he can continue to be effective in the job. But you really can't in 4 years carry through programs that may be necessary.

Sec. 2. The Administrator of General Services is delegated authority, to the extent not prohibited by other laws, to conduct surveys, establish agency-wide objectives for work space use for each Executive agency, and establish procedures, guidelines and regulations to be followed by the agencies in developing the work space planning, information and reporting systems required by this Order.

Sec. 3. Administration. (a) The heads of the Executive agencies shall, to the extent permitted by law, provide the Commission with such information as may be necessary for the effective performance of its functions.

Last week, when I addressed the American people on this administration's defense program, I expressed our determination to reduce our reliance on the terrible power of nuclear weapons to assure the peace. And today I want to say a few words about this critical aspect of our security policy -- our efforts to drastically reduce the arsenals which burden the lives of our own citizens, of our friends and allies, and, yes, of our adversaries as well.

As you know, over the last year and a half, this administration has undertaken a comprehensive and far-reaching arms control program designed to achieve deep reductions in nuclear arms, to rid the world of chemical weapons, and to cut the size of conventional forces in Europe. I'll be saying more about these initiatives in a speech tomorrow, but this morning let me focus on one of these negotiations.

I have just met with the Ambassadors of the countries of the North Atlantic alliance. We invited them here because the citizens of their countries share with Americans a profound hope for success in the Geneva negotiations on intermediate-range nuclear missiles.

The forces being discussed in the INF negotiations directly affect the security of our allies. As I told you last week, the Soviet Union has deployed hundreds of powerful, new SS - 20 missiles, armed with multiple warheads and capable of striking the cities and defense installations of our allies in Europe, and of our friends and allies in Asia as well. The Soviets have built up these forces even though there's been no comparable threat from NATO. They've deployed them without letup; there now are more than 350 SS - 20 missiles, with more than a thousand nuclear warheads. NATO will begin deploying a specific deterrent to this threat late this year, unless, as we hope, an agreement to eliminate such weapons would make this deployment unnecessary.

The United States, with the full support of our allies, has been negotiating in Geneva for more than a year to persuade the Soviet Union that it is a far better course for both of us to agree to eliminate totally this entire category of weapons. Such an agreement would be fair and far-reaching. It would enhance the security of the Soviet Union as well as the security of NATO.

So far, the Soviet Union has resisted this proposal and has failed to come up with a serious alternative. They insist on preserving their present monopoly on these weapons. Under their latest proposal, the Soviets would retain almost 500 warheads on their SS - 20 missiles in Europe alone and hundreds more in the Far East, while we would continue to have zero. Their proposal would actually leave them with more SS - 20 missiles than they had when the talks began in 1981. In addition, the Soviets have launched a propaganda campaign aimed apparently at dividing America from our allies and our allies from each other.

From the opening of these negotiations nearly 18 months ago, I have repeatedly urged the Soviets to respond to our zero-zero proposal with a proposal of their own. I've also repeated our willingness to consider any serious alternative proposal. Their failure to make such a proposal is a source of deep disappointment to all of us who've wished that these weapons might be eliminated, or at least significantly reduced. But I do not intend to let this shadow that has been cast over the Geneva negotiations further darken our search for peace.

When it comes to intermediate nuclear missiles in Europe, it would be better to have none than to have some. But if there must be some, it is better to have few than to have many. If the Soviets will not now agree to the total elimination of these weapons, I hope that they will at least join us in an interim agreement that would substantially reduce these forces to equal levels on both sides.

To this end, Ambassador Paul Nitze has informed his Soviet counterpart that we are prepared to negotiate an interim agreement in which the United States would substantially reduce its planned deployment of Pershing II and ground-launched cruise missiles, provided the Soviet Union reduce the number of its warheads on longer range INF missiles to an equal level on a global basis.

Ambassador Nitze has explained that the United States views this proposal as a serious initial step toward the total elimination of this class of weapons. And he has conveyed my hope that the Soviet Union will join us in this view. Our proposal for the entire elimination of these systems remains on the table.

Soviets have agreed to that, and talks will resume on May 17th. I hope this initiative will lead to an early agreement. We remain ready to explore any serious Soviet suggestions that meet the fundamental concerns which we have expressed.

I invited the NATO Ambassadors here today not only to review these developments but to express my appreciation for the firm support which the allies have given to our negotiating effort in Geneva. And I can assure them of my personal commitment to the closest possible consultations with them on the INF.

This consultative process has already proven one of the most intensive and productive in the history of the North Atlantic alliance. It's made the initiative announced today an alliance initiative in the best sense of that term. And over the past months, we and our allies have consulted intensively on the INF negotiations.

I have been in frequent and close contact with other heads of government. Vice President Bush had a very productive discussion with allied leaders on INF during his trip to Europe. Secretaries Shultz and Weinberger have exchanged views with their counterparts from allied governments.

The very thoughtful views expressed by the allies in these consultations have been of significant help in shaping this new initiative. This process is a model for how an alliance of free and democratic nations can and must work together on critical issues. It is the source of our unity and gives us a strength that no one can hope to match. And it gives me great confidence in the eventual success of our efforts in Geneva to create a safer -- safer world for all the Earth's people.

Kaunda of the Republic of Zambia. President Kaunda is no stranger to this house, nor to the people of the United States. As one of Africa's senior and most respected statesmen, he plays an admirable role in international events.

Namibia. As the leader of one of the frontline states, his counsel and his experience are highly valued during these crucial negotiations. We share a common commitment for the prompt implementation of United Nations Security Council Resolution 435 and look forward to the day when we can celebrate a free and independent Namibia.

Mr. President, we also recognize and applaud your tireless efforts for peace and regional stability in Africa. Your special attention to African unity and to the organization that gives concrete expression to that concept is greatly admired here. The Organization of African Unity is indispensable to the pursuit of stability and development throughout Africa.

I know that your own country, Zambia, is suffering severe economic hardship as a result of the depressed prices of your primary export commodities. The United States itself is now emerging from a long period of economic uncertainty. We are convinced that our recovery will lead to a healthier world economy and should strengthen demand for Zambian and other producers' minerals.

In the meantime, we support the emphasis that you're placing on developing the agricultural sector of your economy. We're proud to have cooperated with you in that development. Our strong bilateral relationship will be maintained and will evolve as we continue to work together.

President Kaunda. I am delighted to have this opportunity to express, on behalf of my delegation and on my own behalf, our profound gratitude to President Reagan for inviting me to visit the United States at this time. It is a pleasure to be here once again.

We appreciate immensely the warm hospitality which the President and his people have accorded us since our arrival in this beautiful city yesterday. The friendly reception which has been given to us is a reflection of the good relations which happily exist between our two countries and peoples.

I want to particularly thank the President for the discussions which have just ended. These have gone on very well. We have covered a wide range of issues, including Zambia-U.S. relations, southern Africa, the Middle East, and world peace and security. We are both happy at the state of our bilateral relations, which are warm. Both President Reagan and I recognize the need to continue to consolidate and strengthen the ties that exist between our two countries, for we believe that it is in the interests of our countries to develop further these relations.

As might have been expected, our discussions on problems of South Africa and Namibia were extensive. We share an abhorrence of the apartheid system which is being practiced in South Africa. We are both of the view that an early end to this system will be good for peace, stability, and rich harmony in the southern African region.

On Namibia, I have explained to President Reagan how we in Zambia see the solution to the problem in that country. I have also listened very carefully to President Reagan's views on the problem. We both believe that this is a serious problem to which an early solution is imperative.

States. We are concerned about the continuing absence of peace and stability in the area. We hope that solutions can be found that can lead to durable peace and security in that important area of the world.

Let me once again thank you, Mr. President, for the generous hospitality which you have extended to us. I hope that the discussions we have had will form a strong foundation on which to build our future relations.

Last week, I spoke to the American people about our plans for safeguarding this nation's security and that of our allies. And I announced a long-term effort in scientific research to counter someday the menace of offensive nuclear missiles. What I have proposed is that nations should turn their best energies to moving away from the nuclear nightmare. We must not resign ourselves to a future in which security on both sides depends on threatening the lives of millions of innocent men, women, and children. And today, I would like to discuss another vital aspect of our national security: our efforts to limit and reduce the danger of modern weaponry.

We live in a world in which total war would mean catastrophe. We also live in a world that's torn by a great moral struggle between democracy and its enemies, between the spirit of freedom and those who fear freedom.

In the last 15 years or more, the Soviet Union has engaged in a relentless military buildup, overtaking and surpassing the United States in major categories of military power, acquiring what can only be considered an offensive military capability. All the moral values which this country cherishes -- freedom, democracy, the right of peoples and nations to determine their own destiny, to speak and write, to live and worship as they choose -- all these basic rights are fundamentally challenged by a powerful adversary which does not wish these values to survive.

The Western commitment to peace through strength has given Europe its longest period of peace in a century. We cannot conduct ourselves as if the special danger of nuclear weapons did not exist. But we must not allow ourselves to be paralyzed by the problem, to abdicate our moral duty. This is the challenge that history has left us.

We of the 20th century who so pride ourselves on mastering even the forces of nature -- except last week when the Queen was here -- [laughter] -- we're forced to wrestle with one of the most complex moral challenges ever faced by any generation. Now, my views about the Soviet Union are well known, although, sometimes I don't recognize them when they're played back to me.

Since the end of World War II the United States has been the leader in the international effort to negotiate nuclear arms limitations. In 1946, when the United States was the only country in the world possessing these awesome weapons, we did not blackmail others with threats to use them, nor did we use our enormous power to conquer territory, to advance our position, or to seek domination. Doesn't our record alone refute the charge that we seek superiority, that we represent a threat to peace?

We proposed the Baruch plan for international control of all nuclear weapons and nuclear energy, for everything nuclear to be turned over to an international agency. And this was rejected by the Soviet Union. Several years later, in 1955, President Eisenhower presented his ``open skies'' proposal, that the United States and the Soviet Union would exchange blueprints of military establishments and permit aerial reconnaissance to ensure against the danger of surprise attack.

Test Ban Treaty prohibited nuclear testing in the atmosphere, in outer space, or under water. The creation of the ``Hot Line'' in 1963, upgraded in 1971, provides direct communication between Washington and Moscow to avoid miscalculation during a crisis. The Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty of 1968 sought to prevent the spread of nuclear weapons. In 1971 we reached an agreement on special communication procedures to safeguard against accidental or unauthorized use of nuclear weapons and on a seabed arms control treaty, which prohibits the placing of nuclear weapons on the seabed of the ocean floor. The Strategic Arms Limitation Agreements of 1972 imposed limits on antiballistic missile systems and on numbers of strategic, offensive missiles. And the 1972 Biological Warfare Convention bans -- or was supposed to ban -- the development, production, and stockpiling of biological and toxin weapons.

The American people had hoped, by these measures, to reduce tensions and start to build a constructive relationship with the Soviet Union. Instead, we have seen Soviet military arsenals continue to grow in virtually every significant category. We've seen the Soviet Union project its power around the globe. We've seen Soviet resistance to significant reductions and measures of effective verification, especially the latter. And, I'm sorry to say, there have been increasingly serious grounds for questioning their compliance with the arms control agreements that have already been signed and that we've both pledged to uphold. I may have more to say on this in the near future.

Coming into office, I made two promises to the American people about peace and security. I promised to restore our neglected defenses, in order to strengthen and preserve the peace, and I promised to pursue reliable agreements to reduce nuclear weapons. Both these promises are being kept.

Today, not only the peace but also the chances for real arms control depend on restoring the military balance. We know that the ideology of the Soviet leaders does not permit them to leave any Western weakness unprobed, any vacuum of power unfilled. It would seem that to them negotiation is only another form of struggle. Yet, I believe the Soviets can be persuaded to reduce their arsenals -- but only if they see it's absolutely necessary. Only if they recognize the West's determination to modernize its own military forces will they see an incentive to negotiate a verifiable agreement establishing equal, lower levels. And, very simply, that is one of the main reasons why we must rebuild our defensive strength.

All of our strategic force modernization has been approved by the Congress except for the land-based leg of the Triad. We expect to get congressional approval on this final program later this spring. A strategic forces modernization program depends on a national, bipartisan consensus.

Over the last decade, four successive administrations have made proposals for arms control and modernization that have become embroiled in political controversy. No one gained from this divisiveness; all of us are going to have to take a fresh look at our previous positions. I pledge to you my participation in such a fresh look and my determination to assist in forging a renewed, bipartisan consensus.

My other national security priority on assuming office was to thoroughly reexamine the entire arms control agenda. Since then, in coordination with our allies, we've launched the most comprehensive program of arms control initiatives ever undertaken. Never before in history has a nation engaged in so many major simultaneous efforts to limit and reduce the instruments of war.

Last month in Geneva the Vice President committed the United States to negotiate a total and verifiable ban on chemical weapons. Such inhumane weapons, as well as toxin weapons, are being used in violation of international law in Afghanistan, in Laos, and Kampuchea.

We have recently proposed to the Soviet Union a series of further measures to reduce the risk of war from accident or miscalculation. And we're considering significant new measures resulting in part from consultations with several distinguished Senators.

We've joined our allies in proposing a Conference on Disarmament in Europe. On the basis of a balanced outcome of the Madrid meeting, such a conference will discuss new ways to enhance European stability and security.

We have proposed to the Soviet Union improving the verification provisions of two agreements to limit underground nuclear testing, but, so far, the response has been negative. We will continue to try.

And, most importantly, we have made far-reaching proposals, which I will discuss further in a moment, for deep reductions in strategic weapons and for elimination of an entire class of intermediate-range weapons.

In all these negotiations certain basic principles guide our policy. First, our efforts to control arms should seek reductions on both sides -- significant reductions. Second, we insist that arms control agreements be equal and balanced. Third, arms control agreements must be effectively verifiable.

We cannot gamble with the safety of our people and the people of the world. Fourth, we recognize that arms control is not an end in itself, but a vital part of a broad policy designed to strengthen peace and stability. It's with these firm principles in mind that this administration has approached negotiations on the most powerful weapons in the American and Soviet arsenals -- strategic nuclear weapons.

Reduction Talks, what we call START. We've sought to work out an agreement reducing the levels of strategic weapons on both sides. I proposed reducing the number of ballistic missiles by one-half and the number of warheads by one-third. No more than half the remaining warheads could be on land-based missiles. This would leave both sides with greater security at equal and lower levels of forces. Not only would this reduce numbers; it would also put specific limits on precisely those types of nuclear weapons that pose the most danger.

But -- and this is important -- they have accepted the concept of reductions. Now, I expect this is because of the firm resolve that we have demonstrated. In the current round of negotiations, we've presented them with the basic elements of a treaty for comprehensive reductions in strategic arsenals. The United States also has, in START, recently proposed a draft agreement on a number of significant measures to build confidence and reduce the risks of conflict. This negotiation is proceeding under the able leadership of Ambassador Edward Romney on our side -- Edward Rowny, I should say, is on our side.

This major shift in the European military balance prompted our West European allies themselves to propose that NATO find a means of righting the balance. And in December of '79, they announced a collective two-track decision. First, to deploy in Western Europe 572 land-based cruise missiles and Pershing II ballistic missiles, capable of reaching the Soviet Union. The purpose: to offset and deter the Soviet SS - 20's. The first of these NATO weapons are scheduled for deployment by the end of this year. Second, to seek negotiations with the Soviet Union for the mutual reduction of these intermediate-range missiles.

In November of 1981 the United States, in concert with our allies, made a sweeping new proposal: NATO would cancel its own deployment if the Soviets eliminated theirs. The Soviet Union refused and set out to intensify public pressures in the West to block the NATO deployment, which has not even started. Meanwhile, the Soviet weapons continue to grow in number.

Our proposal was not made on a take-it-or-leave-it basis. We're willing to consider any Soviet proposal that meets these standards of fairness. An agreement must establish equal numbers for both Soviet and American intermediate-range nuclear forces. Other countries' nuclear forces, such as the British and French, are independent and are not part of the bilateral U.S.-Soviet negotiations. They are, in fact, strategic weapons, and the Soviet strategic arsenal more than compensates for them. Next, an agreement must not shift the threat from Europe to Asia. Given the range in mobility of the SS - 20's, meaningful limits on these and comparable American systems must be global. An agreement must be effectively verifiable. And an agreement must not undermine NATO's ability to defend itself with conventional forces.

Soviet delegation of a new American proposal which has the full support of our allies. We're prepared to negotiate an interim agreement to reduce our planned deployment if the Soviet Union will reduce their corresponding warheads to an equal level. This would include all U.S. and Soviet weapons of this class, wherever they're located.

Our offer of zero on both sides will, of course, remain on the table as our ultimate goal. At the same time, we remain open -- as we have been from the very outset -- to serious counterproposals. The Soviet negotiators have now returned to Moscow, where we hope our new proposal will receive careful consideration during the recess. Ambassador Nitze has proposed and the Soviets have agreed that negotiations resume in mid-May, several weeks earlier than scheduled.

I'm sorry that the Soviet Union, so far, has not been willing to accept the complete elimination of these systems on both sides. The question I now put to the Soviet Government is: If not elimination, to what equal level are you willing to reduce? The new proposal is designed to promote early and genuine progress at Geneva.

For arms control to be truly complete and world security strengthened, however, we must also increase our efforts to halt the spread of nuclear arms. Every country that values a peaceful world order must play its part.

Our allies, as important nuclear exporters, also have a very important responsibility to prevent the spread of nuclear arms. To advance this goal, we should all adopt comprehensive safeguards as a condition for nuclear supply commitments that we make in the future. In the days ahead, I'll be talking to other world leaders about the need for urgent movement on this and other measures against nuclear proliferation.

We Americans are sometimes an impatient people. I guess it's a symptom of our traditional optimism, energy, and spirit. Often, this is a source of strength. In a negotiation, however, impatience can be a real handicap. Any of you who've been involved in labor-management negotiations or any kind of bargaining know that patience strengthens your bargaining position. If one side seems too eager or desperate, the other side has no reason to offer a compromise and every reason to hold back, expecting that the more eager side will cave in first.

Generosity in negotiation has never been a trademark of theirs. It runs counter to the basic militancy of Marxist-Leninist ideology. So, it's vital that we show patience, determination, and above all, national unity. If we appear to be divided, if the Soviets suspect that domestic political pressure will undercut our position, they'll dig in their heels. And that can only delay an agreement and may destroy all hope for an agreement.

The freeze concept is dangerous for many reasons. It would preserve today's high, unequal, and unstable levels of nuclear forces, and, by so doing, reduce Soviet incentives to negotiate for real reductions.

It would pull the rug out from under our negotiators in Geneva, as they have testified. After all, why should the Soviets negotiate if they've already achieved a freeze in a position of advantage to them?

Also, some think a freeze would be easy to agree on, but it raises enormously complicated problems of what is to be frozen, how it is to be achieved and, most of all, verified. Attempting to negotiate these critical details would only divert us from the goal of negotiating reductions for who knows how long.

Our B - 52 bombers are older than many of the pilots who fly them. If they were automobiles, they'd qualify as antiques. A freeze could lock us into obsolescence. It's asking too much to expect our service men and women to risk their lives in obsolete equipment. The 2 million patriotic Americans in the armed services deserve the best and most modern equipment to protect them and us.

I'm sure that every President has dreamt of leaving the world a safer place than he found it. I pledge to you, my goal -- and I consider it a sacred trust -- will be to make progress toward arms reductions in every one of the several negotiations now underway.

I call on all Americans of both parties and all branches of government to join in this effort. We must not let our disagreements or partisan politics keep us from strengthening the peace and reducing armaments.

To the leaders and people of the Soviet Union, I say, join us in the path to a more peaceful, secure world. Let us vie in the realm of ideas, on the field of peaceful competition. Let history record that we tested our theories through human experience, not that we destroyed ourselves in the name of vindicating our way of life. And let us practice restraint in our international conduct, so that the present climate of mistrust can some day give way to mutual confidence and a secure peace.

This is the goal, my fellow Americans, of all the democratic nations -- a goal that requires firmness, patience, and understanding. If the Soviet Union responds in the same spirit, we're ready. And we can pass on to our posterity the gift of peace -- that and freedom are the greatest gifts that one generation can bequeath to another.

I am optimistic that the Senate will ratify him. He is an excellent choice. He does have the knowledge and experience and ability that we need, and he is highly respected in diplomatic circles. And I just think that since the biggest thing that they could ever find out against him in the committee was that somebody wrote him a letter and they didn't like the letter -- he didn't write it, he received it. [Laughter] And I think he should be ratified, and I'm looking forward to it.

Mr. Haddad. Thank you. The gentleman says in view of the delay of agreement or of the Soviets on arms control, wouldn't it be better for the President to declare his intention to run for office again earlier?

The President. Well, I can't give a very specific answer to that. I can only say that, you know, if too early you become a lameduck and then you can't get anything done -- and if the answer is one way. And if the answer is the other way, then everything you try to do is viewed as being political and part of a campaign.

The trouble is, some of the leaks are unfounded, or they're from people down in the bureaucracy someplace who only know a part of what they're leaking. Sometimes it is misinformation on, maybe, a memorandum of options that has been presented to the Cabinet and to the President.

We have actually had to do something in the line of explaining and apologizing when leaks that are absolutely fallacious, have brought a difference, a kind of confrontation between ourselves and some of our friends and allies in the world. And all we've proposed is methods of intercepting the leaks from the government, itself, to the press.

But I don't believe that we're making it difficult at all. As a matter of fact, I have increased the amount of time that I'm going to spend with the press. And we started last week on that, so that they will have greater access to me. And I just think that the press must recognize it, too, has a responsibility for the welfare of the Nation.

East -- that we cannot proceed with the general subject of overall peace for that troubled area until the forces that are in Lebanon get out, and the Lebanese Government is at last, after all these years, allowed to establish its own sovereignty over its own land. Lebanon has asked for this at the -- the Israelis are still in there, the Syrians are still with occupying forces, and there are elements of the PLO still there. And what we have sought is a withdrawal of these forces to their own borders. This is one of the reasons for the multinational forces being there, to help Lebanon maintain order while they bring this about, and then proceed at the negotiating table to take up the overall problems.

Very simply, what the whole goal of our plan is -- and it's being delayed until we can get this clearing of Lebanon -- the goal is to create more Egypts. Egypt and Israel were once at war, and they came together with a peace treaty and became friends there in the Middle East. I don't think that it's impossible to believe that among the Arab States there are other potential Israels and that -- my dream is that Israel can only know real security if it doesn't have to remain an armed camp far beyond what its size warrants, but could know the security of being surrounded by neighbors that recognize its right to exist as a nation and have signed peace treaties with them.

The President. You must realize that under the law -- the law exists now -- those weapons must be for defensive purposes. And this is, again, one of the obstacles presented by the stalemate in Lebanon. While these forces are in the position of occupying another country that now has asked them to leave, we are forbidden by law to release those planes. They're F - 16's, the planes that are on order. And it's as simple as the other forces returning to their own countries and letting Lebanon be Lebanon.

I think the relationship that we have with the countries of Western Europe now, between our government and theirs, is probably better and firmer than it's ever been. But it is true that there is a great counter-propaganda effort there trying to divide us from our allies, or divide them from us, and at the same time to prevent the deployment, the scheduled deployment of the Pershings and the cruise missiles versus the SS - 20's.

And we have -- this was part of the reason for Vice President Bush's trip there. We are using other measures. I don't know whether we can actually turn around some of the people that have organized, as they have here, in regard to the nuclear freeze and so forth. I understand they're planning over this weekend sizable demonstrations there.

There's one good thing about a political year, though. It's the chance to meet with so many of you who are not part of the permanent Washington establishment. And you should be commended for being part of the American Legion Auxiliary's Awareness Assembly and participating in the briefings that you'll be getting this week from government officials. But I hope that you'll keep in mind something that I've learned in the past few years. The conventional wisdom in this town isn't always on target.

Campaign.'' And that was taken at almost exactly this same time 4 years ago during the height of the Presidential primary season. Members of the Washington Press Club were asked to predict who would be the President of the United States in 1981. One candidate -- and I won't mention any names -- got 197 votes. Another got 65. And there were two others with 19 each. And then there was one other candidate whose vote total was so insignificant that it wasn't even reported.

When we came to Washington 3 years ago -- 3 years and a month or so ago -- we came having announced that we'd challenge the conventional wisdom and show that campaign promises could be kept. We wanted to reverse a domestic policy of tax and tax and spend and spend and end a foreign policy of watching the chances for peace with freedom, democracy, and dignity steadily retreat. So, one by one, we dealt with the critical problems that faced our people.

And on the foreign front, America is restoring her strength in words and in deeds. The decay in our military ships that couldn't leave port and aircraft that couldn't take off, a rapid deployment force that was neither rapid, deployable, or much of a force -- all of that's behind us now.

That same uniform that so many of your fathers, brothers, husbands, sons, and daughters brought such honor to is being worn today with pride by millions of young Americans. And all of you know far better than most how important it is that these young men and women, poised and ready, are equipped with the best that we can give them. Their readiness and resolve are the greatest guarantee that we have that our young people will never again see the face of battle, bear the burden of war that we've had to do in the past. There've been four wars in my lifetime. None of them started because America was too strong.

Across the globe, Soviet expansionism, once unchecked, has now been blunted. And for the first time in a long while, an American administration is leveling with the American people and the rest of the world about the crucial nature of the struggle between democracy and totalitarianism.

Yet even as we've been candid about our adversaries, we've pushed forward a series of negotiating initiatives which, I believe, will eventually lead to not just arms control but arms reductions. And we must continue working until that day arrives when nuclear weapons have been banished from the face of the Earth.

Three years then -- the direction of our domestic and foreign policies has been fundamentally changed. At the same time we were dealing with the pressing problems of our economy and national security, the problem of crime and the career criminal has remained among our top priorities. The 8-point program that I announced over a year ago is beginning to show some gratifying results.

Drug-related arrests are averaging a thousand a month and convictions 800 a month, and Federal law enforcement has taken out of circulation 2\1/3\ million pounds of illicit drugs and 20 million doses of prescription drugs. FBI organized crime convictions are up from 515 in fiscal '81 to 1,331 in 1983. After years of decline in our investigative forces, more than a thousand new investigators and 200 new prosecutors joined the fight last year against crime.

We've improved State and local cooperation through local law enforcement coordinating committees and the Justice Department's Governors Project. We've added prison space and improved training opportunities for local and State police. We've brought the FBI in on major drug cases. Our 12 new regional drug task forces are bringing in the big cases against major drug traffickers. And we've stepped up our educational efforts so we can take potential drug customers away from the dealers, because just reducing the supply of drugs isn't good enough. We can't solve the problem until we turn off the customers.

Our organized crime commission, headed by Judge Irving Kaufman, will put the menace of organized crime, well, where it belongs: front and center on the American agenda. Our goal is a frontal assault on criminal syndicates in America. We mean to cripple the mobsters' organization, dry up their profits, and put their members behind bars where they belong.

Through our victims of crime task force and the family violence task force, we have launched major initiatives to improve the treatment of innocent victims of crime and solve the problem of violence in American households.

Yet even all this progress -- progress we've won together -- hasn't satisfied some of the doomcriers who even now are saying that our country's on the wrong course. I just wish that those who were so pessimistic about America's future would remember the record of the last 3 years.

We have come a long way, and success is in sight. The 3-year record of this administration shows how dramatically we broke with the legacy of an awful, immediate past. This administration has a strong record, a hopeful record. It's open to scrutiny; we welcome it.

You know, there are old rules in politics -- for example, in a campaign year: Don't get over confident. President Dewey told me about that one. [Laughter] And then there's a very pertinent one, namely that the people don't want to hear so much about where we've been, but about where we're going; not so much about what's been done, but what needs to be done.

And the issue before the American people is the issue of the future. Will America return to the days of malaise and confusion? Will we go back to double-digit inflation, skyrocketing interest rates, and economic stagnation and decline? Will we return to self-delusion about our adversaries and retreat in the face of provocation and aggression, to the days of decaying defenses and shattered prestige? Or will we get on with the unfinished agenda of the eighties? This is the real issue before us.

Will we continue America's progress toward a strong economic recovery at home, a strong defense abroad, a return to discipline and excellence in our schools, a crackdown on criminal elements in our society, and a renaissance of traditional values?

Now, I'm sure you've heard some who are out of step with the American public on all these issues using words like ``fairness'' and ``compassion,'' possibly because they're stuck for something meaningful to say. I think it's time for these experts on fairness and compassion to answer a few questions.

And on another important constitutional amendment, favored overwhelmingly by the American people, will somebody get them to tell us why it is compassionate to deny schoolchildren a right even the Members of the United States Congress have and that is to open each day with a simple prayer?

And can they explain why they're so bitterly opposed to tuition tax credits and why they think it's fair for one parochial or private school parents to be forced to pay twice for their children's education?

And why these fairness experts and compassion crusaders have bottled up effective anticrime legislation on Capitol Hill for 2 years in a row? Where's the compassion in forgetting the victims of crime? What is fair about holding up urgently needed reform of our bail and parole systems, about refusing to revise the exclusionary rule or reinstitute the death penalty? The Senate has adopted a significant package of these very anticrime measures. Now it's time for the House to act.

And, you know, if I could interject something here, I mentioned the exclusionary rule, and I've discovered that a great many people aren't quite aware what we're talking about. We're talking about technicalities that are invoked in court to deny the introduction of legitimate evidence. And I'll give you an example. Happened in our own State of California several years ago. Two narcotics agents, based on evidence suggesting that a man and woman, living in a home there, were peddling heroin. They got from a judge a search warrant, legally and legitimately, to go in and search that house to see if they could find the heroin. Well, they searched, and they couldn't find it. And then, as they were leaving, on a hunch, one of them turned back to the baby in the crib and took off its diapers, and there was the heroin. The evidence was thrown out of court because the baby hadn't given its permission to be searched. That became known as the diaper case. And of course, the word was out, that's where you can hide heroin, and no one can touch you.

Well, I believe those who are so quick to find fault with what we and the American people have achieved during the past 3 years owe an accounting to the American people. Perhaps they can explain how under the guise of compassion and fairness those who once stood for the working people have now divorced themselves from the concerns of everyday Americans and turned themselves over to the trendy politics of the special interest groups. Maybe they could explain why they're opposed to tax cuts, to the balanced budget amendment, to the prayer amendment, to tuition tax credits, to anticrime legislation, to adequate defense spending.

I think the debate now getting underway in America is an especially important one, that these days are momentous ones for our country, that the choices we make will have much to do with the fate of freedom and prosperity for the rest of this century. And I've often thought that the worst legacy of those grim years at the end of the seventies was the loss of self-confidence by our leaders in our institutions and people. More than a few of those leaders openly blamed their own inadequacies on our system of government and on you, our people as a whole.

Well, the last 3 years have shown just how wrong they were, just how resourceful the American people still are, and just how resilient our system is, and how willing the heart of America remains. Those of you here today from, as I said, the heartlands know what I'm talking about.

Paris, some of the allied commanders doubted whether the green American troops were really up to the job. And then during a great offensive in the Argonne Forest, the allies and the enemy found out just how very quickly these young Americans -- they found out what they were made of.

You know far better than most how important this work is, how high the price of war really is, and how great the heartbreak that it brings. But you also know that an America, strong at home and strong abroad, will never again pay that price or know that heartbreak.

Only the strong are free, and peace comes only through strength. With your continued support and help we can keep America strong, free, prosperous, and at peace. America is moving forward again. Let's keep her there.

The President. Well, good afternoon. We've just had a meeting in the Oval Office. And I am delighted to welcome you all to the White House to witness the signing of our agreement on modernizing the Voice of America relay station in Tangier.

The Voice of America has been a strong voice for truth, and despite problems of antiquated equipment and Soviet jamming, the Voice of America has been able to spread its message of truth around the world.

Were it not for many years of neglect, the Voice of America could be heard more clearly by many more people around the globe. And that's why our administration has made the same kind of commitment to modernizing the Voice of America that President Eisenhower and President Kennedy brought to the space program. It's our firm commitment to Voice of America modernization which brings us here today.

Millions of people who long to hear the truth will benefit from this agreement. And by increasing the direct flow of information to the people and allowing them to make up their own minds about the major issues of the day, we'll be serving the cause of peace and human rights.

America's ties with Morocco go back more than 200 years -- long before the advent of international broadcasting. Our relations are warm and close, and we share many of the same values. The cooperation between our two countries is symbolized by this agreement. And I want to say how much I, as well as Ambassador Reed, Charles Wick, Ken Tomlinson, and others at the Voice of America appreciate the cooperative spirit that has characterized the negotiating between our two countries.

I would particularly like to express my gratitude to His Majesty, King Hassan II for his role in this negotiation. His involvement and wise counsel were critical to its successful conclusion, and we owe him a debt of gratitude.

The Convention would permit citizens of either nation who had been convicted in the courts of the other country to serve their sentences in their home country; in each case the consent of the offender as well as the approval of the authorities of the two Governments would be required.

This Convention is significant because it represents an attempt to resolve a situation which has inflicted substantial hardships on a number of citizens of each country and has caused concern to both Governments. The treaty is similar to those currently in force with Bolivia, Canada, Mexico, Panama, Peru, and Turkey. I recommend that the Senate give favorable consideration to this Convention at an early date.

We are pleased to announce today that the United States will assist the Government of Grenada in its efforts to complete the airport at Point Salines. Following a detailed feasibility study, commissioned by USAID, and after considering the Grenadian Government's request, the President determined that the airport is vital to the revival of Grenada's economy, which was left in shambles following 4\1/2\ years of mismanagement under the Cuban-supported Bishop regime.

Grenada, the President said that the United States is ``committed to the timely completion'' of the airport ``as quickly as possible.'' The airport is expected to boost tourism in Grenada, generating badly needed hard currency to enable the private sector oriented economy to revitalize itself.

While the United States plans to contribute a substantial part of the estimated $24 million to finish the project, other countries have indicated they are prepared to participate in the financing of the airport as well.

Personnel and Legislative Offices, and I also notice we've been joined by a few of the men on our staff. They do sort of stand out. [Laughter] But many thanks to Jim Baker for inviting all of you here.

And permit me to begin by giving each of you high praise and heartfelt thanks for all you've done for our Republican cause. Politics has its share of fun and glamour, but in the end it's sheer, unrelenting hard work from people like you that makes it possible for us to put our beliefs into practice. And the role you play is especially important because you demonstrate the Republican commitment to American women.

The GOP commitment to women runs deep, from its support of women suffrage to when it was first to elect a woman to the United States Congress and the only party to ever elect women to the United States Senate who were not first filling unexpired terms. Today, the two women in the Senate -- my friends, Nancy Kassebaum and Paula Hawkins -- are Republicans. And we have nine outstanding Republican women in the House of Representatives. Now, isn't it time we give them more company?

Public Liaison, Faith Whittlesey, and many other women on the White House staff who are with us today. And one of my proudest days in office was when I appointed Sandra Day O'Connor to be the first woman in history on the United States Supreme Court.

And just as we're eager to see the number of Republican women officeholders grow at the national level, we're determined to see those numbers grow in every American town, city, and State. And together, we Republicans are working to reshape America's destiny. Everyone who takes part, from stuffing envelopes to running for town council to holding national office, is making history.

And I know you're having briefings all day, but if I could just take a moment I'd like to give you an overview of some of our accomplishments. And if you've heard it before, please don't stop me -- [laughter] -- I enjoy saying it so much.

Just 3 years ago, we inherited a mess: soaring inflation and interest rates and declining productivity. And the month that I stood on the steps of the Capitol to take my oath of office, inflation was in double digits and the prime interest rate had hit the highest peak since the Civil War.

The economic crisis struck women hard. The majority of elderly Americans living on fixed incomes are women, and they found their purchasing power eaten up by that inflation. Working women saw jobs become more and more scarce. Homemakers found that 12\1/2\-percent inflation made it a nightmare to try and buy groceries and pay the bills. And the thousands of women who wanted to start their own businesses saw 21-percent prime rate slam shut the doors of opportunity.

When we took office, the economy was job one. And with Republicans in control of the Senate, we moved quickly to set our program in place. And believe me, if we had not had one House of the Congress, we couldn't have achieved what we've achieved so far.

We reduced the growth of Federal spending. We pruned needless regulations. George Bush was in charge of that, and we hacked them out by the score. We reduced personal income tax rates, passed an historic tax reform called indexing, which means that government can never again use inflation to profit at the people's expense. We reduced the marriage tax penalty, almost doubled the maximum child care credit, increased the limits for IRA and Keogh contributions, and eliminated estate taxes on family farms and businesses for surviving spouses.

Now today, from Maine to California, a powerful economic recovery is taking place. The prime rate is almost half what it was when we took office. Inflation has plummeted by two-thirds, to about 4 percent. Factory orders, retail sales, and housing starts are up. Speaking of housing, this morning the news was released for January: 688,000 new houses were sold in America and, except for December of 1983, that was the highest figure for any month since 1979.

The American worker's real wages are rising. The stock market has come back to life, providing new funds for growing sectors of the economy and raising the value of pension funds where millions of workers have their retirement savings. The best news of all is that last year more than 4 million Americans found jobs. That's the steepest 12-month drop in the unemployment rate in more than 30 years.

The unemployment rate among adult women has dropped from 9.1 to 7.1 percent. And today, more women have jobs than ever before in our Nation's history. And the jobs women hold are getting better and better. In 1983 women filled over 60 percent of all the new jobs in managerial, professional, and technical fields. And the number of women-owned businesses is growing twice as fast as those owned by men.

In foreign policy, we're acting with a new firmness and sense of purpose. From Central America to Western Europe to an island called Grenada, we've worked to defend freedom and peace. And while events in Lebanon have been painful, our presence there has prevented far greater destruction and loss of life than would otherwise have taken place. In our dealings with the Soviets, the prospects for world peace stand on a new and firm footing.

Let me take just a moment to mention two vital matters now that are before the Congress, and the first is crime. For too many years the scales of justice have been tilted in favor of the criminals, with devastating results. Rising crime rates, a flood of illegal drugs, billions of dollars worth of property stolen or destroyed each year, and, worst of all, millions of Americans living their daily lives in fear. We were determined to restore balance to our criminal justice system, and I think we've made genuine progress.

In 1982 the crime rate dropped by 4.3 percent, and that was the sharpest decline in 10 years. But we still have much to do. Recently the Senate passed our comprehensive crime control act and several other related crime bills. But in the House, the Democrats have stalled these vital bills by bottling them up in committee.

Now let me give you some examples of the reforms the House Democrats are blocking. One reform makes sentencing more uniform and certain. There's nothing complicated about this. The sentence imposed should be the sentence served. Why should any right-minded person oppose that reform? Another reform involving the so-called exclusionary rule would allow evidence obtained reasonably and in good faith to be used in a criminal trial. It would help keep criminals from going free on technicalities. Now, who could object to that in good conscience?

California, San Bernardino, several years ago. Two narcotics agents with a legitimate warrant, obtained in the legal way, to search a house where they believed heroin was being sold, searched the house and couldn't find the heroin. A man and woman lived there. And they were starting out the door when one of them, on a hunch, just turned back to the crib where the sleeping baby lay and took off its diapers and there was the heroin. Evidence thrown out of court; they went free because the baby had not given its permission to be searched.

American people want voluntary prayer back in our schools. Soon the Senate will vote on a constitutional amendment to permit voluntary vocal prayer in our schools. If the amendment passes the Senate, we'll have to work to get a vote in the House. But neither one will happen without our support. If ever there was a time for the people of this country to make their voices heard, that time is now.

President Lincoln's portrait hangs above the fireplace in this room. And more than a century ago, he said America was the last, best hope of Earth. Well, today the light of that hope is once again aglow. Together, we can make it a shining beacon for all mankind.

In countless ways, both recorded and unrecorded, women have played a vital role in the development of this Nation. The greatness of the United States reflects the accomplishments of American women throughout our history.

Today, whether single or married, with children or other dependents, women continue to assume critically important leadership positions in our Nation's economic, cultural, and social life. They are contributing substantially to the character and growth of the economy and permanently influencing the development of our political, commercial, judicial, and legal institutions.

Although women have always constituted a significant portion of America's labor force and, in fact, represent nearly half of it today, more and more of them are serving in demanding and rewarding professional jobs. Women are university presidents, astronauts, military officers, corporate officials, labor leaders, business owners, and members of innumerable other professions.

Women who work in the traditional roles of mothers and homemakers continue to be a wellspring of our Nation's strength, helping us to maintain our social and spiritual values. They have fostered unity and stability in our families, which are the cornerstone of American life. They serve as the backbone of our volunteer movement, which certainly is one of the most powerful forces for good anywhere on the earth. The vision of women has made them leaders in many causes which have brought important social reform in such areas as abolition, health care, child labor laws, temperance, voting rights, and improvement of industrial labor conditions.

In Witness Whereof,  I have hereunto set my hand this 2nd day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Tijuana Rivers and of the Rio Grande (59 Stat. 1219, 9 Bevans 1166), is hereby designated as a public international organization entitled to enjoy the privileges, exemptions, and immunities conferred by the International Organizations Immunities Act. This designation shall not be deemed to abridge in any respect the privileges, exemptions or immunities which the Commission may have acquired or may acquire by international agreement or by Congressional action.

Sec. 2. This designation shall not extend to the United States Section of the Commission in respect of matters within its exclusive control, supervision or jurisdiction, or within the sole discretion of the United States Commissioner, pursuant to international agreements in force with the United Mexican States, statute or other authority.

Amendments of 1984. This bill will provide a 3.5-percent cost-of-living increase in the monthly compensation checks of some 2.3 million veterans with service-connected disabilities. It will also provide the same percentage cost-of-living increase to approximately 319,000 widows and children of veterans whose deaths were service-connected. These increases will be effective on April 1, 1984.

Compensation benefits to our disabled veterans and their survivors are a reflection of the deep gratitude of all Americans to those men and women who suffered injuries or died in the service of their country. This legislation demonstrates the Nation's continuing commitment and support for these men and women, and their survivors.

S. 1388 will also benefit our veterans in many other ways. For instance, this legislation increases the maximum rate of disability compensation payable to hearing-impaired blinded veterans and liberalizes eligibility for compensation of certain other groups. It improves the Veterans Administration's education, home loan, and medical construction programs, in a number of respects. It extends the State veterans cemeteries grant program for 5 years. And, finally, it increases the membership of the Board of Veterans Appeals in order to improve timeliness in processing appeals from veterans.

Chairman Alan Simpson and Chairman Sonny Montgomery and the other members of the Senate and House Veterans' Affairs Committees are to be commended for their skillful and dedicated stewardship of this bill.

University. He is also a senior fellow of the Aspen Institute, a member of the board of trustees of the Metropolitan Museum of Art in New York City, and chairman of the board of the International House. He serves as a contributing analyst to the American Broadcasting Co.

Seeing the size of your gathering here this evening, the exciting program that you've planned, and the media attention you're drawing, and seeing and feeling the drive, energy, and intellectual force that's coming to our cause from the American Conservative Union, Young Americans for Freedom, Human Events, and National Review, I believe the proof is undeniable: The conservative movement is alive and well, and you are giving America a new lease on life.

It is true that many of you are helping now in our administration. And we're going to add one more in the next few days, because coming to the West Wing, there on our staff, will be the man that organized the first four of these dinners -- Frank Donatelli.

We've been together through many struggles. We've known the agony of defeat. And recently, we've seen public support begin to swell behind our banner. What we worked so long and hard to win was good, but hardly good enough. So, in expressing my pride and affection for this good family, for our family, may I say not only Happy Anniversary, ACU, but also, long live the revolution.

The mission of this conference is a mission of principle: It is a mission of commitment, and it must and will be a mission of victory. Color our cause with courage and confidence. We offer an optimistic society. More than 200 years after the patriots fired that first shot heard 'round the world, one revolutionary idea still burns in the hearts of men and women everywhere: A society where man is not beholden to government; government is beholden to man.

The difference between the path toward greater freedom or bigger government is the difference between success and failure; between opportunity and coercion; between faith in a glorious future and fear of mediocrity and despair; between respecting people as adults, each with a spark of greatness, and treating them as helpless children to be forever dependent; between a drab, materialistic world where Big Brother rules by promises to special interest groups, and a world of adventure where everyday people set their sights on impossible dreams, distant stars, and the Kingdom of God. We have the true message of hope for America.

West, create a nation, and open up a continent. If you take away the dream, you take away the power of the spirit. If you take away the belief in a greater future, you cannot explain America -- that we're a people who believed there was a promised land; we were a people who believed we were chosen by God to create a greater world.

Well, I think we're remembering those bedrock beliefs which motivate our progress. A spirit of renewal is spreading across this land. We even have a pro-conservative newspaper in the Nation's Capital. [Laughter] And, if I may just interject, I understand that Jim Whalen will be honored by your group tomorrow night, and that's wonderful news and well deserved.

I think America is better off than we were 3 years ago because we've stopped placing our faith in more government programs. We're restoring our faith in the greatest resource this nation has -- the mighty spirit of free people under God. It was you who reminded Washington that we are a government of, by, and for the people, not the other way around. It was you who said it is time to put earnings back in the hands of the people, time to put trust back in the hands of the people, time to put America back in the hands of the people.

And this is what we're trying to do. Our critics are not pleased, but I hope we'll be forgiven this small observation: The spendthrifts who mangled America with the nightmare of double-digit inflation, record interest rates, unfair tax increases, too much regulation, credit controls, farm embargoes, gas lines, no-growth at home, weakness abroad, and phony excuses about ``malaise,'' are the last people who should be giving sermonettes about fairness and compassion.

Moon -- [laughter] -- or by the personality of my predecessor. [Laughter] They were caused by misguided policies and misunderstanding human nature. Believe me, you cannot create a desert, hand a person a cup of water, and call that compassion. You cannot pour billions of dollars into make-work jobs while destroying the economy that supports them and call that opportunity. And you cannot build up years of dependence on government and dare call that hope.

But apparently nothing bothers our liberal friends. The same expertise that told them their policies must succeed, convinced them that our program spelled economic Armageddon. First they blamed the recession on our tax cuts. The trouble is, our tax cuts hadn't started yet. [Laughter] They also warned that when our tax program passed, America would face runaway inflation, record interest rates, and a collapse of confidence. Well, at least they got part of it right. Our program passed, and we witnessed a collapse all right. A collapse of inflation from 12.4 down to about 4 percent; a collapse of the prime interest rate from over 21 percent to 11; and a new surge of confidence in stocks and bonds.

And then they said that recovery couldn't come, or would be too feeble to notice. Well, from strong growth in housing to autos, construction, and high technology, from a rebirth of productivity to the fastest drop in unemployment in over 30 years, we have one of the strongest recoveries in decades. And we'll keep it strong if they'll get out of the way.

Pardon me if I add something here. You know, I did get a kick out of watching on TV the door-to-door campaigning in New Hampshire. I got to see some of the homes the people have been able to buy since we brought interest rates down. [Laughter] Incidentally, I'm sure all of you have read or seen on the air that in the month of January our sale of new houses dropped, and dropped to a great percent -- about a 9-percent drop below what it was the previous month. Only 688,000 new homes were sold in January. But they didn't add that that drop was only from the sales in December, and beyond that it was the highest number that had been sold since 1979 in a single month.

Now, lately, the pessimists have been sounding a new alarm: The dollar is so strong, they say, that exporters can't export, and we'll have no chance for lasting growth. Well, the facts are -- as Secretary Don Regan has pointed out -- the dollar is strong because of people's confidence in our currency, our low rate of inflation, and the incentives to invest in the United States. No American should undermine confidence in this nation's currency. A strong dollar is one of our greatest weapons against inflation. Anyone who doubts the value of a strong currency should look at the postwar performances of Japan, Switzerland, and West Germany.

Yes, we have a trade deficit, but this isn't entirely new. The United States had a merchandise trade deficit in almost all of the years between 1790 and 1875. I remember them well. [Laughter] Of course, I was only a boy at the time. [Laughter] But that was when our economy grew into one of the largest and strongest in the world. Rising incomes have given us the ability to increase purchases from abroad. The U.S. economy is serving as an engine for worldwide recovery, and this will translate into greater demands for our own goods. But even with our current trade deficits, exports of goods and services have made a greater contribution to this recovery than to any previous recovery in the postwar period.

The critics were wrong on inflation, wrong on interest rates, wrong on the recovery, and I believe they'll be wrong on the deficit, too, if the Congress will get spending under control. If optimism were a national disease, they'd be immune for life. [Laughter] Isn't it time that we've said no to those who keep saying no to America? If the sourpuss set cannot believe in our nation and her people, then let them stand aside and we will get the job done.

Now, those who deal in a world of numbers cannot predict the progress of the human mind, the drive and energy of the spirit, of [or] the power of incentives. We're beginning an industrial renaissance which most experts never saw coming. It started with the 1978 capital gains tax reduction -- passed over the objections of the last administration -- and which was then made greater by our own tax reductions in 1981.

Incentives laid the seeds for the great growth in venture capital which helped set off the revolution in high technology. Sunrise industries, such as computers, micro-electronics, robotics, and fiber optics -- all are creating a new world of opportunities. And as our knowledge expands, business investment is stimulated to modernize older industries with the newer technologies.

Dr. Robert Jastrow, chairman of the first NASA lunar exploration committee, believes the potential in our high-tech industries for new jobs and economic growth is mind-boggling. A year ago, he predicted the computer industry would double in size by 1986, becoming America's biggest business. And now we're seeing the knowledge and benefits of high technology being put to use in medicine, bringing new hope to millions who suffer handicaps and disabilities.

Our challenge of building a permanently manned space station, and of further exploration, can open up entire new industries. Products from metal alloys to lifesaving medicines -- these can immensely improve our environment and life on Earth.

American technological leadership, and I intend to make sure we keep that edge. That's why I've asked Transportation Secretary Elizabeth Dole to start immediately promoting private sector investment in commercial, unmanned space boosters -- the powerful rockets that carry satellites into orbit. With those boosters, and a thriving commercial launch industry, American private enterprise will be blasting off toward new horizons of hope, adventure, and progress -- a future that will dazzle our imaginations and lift our spirits.

An opportunity society awaits us. We need only believe in ourselves and give men and women of faith, courage, and vision the freedom to build it. Let others run down America and seek to punish success. Let them call you greedy for not wanting government to take more and more of your earnings. Let them defend their tombstone society of wage and price guidelines, mandatory quotas, tax increases, planned shortages, and shared sacrifices.

We want no part of that mess, thank you very much. We will encourage all Americans -- men and women, young and old, individuals of every race, creed, and color -- to succeed and be healthy, happy, and whole. This is our goal. We see America not falling behind, but moving ahead; our citizens not fearful and divided, but confident and united by shared values of faith, family, work, neighborhood, peace, and freedom.

Iowa last week, my sympathies are with the taxpayers, not the taxspenders. I consider stopping them from taking more of your earnings an economic responsibility and a moral obligation. I will not permit an antigrowth coalition to jeopardize this recovery. If they get their way, they'll charge everything on your ``Taxpayers Express Card.'' And believe me, they never leave home without it.

As good conservatives, we were brought up to oppose deficits. But sometimes I think some have forgotten why. We were against deficit spending. Those who would be heroes trying to reduce deficits by raising taxes are not heroes. They have not addressed the point I made in the State of the Union: Whether government borrows or increases taxes, it will be taking the same amount of money from the private economy and, either way, that's too much.

We must bring down government spending to a level where it cannot interfere with the ability of the economy to grow. The Congress must stop fiddling and pass a constitutional amendment requiring a balanced Federal budget. With strong support from many of you here, we nearly scored a great victory in 1982. It's time to try again. We also seek a line-item veto to prevent pork barrel projects from passing just because they're attached to otherwise good legislation. I'm sure we're united by one goal. The Grace commission identified billions of dollars in wasteful government spending. And I believe the Congress has a responsibility to work with us and eliminate that waste wherever it exists.

Combining these spending restraints with another key reform will make America's economy the undisputed leader for innovation, growth, and opportunity. I'm talking about simplification of the entire tax system. We can make taxes more fair, easier to understand and, most important, we can greatly increase incentives by bringing personal tax rates down. If we can reduce personal tax rates as dramatically as we've reduced capital gains taxes, the underground economy will shrink, the whole world will beat a path to our door, and no one will hold America back. This is the real blueprint for a brighter future and declining deficits.

But economic opportunities can only flourish if the values at the foundation of our society and freedom remain strong and secure. Our families, friends must be able to live and work without always being afraid. Americans are sick and tired of law-abiding people getting mugged, robbed, and raped, while dangerous criminals get off scott-free.

We have a comprehensive crime bill to correct this. It would put an end to the era of coddling criminals, and it's been passed by the Senate. But the legislation is bottled up in the House. Now, maybe it's time they heard from a few of you -- a few million of you. You know, you don't have to make them see the light; just make them feel the heat. [Laughter] I hope you realize that in my comments about some of the shortcomings of the Congress, believe me, tonight, present company is excepted.

Strengthening values also demands a national commitment to excellence in education. If we are to pioneer a revolution in technology, meet challenges of the space age, and preserve values of courage, responsibility, integrity, and love, then we can't afford a generation of children hooked on cocaine and unable to read or write. Conservatives have pointed out for years that while Federal spending on education was soaring, aptitude scores were going steadily down. Look at the case of New Hampshire. It ranks dead last in State spending on education, but its students have the highest SAT scores among those States where at least half the students take the test.

And they've maintained that honor for more than 10 years. America's schools don't need new spending programs; they need tougher standards, more homework, merit pay for teachers, discipline, and parents back in charge.

Let us come together, citizens of all faiths, to pray, march, and mobilize every force we have so the God who loves us can be welcomed back into our children's classrooms. I'm gratified that Congressman Newt Gingrich is organizing a rally Monday night on the Capitol steps in support of our prayer in school amendment. Please be there if you can, and please send the message loud and clear that God never should have been expelled from America's schools in the first place. And maybe if we can get God and discipline back in our schools, we can get drugs and violence out.

Wade decision, 15 million unborn children have been lost -- 15 million children who will never laugh, never sing, never know the joy of human love, will never strive to heal the sick or feed the poor or make peace among nations. They've been denied the most basic of human rights, and we're all the poorer for their loss.

Life was her greatest opportunity, and she's made the most of it. An opportunity society for all, reaching for its future with confidence, sustained by faith, fair play, and a conviction that good and courageous people flourish when they're free -- this is the noble vision we share, a vision of a strong and prosperous America, at peace with itself and the world. Just as America has always been synonymous with freedom, so, too, should we become the symbol of peace across the Earth.

We should remember that our defense capability was allowed to deteriorate for many years. Only when our arms are certain beyond doubt can we be certain beyond doubt that they will never be used. President John F. Kennedy spoke those words in 1961. Too many who admired him have forgotten that the price of peace is dear. But some members of his party have not, and I am proud to have one of them, a brilliant patriot, Jeane Kirkpatrick, by my side.

And I deeply appreciate your patriotic support for rebuilding our defenses. We're just beginning to restore our capability to meet present and future security needs. I am open to suggestions for budget savings, but defense is not just another Federal program. It is solely the responsibility of the Federal Government. It is its prime responsibility. So, our first responsibility is to keep America strong enough to remain free, secure, and at peace, and I intend to make sure that we do just that.

America's foreign policy supports freedom, democracy, and human dignity for all mankind, and we make no apologies for it. The opportunity society that we want for ourselves we also want for others, not because we're imposing our system on others but because those opportunities belong to all people as God-given birthrights and because by promoting democracy and economic opportunity, we make peace more secure.

Democratic nations do not wage war on their neighbors. But make no mistake, those who would hang a ``Do Not Disturb'' sign on our shores, those who would weaken America or give Castro's terrorists free rein to bring violence closer and closer to our borders, are doing no service to the cause of peace.

Fellow citizens, fellow conservatives, our time has come again. This is our moment. Let us unite, shoulder to shoulder, behind one mighty banner for freedom. And let us go forward from here not with some faint hope that our cause is not yet lost; let us go forward confident that the American people share our values, and that together we will be victorious.

If you had to choose between shrinking the size of government or shrinking the size of your paycheck, which would it be? Chances are you think you're paying enough taxes already. And I agree with you.

The trouble is, your opinions don't always count for much in Washington, DC. It seems to be taken for granted here that the Federal Government has an automatic right to grow at your expense. Listening to people talk, you'd almost think government owns your earnings. So, please be a little skeptical when you hear the moaning from Washington's born-again deficit fighters. The truth is, these are the same people who brought us big and bloated government in the first place, and they haven't changed a bit.

The Democrats use foggy language like ``recovering revenue'' or ``stopping the revenue drain,'' but you don't need a Ph.D. in bureaucracy to know what they're offering: a choice between a tax increase, a tax increase, or a tax increase.

In the downpayment deficit reduction talks at the White House, suggestions were made on behalf of liberal House Democrats -- suggestions for making you pay more taxes. They added up to $100 billion or more. Some examples: Liberal Democrats want very badly to eliminate indexing; that's the historic reform that will tie your tax brackets to the rate of inflation. Starting next year, you will no longer be pushed into a higher tax bracket just because you're receiving a cost-of-living raise. Keep in mind that indexing doesn't help the wealthy; they're already in the highest tax brackets. Indexing helps those who need help, but it deprives government of the automatic increase in its allowance, so the spenders want to get rid of it. I don't intend to let them.

Another suggestion of theirs is a 3-year postponement in additional estate tax reductions. This would be a cruel blow to surviving spouses of family-owned farms and businesses. Hasn't the farm community suffered enough with the last administration's grain embargo? And the liberals would raise personal tax rates on millions of families and small businesses. These tax increases are neither wise nor compassionate. And they wouldn't reduce the deficit, they'd just reduce the recovery. And none of us should want that.

Yes, deficits are a problem. I've been saying so for more than a quarter of a century now. But the problem is not the size of the deficit, it's the size of government's claim on our economy. Whether government borrows or increases taxes, it will be taking the same amount of money from the private economy. So, if we raise taxes before cutting spending, the money will just be spent, the deficit won't be reduced, and government will grow bigger.

Now, that's what the House Democrats tried to do last year. Their budget resolution would have raised your taxes, then squandered that money on new programs. Well, we have a better way to cut deficits -- cut the growth of government by cutting out the waste. This will reduce government's claim on the people's earnings, leaving more money for you to borrow, spend, invest, and to help our economy grow.

Don't let anyone tell you it can't be done. We've already cut spending by more than $300 billion on a 5-year basis. Contrary to what you've heard, we haven't done this by hurting the needy. Total spending on social programs has increased by $71 billion during these last 3 years.

America's senior citizens are higher than ever before, even after adjusting for inflation. We've been cutting the growth of government by eliminating waste. My Inspectors General have identified nearly $31 billion in agency fraud, waste, and abuse; and we're going after it.

I'll be speaking out on this topic in future radio talks, but one thing is clear: Raising taxes is a cop-out; cutting waste in government is the right way to go. And this is what we're doing and what we'll continue to do. With your support, we can shrink government and stop the spendthrifts from shrinking your paychecks.

From its small beginnings, the Beta Club sought to recognize high school students who displayed leadership abilities, personal integrity, academic achievement and a demonstrated willingness to serve one's fellow citizens.

The original Beta Club members were opportunity innovators. They literally had the brashness to create and run the risk of failure. They had the toughness to experiment and were honest enough to learn from experience. Above all, they were willing to be judged on what they contributed to the well being of others.

The best growth generators are those persons who have the inner moral fiber to accept new ideas, concepts, machines and technology. The Beta Club founders had the ability to convince others that productive change was necessary in revitalizing high school youth to widen their spiritual and intellectual horizons. In recognizing the outstanding achievements of the Beta Club, we pay homage to a vital part of our Nation's heritage.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fifth day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

The President. Mr. Chancellor, Mr. State Secretary, and ladies and gentlemen, we've been honored to have Chancellor Kohl as a guest today. German-American partnership remains a positive, dynamic, and vital force in the free world's struggle for peace, security, and prosperity.

We both agreed that 1983 was a crucial year for the NATO alliance. The leaders of the Western democracies stood firm in the face of an intense Soviet campaign of intimidation aimed at blocking NATO deployment of new intermediate-range missiles. To its common credit, the alliance demonstrated its determination to restore the military balance in Europe and maintain a credible nuclear deterrence and emerge stronger from the challenge. Thanks to the courage and vision of leaders like Chancellor Kohl, we can point to the past year with pride and look to the future with confidence.

Both Chancellor Kohl and myself would prefer to achieve a nuclear balance through arms reduction. Today I reconfirmed my willingness, eagerness to continue to effort to reach arms reduction agreements with the Soviet Union. Both Chancellor Kohl and I agreed that, with new leadership in the Kremlin, an opportunity exists for real progress in relations between East and West. However, in the face of Soviet intransigence at the negotiating table, a table which we remain ready to return to any time, the alliance will continue to strengthen its conventional and nuclear deterrent.

In the Declaration of Brussels last December, the NATO Foreign Ministers affirmed our offer to establish constructive contacts and dialog with the Soviets. I reaffirmed to Chancellor Kohl today my personal commitment to explore every possible avenue for improvement of relations with the East. And I'm ready to meet personally with the Soviet leadership if such a meeting is well prepared and holds promise of fruitful results.

Chancellor Kohl and I also discussed the strengthening of Western economies and the peaceful cooperation between our peoples. We're especially optimistic about the increasing team effort our countries are demonstrating in the exploration of space. The November mission of the shuttle was the first to include a non-American astronaut, a German. And I was delighted that the communications hookup allowed Chancellor Kohl and myself to talk with each other and with the astronauts in space. It was an exciting achievement and a reflection of the good will upon which future progress can be built.

This morning I presented Chancellor Kohl with a plaque commemorating that mission, which bears photographs and the U.S. and German flags that were flown on that mission in space. As the inscription says on the plaque, we look toward future German-American cooperation to strengthen peace, build prosperity, and expand freedom in developing space -- our next frontier.

I am particularly pleased with our success in expanding the human side of the German-American relationship. The tricentennial of German immigration to America heightened our awareness of the deep personal and family ties between our two peoples. The German-American Friendship Garden, established during the tricentennial, symbolizes this relationship. And the newly launched Congress-Bundestag Youth Exchange Program will assure that these important contacts continue unabated.

Western World. There's rarely an issue of international significance on which your views are not sought and where your influence is not felt. Chancellor Kohl, I count on your friendship as Americans count on the friendship of the German people, as we rise together to meet challenges of the coming decade.

The Chancellor. Mr. President, ladies and gentlemen, first of all, I would like to extend to you -- dear Mr. President and dear friend -- very warmly for the extremely friendly welcome you extended to me and for the intensive and detailed conversations we had on that occasion.

In the last few months, I felt it with particular strength how important it was for us not only to agree on political issues but also on fundamental personal values. Well, for us, the Germans, in order to preserve peace and the liberty of our countries, we have to rely on two fundamental principles. First of all, they are the close ties with our friends in the United States of America, and the second issue -- the second principle of equal importance is our close relations within the allies with our friends, the United States of America.

You, Mr. President, in particular, made special contributions towards this end, particularly as regards to friendship between our two governments -- but when I think back on the tricentennial celebrations -- also the contribution to the friendship between our two nations. We discussed thoroughly and in detail the perspective and prospects for future developments between East and West, and there is a far-reaching agreement concerning future developments.

Our two governments stand firmly by the proven and by the balanced concepts of the alliance. We would also in future assure the defense capability of the West by seeking military balance and equilibrium at as low a level as possible.

Mr. President, over the last 2 years, I have met in you a man who has always been aware of his personal responsibility for the peace in the world and who is also ready to bear and to shoulder that responsibility. And for that very reason, I again recommended to you, and in this very spirit, to seek, not as a propaganda coup, but as a political step, an early and a well-prepared meeting with the new Secretary General of the Soviet Union, Mr. Chernenko. And this meeting should not be a propaganda exercise. The Federal Government and I, as Federal Chancellor, do not consider ourselves to be mediators in that context. But nevertheless, if such a meeting is well prepared and if this opportunity is wisely used, we would consider such a meeting to be of great importance and helpful for shaping future East-West relations.

The President and I underlined the importance and the significance which attaches to the current arms control negotiations. And we were in agreement that the West should take the initiative in the negotiations about mutual and balanced forces reductions in Vienna and in the negotiations about a worldwide ban on chemical weapons and that it should make new proposals along these lines. And I was grateful to note, Mr. President, how much support you are giving to the proposals made by Secretary of State Shultz concerning a ban on chemical weapons.

We have also discussed questions of our national economies, questions which are of mutual concern and interest. We also discussed in that connection -- in connection with the discussion of our economic -- the state of our national economies, the fact that it is important for us to ensure that protectionism will not prevail and will not spread in our countries and in our continents, because protectionism is not a means to foster free economy. It's only free trade and free commerce which will ensure the future, which will ensure prosperity, and which will make for a free exchange of goods and ideas.

And of course, among friends there are also subjects on which one is not fully in agreement, on which one does not completely see eye to eye. A European who is here in the White House has got to speak about the high level of interest rates and the impact that has on the European economies. And it is quite clear this is a European problem.

Well, and even before that background, I would like to point out that these conversations once again showed to me the very strong foundations on which German-American partnership and friendship rest. This was a conversation among friends, and what better there you could say?

I'm delighted to have another chance to speak with the National League of Cities. As you probably remember -- some of you at least -- when we met in this room 3 years ago this week, I didn't have much good news to give you. The United States faced the worst mess since the Great Depression. Our national economy was nearing the breaking point, and so were our cities.

We'd paid a steep price for years of good intentions badly misdirected. Families felt helpless in the face of double-digit inflation, 21\1/2\-percent prime interest rates, and a virtual halt in economic growth.

Cities were especially hard hit. The eroding tax base had widened the cost-revenue gap of city budgets. As labor costs increased, services were cut. Doubling of tax exempt bond rates knocked local governments out of the bond market, so you had to delay your infrastructure projects. And the private sector couldn't provide much help because high taxes and the high cost of borrowing had drained them of money and flexibility. Decades of Federal programs costing billions of dollars hadn't done the job. And the dramatic increase of Federal participation in local government complicated urban problems and threatened the foundation of our federal system.

We'd begun to lose sight of the fact of how our cities first became great, and that loss of vision may well have been our worst urban problem. Ingenuity and innovation built our cities and made them centers of commerce and education, of culture and communication, and of progress and opportunity. But the gradual shift of power toward the Federal Government moved us away from the very principles which kept our cities on a sound footing for most of our history.

Communities had lost control of some of the most basic decisions affecting everyday life. Local policymakers became less able to respond to the needs of their community as the Federal Government became ever more intrusive. The growing burden of Federal oversight did little but put cities in handcuffs.

And third, public-private partnerships. We want to pool government and private sector resources through positive incentives and enterprise zones so that we can harness the power and creativity of the marketplace.

And fourth, a return to basic values. We seek to promote a renewal of community life and to strengthen the social fabric of the city -- excellence in the classrooms, voluntarism, a sense of responsibility, and safety on the streets.

Now, I know that success will not come easy. It'll take great effort and patience. But it can and it will be done. Rebuilding cities begins with economic growth, and I believe our economic recovery is the most important urban renewal program in America today. The breadth and strength of this economic expansion are carrying fresh breezes of hope and opportunity to more and more urban areas.

Industrial production has increased for 14 straight months. Factory orders, factory utilization, and residential construction are all gaining strength. The growth of service industries continues to expand. Last year auto sales were at a 5-year high. More than 100,000 auto workers have been recalled. And with real, fixed business investment up by 13 percent -- that was last year -- the biggest gain of any recovery in the past 30 years, we see a bright future with more growth and jobs, and that's good news for the cities.

One example sums up the difference between the old policies of government pump-priming and our approach that begins with trusting people. Last year, there were demands for us to support an old-style, $3\1/2\ billion training program that was meant to place 300,000 people in make-work jobs. We turned it down so that economic recovery could do the job. Well, this recovery has put as many people back to work each month as they claimed their program would have done in a year. We have added 300,000 jobs every single month for the past 14 months. That's more than 4 million new workers on the job and paying taxes.

In our discussions, you said you wanted regulatory relief and reform, general revenue sharing, and block grants. Well, we agree. We want to make programs more responsible for the people that they're -- and more responsive to the people that they're meant to help. And we want to put an end to cumbersome administration and spiraling costs at the Federal level.

Well, we're beginning to do this. We supported general revenue sharing and the surface transportation act which provides dedicated capital funding for mass transit. We've consolidated 56 narrow-purpose categorical grant programs into eight block grants, and we replaced two regulation-burdened programs -- CETA and Title XX -- with flexible block grants.

And your paperwork burden at State and local levels has been cut by 90 percent. We estimate that local governments were spared $2 billion in annual costs and between $4 billion and $6 billion in startup costs.

Our current budget proposes further grant consolidations to let State and local levels determine their own priorities, transfer funds to high priority areas, and further reduce overhead. This new flexibility for the States is now being felt at the local level. Six States have consolidated portions of their health block grants into mini-blocks for their local governments. Now, admittedly, that's only a start; we'd like to see more States doing the same thing. Federalism can't stop at the State capital.

Public-private partnerships are the third important key for sparking economic opportunity and development of urban areas. Partnerships can take advantage of every opportunity available, and they can use these opportunities in a most efficient and productive way to meet local needs. No single sector of our nation -- government, business, labor, or nonprofit organizations -- can solve our urban problems alone. But by working together, pooling our resources, and building on our strengths, we can accomplish great things.

Starting with a $2 million CDBG grant, Columbus, Ohio's partnership with lending institutions, a community housing group, and a local management company revitalized a neighborhood that was threatened with displacement. The project generated over $24 million in private investment. And the neighborhood of low- and moderate-income families was saved.

In Wilkes-Barre, Pennsylvania, a public economic development agency used its $1.7 million grant to create a revolving loan fund. The fund generated over $12 million in private capital to revive the downtown area and begin development of the city's industrial park. Nearly a thousand jobs have been either created or saved, and Wilkes-Barre's tax revenues have increased by more than $500,000.

Long Beach, California, used its CDBG and UDAG grants for a major downtown redevelopment program. And the private sector contributed $100 million to build a regional shopping center. City leaders tell us this partnership has sparked $1.2 billion in new commercial and residential development, 1,200 new jobs, and a major increase in tax revenues.

Partnerships produce jobs. The Job Training Partnership Act gives local government new flexibility, and by using private industry councils it matches local needs with sensible training. The program will train over a million permanently displaced blue-collar workers per year for productive jobs. CETA did just the opposite. It spent $53 billion to find private sector jobs for only 15 percent of the participants. Well, CETA's days are over. Our commitment is to a genuine partnership for real jobs with a real future.

While I'm talking about jobs, let me mention that more and more people recognize the minimum wage puts unskilled young people at a disadvantage in finding that crucial first job. Our youth employment opportunity wage bill will give a much needed boost to those looking for their first summertime job, and it deserves your support.

There's one more initiative that could mean exciting renewal for urban areas of hardcore unemployment and blight. Fifteen months ago, at your annual convention in Los Angeles, I talked about our enterprise zone legislation. Well, it's been on Capitol Hill now for more than 2 years.

The Senate has passed it. The House continues to bottle it up. How in the world can some people give speeches about creating jobs and hope when they refuse to take action on a bill that's designed to provide just that? Enterprise zones encourage growth where we need it most -- in areas of high youth and minority unemployment, in urban areas where the tax base has been hit the hardest. And our legislation will give cities the flexibility they need to make this innovative idea work.

The fourth and final key to a stronger, more prosperous, and stable urban America is a strengthening of basic values through renewal of community life. People coming together in a spirit of neighborhood is what makes cities worth living in. It's what keeps businesses and attracts new ones. And it's what keeps faith with the fine traditions of the past while enabling us to build the future with confidence. Shakespeare said, ``The people are the cities.'' And if our cities can create thriving neighborhoods that offer excellence in education, efficiency and affordability, safety on -- but drugs and crime off -- our streets, then they can become great centers of growth, diversity, and excitement, filled with sound, colors, warmth, and delight.

For too many years, crime and the fear of crime robbed our cities of their strength and vitality and frightened away the business community. Well, common sense is beginning to pay off. In 1982 the crime rate dropped by 4.2 percent -- the biggest decline in a decade. And all over the country people are banding together and working with law enforcement agencies in thousands of crime prevention programs. We're cracking down on habitual criminals, organized crime, and the drugpushers. Federal task forces are stepping up the pressure. And we're working hard to improve the criminal justice treatment of the innocent victims of crime.

But formidable challenges remain. The scales of criminal justice are still tilted toward protecting the rights of criminals. I believe it's high time we restore a proper balance and start doing more to protect our law-abiding citizens. Lenient judges are only lenient on crooks; they're very hard on society.

When you're on Capitol Hill this week, maybe you could give our friends in the House another message. When it comes to putting dangerous criminals behind bars, when it comes to keeping our people safe in their homes and neighborhoods, there should be no Republicans or Democrats, only Americans working for the common good.

Commission on Excellence in Education made it clear that nothing short of a grassroots revolution would bring back quality education to our classrooms. Total expenditures for our schools rose more than 600 percent between 1960 and 1980, but Scholastic Aptitude Test scores were in a steady decline, and 13 percent of our 17-year-olds were functional illiterates.

We should take a lesson from New Hampshire. In fact, I'm a little -- not just what happened recently -- [laughter]. In fact, I'm a little surprised so few people noticed, during all the time they spent there in recent weeks, New Hampshire ranks 50th, dead last in State aid to education. But New Hampshire ranks first in Scholastic Aptitude Tests in those States where at least half the students take the test. And it's maintained that honor for more than 10 years. Very simple, why: In New Hampshire control of education remains in the hands of the people at the community level.

Today all 50 States have education task forces, and major reforms are being adopted in academic standards, discipline, curriculum, and basic values. We're seeing signs of improvement in test scores. Excellence in education is on its way back.

This spirit of renewal is the American spirit, and we see that spirit everywhere we look, from the healthy rise in corporate and private giving to thousands of exciting private sector initiatives, and from neighbors helping neighbors to a welcome return to our basic values.

Now, I know that over the last 3 years we've had to make some tough decisions, and there are still some tough ones to come. I appreciate that the cities you represent have felt the pain of reducing the growth of Federal spending. But to continue down that path that America was on would have meant disaster. We all want what is best for those who live in our cities. They deserve no less. And together we can make it happen. And with your leadership, and with our partnership, it will happen.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Gerald P. Carmen, of New Hampshire, as the Representative of the United States of America to the European Office of the United Nations, with the rank of Ambassador. He would succeed Geoffrey Swaebe who is now Ambassador to Belgium.

The United States is blessed with an impressive array of agricultural products that make our food production and distribution system the envy of the world. One significant aspect of that system is the frozen food industry, which in March 1984 celebrates its fifty-fourth year of service to the people of America and the world.

The farm-to-city migration created a great demand for food supplies in dense population centers in which such supplies could not be grown. The frozen food industry has made great strides in recent decades to respond to consumer needs.

The international frozen food industry started in the United States. Frozen vegetables, fruit, meat, and fish were first packaged and offered to consumers in 1930, contributing greatly to the convenience of life and freeing consumers permanently from the cycle of limited seasonal availability of many foods.

World War II, ration point values posted in stores and carried in newspapers focused public attention on frozen food. Frozen food became a part of the space age when Apollo XII astronauts took frozen meals on board. Seventy-two frozen food items were stored on the Skylab for a five hundred-day supply of meals for the crew.

The American frozen food industry, in close cooperation with producers, has continued research and development for the purpose of seeking better ways to bring the nutrition, quality, and taste of American agricultural products to consumers.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this sixth day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Thank you all very much. [Applause] A speaker devoutly prays that that's what will greet him when he finishes speaking. [Laughter] But Members of the Congress, distinguished members of the clergy here, and you in the audience, I'm delighted to join you here in Columbus -- the 42d annual convention of the National Association of Evangelicals and the 150th anniversary of this great city, Mr. Mayor. It's always a pleasure for me to return to the heartland of America.

Evangelicals has ministered to the people of this country in the name of God's word. And today, the NAE has some 38,000 member churches representing some 4 million Americans, as you well know. You provide Christian education, foreign missions, religious broadcasting, and as you were just told, the provision of a very worthwhile safety net -- a host of other services. In doing so, you are leaders in promoting fundamental American values of hard work, family, freedom, and faith.

Any serious look at our history shows that from the first, the people of our country were deeply imbued with faith. Indeed, many of the first settlers came for the express purpose of worshipping in freedom. The historian Samuel Morison wrote of one such group, ``doubting nothing and fearing no man, (they) undertook to set all crooked ways straight and create a new heaven and a new earth. If (they) were not permitted to do that in England, (they) would find some other place to establish (their) city of God.'' Well, that other place was this broad and open land we call America.

So, the record is clear. The first Americans proclaimed their freedom because they believed God himself had granted freedom to all men. And they exercised their liberty prayerfully, avidly seeking and humbly accepting God's blessing on their new land.

For decades, America remained a deeply religious country, thanking God in peacetime and turning to him in moments of crisis. During the Civil War, perhaps our nation's darkest hour, Abraham Lincoln said, ``I have been driven many times upon my knees by the conviction that I had nowhere else to go.'' Believe me, no one can serve in this office without understanding and believing exactly what he said.

Garden in New York. The rally featured the great figures from government; great stars of the theater entertained the audience, and many times those people proclaimed that God was on our side. And then it remained for a $54-a-month buck private who spoke nine words that no one there that day will ever forget. His name was Joe Louis -- yes, the Joe Louis who had come from the cotton fields to become the world heavyweight prize-fighting champion. Now, this $54-a-month private walked out to center stage after all those other celebrities had been there, and he said, ``I know we'll win, because we're on God's side.'' There was a moment of silence, and then that crowd nearly took the roof off.

During the civil rights struggles of the fifties and early sixties, millions worked for equality in the name of their Creator. Civil rights leaders like Dr. Martin Luther King based all their efforts on the claim that black or white, each of us is a child of God. And they stirred our nation to the very depths of its soul.

And so it has been through most of our history. All our material wealth and all our influence have been built on our faith in God and the bedrock values that follow from that faith. The great French philosopher Alexis de Tocqueville, 150 years ago is said to have observed that America is great because America is good. And if she ever ceases to be good, she will cease to be great.

We saw the signs all around us. Years ago, pornography, while available, was mostly sold under the counter. By the midseventies it was available virtually on every magazine rack in every drugstore or shop in the land. Drug abuse used to be confined to limited numbers of adults.

But perhaps most important, years ago, the American family was still the basic building block of our society. But then families too often found themselves penalized by government taxation, welfare policies that were spinning out of control, and the social mores of our country were being undermined. Liberal attitudes viewed promiscuity as acceptable, even stylish. Indeed, the word itself was replaced by a new term, ``sexually active.'' And in the media, what we once thought of as a sacred expression of love was often portrayed as something casual and cheap.

Between 1970 and 1980, the number of two-parent families dropped while the number of single-parent families almost doubled. Teenage pregnancies increased significantly. And although total births declined during the decade between 1970 and 1980, the number of illegitimate births rose about a quarter of a million.

At the same time that social standards seemed to be dissolving, our economic and governmental institutions were in disarray. Big taxing and spending had led to soaring interest rates and inflation. Our defenses had grown weak. Public officials at the highest levels openly spoke of a national ``malaise.'' All over the world America had become known not for strength and resolve, but for vacillation and self-doubt. It seemed for a season as though our nation was in permanent decline and that any sense of justice, self-discipline, and duty was ebbing out of our public life.

We've begun tackling one problem after another. We've knocked inflation down, and we can keep it down. The prime rate is about half what it was when our administration took office. All across the country, a powerful economic recovery is gaining strength. As we've begun rebuilding our defenses in the name of freedom, morale in the military has soared. And once again, America is respected throughout the world as a great force for freedom and peace.

One of my favorite Bible quotations comes from Second Chronicles: ``. . . if My people who are called by My name humble themselves and pray and seek My face, and turn from their wicked ways, then will I hear from heaven, and forgive their sin and heal their land.'' Today Americans from Maine to California are seeking His face. And I do believe that He has begun to heal our blessed land.

As this special awakening gathers strength, we must remember that many in good faith will hold other views. Let us pledge to conduct ourselves with generosity, tolerance, and openness toward all. We must respect the rights and views of every American, because we're unshakably committed to democratic values. Our Maker would have it no less.

So, please use your pulpits to denounce racism, anti-Semitism, and all ethnic or religious intolerance as evils, and let us make it clear that our values must not restrict, but liberate the human spirit in thought and in deed.

You may remember, but I'm sure you don't agree with, a very cynical quote that got wide circulation, from H.L. Mencken. He said puritanism ``is the haunting fear that someone, somewhere, may be happy.'' [Laughter] Well, some suspect that today's spiritual awakening reflects such narrow-mindedness. We must show that faith and traditional values are the things that give life human dignity, warmth, vitality, and yes, laughter and joy.

In foreign affairs I believe there are two fundamental tasks that we must perform. First, we must make certain our own country is strong, so we can go on holding out the hope of freedom for all the world. When I took office, I made rebuilding our defenses a top priority. Although we still have a great deal to do, we've already made dramatic headway. And since American forces are the cornerstone in the global defense of liberty, that's good news for all the world.

I don't know whether you've ever read his line of when he first began to awaken. They had a new baby, a little girl. And he was looking at her one morning as she sat in her highchair. And he said he found himself looking at the delicate convolutions of that tiny ear. And that was when he said to himself, ``That cannot be just an accident of nature, a freak of nature.'' And he said he may not have realized it at the moment, but he knows that in that moment, God had laid His finger on his forehead.

God bestows -- too easy to suppress freedom of speech, to build walls to keep their countrymen in, to jail dissidents, and to put great thinkers in mental wards. We will deal with the Communist world as we must with a great power: by negotiating with it, from strength and in good faith.

East and West. And while we will never accept for ourselves their system, we will never stop praying that the leaders, like so many of their own people, might come to know the liberating nature of faith in God.

In our own hemisphere, the Communist Sandinista regime in Nicaragua has systematically violated human rights, including the freedom to worship. Threats and harassment have forced virtually all Nicaraguan Jews to flee that country. Catholic clerics have been attacked by government-instigated mobs. Protestant religious leaders have been arrested, beaten, and deported. Dozens of Protestant churches have been burned. And today, the Sandinistas are trying to spread Communist subversion throughout Central America. If they succeed, millions of Central Americans will suffer. And our own security and economy, especially in our own southern States, would be threatened by significantly increased numbers of refugees that might stream toward the United States.

Commission on Central America. The plan calls for a 5-year program of increased political, economic, and military aid to the region with some three out of four dollars going to the direct improvement of living conditions for the Central American people. It is essential to freedom in Central America and around the world that the Congress pass this bipartisan plan. I would like to ask you to join me in urging your Senators and Members of Congress to approve that plan swiftly.

Here at home, I believe there are three basic tasks that we must accomplish. First, we must do our duty to generations not yet born. We cannot proclaim the noble ideal that human life is sacred, then turn our backs on the taking of some 4,000 unborn children's lives every day. This as a means of birth control must stop.

Many who seek abortions do so in harrowing circumstances. Often, they suffer deep personal trauma. Just as tolerance means accepting that many in good faith hold views different from our own, it also means that no man or woman should sit in judgment on another. If we could rise above bitterness and reproach, if Americans could come together in a spirit of understanding and helping, then we could find positive solutions to the tragedy of abortion -- and this we must do.

Second, we must restore education in basic value to America's schools. Since our administration put education at the top of the national agenda, we've seen a grassroots revolution that promises to strengthen every school in the country. Across the land, parents, teachers, school administrators, State and local officeholders have begun work to improve the fundamentals -- not frills in the curriculum, but basic teaching and learning. As this great educational reform takes place, we must make certain that we not only improve instruction in math and science, but in justice, religion, discipline, and liberty, for to guide America into the 21st century, our children will need not only technical skills but wisdom.

And because parents know best what schools are right for their children, our administration has proposed education vouchers and tuition tax credits -- concepts that the American people overwhelmingly support. And I intend to keep pressing for those reforms until they're passed.

And third, school prayer. From the early days of the American colonies, prayer in schools was practiced and revered as an important tradition. Indeed, for nearly two centuries of our history it was considered a natural expression of our religious freedom. Then in 1962 the Supreme Court declared school prayer illegal. Well, I firmly believe that the loving God who has blessed our land and made us a good and caring people should never have been expelled from America's classrooms. And the country agrees. Polls show that by a majority of 80 percent, the American people want prayer back in our schools.

Today prayer remains a vital part of American public life. The Congress begins each day with prayer, and the Supreme Court begins each sitting with an invocation. Now, I just have to believe that if the Members of Congress and the Justices can acknowledge the Almighty, our children can, too.

Hasn't something gone haywire when this great Constitution of ours is invoked to allow Nazis and the Ku Klux Klan to march on public property and urge the extermination of Jews and the subjugation of blacks, but it supposedly prevents our children from Bible study or the saying of a simple prayer in their schools? In 1952 a prominent jurist wrote a legal opinion that I believe still holds true. ``We are a religious people,'' he wrote, ``whose institutions presuppose a Supreme Being. We guarantee the freedom to worship as one chooses. We make room for as wide a variety of beliefs and creeds as the spiritual needs of man deem necessary . . . . To hold that (government) may not (encourage religious instruction) would be to find in the Constitution a requirement that the government show a callous indifference to religious groups. That would be preferring those who believe in no religion over those who do believe . . . .'' Well, the name of that jurist was Supreme Court Justice William O. Douglas. And the situation we face today is just what Justice Douglas was warning about: government hostility to religion. We must change it and change it now.

Senator Denton and Congressman Lott have proposed legislation to make certain that students who seek to use school premises in the name of their faith receive equal access. Well, I intend to support some of this legislation, and I urge you to join me in doing so, too.

Constitution to allow voluntary vocal prayer in America's schools. Our amendment explicitly states that no child must ever be forced to recite a prayer, nor would it allow any State to compose the words of a prayer. But under this amendment the Federal Government could not forbid voluntary vocal prayer in our schools. And by reasserting our children's freedom of religious expression, the amendment would help them to understand the diversity of America's religious beliefs and practices.

House. But neither will happen without our support. In recent weeks the school prayer amendment has received a groundswell of backing across the country. And last night in Washington, many Americans gathered for an all-night prayer vigil at the Capitol. It was a most moving event and a clear expression of the will of the people.

I'm convinced that passage of this amendment would do more than any other action to reassert the faith and values that made America great. I urge you and all those listening on television and radio to support this amendment and to let your Senators and Members of Congress know where you stand. And together we can show the world that America is still one nation under God.

Saint Paul wrote a verse that I've always cherished: ``. . . now abide faith, hope, love, these three; but the greatest of these is love.'' May we have faith in our God and in all the good that we can do with His help. May we stand firm in the hope of making America all that she can be -- a nation of opportunity and prosperity and a force for peace and good will among nations. And may we remain steadfast in our love for this green and gentle land and the freedom that she offers.

Nancy and I are happy to be a part of this magnificent gathering tonight. And let me begin by saying that we Republicans not only think New York is a top priority State; we Republicans are going to carry New York this fall. The Republican victory here in 1980 was no aberration. It marked a turning point in New York politics, and we're going to prove that in 1984.

This city and this State represent the hub of America's commercial and financial activity, and it's good to see labor also recognized or represented here tonight. And as one who was head of a union for six terms and is, I think, the first one in this job that's ever been able to say a lifetime member of an AFL - CIO union, I know that union and management have the same stake in a strong economy.

As for the record, I think the Republicans shouldn't hesitate to ask loud and clear and over and over again this year whether the American people believe they are better off now than they were 4 years ago.

The President. I want to interrupt and just remind you of something here. In 1976 our opponents cooked up a thing they called the misery index. And that was that you added the rate of unemployment and you added the rate of inflation and that was the misery index. And then in 1976 they said of our President Ford, ``He shouldn't even be allowed to run for reelection because his misery index was 12\1/2\ percent.'' Well, in 1980 they were running, and the misery index was just a fraction of a point under 20. Well, we're running again now, and the misery index is less than 12.

And as much as our opponents would like us to believe that the murderous inflation, the economic stagnation, and the crisis of confidence we suffered 4 years ago were part of a mysterious cycle or the result of my predecessor's personality, it doesn't wash. The economy is improving, America is growing stronger, moving forward, for one simple reason: We Republicans reversed the liberal policies of tax, spend, and inflate and put you, the American people, back in charge. It took time to put our program in place, and it's taken time for it to take effect. My goodness, aren't we happy we stuck to our guns?

We're in the first phase of a recovery that has already astounded the experts. The gross national product grew at a firm 6.2 percent last year. And January's hefty jump in the index of leading economic indicators suggests a healthy growth rate will continue. Employment is at the highest level in history, with unemployment dropping sharply. We have more people working today than we've ever had before in our history. Housing starts and auto sales are heavy. Housing starts -- you probably saw the announcement a few days ago, and the way it was carried, that the sale of new houses in the month of January was 9 percent below the rate in December. And that's the way it was presented. Well, let me tell you the rest of the story. That's right; it was 9 percent below December. But that was because December just happened to be a little bigger than January.

Productivity, after falling in the 2 years before we took office, rose 3\1/2\ percent last year. Real take-home pay, thanks to our tax cuts and the progress we've made in controlling inflation, is rising. And a sign that even better days are ahead -- venture capital rose $4 billion last year, and that's four times what it was in 1980.

Real defense spending -- and this was no accident -- was permitted to erode by 20 percent in the last decade. Weapons systems like the B - 1 bomber were unilaterally canceled. Members of left-to-liberal think tanks might have been impressed, but those who run the Kremlin weren't. As our level of power dropped, so did our influence. We were less secure and less respected.

In 1981 we went to work repairing the damage done by those who believe that a weaker America is a safer America. We continue to strive for realistic arms reduction negotiations with the Soviet Union. But, to be taken seriously, the Soviets must know that we're not going to simply give them what they want without concessions in return. Make no mistake, those who call for gutting the defense budget are undercutting our chances for arms reduction agreements with the Soviets.

In the coming campaign, Republicans should have no hesitation about bringing the issue of peace and security to the American people. There are many patriotic Democrats who will join us in supporting our efforts to rebuild our country's defenses, and we must reach out to them. They know that wearing love beads and touting our sincerity will not make for a safer world. Peace through strength is not a slogan, it's a fact of life. Four wars in my lifetime, and none of them came about because the United States was too strong.

I have to tell you, Nancy and I had -- a few months ago -- a unique reunion on the White House lawn. We brought together members of the Armed Forces, of the branches that had served in Grenada, representatives from each group, and hundreds of the American medical students that they had rescued there. It was a moment we'll always remember, especially those scenes when the students -- and they were all about the same age, the students and the military -- to see those students, some of them openly confessing that they had, once had a viewpoint where they did not respect the uniform -- they couldn't keep their hands off those marines and soldiers and seamen and airmen. They were throwing their arms around them. They were telling them, ``You saved our lives. You rescued us.'' And that heartwarming scene reconfirmed for me that Americans are still a great people who can accomplish great things. They'll accomplish great things if you, the people of this country, have a government that believes in you. And this government does.

If I could just impose something on you. I'm so proud of what's happened in these few years and these men and women of ours in uniform. When you see one of them on the street, kind of remember the wartime thing and say hello to them, with a smile, and tell them you're kind of grateful for what they're doing. They're wonderful young people. We can all be proud.

Our people want us to be a force for good in the world. We'll stand by our friends and protect our national interests. In Lebanon we were not a part of a military mission, but members of an international peacekeeping force. And while time and events -- longstanding hatreds and mistrust -- prevented the restoration of order, it was not from lack of trying or an absence of responsibility on our part. We have every reason to be proud that our marines, along with other members of the multinational force, attempted to bring peace and stability to that troubled country. It was a worthwhile mission. And furthermore, we remain near and ready to help if our efforts can serve the cause of peace.

During the latter half of the last decade, our country was paralyzed by its declining military power and a crisis of confidence. We were represented in bodies like the United Nations by people who seemed to spend more time apologizing than representing our interests. Well, we've turned this around, too. All Americans can be proud that we now have a person with courage and dignity representing us in the United Nations, a brilliant individual whose strength of character reflects the values of our great country. I think Jeane Kirkpatrick is a 10, and I'm mighty grateful for the magnificent job that she does every day.

Sometimes democratic countries are singled out for abuse in the United Nations. Well, America will stand by her friends. And this is especially true concerning our commitment to the one Western-style democracy in the Middle East, the state of Israel. There have been moves afoot to kick Israel out of the United Nations. And let me say just one thing and make it very plain: If Israel is ever forced to leave the United Nations, we'll leave together.

The security of our country and its people is the paramount responsibility of American government at every level. Unfortunately, too many of our citizens are not even secure on the streets of their community or in their own homes. The epidemic of crime and violence that we experienced in the last two decades has been a national disgrace. You in New York know what a nightmare crime can be. What we suffered -- the assaults, the murders, the rapes -- was the manifestation of policies which bent over backward to defend the rights of thugs, but which had too little concern about the innocent people victimized by the criminals. Well, the Republican Party reaffirms that the purpose of the law is to protect the innocent.

The Republican Senate has passed a package of criminal justice reforms, reforms aimed at making the system more efficient and more capable of getting career criminals off our streets. As of yet we're waiting for the Democrat-controlled House to move on this vital legislation. If the leadership of the House refuses to act and continues jeopardizing the safety of the American people, it's time that we replace those liberal opponents of ours with some good, old-fashioned law-and-order Republicans. Some of the provisions of that program of ours were authored by your Senator D'Amato.

In these last 3 years, I've been grateful to New York for the fine Republican delegation that it has in Washington. Senator D'Amato has been a real plus in the Senate. Your 14 Republican Representatives have been a source of support vital to our efforts to get control of Federal spending and taxing and to reinvigorate the economy. All I ask is that on election day, don't just vote for them, get all your friends and neighbors out to vote for them, too. And, yes, if you could, send us more just like them. We'd be able to put them to good use.

One member of your delegation of whom all of you can be rightfully proud is retiring after 20 years of frontline service. And even though Congressman Barber Conable couldn't be here tonight, I wanted to take this opportunity to thank him for all he's done for our country and for the Republican Party.

Real progress in this country can be traced to the work of conscientious and hard-working individuals like Congressman Conable. One such person is John Mariotta, who's providing jobs and training for the hardcore unemployed of the South Bronx. Born of Puerto Rican immigrants, and having served in the United States Army, Mr. Mariotta has had all the ups and downs associated with entrepreneurship. And today, through Wed-Tech, he not only has built a successful corporation, he's helping hundreds of people who would otherwise be condemned to menial jobs or a life on the dole. And what gave Mr. Mariotta the courage to keep going when others quit? He tells us it was his faith in God. Now his faith has moved mountains, helping hundreds of people who'd almost given up hope. People like John Mariotta are heroes for the eighties.

The future of our country, the direction that we go as a people, whether we move ahead to meet the challenges of the future or slide back into the irresponsible policies of the past, will be determined by those who get involved. By being here tonight, you're proving that you are willing to do your part. Together, with the other good and decent people of this country, we can make certain that America is the kind of place, the shining light of opportunity and freedom, that God intended it to be.

Alliance represents a living commitment of the nations of the West to the defense of democracy and individual liberty. By uniting Europe and North America in this way, it has deterred war between NATO and the Warsaw Pact for three and a half decades and made possible the longest period of peace and prosperity in modern history.

This success has not been won without effort. Throughout its history, the NATO Alliance has been challenged by the military power and political ambitions of the Soviet Union. Yet, in every decade, the nations of the Alliance have consistently pulled together to maintain peace through their collective strength and determination. On the basis of that strength and unity, the nations of the Alliance also have taken the initiative to seek a more constructive relationship with the Soviet Union.

Over the years, NATO has grown from its original twelve members to include Greece, Turkey, the Federal Republic of Germany, and, most recently, Spain. It has demonstrated a capacity to adapt to evolving political and security challenges and to meet the changing needs of its members.

This will be a special opportunity to celebrate the thirty-fifth anniversary of our common enterprise and to consider the future challenges facing the transatlantic partnership. I call upon the Congress and people of the United States to join me in expressing our support for a bond which has served us so well over the years and which will continue to be essential to our welfare in the future.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 6th day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

States strategy toward the Pacific Basin. He will engage in planning related to the potential interruption of oil supplies and the development of indigenous and other sources of natural gas. In addition, he will seek ways to protect United States interests in the Pacific region and to take advantage of trade opportunities. He will seek to support the Vice President's efforts to resolve our bilateral and capital-flow problems with Japan and also to work to expand opportunities for sale of nonnuclear energy to Japan.

Since its beginning, the American Red Cross has been in the forefront of efforts to provide for the well-being of the American people. Its volunteers and staff have kept that tradition going during this past year. They brought needed relief to hundreds of thousands of our fellow citizens who suffered in disasters and spent a record-breaking amount for disaster assistance and preparedness.

These dedicated people also implemented programs to improve the health of all Americans through life-style changes, kept our Nation's blood supply strong, and provided morale-building services to the men and women in uniform and their families.

The American Red Cross was founded in 1881 on the principle of service to others and has been sustained since then by millions of Americans who freely offer their time and talents for the benefit of their fellow citizens.

The American Red Cross pioneered in disaster relief, public health, assistance to veterans, and in efforts to enhance the spirits of our military services in war and peace. It also initiated the world's largest system for voluntary blood donations. And through Red Cross Youth Services, it helps our Nation's young people to learn the role of leadership and the value of service to others.

These efforts have been made possible by financial contributions from the public. Without this support, there would not be a Red Cross. It is the goodwill of all of us that perpetuates its efforts and provides such an inspiring example of what the private sector is capable of doing.

In the years ahead, there will be many opportunities for new endeavors as our Nation's social conditions change. The American Red Cross, as in the past, will respond to such challenges and will persevere in its efforts on behalf of human life and dignity.

The President. No, I am not. I have complete confidence in his standards, and I don't think there was anything more than what he has answered fully on all of those questions -- anything more to say about it.

The President. See, you change the subject, and I'm right in the midst of the biggest news of the day. [Laughter] We're having some productive meetings with the Senate, and we will come forth with a program with regard to the deficits.

The President. We weren't trying to make an end run. When we realized that we could not bridge the gap until they're going to take action -- which we hope they will take -- on the Kissinger commission's report, that there was going to be a financial gap in there for both of those funds, we then thought in terms of going directly there with the proposal of a separate bill and were advised that this, too, would take too long. So, we thought we would do what so many of them do: ask them to put it onto a program that was already going through the legislature.

The President. Well, I certainly hope not. They're going to take it up next week, and I think that reason will prevail. I don't see how anyone could think it was responsible after all this time to actually envision the armed forces of Salvador running out of ammunition and materiel that is needed to defend the country against the guerrillas. And that's the situation as it will stand.

But let me point out, again, those memos were dredged up from the Albosta committee record after they had been completely investigated by the FBI, and the FBI had said there was no evidence of wrong-doing at all. Now, this is all rehashed, old material. There's nothing new in this at all.

During the last 2 years the United States has risen from the depths of recession to one of the strongest recoveries in decades; from dark days of despair to a bright new dawn of promise and hope for all Americans.

What pulled us through that ordeal, I'm convinced, was our determination to stick to our program, believe in ourselves, and trust in our values of faith, freedom, and hard work -- values that have never failed us when we've lived up to them.

And now we're seeing the payoff. 1983 was a banner year for America, notwithstanding voices of pessimism which always found the single dark cloud in every blue sky. Those voices come from many different areas of our society. Recently, the Wall Street Journal reported on a survey of one of them -- the television networks' nightly news coverage of the economy during the last half of 1983. During that entire period there were 4 to 15 economic statistic stories a month telling us whether inflation, unemployment, interest rates, retail sales, or housing starts were up or down for a given month. The survey found nearly 95 percent of these reports were positive. However, of the 104 lengthy economic news stories in which the networks gave us their interpretation of what was happening, 86 percent were primarily negative. The survey found the economic news in the second half of 1983 was good. But the coverage on network television was still in recession.

Now please don't get me wrong, every administration must be held accountable. None of us can be excluded from the fury of a free press whenever that's right and proper. But true balance implies consistently showing all faces of America, including hope, optimism, and progress.

Our economy is stronger than practically anyone predicted. The index of leading economic indicators has been up 16 of the last 17 months. Industrial production has risen 14 straight months. Housing starts climbed 60 percent in 1983 to the highest level in 4 years. Retail sales surged. Auto sales registered their best year since 1979. And we had the steepest drop in the unemployment rate in more than 30 years. Yesterday we learned that unemployment for all workers in February dropped to 7.7 percent. More Americans are now at work than ever before in this nation's history.

Here's one example that sums up the difference between yesterday's policies of depending on government and our approach that begins with trusting people. Last year we were asked to raise taxes and appropriate money for a $3\1/2\ billion program to put 300,000 people in make-work jobs over a year. We said no, because incentives produce economic recovery, and strong, steady growth puts more people back to work than any government program. And it has.

The revolution in science and high technology is only beginning. Each time our knowledge expands, each time we push back frontiers of medicine, agriculture, and space, we will be creating entire new industries, modernizing older ones, and raising our standard of living.

The issue before America in 1984 is clear: Which direction will we go now -- forward with optimism, faith, and confidence, continuing to build an opportunity society for all our people; or backward in pessimism and fear, surrendering to politicians who would dismantle our program because their agenda is to make government grow big and fat at your expense?

To serve that agenda, they need to dwell on bad news. So when good news comes, they're either dumbstruck or they pretend they didn't hear. Well, with your support, we'll keep our economy moving forward, and we'll keep America's rendezvous with an optimistic future.

Well, the last time we met we didn't really meet. Mr. Dalton and I were at the White House and you were all here, and we were beamed in here on television. And it was at that point that he learned for the first time that the White House wanted to adopt Congress School. And we're very happy that we did.

I know that some of our people have been here and have been in your classes. There have been field trips and all. And I have to tell you, they're learning as much from those meetings as you are, and maybe more at times. But they're all enjoying it. And we all are very interested in education and the importance of this school and what it's going to mean in all of your lives.

And it may seem strange to you, but years and years from now when you're as old as I am -- if anyone could ever be that old -- you're going to be surprised at how much you remember about these days right here in this school and how much they're going to mean to you.

But now I understand -- you know, if you're going to be partners -- and incidentally, this whole idea of partnership is spreading all over the whole country, all the way across. I'm almost afraid to tell you who are partners of the schools in San Diego, because then you'll probably wish that you had them instead of us. [Laughter] But the football team there and a baseball team there have adopted schools in San Diego. But this is going on.

The President. There. Now, I understand that we've got a little time in which I can answer questions, and so I'm going to ask you, Rudolph, you'll have to keep watching them to see who raises their hand. And just for one, at least, would you pick the first one that I'm supposed to answer?

This morning, into the White House for what we call a staff meeting -- that's catch-up with anything that's new or that we need to discuss for today. And then I went into the Cabinet Room and we had a number of Congressmen in there -- leaders and chairmen of committees and so forth in the Congress. And I discussed with them plans for trying to reduce the Federal deficit. And we had a good meeting.

Then I went back to the Oval Office and two gentlemen\1\ (FOOTNOTE)  came in who are not part of government but who have just come back from a trip to the Middle East. And they've been in several countries over there. They've been in Turkey and Saudi Arabia and Morocco and, well, a number of other -- Egypt and Oman and those countries. And they wanted to tell me that they had met there with the heads of government in those states, and they reported to me on the things that they had discussed and that these heads of state had discussed with them as to things that we can do to be closer with them.

Central America, Costa Rica, and the Foreign Minister of Honduras. Now these are both countries down there where we're trying to be helpful and where there is war going on and people are being killed. And we're hoping that we can find an answer that will end all that and allow them to live better and live the way we do and live in peace with each other.

And at about that time, somebody came into the office and just stood there staring at me until I knew that they were telling me that time was up, and I said goodbye to the Foreign Ministers because I had to get in the car and come over here to Congress School.

So, that's just an idea of what part of the day is. And pretty soon somebody's going to look at me or tap me on the shoulder and tell me I have to go back over to the Oval Office because I have another meeting over there.

The President. [Laughing] No, I think that probably it's the time for me to retire from thinking about the movies. I have a hunch -- we have a ranch which I miss very much. And I have a hunch that when this job is over that maybe I'll just go to the ranch and ride my horses and do the things that have to be done around the ranch. There's always a lot to be done. As a matter of fact, last summer I had a couple of weeks there, and we built some 400 feet of fence out of telephone poles, and there were just three of us working at it. So I'd find things to do. But, no, I don't know what -- I liked pictures, and I liked working in them, but I think that's all finished now.

The President. Oh! [Laughing] I think there are always some people that tell you whether you should try to do that or not, and this happened -- I had been Governor of California for 8 years, and on the basis of that, there were people that thought that I should seek this particular job. And so I did, and was elected by the people to be President. And I have to tell you it's a hard job, but it's also a very challenging and fulfilling thing to have an opportunity to do something that you think might help the people of our country.

The President. Well, from everything that I've heard from all of our people who have been able to come here -- and, incidentally, I know I've met some of you before, and not just on television, because there were some of you who visited the White House, and I saw you outside on the South Lawn there and got to say hello to a number of you -- but from all that I've heard, everybody on our side is very happy that you're our adopted school.

The President. Well, I can tell you business has been steady. [Laughter] I mentioned going to the ranch last summer and everything. And my wife, Nancy, told me after that vacation, she said that she's decided that Presidents don't get vacations, they just get a change of scenery.

The President. Well, I have to tell you this, that I am firmly convinced -- I don't know that I can say about a particular year or not, who'd be supported -- I am convinced that one day before too long there's going to be a woman holding this job. And among the heads of state that I have been able to meet, both when I was Governor and since I've been President, people like Golda Meir, when she was the head of government of Israel, Margaret Thatcher, who is the present Prime Minister of England, Indira Gandhi of India -- I have found them to be really tremendous people, wonderful people and strong leaders. And I see no reason why the United States should not be able to do the same thing.

The President. Well, I've asked myself the same question several times. But I think that it all came from when I was asked, and agreed, to become the Governor or seek the Governorship of California. And on the basis of the 8 years there as Governor, that led to this.

I have to tell you, though, I never had any idea in my life, prior to that time, that I would ever be doing anything like this. So don't be surprised, or don't be disturbed if all of you haven't made up your minds yet what you want to do with your future, with your life. I didn't really settle down to what I was going to do until I'd actually finished my total education.

The President. Well, we had looked at a number, and then between us, we all decided that this was the school we'd like to do. So we had a meeting on education over at the White House, and it was covered by television, and the television was being played also to your school here, as you know. And there, on television, we made the announcement that it was going to be your school.

Mr. Dalton. Mr. President, I know that you have another appointment. I want to interrupt to say that the Congress Heights School appreciates being a partner with the White House, and your endeavors have been rewarding to the students. And before you go, we would like to make a small presentation to you from one of your schools.

Now I know I didn't get to all the hands. But I think, as partners, there'll be other occasions when we can get together, and we'll answer the questions we missed today or, maybe, at that time, you'll have figured out some different ones you want to ask.

But again, this has been a great pleasure and -- well, the principal says that I can't, that my time is up. He says that I can't take any more. It's the same way with the press there in the press conferences. There are always more hands than we have time for.

During the question-and-answer session, Annie Staton, a teacher, repeated the students questions for the benefit of the other participants and observers. William Dalton is the principal of the school.

Well, I want to thank all of you for what you're doing to advance the ideals and the goals that unite us. We've journeyed far, I think, in these 3 years. But it never would have happened without the drive and the energy and determination of officeholders in State capitals and communities all across America. America's future looks bright, and you've made the difference.

Our economic recovery is bringing new hope and opportunity to our people. Inflation has plummeted by two-thirds to about 4 percent. The prime rate is almost half what it was when we took office. Three words describe our recovery program: Jobs, jobs, and jobs.

And last month alone, 700,000 more Americans were found on the payrolls. And we've had the steepest drop in the unemployment rate in over three decades. And I meant the 700,000 in just that 1 month -- from the previous month. The overall unemployment rate is down to 7.7 percent, and among adult women, the rate has dropped from 9.1 to 6.9. Since the beginning of the dramatic upturn 15 months ago, nearly 5 million -- 4.9 million -- people have gone back to work in the United States. And more people are working than ever before in our history. But we can't rest until every American who wants a job has found one.

All the leading economic indicators suggest that our economic growth will continue. The failed policies of higher taxes, bigger government, soaring inflation, and runaway spending haven't disappeared. In fact, they're lurking not far away, as anyone who had time to watch the debate last night would know. Right now those failed policies are on the stump -- just a few hundred miles south of here.

The Federal Government and the budget must be brought under better control. Deficits remain a problem, but the biggest problem is the size of the government's claim on our economy. I'm dead serious about negotiating a downpayment on the deficit. But common sense, not partisan politics, should govern the deliberations so that we can protect the interests of the American people.

The starting point is to cut out the waste in spending -- and believe me, we've discovered there's still a lot of waste in spending. Personal tax rates have been reduced. We passed an historic tax reform indexing so that government will no longer be able to use inflation to profit at your expense. But those in government who have a stake in bigger government don't want you to have indexing. The billions in tax and spending increases that these spenders are pushing would not reduce the deficit; they just reduce the recovery.

We want to go forward, not backward. And America will go forward if we simplify the tax system and reduce tax rates further. Republicans want to build an opportunity society. We can all be proud that we're putting America's future back in the hands of the people and proud that we're working to strengthen our social institutions, the bedrock of our society and our freedom.

But important challenges remain. We can start by letting our children have the right to call on a little help from God at the start of the school day, if they so choose. When 80 percent of the people want voluntary prayer back in our schools, I think it takes a lot of gall to tell them they can't have it. Well, if enough of you make your voices heard, we can restore the right of voluntary prayer in the classroom.

Excellence in education means getting back to fundamentals, working from the bottom up, providing local leadership, and thinking smarter. And I think our support for basic reform is starting to pay off. When our administration took office, only a handful of States had task forces on education. Today they all do. And reforms are being adopted in academic standards, discipline, curriculum, and basic values. For example, 44 States are increasing graduation requirements; 42 are studying improvements in teacher certification; and 33 are considering or have enacted legislation for master teacher type programs. So, it's up to us to make sure the momentum continues.

In connection with this whole thing on education, I just had a chore this morning that was most pleasant. You know, this partnership thing that is sweeping the Nation of various business firms or organizations or groups and labor unions -- and even some of our professional athletic teams have formed partnerships with local schools, and they help and are going to field trips and going there to lecture, whatever they can do to help. Well, the White House adopted a school here in town -- Congress Heights School -- and I was out there this morning and was taking questions from the students there and meeting them.

But a third important challenge is to restore the proper balance to our criminal justice system. We came to Washington determined to crack down on habitual criminals, organized crime, and the drugpushers. And in 1982 crime went down 4.3 percent, and that's the biggest decline in 10 years.

But now the bill is being bottled up in committee by Democrats in the House. And I'm very disappointed in their attitude. When it comes to putting criminals behind bars, when it comes to keeping the American people safe, there should be no Republicans or Democrats -- just Americans. Now, if they continue to refuse, then you and I not only have the right; we have the obligation to hold their feet to the fire.

Well, back in the late seventies, some had lost sight of Mr. Truman's wisdom. We had an uncomfortable feeling that we'd lost respect overseas, and we no longer trusted our leaders to defend peace and freedom. Today the world knows once more that America can be counted on to defend freedom, peace, and human dignity. And, believe me, that makes the world safer for all of us.

Now let me say a few words about El Salvador, a new democracy that is struggling to protect itself from extremists of the right and the left. El Salvador will be holding elections at the end of this month. But if they're to succeed, they must take place in a climate of security. We know that Cuban-supported guerrillas plan to disrupt these elections, just as they tried and failed to do that 2 years ago when they held their first elections. But the Salvadorans are out of U.S. military aid assistance funds, because my original request was not fully funded by the Congress. El Salvador -- their army, trying to protect them against these guerrillas, will soon be out of ammunition, supplies, and funds for U.S. training support. As a matter of fact, shipments of medical supplies have already had to be stopped. Without these supplies and training support, El Salvador cannot hold secure elections or defend their country.

Therefore, I've asked the Congress to approve an emergency, short-term military assistance package to tide the situation over until the Congress acts on the recommendations of the Bipartisan Commission on Central America. This package is urgently needed, and I urge its rapid approval by the Congress. Democracy in El Salvador depends on it.

And to those who maybe question whether they really are achieving anything in democracy: Two years ago, observers from our Congress went down to observe those elections. Eighty-three percent of the people turned out. We haven't turned out 83 percent of the people for an election in years and years. And they actually saw -- some of these Congressmen -- and talked with a woman who was standing in the lines for hours waiting to vote, waiting her turn, had been shot, wounded by the guerrillas, and refused to leave the lines for medical attention until she had been allowed to vote. This is what we're trying to defend down there and protect, and I think they deserve our help after 400 years.

Two months ago that Bipartisan Commission submitted its report. They called on our government to substantially increase economic and military assistance to Central America. Between two-thirds and three-fourths of that assistance will be economic and social, not military. And although the region is vital to our national interest and the situation increasingly urgent, the Congress has not acted.

As a nation, we can't afford to let this issue drag on while people die in Central America. We can't afford to let political partisanship jeopardize our security interests or undercut the opportunity for El Salvador to build its democracy. The Bipartisan Commission gave us a formula which should be acceptable to all. So, let's use it and get on with it.

Even before women -- maybe you don't know this -- had a right to vote, our party became the first party to elect a woman to the United States Congress. And today the only women in the Senate are Nancy Kassebaum and Paula Hawkins -- Republicans. And, of course, we have nine outstanding Republican Congresswomen, including Barbara Vucanovich, who is here with us today. Now, don't you think it's about time that we give them some more company?

But just as important, thousands of able Republican women like you are serving in public offices all across America. We want to see the numbers grow. We want to see them grow here in Washington for sure -- and here in Washington and in every American community. Someday, and I hope it's sooner rather than later, a woman's going to have my job. Our job is to make sure she's a Republican.

American people share our values. But we cannot afford to rest; there's too much that remains to be done. So, with your help, with your frontier spirit, we'll get the job done. And we'll make 1984 a great year for the Republican Party.

The President. Well, maybe might not have picked that, and yet I think I can understand -- a kind of a new face. But I still think that it's too early to really be naming any frontrunners or anything in that race. Having gone through a series of primaries, there's a long way to go.

Q. Mr. President, a lot of us pundits have been predicting that this race would turn into a generational conflict. I recall you in the past talking about how -- finally how America needs to return to the stature and to the values of its past. Will you be adjusting that strategy if you are facing an opponent who talks about, compares himself -- backing the future, as opposed to the policies of the past?

The President. No. As a matter of fact -- it might be in the past in that, to the extent that some of the things were principles that this country was based on -- but I think that what we've done has been a departure, certainly from the past 40-odd years of Democratic domination in the country in which they have held both Houses of the Congress.

Q. Mr. President, can you give us some idea about what you would do in the next term to control the deficits? Are we talking -- would you -- are you considering possibly another increase, or an increase in taxes by changing the system, say, or would you make any further cuts in entitlement programs?

The President.  --  -- what we think are so-called loopholes that offer not quite fair benefits to some and not to all. We have also discussed and I've asked the Treasury Department to look into something that can't happen in this coming year, it's going to take more study than this, and that is a simplification of our tax structure. We need to look at ways to get the billions and billions of dollars that are not being paid in taxes -- owed by people legitimately and not by way of loopholes; in this instance, just outright violations of the tax code. To that extent, yes, we're going to do that. But for the future, we have to bring down the percentage of the gross national product that government is taking in this country.

See, I have a degree in economics myself. Now, that doesn't make me an authority, because I don't think economists are authorities; it's an inexact science. But I do remember that when I was getting my degree, it was more or less a standard acceptance in economics that the business cycle, so called, and the lean periods previous to that are -- what we now call recessions and depressions -- when they did occur, that usually it was when the government had gone beyond a certain point in the percentage of gross national product that it was taking. And that was just more or less accepted as standard.

Well, I think it is very true today. And I think that after we get what we've called a downpayment, which is about all we can get in this year, with the limited time that Congress is going to be here, then I think, in a bipartisan way, we're going to have to continue to look at government, as to how, structurally, we can reduce the share that government is taking.

Q. In the negotiations that have been going on in the last few weeks on this downpayment that you referred to, what concessions have you expressed willingness to make? And what concessions might you be willing to make for your part in these negotiations?

The President. Well, frankly, I've lost a little faith in the bipartisan approach to this, because the other side seemed more interested, I think, in politics than they did in meeting us in any way on trying to achieve this downpayment. So, I am and have been meeting with the leadership of our own in the House and in the Senate on that very thing, and will be willing, once we all come to agreement and have settled on a plan -- and I can't go beyond that, because we haven't -- but I will be willing then to go forward with our own proposal and hope that we can, with the support of the people, that we can get bipartisan support for it.

Republican leadership, both the House and Senate and myself. We are discussing -- and there are a number of viewpoints on figures having to do with spending reductions -- and I think we're pretty much agreed on that tax revenues would be -- if there are any -- would be obtained from corrections in the tax program and not in any change in the rates.

Q. Mr. President, not too long ago your finance chairman in Mississippi, William Munger, was reflecting back on the Republican's defeat in the gubernatorial race in that State last year, and he said that in order for Republicans to do well in Mississippi, they had to attract black votes, but if they did the things necessary to attract black votes, they'd be going against Republican philosophy. Do you agree with that?

The President. No, I don't. No, I think everything that we've done in our economic approach is of benefit to everyone. I know that there are charges being made -- I listened to the debate -- that somehow our attempts at economies and all have penalized people who were dependent on government aid. That is a falsehood. The simple fact of the matter is we're spending more on help for the people and for the needy than has ever been spent before in history. Our budget cuts have been reductions in the increase planned in spending. We haven't come to some place where we're spending less than had been spent.

Q. But, sir, blacks in Alabama say that they're not going to vote for you. They say they're going to vote for the Democrat, whoever he is. How are you going to counter what they perceive to be an administration that doesn't have their interest at heart?

The President. Well, you said the key word, that they ``perceive'' to be. And I'm just going to hope that in the campaign we can reveal to them that they have not been given the truth, that they are the victims of a lot of demagoguery that has portrayed us as guilty of things we haven't done.

The President. Well, even before a campaign started, this has been pretty much the theme of the other side. I have been held up as eating my young, that we have been hostile to the poor and our tax program benefits the rich. How can a program that cuts taxes evenly, percentagewise, across the board -- thus leaving the same rate of progression in our progressive tax system -- how can that be beneficial to the rich and detrimental to the others?

That was probably the worst tax on the elderly with fixed incomes, the worst tax on the poor who have to spend most of their earnings on subsistence, on the necessities. The person with luxury income who spends a minor portion of it on necessities and the rest on luxuries, they weren't really penalized as much by inflation.

Q. You mention the elderly. If I could ask about that. The large elderly population of Florida -- and they -- many voters seem to be convinced that you, more than the Democrats, have been trying to restrain the growth or cut back entitlement programs such as social security and medicare. First of all, is that a correct perception? And is it possible in a second term that you would be advocating further cutbacks?

The President. I have said repeatedly that programs like that -- there are things that need to be done, but we must never pull the rug out from those people presently receiving their payments from the program and dependent on it. You can't suddenly undermine them or break your contract with them. Reforms, if there are such to be made, must be made, looking toward the future, on people not yet dependent and who would have plenty of time and warning with regard to such changes.

Again, this was -- if you will remember, that was the issue of the 1982 campaign. And nothing had been done. We were guilty of trying to tell the Congress and our opponents that social security was facing financial disaster and it could hit it as early as July 1983. They denied that. I remember hearing the Speaker of the House, himself, deny that that was true. And then after the election was over, we all got together in a bipartisan group and without any animus, came up with a plan to save social security because it would be broke by July of 1983. And we came up with that program. It wasn't a permanent answer to some of the problems, but it did buy us a great many years down the road before we would again be in the fiscal spot of that kind.

Now, as to what we've done in social security since we've been here, the average married couple on social security has had a $180-a-month increase. So, I, again, don't think that we were doublecrossing anyone.

The President. Well, first of all, we know that unemployment is never consistent with the national average. I described this to some of our own people a little while ago, that to think that it is like the man that drowned trying to wade across a river whose average depth was 3 feet. There are those pockets and certain areas that are going to be hit harder than others. But in the surge which -- in reducing unemployment -- which is greater than anything we've seen in the last 30 years -- even those hard-hit areas are being benefited.

This is a program -- and I was amazed when one of the candidates in the debate last night started talking about we must look at tax incentives to help industry and so-forth put people back to work. Well, that's what the enterprise zones are all about, picking those hard-hit spots, both rural and urban, and generating employment through the use of tax incentives. And so far, a number of States have gotten tired of waiting for the Congress to act and do it at a national level, and have put in their own enterprise zone programs. And every one of them is proving tremendously successful.

But, knowing that you might get around to unemployment, I just decided some figures might be of interest to you. You represent two, four, six, eight States -- and all in the same region. In every one of them the figures for the peak of unemployment, and the figures for -- I can't give them to you except for one State now -- but in December, as of the December level of the comeback, were considerably down from the peak. And in the State that you just mentioned, your own, at the peak, unemployment in West Virginia was 21. By December it was down to 15.7.

Department gives you the overall statistics, they don't break it down to States at the present figure. It takes them awhile to break it down as to States. So, all I have are the November figures, except for Florida, and that's because they do break it down for the 10 most populous States earlier than they do for the rest.

Maybe -- and, you know, all of your States, particularly there in the Sunbelt, you're going to have to recognize also that your reduction in unemployment may be a little slower because of the migration to the Sunbelt. And that means that newcomers coming in, without jobs and looking for jobs, are temporarily going to distort the figures.

Yes, I had the help of some of the finest economists in the country in working on the program that I call the economic recovery program. And toward the end of the summer, 1980, I announced that plan, and based our projections -- that, yes, it could balance the budget by '83, based on all the projections that those economists at that time -- before the election. Between that announcement and November, that projection was no longer valid, because the economy in 1980 was deteriorating so fast, and had not been projected to do so by any of these notable economists.

Now, when I started -- you've got to remember that the President comes in not with his own budget. You are still bound until the following October by the budget of the previous administration. Nor was my program in effect. We were still trying to get it. And in July of 1981 was when the further big dip came.

Now, some economists have said, well, we had a 1979, '80 recession, and then the thing that happened in July was another -- a different recession. Well, I don't think so. Things were -- it was a continuation. And the bottom fell out with the interest rates that stayed high, the automobile industry, the housing industry -- either one of which can start a recession by itself. So, nothing of what happened and the great surge to 10.8 percent in unemployment -- none of that could be attributed to our program, because our program hadn't started.

It took 3 years to get the 25-percent tax cut. Other things that were implemented -- and we never got all of the spending cuts. As a matter of fact, we got a little less than half of what we asked in spending cuts. And that's to this day.

Now, I could turn around and say that maybe the recovery might have been even better if we had gotten -- remember that one stage of our tax cut -- 10 percent of it -- was going to go into effect retroactively to January of 1981, and we didn't get it then. And when we did get it, after the drop had occurred, it was only 5 percent, and it didn't go into effect until October, which meant that it was about 1\1/4\ percent when it only went on for 3 years -- or 3 months.

Q. Mr. President, I want to get clear on one thing. Are you -- your comments earlier about this bipartisan -- bipartisan meetings over the deficit -- when you said you're now pursuing your own plan with other Republican leaders. Are you saying that you've abandoned altogether any hope of reaching any kind of compromise with the Democrats? Are you through talking with them?

Is it impossible for us to -- well, no, you can't remember; all of you're too young, so it would have to be history for you -- but for almost half a century the other party has been in control, as I said earlier, of both Houses of the Congress. And Congress is the only one that can deal with these things. A President has a veto power, but a President cannot spend a single dime. There's nothing in the Constitution that gives the President the right to spend anything. But for almost this half-century we have every year run deficits. It was almost a trillion dollars by the time we came here. And there were many of us who opposed this. And we were told at the time that the national debt didn't matter because we owed it to ourselves. That was the explanation. We were told the deficit spending and a little inflation was necessary to maintain prosperity. Well, some of us didn't think that added up. And I can show you speeches I made 20, 25 years ago in which I said inflation cannot continue without going out of control eventually. You cannot go down this road.

Well, now, suddenly, with the big dip that came in July in that recession, with millions more people added -- the unemployed, who became wards of the government, which increased the spending, but who were no longer paying the taxes, which decreased that; the very fact that we improve the inflation figure also militated against government revenues, because inflation is a source of tax increase. And we didn't get -- we didn't think we could reduce inflation that fast. We thought that there would be higher revenues than there turned out to be because of licking inflation.

Well, all of this, for them now to suddenly become aware of deficits -- and yet, when you try to talk to them, what is the only answer that they have for curbing the deficit? Increase taxes. Well -- and they'll also agree to cut defense spending. Well, defense spending right now is down to a little more than a fourth of the budget. Defense spending, historically, the days of Jack Kennedy, was virtually a half of the budget. Under Jack Kennedy, it was 47.8 percent. So, the -- and the increase in taxes -- they doubled taxes in the 5 years before we got here. And the deficits increased, because when you increase taxes, they increase spending.

But, if you'll remember, they described it as a reaffirmation of Democratic principles. And it did call for somewhere around $70 billion in increased taxes. But it also called for that much increased spending for new programs, social programs.

So, this was where we philosophically just were in complete disagreement -- that they think you can solve the budget deficit by increasing taxes. They don't even pay attention to the fact that this could subvert the recovery that we're now having and put us back where we were. But beyond that, they've made it plain, and, indeed, their own candidates talk of new spending programs.

The President. Well, I'm hoping that before I get out there that we'll have the school prayer amendment passed in the Congress. And here again, the effort that is being made to portray that as someway, somehow we're talking compulsory prayer; we're going to compel the schools. I'm sure there would be some schools -- all we're asking is that they have the right to if they want to.

But I think it's a right that we had for the bulk of our entire history in this country. And it didn't destroy the country at all. As a matter of fact, crime rates were lower, and we didn't have drug epidemics, and all sorts of things.

The President. Well now, wait a minute -- I'm going to have to ask, but -- you know, I have to tell you something about this room. I don't know whether you've noticed it or not -- out there in that center of the room under the dome, you kind of disappear a little on me.

Q. And the evidence is that there's more illegal drugs coming in than ever before -- at least in recent years and despite intensified enforcement in Florida and other places. And what I'm wondering is whether you think that because of that that there's going to be a need to change the drug enforcement strategy, and whether the drug enforcement strategy that you've employed has been a success?

The President. Oh, well, wait a minute. Then this -- if this is a new figure that I haven't obtained -- our task force in Florida, which is the first time that we have ever put the Federal Government, the State government, and the local authorities, the drug enforcement authorities, and the military involved in trying to head this off -- this shipment from out of the country coming in -- was so successful in Florida that this is where, why we went to 12 such task forces all around the country on our borders to try and have the same success. Of course, there's no question: When you've got the coastlines that we've got and the borders that we have, I don't think you will ever solve the problem totally by intercepting the drugs.

The answer is going to be the kind that has Nancy down in Houston. To really be successful, you're going to have to take the customer away from the pusher. The customer's going to have to start saying no. And this we're embarked on also, as you know, with great efforts all through the country.

The President. What we used was we used their radar facilities; also their air surveillance for information that we needed. I don't think they actually participated in any of the arrests, but they provided the surveillance and the information for us. If they can see an enemy coming in, I can see that.

Q. I had just one final question for you related to defense. This year for the third year now you're requesting in your defense budget funds for chemical weapons production. And of course, Congress has narrowly defeated these proposals for the last 2 years. There's been a suggestion made in the last week by some Democratic House Members that any proposal for funding for chemical weapons should be tied to legislation requiring the administration to make a new initiative on talks with the Soviets on chemical weapons control. So, my question is, first, do you think that the United States is doing all it can in this area? Would you agree to a proposal like that? And also, do you see any reasons now why Congress might be willing to pass the chemical weapons appropriation when they haven't been?

The President. If they were responsible, they would, because the very thing that they're talking about we are going to be ready very shortly to table a treaty for discussion of banning chemical weapons. We know that's the way to go. But the reason why they would be more of help if they would okay the spending is, how better to get the other side, then, to agree to a treaty with us banning this; how much better able we'll be if they know that if they don't do that, they will have to face the fact that we have chemical weapons that we can use against them.

The President. All of that -- we happen to know that they sent for those when they couldn't get him on anything else. They sent for those from the Albosta committee. Those are part of the record that the FBI said, as far as they're concerned, there was no criminal action, there was no misdeeds, and closed the investigation.

American Jews, and you certainly have proven that to me this morning with the figures that we've just heard. Through the agencies it funds, the UJA provides vital social and economic assistance, including resettlement, rehabilitation, and development programs for Jews in Israel and more than 30 other countries. And through its Young Leadership Cabinet, the UJA trains the hundreds of young men and women for service positions of responsibility around the world. In recognition of your historic task and your great humanitarian achievements, I certainly commend you.

In your lives, you must overcome great challenges. I know you draw strength and inspiration from the well of a rich spiritual heritage, from the fundamental values of faith and family, work, neighborhood, and peace.

Two centuries ago, those values led Americans to build democratic institutions and begin their Constitution with those courageous and historic words, ``We, the people . . . .'' And today our democratic institutions and ideals unite all Americans, regardless of color or creed. Yet as we enjoy the freedom that America offers, we must remember that millions on Earth are denied a voice in government and must struggle for their rights. They live under brutal dictatorships or Communist regimes that systematically suppress human rights.

In the Soviet Union, Jews are virtually forbidden to teach Hebrew to their children, are limited to a small number of synagogues, and cannot publish books of Hebrew liturgy. Emigration of Jews from the Soviet Union has been brought to a near standstill. Prominent Jews like Iosif Begun have been arraigned in mock trials and given harsh sentences. Hebrew scholars like Lev Furman have seen their teaching materials robbed and their homes ransacked. And Jewish dissidents like Anatoly Shcharanskiy have been put in mental wards or thrown in jail. We must support Soviet Jews in their struggle for basic rights, and I urge all Americans to observe the International Day of Concern for Soviet Jews this Thursday, day after tomorrow, March 15th.

In this world where so many are hostile to democracy, how can Americans best preserve and promote the democratic ideals that we hold dear, ideals which are the keys to the golden door of human progress?

First, we must teach tolerance and denounce racism, anti-Semitism, and all ethnic or religious bigotry, wherever they exist, as unacceptable evils. And down through our history, American Jews have been on the frontlines in our nation's great struggles for equal rights. A century ago, the 14th amendment proclaimed the full protection of the law for all. In the fifties and sixties, the struggle for civil rights stirred our nation's soul. Americans must continue that great tradition, because even today vestiges of racism and anti-Semitism remain. Synagogues are vandalized, Jews and others are harassed and mocked, and Nazis and the Ku Klux Klan have attempted to march through black and Jewish neighborhoods. Well, let us reject prejudice, turn our backs on bigotry, and stand shoulder to shoulder for equal rights.

Our second challenge is to promote economic growth. Throughout history, civil and economic rights have gone hand in hand. For centuries, rulers kept Jews down by limiting their occupational choices. In our own country, many blacks suffered from Jim Crow prejudice, denied all but the poorest of jobs. But in a strong and growing economy, all groups have the opportunity to advance through hard work, enterprise, and heart.

Just 3 years ago, our nation was an economic disaster area. Double-digit inflation, record interest rates, huge tax increases, and too much regulation were destroying growth, drying up opportunities, and freezing those at the bottom of our society into a bleak existence of dependency. And that's why economic recovery without inflation was our top priority. We cut taxes, reduced the growth of the Federal budget, eliminated useless regulations, and passed an historic reform called tax indexing. Indexing means government can never again profit from inflation at your expense.

Despite all we've accomplished, we must go forward to new goals to keep the nightmare of inflation from ever coming back. We must enact constitutional budget reforms like the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment. And to make taxes more simple and fair and to provide greater incentives to our people, we must press for tax simplification -- a sweeping and comprehensive reform of the entire tax code.

But the other day I got a figure from the Treasury Department that astounded me. If you were a young lawyer deciding, maybe, to get into the area of tax counseling and advice and so forth, do you know how many books of regulations you would have on your shelves just to help you with the income tax? Well, you've heard of the Harvard Classics -- 5-foot shelf of books. You'd have to have a shelf of 31 feet of books just for that one subject.

Well, as we move ahead, we're determined to leave no one behind. Under this administration more funds go to needy Americans, even after adjusting for inflation, than ever before. And total spending on social programs has increased by $71 billion during these last 3 years.

Jewish charity would join us in questioning the relationship between greater Federal spending and a healthy, prosperous, and growing country. During the sixties and seventies, the Great Society and other Federal programs led to massive increases in social spending. Why, then, at the same time, did the number of Americans below the poverty line stop shrinking? Why did we see a drop in the number of males in the work force and a huge increase in births out of wedlock?

New Deal gave cash to the poor, but the Great Society failed to target assistance to the truly needy and made government the instrument of vast transfer payments, erecting huge bureaucracies to manage hundreds of social programs. The Great Society failed in two crucial aspects: It fostered dependence on government subsidies, and it made the transfer of money from Washington bureaucrats to those in need seem like a mission impossible.

I was a New Deal Democrat. And I still believe, today, that there is only one compassionate, sensible, and effective policy for Federal assistance: We must focus domestic spending on the poor and bypass the bureaucracies by giving assistance directly to those who need it. We must end dependency, eliminate quotas, and foster a vital, innovative economy that rewards all Americans according to their talent and hard work. If we do, we can enhance our democratic ideals and can make America a genuine opportunity society.

Well, during those 10 years our spending on defense dropped over 20 percent in real terms. We canceled major weapons programs, reduced our nuclear stockpile to its lowest level in 20 years, and slackened in the training of our Armed Forces. Between 1968 and 1978, we cut our Navy, the fleet, by more than half.

Since taking office, our administration has made significant headway in rebuilding our defenses and making America more secure. Perhaps you remember the 29th Psalm in which King David said, ``The Lord will give strength to His people; the Lord will bless His people with peace.'' Well, today America once again recognizes that peace and strength are inseparable.

But we've only begun to repair past damage. Make no mistake: If we heed those who would cripple America's rebuilding program, we will undermine our own security and the security of our closest friends, like Israel, and I am not prepared to let that happen. After two decades of military expansion by the Soviet Union and a decade of neglect by the United States, we're struggling not to regain the superiority we once enjoyed, but simply to restore the military equivalence we need to keep the peace.

Herzen, the great Russian writer, warned, ``To shrink from saying a word in defense of the oppressed is as bad as any crime. . . .'' Well, we who are blessed by the fruits of liberty have a personal responsibility and a moral obligation to speak out in defense of our brothers and sisters.

Our administration has repeatedly and vigorously protested the persecution of Jews and others in the Soviet Union and other Communist nations. We're also using our influence with countries that receive American assistance to give human rights firm support. In El Salvador, we're insisting that the leaders take steps to end human rights abuse. And although El Salvador is far from perfect, we've seen marked progress.

U.N. Ambassador Jeane Kirkpatrick is our leader on this. And let me assure you of one thing about Jeane: She is a very tenacious woman. She has defended Israel and stood up for human rights with persistence and courage. But just so no one gets any ideas, I will be blunt: If Israel is ever forced to walk out of the U.N., the United States and Israel will walk out together.

Standing steadfast with our allies in support of greater economic growth and of peace with freedom is our third great challenge. Our administration is working hard to do just that. In Europe we and our NATO allies have shown the Soviets our willingness to negotiate and our unshakable resolve to defend Western Europe. In the Far East, we are strengthening our ties to the Asian democracies and developing our relations with China. In Central America we have supported democracy and fostered economic development. And in the Middle East we have strengthened our relations with a nation close to your heart and mine -- the State of Israel.

East. Israel and the United States are bound together by the ties of friendship, shared ideals, and mutual interests. We're allies in the defense of freedom in the Middle East. The United States was the first nation to recognize the State of Israel, and ever since, our support for Israel has remained unflinching. Today, when even our NATO allies vote with us in the United States [United Nations] only some 6 out of 10 votes, the alliance between the United States and Israel is so strong that we vote together more than nine times out of ten.

First, the U.S.-Israeli strategic relationship has been elevated and formalized. This is the first time in Israel's history that a formal strategic relationship has existed. The new American-Israeli Joint Political-Military Group is working to decide how the U.S. and Israel can counter the threat that growing Soviet involvement in the Middle East poses to our mutual interests. Our cooperation adds to deterrence and improves and protects the prospects for peace and security. The negotiations have been positive, and they're moving forward.

Second, we're negotiating to establish a free trade area between the United States and Israel, and this will launch a new era of closer economic relations between our countries. By substantially eliminating duties and nontariff barriers between our nations, we will enable American producers to sell and compete in Israel while providing Israeli manufacturers unimpeded access to the free world's largest market.

We have restructured our 1985 foreign aid package, and Israel will now receive economic aid totaling $850 million and a military grant of some $1.4 billion. This will ensure that Israel maintains its qualitative military edge.

Were the Soviets to control the region -- and they have expanded their influence there in a number of ways, notably, by stationing 7,000 troops and advisers in Syria -- the entire world would be vulnerable to economic blackmail. Their brutal war against the Afghan people continues with increasing ferocity. We must not allow them to dominate the region.

Second, we must prevent a widening of the conflict in the Persian Gulf which could threaten the sealanes carrying much of the free world's oil. It could also damage the infrastructure that pumps the oil out of the ground, and we must not permit this to happen.

Third, we seek to go on promoting peace between Israel and her Arab neighbors. In response to the growth of Syrian power and the rise of the Iranian threat, we must help to protect moderate Arabs who seek peace from the radical pressures that have done such harm in Lebanon.

Syria is trying to lead a radical effort to dominate the region through terrorism and intimidation aimed, in particular, at America's friends. One such friend we continue to urge to negotiate with Israel is King Hussein of Jordan. Today, Jordan is crucial to the peace process, and for that very reason, Jordan, like Israel, is confronted by Syria and faces military threats and terrorist attacks.

Since the security of Jordan is crucial to the security of the entire region, it is in America's strategic interest, and I believe it is in Israel's strategic interest, for us to help meet Jordan's legitimate needs for defense against the growing power of Syria and Iran. Now such assistance to Jordan does not threaten Israel, but enhances the prospects for Mideast peace by reducing the dangers of the radical threat.

This is an historic moment in the Middle East. Syria must decide whether to allow Lebanon to retain control over its own destiny or condemn it to occupation. Syria forced the Lebanese Government to renounce the May 17th agreement with Israel precisely because it was a good agreement. Now those who have chosen this course will have to find other ways to secure the withdrawal of Israeli forces. Arab governments and the Palestinian Arabs must decide whether to reach peace with Israel through direct negotiations. And if Arab negotiators step forward, Israel must decide if she will take the risks necessary to attain the real security that comes only with genuine peace. I have no doubt that given that choice, the Israelis will once again have the courage to choose peace.

Now, we hope that the Government of Israel will understand that continued settlement activity in the West Bank and Gaza will make the peace process more difficult. Peace can only come about through the give-and-take of direct negotiations. These negotiations will deal with many issues, including the status of Jerusalem, voting rights, land use, and security. If there's to be any hope for these negotiations, however, we must preserve our credibility as a fairminded broker seeking a comprehensive solution. Only the United States can advance this process. And we must not undermine our role.

If I could leave you with one thought today it would be this: Even though in the Middle East and elsewhere the world seems hostile to democratic ideals, it's the free men and women on this Earth who are making history.

Today America is leading a revolution even more sweeping than the Industrial Revolution of a century ago. It's a revolution ranging from tiny microchips to voyages into the vast, dark spaces of space; from home computers that can put the great music, film, and literature at a family's fingertips to new medical breakthroughs that can add years to our lives, even helping the lame to walk and the blind to see.

In Israel free men and women are every day demonstrating the power of courage and faith. Back in 1948 when Israel was founded, pundits claimed the new country could never survive. Well, today no one questions that Israel is a land of stability and democracy in a region of tyranny and unrest.

The President today announced the appointment of Burleigh C.W. Leonard as Special Assistant to the President for Policy Development. He will also serve as Executive Secretary of the Cabinet Council on Food and Agriculture.

He's truly an international personality, a valiant supporter of Western values and ideals, and a man of great personal courage. As Prime Minister of Portugal, he represents a close and valued ally, one of the founding members of the North Atlantic alliance. We regularly seek his counsel, and again today we've had valuable and extensive discussions.

Prime Minister Soares and I examined economic matters of importance to both our peoples. I assured the Prime Minister that the United States will continue to do all that is feasible to assist Portugal in meeting its difficult economic challenges.

In another vital area of cooperation, we discussed the bilateral mutual security arrangements renewed last December. Under these arrangements, Portugal is playing a significant role in protecting the freedom of the Western democracies and maintaining world peace. The responsibilities he demonstrates reflects well on the character of Portugal's people and her leaders.

East and Central America -- regions in which he has a long and deep interest and concern. And certainly we benefited from his insights. We had an especially useful discussion of the outlook for peaceful settlements of the conflicts in southern Africa. Portugal's historic interests in Africa and her cultural, economic, and political ties of today add much weight to Prime Minister Soares' judgments in this area. We agreed that regular consultations between our two governments on African questions are useful for us both, and we will continue this practice.

President of the United States for his invitation to make this official visit to Washington, and to say how pleased I am to have been afforded this opportunity to renew now, as head of the Portuguese Government, the contacts and friendly relationships which I established in the past with President Reagan and the American administration.

During this period, we have learned to respect your leadership qualities and the straightforward way in which you have handled delicate situations, while always keeping in mind the fundamental values of democracy. Contacts between the leaders of our countries, which should be considered normal between two NATO allies which have maintained close relations over a long period, now assume special importance in view of the readiness of both parties to imbue our relationship with a new dynamic following the important impetus to our cooperation in the defense area provided by the renewal of the Lajes Base agreement.

The sound relations existing between the United States and Portugal are not the result of occasional identical positions or passing convergence of interests. They are, rather, the result of a sincere and profound sharing of values and ideals, such as freedom, democracy, and respect for human rights, principles in which we believe and which we practice. The Luso-American community residing in this country, which here bears witness to the affection in which the Portuguese hold the American people, greatly contributes to the friendship which unites us.

Among the issues which we have had the opportunity to address, I wish to emphasize those related to southern Africa, a region of the world where important steps on the road to peace are now being taken. Portugal, which maintains centuries-old ties of friendship with the people in this region, namely with those of Mozambique and Angola, has devoted particular attention to the problems of this area, following the process of decolonization carried out in 1974, and has spared no effort to contribute to the creation of a climate of dialog and peaceful solutions to the problems of the region.

Contadora group, as well as all those directed towards advancing the democratic process and establishing regimes guaranteeing true freedom in the countries of the region, are deserving of our support. The cultural ties existing betwen the Iberian countries and Latin America, stemming from a longstanding commonality of history and language, lead Portugal to take profound interest in the evolution of the situation in the countries of this region and to maintain close contacts with those forces seeking to uphold the principles of liberty in that part of the world.

It was very gratifying for me to note that the United States and Portugal share very similar points of view regarding East-West relations and the need to strengthen the Atlantic alliance in order to resist expansionist threats and contribute to peace.

Nancy and I wish everyone a joyous St. Patrick's Day. For the Irish and all the sons and daughters of Erin the world over, this is truly a festive day filled with pride and renewed hope for the future.

Like so many of the Irish before and after him, my great-grandfather, Michael Reagan, heard, in the words of a favorite song, ``. . . a whisper of a country that lies beyond the sea, where rich and poor stand equal in the light of freedom's day.'' He and millions like him left home and family in Ireland to make their way to this country. While they came seeking the bounty of America, they brought with them a rich Irish heritage, a strong faith in God, and a love of liberty. They came imbued with sustaining talents great enough to make them an integral part of their new home and to spark a nurturing and enduring friendship between the peoples of Ireland and America.

The annual observance of St. Patrick's Day provides a fine opportunity for all of us to warm our hearts in remembrance of the bonds of history, family, and tradition that have come to us from the Emerald Isle. We join Irish Americans throughout the land in celebrating their truly singular contribution to our way of life.

His courage and determination to stand up for those rights have earned him the respect and admiration of countless people worldwide. But he would not want this day to be dedicated solely to him. Rather it is a day when men and women of good will reflect on all the aspects of the situation of Jewry in the U.S.S.R. That situation has deteriorated over the past year. Jewish emigration from the Soviet Union has fallen to its lowest levels since the late 1960's; officially tolerated anti-Semitism manifesting itself in broadcasts, articles, and the widely publicized formation of an ``Anti-Zionist Committee of the Soviet Public'' has increased; and individual refuseniks continue to be subjected to harassment.

All in all, this is a grim picture. But we will not be disheartened. Soviet Jews value the support of concerned individuals and organizations all over the world. In our country this support reflects the broad, grassroots concern which abuse of human rights elicits in the American public. Outrage where human rights are violated is one of the best American traditions. I endorse the International Day of Concern and the goals for which it stands.

Jews to practice their cultural traditions freely and to emigrate from the U.S.S.R. if they so choose. This point has been emphasized to the Soviet authorities in many fora and at all levels; it has been conveyed to the new Soviet leadership. It is our sincere hope that the Soviets will ease their repressive human rights policies and fulfill the solemn international obligations they have undertaken, including their commitment under the Helsinki accords. In our dialog with the Soviet authorities, we have no higher priority. Those who care about the fate of Soviet Jews should know that we are with them today and will be with them tomorrow.

America has always been a magnet for people seeking freedom and peace and the opportunity to better their lot and to go as far as their God-given talents will let them. Pioneers came to our shores with the courage to start all over again because they knew America offered a hope for the future. Today our task is to make sure that even the most recent pioneers have good reason to dream the same great dreams as those who came before.

A promising future begins with a foothold on the economic ladder, and the recovery now surging through this land is providing millions of our people that chance. The economic recovery is helping every American and every ethnic group. And just this morning we received more good news. In February, industrial production rose another 1.2 percent. That is the 15th consecutive monthly increase. And just to put a little frosting on the cake, this morning when they gave us that news about February, the month of February, they also corrected the information they'd previously given us about January, and it was higher than had previously been announced.

Nor did the explosion in social spending get crime and drugs off the street or give us a better education for our children. The disadvantaged became more dependent on Federal programs as work disincentives discouraged initiative. Urban America was going downhill, and solutions seemed farther and farther away. It is no wonder that Americans were losing confidence in their government. And now that we're regaining confidence, and now that America is back on the road to robust growth, I believe it's time to build even wider opportunities.

We must go forward to new goals to keep the nightmare of inflation from ever coming back. We must enact constitutional budget reforms like the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment. And to make taxes more simple and fair and to provide greater incentives to our people, we must press for tax simplification, a sweeping and comprehensive reform of the entire tax code.

Development Sam Pierce and others are going to be speaking with you this afternoon. And at the risk of preempting them, I'd like to highlight several programs that offer exciting opportunities for urban America.

In the area of jobs, the Job Training Partnership Act gives communities new flexibility, and by using private industry councils, it matches local needs with sensible training. This program will train over a million workers a year for productive jobs. The old job program, CETA, did just the opposite. It spent $53 billion to find private sector jobs for only 15 percent of the participants.

Well, those days are over, and the future is now a genuine partnership for real jobs with a bright future. And while I'm talking about jobs, let me mention that more and more people recognize that the minimum wage puts unskilled young people at a disadvantage when they're looking, particularly, for those first jobs or those summer vacation jobs. Our youth employment opportunity wage proposal would give our young people the opportunity to gain their first foothold on the economic ladder. And the proposal would protect current workers from displacement. It'll soon be before the Congress, and I'd like to appeal for your strong support.

Enterprise zones is another legislative initiative that would mean welcome renewal for urban areas of hardcore unemployment. Enterprise zones encourage growth and opportunity where we need it most -- in areas of high unemployment and in areas that are hardest hit by urban decay. The legislation provides incentives for business firms and entrepreneurs to invest in blighted areas, create new jobs, and bring new life to distressed areas. This legislation has been on Capitol Hill for 2 years. The Senate has passed it, but the House continues to drag its feet. And, forgive me, but those who refuse to take action on a bill that's to create jobs and opportunity are the last people who should be giving speeches about their compassion for the unemployed.

And too many of those Members in the House are dragging their feet on another important piece of legislation -- one that would get tough on criminals. For too many years, crime and the fear of crime robbed our cities of their strength and vitality, and inner cities suffered the most. Well, common sense is beginning to pay off. In 1982 the crime rate dropped by 4.3 percent, and that's the biggest decline in a decade. But we still need to do much more, and I am determined to do everything possible to get crime off our streets.

We need new laws to stop drug traffickers and tougher laws to fight the criminal elements in our society. And the way to get long-overdue reform begins with the passage of our Comprehensive Crime Control Act. This package will give more protection to our law-abiding citizens by cracking down on criminals, particularly organized crime and drug traffickers. It would enable authorities to keep people considered dangerous to the community behind bars, pending trial, and it would eliminate paroles. The legislation has, as I say, already passed the Senate. The House should stop delaying, put partisan politics aside, and do what's right for you, the law-abiding people of this country.

I sense a spirit of optimism spreading across our land, carrying hope and opportunity for more and more urban areas. And I think it's justified. America is moving forward again. I know much remains to be done. I know many of our fellow countrymen still wonder what will come of their hopes and dreams. Success will not come easy, but it will come. And to make it happen, America needs the help of all Americans, including those from la isla de encanto.

But you've enriched our national culture and our heritage. And we need your energy, your hard work, and your values. We need people like Antonio Monroig, Rita DiMartino, Reynaldo Maduro, and Rafael Capo -- Puerto Ricans who are doing an outstanding job in leadership positions in our administration. If you follow their hopes and dreams, all of us will benefit.

America can be proud of its record in international trade. From the earliest days of the Republic, the Yankee trader was a familiar figure in all the great cities of the world. Merchants of every nation knew and respected these traders for the energy and resourcefulness that have always been so characteristic of the American people. By the middle of the nineteenth century, clipper ships from the United States had become the graceful symbols of our national determination to be first and best.

In each decade of our history, we have matched our trading strength with that of the strongest nations in the world. We have opened new markets, created new industries, and pioneered new technologies. In a competitive environment, we have succeeded and flourished. We have built the prosperity of this country on our confidence and on our own strength, ingenuity, and creativity.

Today, the United States is the greatest trading nation on Earth. We are the world's largest economy, its biggest market, and its leading exporter. American brand-names are household words in every market, and everywhere the words ``Made in U.S.A.'' are accepted as an assurance of the highest quality and service.

The strength of our exports has meant a great deal to America. To industry, it has meant profits and added opportunities for growth. To labor, exports have meant jobs -- more than five million in 1983. To the American consumer, free and fair trade has meant better products in greater variety and at lower prices.

There is no question that world trade is fiercely competitive nowadays. Few industries are unaffected by the pressure of foreign goods and services, whether competing for sales at home or abroad. This is a continuing challenge for us. Some would have the United States look to protectionist measures for the answer to competition. As we learned in the 1930's, protectionism in one country only provokes retaliation and invites protectionism in others. International tension grows, the flow of trade is diminished, and the world economy contracts.

Free and fair trade benefits all nations. For this reason, the United States is committed to policies promoting unrestricted trade and investment consistent with our security interests. Internationally, we are working with our trading partners for new negotiations in support of freer world trade, greater competition, and more open markets. At home we have urged American business to challenge foreign competition with aggressive selling, research and development, improved management systems, and innovations. Above all, we must build on the surest foundation for this country's prosperity -- our confidence in our own strength and abilities.

Ladies and gentlemen, in my State of the Union Message, I proposed a bipartisan negotiation to develop what I called a downpayment on the deficit. I urged Democrats and Republicans to come together on the less controversial issues to enact a deficit reduction program quickly that would reduce the deficit by a hundred billion dollars over 3 years.

To help get the process moving, I've had a series of meetings with the Republican leadership who are here with us today, except for two -- Senator Dole, who is busy on the Hill, and Senator Mark Hatfield, but who are both in total agreement with this plan. Senator Hatfield is appearing at Harvard right now.

Our objective has been to reach agreement on a deficit reduction package that could be passed by the Senate and that would be supported by the bipartisan group representing both Houses of Congress. I'm happy to announce that the congressional leadership and I have agreed on a balanced package that is comprised of three basic elements.

These savings can be achieved by passing the Senate Finance Committee's pending entitlement reforms and Grace commission savings, a farm program target price freeze, the pending reconciliation bill's Federal pay cap and COLA delays, and a freeze and cap on nondefense discretionary programs.

Second, we have agreed to close certain tax loopholes to raise revenues by $48 billion over 3 years. There would be no increase in tax rates. The changes in tax law would close certain loopholes of questionable fairness.

Third, we have agreed to further reductions in defense spending, which will slow our defense buildup somewhat but which will not seriously reduce our national security to a point of unacceptable risk. The changes we've made will amount to defense budget authority reductions over the next 3 years of approximately $57 billion and 3-year defense outlay savings of about 40 billion. This, I should note, is in addition to the reductions that we already made before submitting our budget to the Congress.

For the 1985 budget, it would mean $9 billion in additional revenues, and I repeat, without increasing tax rates. Domestic spending will be reduced by 9 billion, and defense budget authority in 1985 by 14 billion. It is a fair and balanced package, one that can be easily implemented. It merits the support of all those who are responsibly concerned about deficits. It's worthy of prompt attention and positive action by the Congress.

And I want to thank the Republican leaders of the Senate and the House for their constructive effort and cooperation. I hope their Democratic colleagues will now join with them in enacting this downpayment on the deficit. And with that, I can tell you that Secretary Don Regan and Dave Stockman will be prepared to brief you as we leave here in the Press Room.

Q. Mr. President, you're going to meet President Mitterrand next week, and what are the main issues you are going to raise with him and -- for instance, are you going to talk about the need for reform in NATO to prevent a drift between Europe and the U.S., as many have suggested? The need -- do you think there is a need for such reforms?

And also I will be discussing with him the East-West relations and what our goals are, because we are determined to bring about arms reductions and to get conversations restored with the Soviet Union to where we can discuss face to face the problems that only we can solve.

Q. You and President Mitterrand came into office at about the same time 3 years ago; you with a conservative agenda, him on a socialist platform. Given this contrary background, how have you been able to develop a good rapport and maintain the cooperation between your two governments?

The President. Well, while it is true that there are differences in our political philosophies, there are a greater number of things we have in common. We have spent a fair amount of our lives in politics, worked hard to become Presidents, and entered office at approximately the same time.

Since then we have been together on several occasions -- at three summit meetings, at Yorktown and Cancun, as well as in each other's capital. Finally, we are both leaders of major Western nations with a set of global interests and concerns which, while not always identical, are almost always compatible.

What we share the most is a common commitment to the Atlantic alliance. We have both worked to strengthen that alliance. I think it fair to say that today there is an unusual degree of transatlantic consensus and security cooperation. President Mitterrand played a significant role in helping achieve this. He and I also share a desire for a renewed and improved East-West dialog, including the resumption of arms reduction talks to reduce world tensions.

I will be discussing this and a whole range of global issues with President Mitterrand. I am looking forward to his visit, which comes at a time when U.S.-French relations have seldom been better than they are today.

Q. Your Ambassador to Paris, Mr. Evan Galbraith, has been widely criticized recently for intervening in French domestic affairs by publicly criticizing the role of Communist Ministers in the French Government. At the time, the White House said he had your full confidence. Does that mean that you approve of his views and the way he expressed them?

The President. The matter was successfully resolved some weeks ago, and I see no good reason to reopen it. I look forward to seeing Van Galbraith again -- and as you have noted, he enjoys my full confidence -- when he is here for the state visit of President Mitterrand.

The President. We regard, as do all other of its members, the Atlantic alliance as the essential framework of our common security. Within that framework, we have consistently urged a greater defense contribution from our European partners. We note with pleasure the steps which have been taken in this regard in recent years. As always, our attitude toward any specific initiatives for enhanced European defense will depend on the contribution that can be made to the overall strength and cohesion of the Atlantic alliance.

The President. As I have said on several occasions, U.S. troops in Europe are there to defend our vital national interests. Unilateral reductions in the number of U.S. troops in Europe will not reduce the threat to these interests. On the contrary, it would increase that threat.

I am committed to maintain the American contribution to the defense of Europe; indeed, we have made major efforts to strengthen that contribution. This commitment is shared, I believe, by the vast majority of the American people.

The President. France plays a constructive role in Africa, through its economic and security assistance programs. We maintain a constant and frank dialog with the French Government on African developments. We seek to work with France in a complementary fashion.

Both the United States and France have a particular concern about Africa's worsening economic crisis, and both countries are taking steps to be of assistance. I plan on seeking Mr. Mitterrand's views on this subject when we meet.

As for Chad, the response of the French Government has been laudable. France has taken the lead in providing assistance to the legitimate government of that country in withstanding Libyan aggression. We are proud to be associated with France in that assistance effort.

And I'm glad you mentioned Central America. We share with all the nations of Europe a firm belief that peace needs to be restored in Central America. As you know, we are working actively to assure that El Salvador's new democracy is allowed to develop without violence or guerrilla harassment. And we are determined in our view that Nicaragua and Cuba should not succeed in the export of revolution elsewhere in the region.

What we are witnessing to the south is a power play by Cuba and the Soviet Union, pure and simple. Cuba, after nearly 25 years of so-called revolution, is an economic basket case. It cannot supply even its own needs without massive and costly Soviet subsidies. Like a roving wolf, Cuba looks to its peace-loving neighbors with hungry eyes. We want to avert a crisis before it happens -- to help our neighbors build strong economies and democratic governments and to counter Soviet-backed insurgency. The way to end hostilities in El Salvador, for example, is through free elections. But we see those who oppose democracy now trying, through violence, to disrupt the March 25 elections there.

What the United States is doing on behalf of freedom in Central America is minimal, considering what is at stake. We have a vital interest, a duty, and a responsibility -- and I ask you, why should the United States and France, two of the great democracies of history, not want to see democracy prevail in Central America?

Q. Many French and European officials complain that the huge Federal deficits are responsible for high interest rates and an overvalued dollar which jeopardize their economic recovery and increase protectionist pressures. Are you prepared to take concrete steps to alleviate such fears before the November election?

November election and have just done so. I am asking the Democratic and Republican leaders in the Congress to work with the administration on the development of a downpayment deficit reduction program. A program of spending cuts and tax measures to close certain loopholes could, I believe, be enacted this spring that would reduce the deficit by some $150 billion over the next 3 fiscal years. I see this as a first step toward full elimination of the remaining deficits.

As to the fears of some Europeans that the U.S. budget deficit, high interest rates, and strong dollar jeopardize their recovery, may I say that the strong performance of the U.S. economy has given a significant push to European recovery, and the strong dollar of which they complain has given Europe a substantial export advantage which is further contributing to their recovery.

I have great confidence in our own economic recovery, and I am looking forward to discussing it with your President. As spring begins here in Washington, I think President Mitterrand will find a lot of optimism about the future.

I am pleased to note the resumption in Vienna today of the negotiations on conventional force reductions in Europe, known as the MBFR talks. The U.S. Representative, Ambassador Morton Abramowitz, and his NATO colleagues will be working closely together in seeking early progress toward an agreement to reduce NATO and Warsaw Pact forces in Central Europe to a substantially lower and equal level.

The MBFR talks are an important part of the East-West security and arms control dialog. The resumption of MBFR coincides with the conclusion today of the first round of the CDE talks in Stockholm, which deal with military confidence-building measures in Europe. Here, too, the Western nations are working closely together. During the initial round, we have tabled a comprehensive package of proposed measures to reduce the risk of war.

I welcome these developments and sincerely hope that General Secretary Chernenko and other members of the new Soviet leadership will approach these negotiations in a similarly positive spirit. I also urge the Soviet Union to return to the INF and START negotiations, where very important work in the cause of building a more secure and peaceful world has been suspended by them. These crucial negotiations can succeed if the Soviet Union wants them to succeed. We are certainly ready to do our part. It is in the interest of all mankind that these vital efforts be resumed now.

But so many of our great public figures are of Irish ancestry, from the man considered by many as the father of the American Navy, John Barry, to our first heavyweight champion, John L. Sullivan, to the great tenor, John McCormack, to a couple of Presidents of the United States and, yes, even to the current Speaker of the House.

In fact, the secret wish disclosed the other day by my friend, Tip O'Neill, is an indication of the hold that Ireland has on all of us here in the States. This is a nation where the Speaker of the U.S.

Mr. Prime Minister, I was explaining to Tip only a few moments ago, though, seriously, why I thought that appointment was impossible, and perhaps, knowing your countrymen as you do, you'll agree with me. Tip, the Irish aren't looking for Speakers, they're looking for listeners.

Well, Mr. Prime Minister, the joshing we do here is in the best Irish tradition. It makes light of what are sometimes serious political differences. But I think there's one point on which the Speaker, Senator Kennedy, myself, and the other Irish American leaders here are united -- our admiration for the efforts that you are making to bring peace and stability to Ireland. We support your personal mission in America to end the tragically misguided support of some here for terrorist elements in Northern Ireland.

Now, you know, Mr. Prime Minister, I've been told by one of your countrymen that the Reagan family line goes back as far as the great 11th century warrior king, Brian Boru. If it's true, I'm exceedingly proud. But sometimes, like you, I wonder what our brave ancestors -- those who fought so gallantly over so many centuries against such hopeless odds -- what they would say about the valor of people who commit acts of violence and prey on the innocent, sometimes maiming and killing innocent women and children.

Your words have been very direct on this point, Mr. Prime Minister. You've reminded those in this country who provide assistance to Northern Ireland's terrorists that they are assisting in violence and murder. Let me assure you that the vast majority of Irish Americans join you today in condemning support for those who preach hatred and practice violence in Ireland.

But there's another part of your mission to America, Mr. Prime Minister, which is perhaps more fitting to today's festive atmosphere and more important over the long run, and that is the message of hope that you bring us. We're especially heartened by your own efforts, as well as your colleagues', in the New Ireland Forum and the British Government as they seek a democratic and peaceful reconciliation of Ireland's diverse traditions. As we know, the high-level dialog between Ireland and Britain has been renewed, and the groups promoting reconciliation and economic cooperation -- groups like Cooperation Ireland -- are also bearing fruit. For our part, we shall continue to encourage American firms to invest in Ireland, north and south, in ways which promote prosperity and both traditions.

Some time ago, a former American Ambassador told me of a weekend retreat where politicians from the various Irish traditions met together for a frank discussion of the differences that separated them. And it was a good weekend. Those who'd never talked of such matters before were able to speak and listen to each other in a spirit of understanding. And on the bus back home, they laughed and sang songs. The spirit of friendship bloomed. And when they got off the bus, the spirit somehow seemed to evaporate. And after hearing this story, I told our Ambassador to take them a message, and I think it bears repeating.

Joan and I and all of us from Ireland are very grateful to you and Mrs. Reagan for your warm welcome, your splended hospitality in this beautiful and historic setting, provided by an Irish architect, James Hoban.

It's sometimes forgotten that the Irish ethnic tradition in American society historically has had two strands. The better known today is the predominantly Roman Catholic tradition of the immigration that swelled to huge proportions after the great famine of the 1840's. A strong tradition, indeed, it was, and still is the deep and positive influence in American society.

In America, Irishmen of these two great traditions of Ireland have worked together to shape this wonderful country. We in Ireland hail them all with equal pride. But in one part of Ireland these two traditions have not yet come to terms with each other. Within Northern Ireland the two Irish traditions are sharpened into separate identities which have confronted one another in mutual, and sometimes violent antagonism.

Catholic and Protestant, Nationalist and Unionist alike -- are our own people. Their troubles are ours. And in the solution of their problems we have a crucial role to play, one that must be undertaken in the spirit of openmindedness and generosity. To reconcile the conflicting identities of the two traditions in Ireland and to suggest new political structures that could accommodate both of them are the main tasks to which we, in the four political parties of Irish Constitutional Nationalism, north and south, representing 70 percent of the people of Ireland, have dedicated ourselves through the unique deliberations of the New Ireland Forum.

In undertaking this task, Mr. President, let me say how much we in Ireland value the encouragement that in your own words today you, yourself, have given to this cause of Irish reconciliation, together with the support of other great Irish American political leaders, some of them with us today here -- Speaker O'Neill, Senator Kennedy, Senator Moynihan, so many others, who have given us comfort and heart and courage to continue with our work.

It was the great Abraham Lincoln, who wrote, ``Among free men, there can be no successful appeal from the ballot to the bullet.'' He answered a century and more ago the claim by certain violent men in our Ireland to take power with a ballot box in one hand and an armalite rifle in the other.

When the Irish people come together, it will be in one way only -- in peace, by agreement, under structures devised for the security of all the island's people and for the advancement of all their interests. And we know, and you've made it explicit today, Mr. President, that in our efforts to promote that process, we have your support and encouragement.

May I turn to your forthcoming visit with your wife to Ireland. Already this visit is the subject of conversation and excitement throughout the length and breadth of the land. We know how much you cherish your Irish heritage and how much you are looking forward to setting foot in that tiny village in County Tipperary -- which, as I said to you, fortunately has a wide main street to accommodate all the people who'll be there when you come -- [laughter] -- from which your great grandfather stepped out bravely one day to face the world, as my own grandfather did, also, to the same place, London, a decade later, from a place not 7 miles away from Ballyporeen.

Irish freedom. It's because they came back 70 years ago that I shall be there with Joan to welcome you and your wife on the 2d of June next, when you return for this visit to the land of your ancestors -- the first of several -- the last -- not the last -- one of a number of such visits.

Mr. President, I've already presented you with some shamrock. We had a little difficulty. I tried pinning it on, but partly because of my concern to make sure I didn't actually physically assault the President of the United States by sticking a pin in him -- [laughter] -- I totally failed. The President took over the job himself and did it very neatly and quickly. [Laughter] But if I might formally present you with a bowl of our shamrocks so there will be some to go around to the whole family.

Dowling, former artistic director of the Irish National Theatre in Dublin and current artistic director of the Shakespeare Company in Stamford, CT, provided the entertainment prior to the exchange of toasts.

Older workers today represent a national resource of incomparable knowledge, judgment, and experience. In the coming decades, it is likely that older workers will constitute an increasing percentage of our population. Therefore, it is vital to the future prosperity of this Nation that these workers be encouraged to continue to make their considerable contributions by remaining in the work force or by serving their communities in voluntary roles.

Many employers have already recognized the potential contributions of older workers and have initiated hiring, retraining, second career, and job retention programs. In addition to these significant private initiatives, the Federal government has been active in promoting opportunities for older workers through a variety of efforts, including the recently implemented Job Training Partnership Act. These various private and public sector efforts have successfully demonstrated that, if sufficient opportunities are available, older workers can continue to make useful and valuable contributions which enhance the quality of life for their communities and which develop a renewed sense of their accomplishment and self-worth.

Happy St. Patrick's Day to all of you. You know, this is a day when those of us of Irish descent have an opportunity to boast a little and, like good Irishmen, celebrate a lot. Because of the Irish, America today is a richer, brighter, freer, and, yes, a bit noisier land than it otherwise would have been.

But today all Americans can take pride in the rich diversity of America's ethnic heritage -- especially the Irish American contribution to that heritage. It's one reason why Nancy and I were delighted to host a lunch here at the White House yesterday for Prime Minister FitzGerald of Ireland. We all had a roaring good time, but there was some important business done as well.

The Prime Minister and I urged all Americans not to give support of any kind to the terrorist IRA elements in Northern Ireland. Believe me, it was a call heartily endorsed by all the Irish American political leaders who were present.

And second, the Prime Minister brought us a message of hope about peace and reconciliation of the problem of Northern Ireland. After all the tragedy in Northern Ireland, it was cheering to hear about groups who are working toward mutual tolerance, and peaceful and democratic solutions.

Here at home, as we prepare to greet the first days of spring, there is also reason for confidence and cheer. Good economic news is bursting out all over, and America's economy seems to be saying, ``This is celebration time.'' Optimism is being bolstered by vigorous new growth, continued low inflation, and better prospects for reducing budget deficits.

February, a smaller rise than in January, and a solid sign that inflation remains in check. We're determined to keep the nightmare of runaway inflation from ever coming back. Housing starts reached 2.2 million units in February, the highest level in nearly 6 years. That's an 11-percent increase from the January level, which was revised up to 1.9 million units. And building permits, a signal of builders' intentions, also registered a strong increase, so that means continued housing strength in the months to come.

We're also making progress towards reducing projected budget deficits. For one thing, the sheer strength of America's economic growth, as measured by all those new jobs created in the last 15 months, means more people are supporting themselves and paying taxes, and fewer people need government assistance. As I've said again and again, strong and steady economic growth is the best way to reduce deficits.

Thursday night, shortly after we reached agreement, the Senate Finance Committee concluded its work on a major portion of our package. I'm hopeful the entire package will be passed promptly by the Senate.

This $150 billion downpayment deserves strong bipartisan support in the House because it will reduce the deficit in a way that's effective, responsible, and fair, by targeting $43 billion of savings in nondefense spending, $57 billion in defense authority reductions, and by raising some $48 billion in revenues, primarily from closing certain tax loopholes of questionable fairness.

Now, make no mistake. The defense cuts will slow our defense buildup somewhat, but not to a point of unacceptable risk. There will be no increase in tax rates on American families and no tax increases that would threaten the economic recovery. Continued strong growth with the prospect of deficits coming down and without renewed inflation spells a brighter future for America's economy, provided the Congress will just stick with our program.

America's vast energy resources are among its greatest assets. Intelligent use of our existing energy supplies together with prudent conservation measures and development of alternative sources of supply will allow this country to maintain its position of world leadership and help ensure a higher standard of living and greater prosperity for all our people.

The shift in Government policy away from artificial controls to an emphasis on free market forces has produced adequate supplies of energy at affordable prices. The impact of this policy shift was clearly demonstrated by deregulation of petroleum prices, which resulted in greater production of energy, more efficient use of energy, and lower energy costs for consumers. We anticipate a similar experience with the move toward a freer market in natural gas.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventeenth day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

One of the most meaningful gifts that one human being can bestow upon another is the precious gift of life. It can be given simply by making arrangements to donate our organs or those of our loved ones after death. Donation of our corneas would give others the gift of sight; donation of our kidneys, hearts, lungs, livers, and pancreata could save the lives of many people who might otherwise die.

On several occasions during the last year, I have asked the American people to be aware of the opportunities to donate their organs, and I have made special pleas for small children in need of liver transplants. The response proved to be overwhelming. Tragically, however, many desperately ill persons, including small children, have died while awaiting a suitable organ.

Ironically, recent surveys indicate that about 93 percent of all Americans have heard about organ transplants, but the need for organs far surpasses the number donated each year. Our organ procurement system is being managed effectively by the private sector but can be improved to meet a larger portion of the need. For these reasons, I supported the establishment of the American Council on Transplantation. The primary goal of this national umbrella organization is to increase the availability of organs for transplantation.

It is appropriate that we as a Nation encourage organ donation and increase public awareness of the need for such donations. By filling out a uniform donor card carrying it, and by making our wishes of donation known to our families, we may give the gift of life to people who so desperately need solid organs for transplantation, an exceedingly scarce resource.

Americans are a caring and giving people. I have heard from many Americans who have lost their loved ones in tragic accidents, but who have found solace in knowing that through their loss other lives were saved.

Small business plays a vital role in American life. Many businesses -- well, they make everything from ice cream to shoes to computers. Small businesses are the biggest providers of new jobs, give the most employees the freedom to work part time, hire the most women, young people, and senior citizens. They embody innovation, provide economic diversity, and chart our path toward the products, markets, and jobs of the future.

And to remain engines of hope and prosperity, small businesses need a healthy economy. Just 3 years ago, the American economy was, as we all know, anything but healthy. We all remember those days. Government was growing like Goliath, wrecking the economy with punishing inflation and interest rates, a growing tax burden, and government regulations that were smothering economic growth. When an enterprising man or woman wanted to borrow money to start their own business, 21\1/2\-percent prime interest rates shut the door in their faces. When a small business wanted to buy a new plant or materials to expand, 12.4-percent inflation put opportunity beyond its reach.

When we took office, we made restoring economic vitality our top priority. We reduced the growth rate of government spending, pruned needless regulations, cut taxes, and passed an historic reform called tax indexing.

Well, one of our reforms, also, was tax indexing. It means the government can never again profit from inflation at your expense. And today, we're seeing a surging economic recovery from Maine to California. Housing starts, factory orders, and real income are all up. The stock market has come back to life. Between the end of 1982 and the end of 1983, net private savings shot up nearly 50 percent to over $230 billion, making more funds available to the risk-takers and innovators who give small business their drive.

Small businesses have led the way in creating new jobs, and today more Americans have jobs than ever before in our history. Since the beginning of the recovery 15 months ago, nearly 5 million Americans have found work. And the unemployment rate has fallen to 7.7 percent, marking the steepest drop in more than 30 years.

Now, this isn't a Keynesian recovery produced by big-spending bureaucrats tinkering with aggregate demand. In fact, I don't know of a single Keynesian who predicted it. Instead, this recovery was created by the incentives of tax rate reductions, which shifted resources away from government back to American producers, savers, and investors.

Now, make no mistake: The defense cuts will slow down our defense buildup somewhat, but not to a point of unacceptable risk. There will be no increase in tax rates on American families, and no tax increases that would threaten the economic recovery.

Permit me to mention a few of the inspiring small business success stories that I've heard, now, at this point. Back in 1978, Ginnie Johansen of Dallas -- she was in college and needed a belt to wear with casual slacks. And since she didn't like anything she saw in the stores, she made a few belts of her own. Several students offered to buy several belts, and soon Ginnie decided to try her hand at business. Today Ginnie's company grosses $8 million in annual sales, manufactures 57 different accessories and, best of all, employes 65 people, most of them young women. By the way, Ginnie is now 24 years old.

Roberto Ruiz of Tucson was born in Mexico, moved to the United States as a teenager. In 1977 he founded a construction company and an engineering corporation. Between 1979 and 1983, sales for Roberto's companies grew from $1.4 million to $7.2 million, an increase of more than 500 percent. Roberto's companies do a great deal of work in the Arizona border area, a section of the country hard hit by the devaluation of the peso. And Roberto has always made an effort to hire local workers. Last year alone he hired 100 employees, and today his firms account for more than 200 jobs.

Cervantes once said, ``Many littles make a much.'' And as small businesses spring up across the country, they add up to products we've never dreamed of, new standards of excellence, and jobs for millions. It's small business people like you who remind us of the enterprise that made our nation great. You show us that Americans have just as much pluck as ever, and you prove that our country's best days are still to come.

I am pleased to submit to the Congress my third annual report on the state of small business. The year 1983 was an excellent year for the economy in general, and especially for small business. At last, we are succeeding in establishing economic conditions which recognize and promote the vital role small business performs in our economy. And small business has responded with record business formation, employment, and activity.

Small business optimism and faith in the future have been demonstrated not only in polls and surveys, but in the economic record this report details. In the first three quarters of 1983 new business starts were up 13 percent from the same period in 1982. There was a significant decline in business bankruptcies in 1983 -- over 10 percent. The strengthening of the recovery is seen in more recent figures -- in the last half of 1983 business bankruptcies were 30 percent lower than during the last half of 1982.

Income from partnerships and proprietorships -- which comprise most small business -- increased in 1983 by 18 percent over the previous year. In addition, as the report details, the opportunity for business ownership and activity is reaching great numbers of minorities, women and other members of our society. To encourage that activity among women entrepreneurs, I have directed the Small Business Administration (SBA) to begin a National Initiatives Program. This series of regional conferences is designed to provide managerial and technical assistance to women business owners and women entrepreneurs.

The reason for the success of small business in 1983 is no mystery. The economy reflects the growing confidence of private sector decisionmakers to invest capital and take risks. Business decisions can be made more confidently with an inflation rate of 4 percent instead of 12 percent.

Small business, which relies more heavily on borrowed capital, is better off with prime interest rates at 11 percent rather than 21 percent. And small business has done far more than most to provide employment for members of our work force. During 1983 total employment increased by four million jobs. Small business contributed significantly to this growth, continuing the strong trend shown during 1981 and 1982, when small business contributed 2.6 million new jobs to the economy.

Government policies that have a major, favorable impact on small business. It has been my desire to ensure that, whenever possible, our policies reflect the importance of small business to the economy as a whole.

The cuts in individual and estate taxes in 1983 are part of our efforts. These important changes in the tax law directly benefit the more than 85 percent of small businesses that pay taxes through the personal income tax returns of their owners. Tax policies that sustain the cash flow of small firms will continue to be a major goal of this Administration. More reasonable and understandable tax regulations are important and necessary policy goals for small business. In this regard, the action of the Internal Revenue Service to withdraw its proposed rule and reexamine the issue of classifying small business investments as debt or equity is notable.

Many Federal agencies developed a positive working relationship with small business. Regulation, when it is necessary, is increasingly achieved with a maximum of flexibility and common sense and a minimum of extraneous costs and burdens. The Task Force on Regulatory Relief has established the momentum and the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) is continuing the effort.

The OMB and the SBA's Office of Advocacy have continued to work with agencies to achieve better regulation for small business. Together they have managed to cut 300 million hours of Federally imposed paperwork burden. Hearings held by SBA on small business paperwork confirm that this is significant progress, but that we must redouble our efforts to attack those forms which still vex and confuse small business owners. The opportunity this Nation offers for individual entrepreneurial effort ought not to be diminished by outdated or overzealous regulation.

Federal purchases of goods and services, excluding employee compensation, represent approximately 20 percent of Federal expenditures. It has been my consistent conviction that the taxpayer and the Government are well served by strong small business participation in the procurement process. We need to utilize the wealth of technological capability, experience, and efficiency present in the small business sector. To this end, we have significantly increased the amount of Federal purchases from small and minority businesses. In addition, to further open the procurement process to small business in 1983, I signed the Commerce Business Daily Act (Public Law 98 - 72) which requires Federal agencies to allow longer periods for responses to bid requests.

Small business progress in 1983 -- whether in terms of new business starts, creation of new jobs, efficient sales to the Government, or new innovations -- cannot be sustained without continued, favorable Federal policies toward small businesses. We intend to act on upcoming issues to ensure that our Nation's policies continue to be favorable to small business.

First and foremost, we must preserve the individual tax cuts and tax indexing enacted over the past three years. It would be unwise to roll back the progress small business has made as a result of these 1981 reforms.

We must take other actions to maintain a healthy economy. We need to ensure that Federal activities are as efficient and cost effective as possible. We will vigorously implement policies against unfair competition with the private sector from the Government or other tax-advantaged sectors of the economy.

The procurement process must continue to be simplified and made more accessible to small firms, especially in the important area of spare parts for Government and military purchases. The major Federal procurement agencies have committed to reduce procurement paperwork by 10 percent in Fiscal Year 1984. I intend to pursue policies that ensure that necessary procurement by the Government results in wise and effective use of our tax dollars.

There are several specific areas of business where we look forward to positive Congressional action in 1984. This Administration recognizes the spirit and capabilities of small and minority businesses in its support of Federal Enterprise Zones and urges Congressional action on this important issue.

The potential liability of many small manufacturers and distributors in product liability tort actions governed by a myriad of state laws is of continuing concern. Simple reform of this legally complicated area is needed. The Congress should recognize problems that affect small manufacturers and enact a fair bill reforming product liability.

The condition of our Nation's immigration laws is a matter of national concern and specific concern to the small business community. Legislation on this issue is in the Congress and has been carefully debated by many participants, including representatives of the small business community.

The Equal Access to Justice Act should be reauthorized. This law provides an important tool for the small business faced with unjust Government action. From my perspective, there is an equally important influence upon potentially overzealous regulatory agencies which have an impact upon small business. The statute needs improvement, however, and we will work with the Congress to produce legislation which resolves unanswered questions regarding the scope of the law.

The necessity to keep our national leadership role in technological development is a responsibility shared by small and large business. This Administration has proposed legislation which would clarify and ease the procedure for firms to form joint research and development companies.

We should be mindful of the important role played by small business in our Nation as employer of many of our citizens, as job creator, and as innovator. Our job in Government is to continue to create an economic environment where creativity and hard work pay dividends. With the improved conditions in 1983, small business has adapted and thrived. There is every reason to feel confident that this prosperity will continue.

Cuban Americans, perhaps better than others, appreciate what opportunity and economic freedom mean to people who are struggling to better themselves. Many of you arrived here in the early 1960's when America was enjoying high growth and low inflation. In that environment, everyone had the chance to better themselves.

But during the 1970's this shining land of opportunity, once so vibrant and vital, was ravaged by inflation and economic stagnation. By 1980 it was painfully clear to all Americans that something was seriously wrong.

So we set out to make some long-overdue changes. By reversing unwise policies of over-taxing and spending, we've put America back on track. And I'm mighty proud that when the heat was on, and the advocates of the failed policies of the past tried to get us to reverse course before our program had a chance to take hold, we stuck to our principles; we stayed the course. I think the country is beginning to understand why we did.

I firmly believe what's best for all Americans, especially those who want to improve their condition, is a policy of low inflation and strong growth. America needs jobs and opportunity, not make-work and handouts.

The Cuban community, especially in Florida and other Gulf Coast States, has become a center for commercial activity, much of it with Latin America. This has boosted our economic potential and has been a boon to our neighbors to the south. I'd like to thank you for the vital role you are playing.

United States, as well. I can assure you today that our administration fully recognizes the vital importance of the economic, political, and military struggle going on in Central America and the Caribbean. We do not intend to let the Soviet Union, through its Communist Cuban proxies, take over that region.

Central America and the Caribbean are of the utmost strategic importance to the United States. If we don't give friends so close to home the means to defend themselves against Soviet-supported insurgents, who will trust us anywhere in the world, especially in the faraway Middle East and Europe?

To those who would spend time focusing on the flaws of our friends -- and they are far from perfect -- let me just say we all are concerned about human rights. But I believe it is being either naive or downright phony to profess concern for human rights, while pursuing policies that lead to the overthrow of less-than-perfect democracies by Marxist dictatorships which systematically crush all human rights. We've seen it happen in countless countries, including Afghanistan, Vietnam, and, yes, Cuba. In these countries there are no human rights nor any debates about human rights. There is only brutal suppression by the Communist Party. Because such regimes are at war with the basic laws of human nature, invariably they inflict great economic misery on their people. That is why it's both logical and necessary for them to conquer other lands to obtain the resources they cannot produce themselves.

The island was living under virtual Cuban occupation. The lives of American students, as well as the islanders and, indeed, Grenada's peaceful, freedom-loving neighbors, were all being put in jeopardy. We had no choice but to join with our neighbors, at their request, and to free the people of Grenada. And that's exactly what we did.

I just have to tell you, one of my most heartwarming memories will always be of a reunion we had on the White House lawn. Students, many of whom had negative attitudes about the military before, threw their arms around the young soldiers, sailors, and marines who risked their lives to save them. Then the students introduced these military men to their parents as heroes.

We have every reason to be confident. But if freedom is to prevail, if peace is to be preserved, we cannot be complacent. Our greatest strength is truth, because truth is on our side and with it we can and will turn the tide. Saint John said you shall know the truth and the truth shall make you free. I am very proud that we are making steady progress in our efforts to put Radio Marti on the air.

The EAA export controls were not expanded during the emergency period, and the administration of the system of controls continued in the normal course. Accordingly, the government spent no funds over and above what would have been spent had the EAA remained in force without interruption.

Nation's Capital. The growing backlog of criminal and civil litigation in the Superior Court is accordingly a matter of both local and Federal concern, and this legislation will help alleviate the backlog. It is my hope that the District of Columbia Judicial Nomination Commission will act promptly in submitting lists of qualified individuals for nomination to these judgeships so that the new judges can be in place, reducing the backlog, as soon as possible.

While this legislation will ease the caseload problem in the Superior Court, it does not provide a cure for that problem or the similar problems plaguing most of our nation's courts. The staggering increase in litigation has strained the capacity of our courts and threatened their ability to settle disputes. One of America's greatest lawyers, Abraham Lincoln, once said: ``Discourage litigation.

Persuade your neighbors to compromise whenever you can. Point out to them how the nominal winner is often a real loser -- in fees, expenses, and waste of time.'' We must continue to search for alternative means of settling disputes. If we fail to do so, the costs and delays of litigation in our overcrowded courts will effectively close the courthouse doors to all but the wealthy and those that seek to use delay to their advantage. We must not permit meritorious claims deserving of prompt judicial resolution to become lost in a sea of frivolous suits or disputes that could more quickly and efficiently be resolved in other forums.

States under such conditions and in such quantities as to render or tend to render ineffective, or materially interfere with, the price support operations being conducted by the Department of Agriculture for sugar cane and sugar beets.

The adjusted average transportation costs shall be the weighted average cost of handling and transporting domestically produced raw cane sugar from Hawaii to Gulf and Atlantic Coast ports, as determined by the Secretary. Interest costs shall be the amount of interest, as determined or estimated by the Secretary, that would be required to be paid by a recipient of a price support loan for raw cane sugar upon repayment of the loan at full maturity. Interest costs shall only be applicable if a price support loan recipient is not required to pay interest upon forfeiture of the loan collateral.

Not principally of crystalline structure and not in dry amorphous form, containing soluble nonsugar solids (excluding any foreign substance that may have been added or developed in the product) equal to 6% or less by weight of the total soluble solids, provided for in item 155.30, part 10A, schedule 1. . . .  .... An amount determined and adjusted in accordance with headnote 4(c) per pound of total sugars, but not in excess of 50% ad val.

C. The Secretary of Agriculture, in consultation with other appropriate agencies, shall review the fee system established by this Proclamation on a quarterly basis and shall submit to me any recommendations for any changes determined to be necessary or appropriate.

F. This proclamation shall be effective as of 12:01 a.m. Eastern Standard Time on the day following the date of its signing, and shall apply to articles entered, or withdrawn from warehouse for consumption, on or after such effective date.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 19th day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

East-West relations you most value. However, when the Socialists assumed power in 1981 and included Communists in the cabinet, your administration showed a clear apprehension. Is this concern now alleviated?

Western leaders whose views regarding East-West relations I value most. And despite differences in our political philosophies, there are a greater number of things we have in common. In particular, we find ourselves pursuing many mutually supportive national security policies. Our goals are congruent, because we are determined to bring about arms reductions and to get meaningful conversations going with the Soviet Union so that we can solve East-West problems.

Q. The U.S. welcomed Mr. Chernenko's first statements with some optimism. Does this feeling still prevail? Is it realistic to expect a resumption of the two Geneva negotiations and a summit meeting between yourself and Mr. Chernenko before November's elections?

The President. Clearly, words alone are not enough to bring about meaningful improvement in relations between our two countries. Dialog between the Soviet Union and the United States, if it is to have meaning, must lead to deeds -- specific actions and changes in policy that address some of the basic issues between our two countries. For our part, we would welcome that opportunity.

Moscow is less than encouraging. Nonetheless, I remain hopeful. Better relations are in the interest of both our peoples, and Mr. Chernenko will eventually have to acknowledge that the United States is not the intransigent party. We're ready and willing to talk, and if agreement can be reached, to act.

As for a summit, I remain, as always, willing to meet with the leader of the Soviet Union to discuss a full range of issues. But I also believe -- as the Soviets apparently do as well -- that such a meeting would have to be carefully prepared in order to be useful and to have the prospect of meaningful results.

The President. As I indicated, we think the best way to make progress in reducing nuclear arms is for the Soviet Union to return to the INF and START talks. In both negotiations, we have made good proposals with built-in flexibility which the Soviets ought to explore. If they have serious ideas for other ways to resume talks, we will listen. The Soviets have never indicated an interest in merging the two negotiations.

We agree on the absolute necessity of maintaining an effective nuclear deterrent and reestablishing a balance of power. We also agreed that pursuing fair, verifiable arms control agreements is of utmost importance. Any such arms control agreement must meet two standards: It must safeguard Western security, and it must reduce the risks of war. On this we are all agreed.

Q. Mr. President, several leading American political figures have recently urged Europe to assume a greater responsibility in Western defense. What is your position in this respect, and will you initiate a discussion of this matter with Mr. Mitterrand?

The President. The Atlantic alliance is healthy, its structure sound, and its strategy valid and viable. The strength and resilience of the alliance has most recently been demonstrated by the first initiation of INF deployments aimed at reestablishing the nuclear balance in Europe. The allies moved forward despite unprecedented Soviet threats and intimidation. Hopefully, they learned that negotiation will better serve their interests than trying to frighten the Western democracies into submission. I would hope all the Western allies would do more to strengthen their defenses.

As for the United States, our commitment to the defense of Europe remains steadfast. Indeed, we have taken and will continue to take steps to strengthen it. President Mitterrand and I have had numerous discussions about the Western defenses, and I applaud his courageous leadership, independent and strong sense of responsibility.

Q. Yourself, as well as the highest ranking officials in your administration, have repeatedly warned that withdrawing the marines from Beirut under Syrian pressure would seriously jeopardize world peace, Western influence, and vital interests in the Middle East. Now that you have redeployed the marines on board American ships, how do you assess the situation in the region?

The President. The bloodshed in Lebanon and the continuing stalemate of the Arab-Israeli peace process remain a threat to the peace and stability of the Middle East and the world. It is in the interests of Arab nations, Israel, the United States, and for Europe as well to restore order in Lebanon and get on with the peace process. The United States, France, and the other nations which committed troops to the peacekeeping force in Lebanon have not given up even though longstanding hatreds prevented us from reaching our immediate goal.

The United States has three principal aims in the Middle East. First, we must continue to promote peace between Israel and her Arab neighbors. Second, we must prevent a widening of the conflict in the Persian Gulf, which might disrupt the flow of oil to the free world. Third, we must deter any Soviet threat to this vital and strategically important region. The conflicts in this region are numerous and intense. They are complicated by historical animosities and deadly power now in the hands of extremists and terrorists. Yet we must try to do what we can.

In the case of Lebanon, the United States will continue to pursue its long-term goals: the restoration of a sovereign, independent, unified nation; the removal of all foreign forces; and the security of Israel's northern border. Peace must be restored to this troubled land, and Lebanon itself must remain intact as one country. The partition of Lebanon would solve nothing and in the long run would led to even greater instability.

Our efforts to bring peace to Lebanon are something of which our countries can be proud. It is a humanitarian endeavor, taken at great risk. It reflects well on the character of the American and French people -- and of Italians and British as well -- that we would undertake risk and hardship for the people of a faraway land.

The President. The positions contained in my September 1, 1982, peace initiative are the most realistic, workable, and promising approach to a just and lasting peace settlement between Israel and its neighbors. Furthermore, our proposal is the only one on the table. If there is a better plan, let's hear it.

Q. Under what precise terms and conditions would the American Government be prepared to ease the economic and military pressure it is now, directly or indirectly, exerting on the Nicaraguan authorities?

The President. The Government of Nicaragua is under considerable pressure to modify its aggressive foreign policy and repressive internal rule. The pressure comes not only from the U.S. but also from its neighbors, other Western countries, the regional negotiations of the Contadora group, and, of course, the armed and unarmed Nicaraguan opposition. The United States is deeply concerned about the continuing crisis in Central America, especially events in and around Nicaragua. Our objectives vis-a-vis that country are simple.

There should be an end to Nicaraguan support for insurgents attempting to overthrow the government of neighboring countries. We would like to see a severance of Nicaraguan military and security ties to Cuba and the Soviet bloc. A reduction of Nicaragua's military strength to levels that would restore military equilibrium in the area. Finally, there should be a fulfillment of the original Sandinista promise to support democratic pluralism.

These are legitimate concerns, and, as of yet, there is no convincing evidence that the Sandinistas are willing to address them. We have made our views known through private and public diplomacy, and we have made clear that we will respond in kind to meaningful, concrete steps taken by the Sandinistas.

Early on, the United States reached out in friendship to the new Government of Nicaragua, providing them large amounts of direct aid and assuring them of our good will. Nevertheless, for ideological reasons, the Sandinistas moved rapidly to establish a Marxist dictatorship, a militarized state closely tied to the Soviet Union and bent on undermining neighboring governments. This is unacceptable to the United States and other countries of the hemisphere.

United States apparently because of the strong presumptions of involvement with the death squads resting on him. In your opinion, what consequences would his election to the Salvadoran Presidency have?

Our interest in the election is in the electoral process itself. The freedom of the Salvadoran people to choose their own leader is our basic concern. As far as the candidates, we are neutral and will respect the results of any free and fair election in which the people express their views. We do not base our relationships with other nations on personalities, but rather on their institutions and policies.

Our position on visits is consistent with this approach. In the closing days of the Salvadoran election campaign, we prefer that none of the Presidential candidates visit and bring the Salvadoran campaign to the United States.

We are deeply alarmed about political violence in El Salvador, from whatever source. It is tragic to note that the violent left, which opposes democracy in El Salvador, has escalated the level of bloodshed in an apparent effort to disrupt the March 25 election -- something their leaders said they would not do. This violence from the left often does not receive the same attention in the world press as when such acts are committed by the violent right. But from whatever source, the United States wants to end the killing and to develop democratic institutions that will provide a peaceful means of settling disputes.

Much of what happens in the region hinges on what happens in El Salvador. A bipartisan commission from the United States endorsed a policy of ending hostilities in Central America through free elections, and that is our guiding principle -- one that a democracy like France can well appreciate.

The urgency of promoting the democratic process and social justice in Central America will be one of many issues that President Mitterrand and I will discuss this week. I will be listening attentively to what President Mitterrand has to say on these matters. France is our oldest ally and a champion on liberty. We greatly value the warm relationship between our two countries -- a relationship deeply rooted in a mutual respect for democratic traditions and humanitarian principles.

The President. Well, I think I can understand interest in a new face. But it's too early to really be naming a front runner in that race. Having gone through a series of primaries myself, I know they have a long way to go.

Anyway, I have always felt we should discuss our own record and not base our campaign on who the other fellow is or what he says. I think Americans will see the difference and make sound judgments about what's best for our country.

Good morning, and welcome to the White House. I'm delighted you could be with us on this first day of spring. Here in Washington, it means the advent of cherry blossoms and lots of tourists, and, hopefully, some congressional action on the budget. [Laughter] But for all of you, the beginning of spring signals the time to pull equipment out of the sheds and to turn attention to the fields.

This is also National Agriculture Day, a day set aside to express our appreciation to the working men and women of agriculture for the bounty of food and fiber you provide and for the strength that you give us. It's a fitting time to honor America's bedrock industry, and I encourage the American people, both on and off the farm, to participate in the special activities that are taking place all across our nation.

Well, today we pay tribute to an industry whose record of productivity is unmatched by any other in the world. Our farmers and ranchers produce the most wholesome and varied range of foodstuffs known anywhere. In fact, our agricultural community has been so successful, it's too often been taken for granted. Few advances in modern technology can surpass the miracle of American agriculture. In 1820 a farmer in this country produced enough food to feed four people.

This unparalleled productivity enables us to feed our own population and tens of millions of people throughout the world. The United States is the world's leading exporter of agricultural products. Our food travels to every corner of the Earth. In 1982 nearly one-fifth of the world's agricultural products was shipped from American ports. And let me assure you, now that we've regained our reputation as a reliable supplier, we're going to keep it that way.

Some would say that American agriculture is nothing short of magic. Well, it's not magic; it's the miracle of freedom. Millions of individuals, each representing a single farming operation, yet linked together so effectively that agriculture is the largest business in the United States -- an enterprise of 23 million people with assets equal to about 70 percent of those held by all manufacturing corporations in the United States.

I'm delighted to be with those of you who make American agriculture work so well. And I believe part of the reason for your great success is your partnership with the Department of Agriculture and agencies like the Agricultural Stabilization and Conservation Service, the ASCS. The county ASCS office is the place where you're likely to see a neighbor's pickup truck outside and have some good conversation inside. And that's the way government works best -- at the grassroots, where programs are responsive to the people they're meant to help.

I want all of the ASCS State committeemen and directors with us this morning to know that I appreciate what you've done to make our Payment-In-Kind program a success. Thanks to your fine efforts we've cleared away many price-depressing surpluses, and we've moved closer to the point where the market, not the government, will be sending the production signals to our producers. I'm sure that you're approaching this year's farm program with the same dedication.

And we heard some pretty good stories at breakfast this morning. You know what it's like -- all of you -- to watch a hailstorm destroy a year's labor, how it feels to witness a dreaded fever spread through your livestock. But you also know the value of free enterprise and what it means to have a personal stake in deciding your future.

You know the exhilaration of opportunity and the accomplishments of scientific research. We now have many disease-resistant crops and stronger livestock, and we're on the threshold of even greater scientific and technological breakthroughs. The work being done at places like USDA's Beltsville Agricultural Research Center is bringing exciting new advances.

National Agriculture Day is a celebration of America, and when we talk about our farm community, we're talking about the values and traditions that made America great: hard work, faith, family, neighbors helping neighbors, freedom, and independence. We can touch the spirit of America in our farm communities.

Block. But with all these wonderful-looking people up here on the platform, these fine young families here, and what I was saying about freedom being the basis of our agriculture, I can't resist telling just one little story. I happen to collect stories that I get from defectors from some of the Warsaw bloc nations, of the stories that the people in those countries tell among themselves about their own system -- shows a little cynicism too, at times.

For the people of Afghanistan, March 21 is the traditional celebration of the New Year, the beginning of the cycle of life. It is a period of rejoicing and celebration for life's regeneration as a gift of God.

But today, for most of the people of Afghanistan, the March 21 New Year brings only the renewal of fighting, destruction, and death. For more than four years, the armed forces of the Soviet Union have occupied Afghanistan. More than 100,000 Soviet soldiers now occupy that beleaguered country. The overwhelming majority of the Afghan people are struggling against the Soviet occupation troops and the puppet regime headed by Babrak Karmal. It is a regime that is maintained only by Soviet force.

Afghan resistance to Marxist rule grew dramatically after the Soviet invasion, and it has now spread throughout the country. A solution to the Afghanistan problem must begin with the removal of the Soviet troops. A negotiated political settlement can be achieved if the Soviet Union agrees to withdraw its military forces of occupation.

The goal of United States policy remains clear and consistent. We seek the removal of Soviet military forces so that the Afghan people can live freely in their own country and are able to choose their own way of life and government.

Hope, it is said, springs eternal. We continue to hope that a negotiated settlement can be found, a settlement which fulfills the conditions spelled out five times in resolutions resoundingly endorsed by the General Assembly of the United Nations.

These resolutions, passed by the overwhelming majority of the world's nations, call for the immediate withdrawal of foreign troops from Afghanistan; reaffirm the right of the Afghan people to determine their own form of government and to choose their economic, political, and social system; reiterate that the preservation of the sovereignty, territorial integrity, political independence, and nonaligned character of Afghanistan is essential for a peaceful solution of the problem; and call for the creation of the conditions which would enable the Afghan refugees to return voluntarily to their homes in safety and honor.

We stand in admiration of the indomitable will and courage of the Afghan people who continue their resistance to tyranny. All freedom-loving people around the globe should be inspired by the Afghan people's struggle to be free and the heavy sacrifices they bear for liberty.

Afghanistan Day will serve to recall the fundamental principles involved when a people struggles for the freedom to determine its own future and the right to be free of foreign interference. Let us therefore resolve to pay tribute to the brave Afghan people by observing March 21, 1984 as Afghanistan Day. Let us pledge our continuing admiration for their cause and for their perseverance, and lend our support to the Afghan refugees in Pakistan.

I would like to express my heartfelt gratitude for the unprecedented outpouring of support from citizens who made their views known to their Senators on this issue. And I want to thank Senators Baker, Thurmond, Helms, and Hatch for their valiant efforts to restore this revered American tradition.

This has been an important debate revealing the extent to which the freedom of religious speech has been abridged in our nation's public schools. The issue of free religious speech is not dead as a result of this vote. We have suffered a setback, but we have not been defeated. Our struggle will go on.

The courts themselves can restore a more balanced view of the first amendment, as we have seen in some recent cases. My administration will continue our efforts to allow government to accommodate prayer and religious speech by citizens in ways that do not risk an establishment of religion. I urge the Congress to consider the equal access legislation before both Houses so that voluntary student religious groups can meet on public school property on the same terms as other student groups.

Q. Mr. President, a recent poll showed you beating Mondale among independent voters, but losing to Hart. Given the fact the independents possibly can be expected to decide the next election, why do you think that Hart has this advantage among independents at this time? And how do you propose to counter it, assuming he's the nominee?

The President. Oh, I think that we're seeing a contest that is going on over there and that is very much in people's minds, in the press and in the media, so that, as I've always said, I think polls are pertinent to when they're taken. And there've also been several polls that have shown the reverse -- that I'm doing all right. So, I'm just going to wait for that poll that takes place next November.

Q. Mr. President, next November you plan to win reelection, I know. I'm wondering whether you think the prize will be worth it. We're facing huge deficits, possibilities of tax increases. A second Reagan administration may not be able to come up with many new, exciting initiatives for the American people. Do you think it's going to be a terrible chore in the second term, or are you going to be able to excite the public somehow?

The President. Well, to a certain extent it's always quite a chore, but, no, one of the reasons why I would like to run is the job is unfinished. And I think we've made a tremendous start on getting things corrected that have needed correcting for decades. And it just isn't possible to get the job done in these few years.

The President. Well, maybe if we continue on the course we're on, I am convinced that we will reduce the cost of government, certainly the rate of increase in government spending. We have already -- we've about cut it in two, and we're doing the things that I think needed doing. We are bringing unemployment down at a faster rate than it's been brought down in more than 30 years.

And, yes, it is going to take some time, but I'd like to recall to you that I said a couple of years ago that this wouldn't be done in months, and it wouldn't even be done in just a few years, that it was -- it's been coming on for a half a century. And so, I foresee getting some of the things that we've been refused so far. We've only obtained about half of what we asked in changes in government spending. So, we'll keep on going for the other half.

The President. Well, they're -- I'll tell you, a great many of them would be found, and will be found, in the recommendations of the Grace commission. Almost 2,000 top leaders in every facet of our economy volunteered their services to take a look at government and take a look from the standpoint of whether modern business practices could improve things, improve the way of doing things. And they now have given us almost 2,500 recommendations. And we have a task force of our own now that is working on those to see -- because many of them, the bulk of them, will take legislation.

The President. Well, if there are new programs that'll be beneficial to the people and proper to employ, why yes, you'd go that way. But right now, I think a great deal of our problem is that government has attempted to do a great many things that aren't government's proper prerogative.

The President. Now, I think that the entitlement programs have to be looked at structurally. And that's got to be a very careful study, because there is no way that I would ever support pulling the rug out from under people that are presently dependent on programs such as social security. And contrary to what some of our opponents have said of me, there has never been a time when I have advocated pulling that rug out. As a matter of fact, the average married couple on social security today is getting $180 a month more than they were getting when I took office.

But I think that looking at the demography, looking at the statistics with regard to workers, earners, retirement ages, and so forth, you have to look at programs of that kind as to whether they need restructuring for people just coming into the work force and who one day will be depending on those programs.

The President. Well, this has always been my hope. We have to have, under the situation with a majority of one party in one House and the majority of the other in the second House -- we have to have bipartisan programs. But I haven't seen or heard what it is they've come out with today or what they've come together on, and I'd like to see it and study it with regard to ours.

Q. Mr. President, Minority Leader Byrd said the other day that Ed Meese will always have a cloud over him because of the allegations and charges that have come to light over the last few weeks in his nomination hearing. Why do you continue to back Mr. Meese, and do you want to have an Attorney General, should he be approved or sanctioned by the Senate, who, when people see him, may bring forth those thoughts that here's a guy who trades jobs for loans?

The President. Well, Gary, that charge -- let me just remind you of something about our administration, and during the campaign, something that I said. This idea of jobhunters that could be purchased or something -- let me point out, I said that we were going to try to get people in our administration who didn't want or need a government job. And we've done pretty much that.

No, we have an investigation now that's going forward. Ed Meese has supported the idea. He wants it. And so, I can't comment on particulars now, because there is such an investigation, but I have complete confidence in him. I've known him for a great many years, and I think he'd make an excellent Attorney General.

The President. Well, perception is something that's always present in government and in politics, and there are an awful lot of wrong perceptions about many things having to do with this administration. And I think when the truth is known and an investigation is completed, then I think the American people are very fair and they can make their judgment.

The President. No, I hadn't delved into his personal life. I do know that, like so many others that came into these government jobs, I knew that he had to make some pretty great economic sacrifices to come here and work for the Government.

Q. In a general sense, Mr. President, does it concern you that there may be an appearance of possible impropriety in a situation where there are six instances where people -- whatever the reasons were -- where people who provided financial help to Meese did receive jobs in the administration? I'm not impugning any wrong motives to anybody, but there is that factual situation.

The President. I know, but as I answered a moment ago, I think someone should take a look and see what did they have to give up in order to take that government job. And most of the people in our administration had to give up a great deal.

Q. Well, Mr. President, it's more than just a paycheck with the government; it's a whole question of influence and being able to get on the inside, in government agencies and so forth. It's more than just giving up a high-paying job in private industry for another job in government. The perception -- again, without impugning any motives -- to some people is buying influence in the Government.

The President. I don't know. I just have to tell you that there are more people who actually are public spirited enough, believed enough in what we were trying to do that they wanted to be of help in that, than anyone is giving them credit for.

The President. No. If I thought that there was anyone who, in our administration, who was doing something that was contrary to the public interest and the interest of the people, I'd be the first one to take action to oust them. On the other hand, I've never been one that wanted to throw the baby out of the sleigh to the wolves in order to lighten the load.

Q. Mr. President, on another subject if I might -- Secretary Shultz said today that we must accept the results of the Salvadoran election, whatever those might be. But realistically, do you think that Congress would sanction continued aid to a regime headed by this fellow D'Aubuisson, who's suspected of involvement in murder? And, secondly, do you have any message for those Salvadoran military leaders who are rumored to be thinking about a coup?

The President. Well, certainly I would not support the idea of a coup. We have a democratic government there, probably for the first time in 400 years, that has been doing its best to institute democracy and democratic principles, practices. And I'm not going to say a word now about anyone who is a candidate there, because I think that the United States -- I want to be of help and I think we should be of help down there, but I don't think we should say anything that indicates that we are taking sides in this election. I don't think that's our place.

Q. Mr. President, in much of rural America, farmers have been beset by large crop surpluses, depressed prices, increased competition from abroad; they've seen their neighbors facing bankruptcy; they've had trouble getting their own operating capital. I wonder, with that set of circumstances, why rural America should support you for another term.

The President. Ah. Well, there's no question but that in the cost-price squeeze, the inflationary spiral, and the high interest rates that reached their peaks in 1980, the farmers were probably hurt worse than any other segment of our society. Their costs skyrocketed at the same time that, in all of the inflation, the prices they could obtain were going down. And then they had the embargo thrown at them, which was a serious blow to a large segment of our farm economy. On the other hand, the bankruptcies that some people are talking about today -- last year there were 270,000 loans out to farmers, and less than one-half of 1 percent resulted in bankruptcies. So, I don't think that that is a major problem there.

What we've been able to do is, by bringing down inflation, reduce the however increasing cost of operation for them. By our PIK program, we, by eliminating a great deal of the surplus, we have increased prices for their products. The other -- that surplus hung over them and was an artificial cap on them. We are going to be -- the Department of Agriculture is going to be lending some $4.6 billion this year in help to the farmers. We have now eliminated the embargo, opened up foreign trade for them. The new long-term agreement with the Soviets calls for 50 percent more than had been in the agreement.

Q. Mr. President, why do you insist that the sale of the Stinger planes go through to Jordan in light of what King Hussein said this past weekend and in light of what Secretary of State Shultz has said in the last couple of days? Are you still hanging in there for that sale, or are you willing to pull it back?

The President. Well, let me just say, I'm not going to talk about details of it other than to say that the whole basis for peace in the Middle East, and the thing that we tried to help bring about and are going to continue to try and help bring about, is dependent on being fair and evenhanded in dealing with the moderate Arab States that I think also want peace -- Israel, and we know our relationship with Israel and what it has always been and will continue to be. And we can't appear to be one-sided. Jordan -- and King Hussein had the courage to participate and make himself available for the peace efforts, and he is in a position in which there was some risk entailed with the border that he has with Syria. And, therefore, I think that it is only fair. And if we don't make available the things that he needs for his own security, he's going to find them someplace else.

Q. One of the most damaging things -- charges, though, it seems to me, that King Hussein made was to, in effect, say that your administration and some previous ones as well have not been honest brokers in the Middle East. How do you respond to that?

Sunday. And I thought that there was a sort of withdrawal from some of what had been cited as more extreme statements. But I do know this: We've had a friendship, and I think he and his country are essential to peace in the Middle East. And we're not going to give up that goal very lightly.

The President. Well, I don't know of anyone here that thinks that the Superfund is going to await the taking place of an election. Bill Ruckelshaus had made it plain to me that he's determined to carry on with that program.

The President. No, I don't think it'll make much difference who the other fellow is. I've always preferred campaigning on the basis of what we've done and what we intend to do, looking to the future with positive, new ideas.

The President. No, I was just talking -- that my idea of a campaign is to give the balance sheet on what we've done, what we've accomplished, and what we intend to do if given the opportunity to go forward on this. And I think we've got a lot of things to be proud of, things that are drastically different. Very few of you have realized that for the last 3 years, unlike the last 50, there haven't been arguments going on in Washington about whether or not and what to spend additional money on. The arguments have been on where do we cut.

I don't recall actually tying his name to that. I have talked about that -- all that talk of malaise back at a time when they were trying to explain our economic problems as being blamed on the people.

The President. Oh, well, no, I haven't been targeting anyone. I've been talking about -- we came here with a whole policy of government that we inherited: that had been on one path of growth in government, constant increasing of the amount of earnings that we took away from the people for government, government doing more and more things -- and many of them that were not government's proper province. And we set out to streamline this somewhat. We set out to give the economy a chance and give the people a chance out there. And I think it's worked.

We have the greatest decline in unemployment in more than 30 years. I believe we have an economic improvement that is -- it's on a solid basis and not just a temporary quick fix, an artificial stimulant, which has been characteristic of seven previous recessions since World War II.

I'm proud of what we've done with regard to the military. We have the highest percentage of high school graduates in our military today than we have ever had in the history of this country, and that includes back when we had the draft, which was an all-encompassing sweep that took in everybody. We have 91 percent of our personnel out there -- are high school graduates. And there's a morale, there's a readiness that I think is something the people of this county have every reason and right to be proud of.

The President. It frustrates me, yes. And it is a part of what Gary was talking about a little while ago. It's a perception, and it's a perception that is based absolutely on falsehoods. We can turn to any area of the society we want to, and we will find out that none of those things are true.

We tripled the taxes in the decade or so before we got here. The personal earnings -- well, let me give a figure, not just personal earnings. In the last several years before we got here, there were three increases in the grants to people on the program Aid for Dependent Children, and at the end of the three increases they were poorer and had less purchasing power than they had before the increases went into effect -- because of inflation. And, of course, the increase in taxes, as I say, well, they doubled in the last 4 or 5 years before we came here.

The President. Well, wait a minute. Here's what we did. Many of those programs had become so encrusted, the administration so big, that the Federal Government was paying a tremendous fee for every dollar that it delivered to a needy person. The things we were trying to cut was not the dollar to the needy person; it was the sometimes $2 it took to deliver that to him.

On the other hand, we also found people in these programs that had no justification for being there. When people were earning above 150 percent of the poverty level, as much as up to 180 percent, and still being declared eligible for these programs, we felt something had to be done.

And we redirected those programs toward those who were truly needy. And today, we are feeding more people; we are taking care of more people; we are funding more students going to college than ever before in our history.

We are giving more food stamps to more people than we were ever giving in our history. And yet we got 800-and-some thousand people off of food stamps. But we increased the number -- total number that were getting food stamps. But the 800,000 or more -- it was around 860,000 -- those people were of an income that was above a level in which their neighbors should have been contributing to their welfare.

The President. Well, I'm hopeful. As the campaign goes on, we'll tell the truth. And you see, so far, it's just been a constant drumbeat from the other side, the fairness issue, and that somehow our tax program benefited the rich, not those at the lower level of income. And yet the very people saying this have been fighting and fighting to get us to cancel indexing. Well, if you canceled indexing, the penalty for canceling it would run about 2-percent increase in taxes for the person at $100,000. It would be a 9-percent increase for the person at $10,000. Now, does that make us the administration of the wealthy or the rich?

The truth of the matter is in everything from college loans to grant programs to food stamps, we took programs that were benefiting people who really should not be dependent on government, and we redirected that money to the people of true need. And actually, with all of this supposed cuts in budgets, no, all we've done -- all we've been able to do is reduce the rate of increase in spending. We're spending more. We're just not spending as much more.

And if we had stuck to the budgets of our predecessor, his -- you know, how you have to project now under the law several years ahead -- if we had stuck to his projected budgets, today's deficit would be $191 billion more than it is.

Now, our program for economic recovery had just begun in 1982 to be phased in, but we had that great further dip in the 1970 and '80 recession in July of 1981. Not one bit of our program was in place when that big fall into 10.8-percent unemployment and so forth, when that took place. So, of course, there are more people in poverty in that particular year. But the decline -- or the increase, I should say, in the number of people living in poverty that began back in '79 and '80 -- we weren't even here yet. And in '81 we were here, but as I say, the budget and the programs were already in place. So, it is frustrating to try and answer all these.

What I'm going to be interested in seeing is where is the -- what is the number of people living in poverty in 1983 once the recovery was underway. The truth is, if they wanted to even go back farther, back in the sixties, the early sixties, we had fewer people living below the poverty line than we had in the later sixties after the great war on poverty got underway. And there has been from that moment on a steady increase in the level of poverty right on up to the figures that were used -- the 1979, '82 figures.

The President. [Laughing] Quite a few of them, yes, I do, quite a few. Now, we have, part of our own proposal is a freeze on farm payments, as you know. But that was because the 1981 farm bill, when it was passed, was based on what they had projected would be a much higher inflation rate. And so, we're spending in the farm program several times more than we should have been spending.

Grace commission, their recommendations, these are going to take really bipartisan approach and study, because these are -- your deficit was made up of half recession and half structural; that structural thing was built in. That was the automatic increases that just took place, as every year went by; and the Congress didn't have to increase them, they were there.

Now, we need structural reform. The recovery has already had some reductions of our own estimates of the deficit. As you know, last summer we were estimating above $200 billion, and suddenly it is down sizably more than that -- down around 180. That is the recovery that's doing that. Now, that will continue as the recovery continues -- I've got to stop saying recovery. Some of the leading economists in the country have contacted me and said I should no longer use that word, because we're beyond recovery; we are now into expansion. So, the expansion will continue.

But the structural part will remain a threat until we deal with it. And this is where, as I say, I think that we, not only in those commission reports but everything else -- we must look at structural reforms that can be made that will leave government doing what government is intended to do -- for example, some of the savings that we made, by way of things we call block grants.

Well, it didn't meet our priorities. Maybe it met the next State's priorities, but ours were different, and then someone else's were different. And so, I came here conceiving this idea of let's put the money for general purpose in block grants and turn them over to the States and localities, and give them the ability to administer these as they know they will be most efficient. And this allowed -- there again, the money that was being saved in reducing these amounts -- was the administrative overhead that was being eliminated. And we must do more of this.

Even when a mayor tells you that a program with regard to transportation for the handicapped, the way the government, the Federal Government, forced it on him -- so costly that he, he could have sent taxicabs for every handicapped person that needed transportation and been money ahead -- if he'd been allowed to do that. It wouldn't have cost as much as it did doing it the way the Federal Government said they had to do it.

But here again, could I take advantage of you -- I know Larry says we're through -- let me take advantage of you, though, for one thing. And maybe the media in some ways has helped with this -- certainly in the editorial pages.

But we didn't have concerted prayer. Oh, I can remember a few times when some classmate was ill or some student's mother was very ill, and the teacher might say, ``Let's all pray for the recovery,'' so-forth, things of that kind.

All the amendment we proposed would do would be to say, if the schools want to, that's up to them. It's permitted. The Constitution does not deny them the right. What we did specify was that, no, they couldn't write a prayer, and, no, they couldn't dictate a specific prayer or dictate a method of doing this. They didn't have to do it at all if they didn't want to -- and many of the schools, as I say, that I attended didn't, other than in occasions of this kind. And for Senators who are up there in the debate to be so convinced that what they were voting against was an order, a mandate on the schools -- we just wanted to give the authority back to the schools to do what they wanted to do.

I have to explain something, confess to something, here, that I came around to the wrong side here where I was supposed to sit, and was directed over to this side, but coming in this short aisle, I realized that if I came directly this way, I had to turn left. [Laughter] So, I did it backward.

But I've come here and asked for permission to talk to you this morning -- and I appreciate this opportunity -- on the so-called downpayment that we have come together on, some of your colleagues and ourselves, and the importance of it.

As you know, in the State of the Union Address, I had asked for a possibility of a bipartisan group from both Houses of the Congress that we could get together, and without polarizing or making it an election issue, that we could come to an agreement on a downpayment -- called a downpayment because we realize that there is nothing that we can do, right now and in this short span, to completely resolve the ongoing deficit problem. But that doesn't mean there aren't things that we can do over the long range, looking to a date possible when we will have a balanced budget. And that's why I continue to hope that we can convince everyone of the need for a constitutional amendment that will make a balanced budget mandatory.

It seemed that we couldn't get the cooperation we sought in trying to come to that bipartisan position. So, with your leadership -- Howard Baker, Ted Stevens, and John Tower, and Pete Domenici, and Bob Dole, Mark Hatfield, Jake Garn, and Paul Laxalt -- we did, in a series of meetings, move to and come to agreement on this plan which would call for $43 billion over a 3-year period in savings in the domestic side of the budget, $57 billion in budget authority in the defense budget, and $48 billion in increased revenues, but without a tax increase as to rates. We believe that there are loopholes, there are provisions in the tax law that, in some instances, say, are unfair generally, or some can take advantage -- unintended advantage of them. And in looking at these, we believe that this sum of money was possible.

Now, we know that there are others. Your colleagues on the other side of the aisle, who want -- or profess to want -- a reduction of the deficit, but they would put the major emphasis on defense and increasing taxes and increasing tax rates.

We believe that this is a good package. Let me just say that -- I have to say that I believe the cuts that we're proposing in defense will mean a slowdown in what we're trying to accomplish. But I don't believe it's unacceptable -- that it isn't enough to overcome the need for us to deal with this deficit problem.

Now, I know that we're hearing all sorts of things about the deficit, and I think it's wonderful that suddenly after all these 40-odd years in which our opponents had the majority in both Houses of the Congress, and during which time we virtually without exception had deficits, literally as a matter of policy -- that they have now decided that we should share and that the deficits are ours.

I think that as an issue, it's going to be rather difficult for those who have, as I say, participated deliberately in a policy of deficit spending that accounted for virtually a trillion dollars in national debt before we got here, to now turn around and say to those of us who have been asking for reductions in spending in these last 3 years -- and have only gotten about half of what we asked for -- to now say that we are responsible for these, when, at the same time, we are the ones who are asking for a balanced budget amendment, and they are the ones who are resisting that.

But I do hope that we can be bipartisan to the extent that there will be well-meaning legislators on the other side of the aisle who see the necessity for getting this downpayment. And then, as I indicated a moment ago, that there is further distance to go -- then I believe that we must seriously study the structural changes that have to be made in government in order to come to that day of balanced budget.

About half of the deficit, this vastly increased deficit, came about because of the added dip in the recession that took place in July of 1981 -- 10.8-percent unemployment and so forth. The other half was structural. Now, the half that was due to the deficit [recession] is going away. It's going away because I have been hearing from some very noted economists who have contacted me on their own to tell me I should stop calling it an economic recovery. They said we have passed the recovery stage; we are now in economic expansion. And some of the figures certainly bear that out -- the most recent one, the flash estimate 7.2 percent for this quarter of growth in the gross national product; what has been happening with unemployment.

I just received some figures yesterday. The automobile industry, which was in such dire straits when we came here in 1981, has added some 83,000 more employees working today in the automobile industry than were working in 1981 in that industry when we came here. Their rate in the industry now of unemployment is 5.9 percent, which is well below the 7.1 percent national average. But there are figures -- all of these things -- the retail sales, the personal income, the housing starts -- everything indicates this recovery that we're having. So, that part, that half of the deficit is being taken care of.

It is up to us now to face up to the structural, built-in causes of deficit and look toward a long-term change in that structure to where we can have government under control. Now, I know we want to run and say, ``Stop the presses'' or ``I have a story that'll crack this town wide open'' or something if I say what I'm going to say, and I will, and that is: I've dug in my heels on taxes. I want you to know that if -- first of all and this third part of the downpayment, the $150 billion downpayment -- the $48 billion in added revenue -- if an effort is made and is successful enough to reach my desk, that attempts, first of all, to get that without keeping the promise for the spending cuts, I will veto. I will veto also if there's an effort made to increase rates.

But I will say at the same time, if when we have finally brought government down to the percentage of the gross national product that government is taking, and we believe ourselves and can honestly say this is the minimum -- this is as far as we can go, and this is now the cost of government if we're to do the things that are required of us -- and if that figure then is still above the percentage of gross national product we're taking in revenues, then I would be the first one to say we would have to adjust to meet this standard of government. I happen to believe that there's a good chance that will not be necessary if we do what we should do with regard to shrinking the cost of government.

So, I think I've covered the point here, except that I believe, in this year particularly, it is absolutely essential that we appear as -- the group of us, your leadership and ourselves -- that we appear united in our determination to get this package and stand together. And I think it will benefit all of us very much in every way. It will not only be good government; it will be good politics.

The President. Well, Jack and Bob, I want to thank you very much for this opportunity and making it possible. I've come down here to talk to you about our $150 billion downpayment and try and -- if I can -- express the importance that we place on it, how essential I think it is that we all stand together in this particular time. And I would like to commend at the same time, Bob Michel, Trent Lott, and Silvio Conte and Barber Conable and Del Latta, and their colleagues in the Senate for our coming together as we have on this $150 billion downpayment -- working together. And we did have consensus on this.

I think we have to remember with all that's going on where we were 3 years ago: the inflation rates, the interest rates, the economy that had faltered so badly. Everyone seemed to think that when the bottom kind of fell out a little further in July of 1981, that that was the recession.

They're forgetting a little bit that some of us campaigned in 1980 in areas where employment -- unemployment, was over 20 percent. I remember being castigated by some because I referred to the situation then as a depression, not a recession. And when they took me on and said that technically it wasn't, if you will remember, I said that a recession is when your neighbor's out of work, and a depression is when you're out of work. And there were a lot of the people I was talking to who were out of work.

Well, the latest figures for this quarter are 7.2-percent growth in the gross national product. There has never been a recovery in the seven preceding recessions since World War II of that level. But at the same time, I don't think it's overheated. And I think it's a solid one because it has been based on solid practices. It hasn't been a quick fix with flooding the money market and artificial stimulants of spending programs and which we know seven times previously resulted in another and worse recession just 2 or 3 years after the one that we had come out of.

This is in authority -- I'm not talking, now, the outlays; I'm talking the budget authority. And it calls for $48 billion in increased revenues. Now let me hasten to say this does not represent a tax rate increase. This is finding provisions in the tax laws and some loopholes which we would be justified in closing even if there were no deficit to be handled.

Department is going forward with a study on how we might be able to simplify and broaden the tax base, and even be possible to reduce the rates at the same time; a tax program that possibly could catch that $100 billion in revenue that is now being denied us and that is legitimate revenue because it is people who actually owe the tax and are not paying it at all.

Now, we believe that all these things are possible. But we also believe that then, with the Grace commission reports that we have -- and, incidentally, some of those Grace commission recommendations are responsible for some of the cuts that are in here, including in defense. As a matter of fact, Cap Weinberger and his team cut $16 billion out of their proposed budget -- some of it was Grace commission findings that they found could be utilized -- before he delivered the first budget to us, and which our group now -- the Republican group of Representatives, Senators, and we of the administration -- he had cut that much, and then we further reduced that, but with his -- he was a part of the negotiations, and he agreed that we could do it. Now, we have to say it does slow, somewhat, what we think is necessary for national security, but not to the point of an unavoidable -- or to a risk that we can't take. It is not that much of a risk and with the necessity of getting control of the deficit.

Now, let me, if I can, just touch on something else with this deficit since it seems to be becoming a campaign issue already. And I'm a little astounded at how far out on a limb some of our opponents have gotten with this campaign use of the deficit. Because are we to forget that for more than 40 years they have dominated both Houses of the Congress, and for more than 40 years, deficit spending has been a deliberate part of their policy? How many of you, when you tried to protest, heard in the past that we didn't have to worry about the national debt, we owed it to ourselves? -- and that deficit spending was necessary, and a little inflation was good for us, also; it maintained prosperity? And those of us who kept saying, ``It will one day catch us, and the bottom will fall out,'' well, it has happened.

Now, about half the deficit, the estimated big deficits, were the result of that further dip, plus what had gone before in the economy, because half of the deficit is cyclical. Now, that is the part that is shrinking right now. The other half is structural, and you and I know it. It was built into government policy. You didn't have to each year increase spending or anything, it was automatic.

So, once this downpayment gets in place, that doesn't mean we're finished. No. We're going to go to work. And I hope it'll be a bipartisan study of what can be done to make the structural changes that must be made to let us control deficits and deficit spending.

How can they claim that we are the ones that seemingly want deficit spending, when for 2 years we've been asking for a constitutional amendment to prohibit deficit spending by the Federal Government, require a balanced budget, and they are the ones who are opposed to it? Now, I still believe that we should have that amendment to the Constitution. Granted, we would have to point to a year of implementation that we could foresee with what we could legitimately do without causing chaos and disruption in bringing government spending down to the level of government revenues. And that we will proceed with.

And with the 2,500 recommendations of the Grace commission -- they will be a part of our study, what we're going to try to do. But let me just point out some things. Recently, the figures were thrown at us that poverty has increased. And the period they chose to say that it increased was from 1979 to 1982. Well, we weren't here until 1981, and in 1981 we were still using their budget and their spending policies because you come in in the midst of a fiscal year.

The truth of the matter is we started an increase in the number of people living in poverty back in the late sixties and early seventies when the Great Society, the War on Poverty actually was implemented and got underway. And rather than decreasing poverty, it increased the number of people that were declared in poverty.

Nineteen seventy-four -- and many of you participated in it -- there was a budget process that was passed for us to get control of the budget. And from 1974 when that was passed until 1981, the deficits totaled $560 billion, on top of the almost -- well, that made the almost trillion dollars that was here when we came.

Well, again, I think if we all stick together and if we recognize that we're not being unfair, that we're feeding more people today who are hungry than have ever been fed, we're providing more food stamps, we are sending more young people to college -- 40 percent of the people going to college today are going there with the aid of Federal grants, loans, and so forth. In other words, all of this talk about fairness and unfairness, they who want to cancel -- as an aid to curing the deficit -- want to cancel the tax indexing -- and they say that would be fair -- well, maybe you'd be interested in knowing that we figured out what would happen.

We're trying to help the people that are down there. The cuts that we've made in many of the social programs have been cuts in administrative overhead. I came here with the knowledge, as previously having been a Governor, that there were a number of the social reforms here in which it cost the Federal Government $2 to deliver $1 to a needy person. And these are the things that -- where we have been trying to cut and trying to bring some sense into government. And it's what we're continuing to try to do.

More people are getting food stamps today than have ever gotten them. But there are 860,000 people who were getting them that are not getting them because we found they morally had no right to them. Their income was above 150 percent of poverty.

So, we've got a story to tell, and I hope that we'll get out there and tell it to all of the people in this campaign. And it's a story in which 12.4-percent interest -- or inflation rates, are not fair to people at the bottom of the economic ladder. But I think that -- not completely out of it, but 3 percent, and right now, only around 4-percent rates are a little more fair than 12.4. And this is what we've been achieving here.

We have a solid recovery on its way. Let me just give you a couple more figures. I know I've gone over my time here, and I have to let you go, but let me just tell you that the automobile industry, the industry as a whole now has 83,000 more people working than were working in that industry when we came here in 1981. Their unemployment rate, believe it or not, in that industry is now only 5.9 percent, as contrasted to the general average of 7.1.

We could go on with the figures of that kind, of the housing starts, with the fact that on the cyclical part of the deficit, the further help that we're going to be -- that in the last 15 months, we've put 4,900,000 more people into jobs in this country. Now, that hasn't had time to have, really, the impact -- only the first ones for the first year -- but from here on, to have almost 5 million more people, many of them no longer wards of the government, not getting unemployment insurance and food stamps and things of that kind, but working and paying taxes, we can see that the cyclical part of the deficit is being taken care of.

When we, last August, told you that it looked like the deficit was going to be a little over $200 billion, and now it comes down to about 185 -- do you know how that happened? We couldn't even project back then what the recovery was going to be, and then we found out that we got $15 billion more in tax revenues from the reduced rates than we had anticipated just a short a time ago as August to January.

Many single parents in America are making valiant efforts on behalf of their children under trying circumstances. Whether it is a deserted spouse forced to work and care for children simultaneously, or a spouse who is not receiving child support that has been awarded by a court, or an unwed mother who has bravely foregone the all-too-available option of abortion, or a widow or widower, single parents deserve our recognition and appreciation for their demonstrated dedication to their young.

At the same time, we should also recognize the vital and ongoing role a large percentage of non-custodial parents play in the nurturing process of their offspring. Their sacrifices, devotion, and concern reflect the bonds of caring for those they have brought into this world.

Single parents can and do provide children with the financial, physical, emotional, and social support they need to take their places as productive and mature citizens. With the active interest and support of friends, relatives, and local communities, they can do even more to raise their children in the best possible environment.

Nancy and I are pleased and honored to greet you and Madame Mitterrand. We welcome you as a head of state who has demonstrated courage and decisiveness in the face of international challenges that test the character of Western leadership. We welcome you, also, as the representative of the French people for whom all Americans share a special affection.

We look out over the White House grounds, and we see evidence that the bond between us is deep and has stood the tests of time. There in the distance is the Jefferson Memorial, a tribute to America's third President, a founder of our republic, an intellectual whose ideas were profoundly influenced by his exposure to French philosophy and culture. It is not mere coincidence that this giant of American freedom was one of our first representatives to France.

Mr. President, millions of people throughout the world admire and respect your country's historic legacy. Today, under your leadership, France continues to be a major contributor to world stability and peace. In this cause, we stand together as two peoples who cherish liberty and two peoples committed to humane and civilized values.

In Lebanon, we Americans are proud that we're part of a peacekeeping force working together at great risk to restore peace and stability to that troubled land. We will always remember that in this gallant and humanitarian effort we stood shoulder to shoulder with your brave countrymen.

Our nations, two great world powers, have responsibilities far beyond our own borders. Your influence is a force for good in the Middle East. You have drawn a line against aggression in Chad, and you've extended assistance to other African nations seeking to preserve their security and better the lives of their peoples. These are but a few examples of the constructive global role that France is playing.

European unity. I am most eager to discuss with you our bilateral concerns and also those economic, social, and political issues of significance to Europe as a whole. America continues to support a strong and united Europe. The European democracies are, through the North Atlantic alliance, anchoring the mutual defense of our common freedom. Today, as in years past, our own liberty relies heavily on the good will and shared sense of purpose among those people in the world who enjoy freedom. Victor Hugo's words still ring true. ``It is through fraternity,'' he said, ``that liberty is saved.'' Clearly, Mr. President, if those who love liberty stand together strong in resolve, freedom will not only survive, it will prevail.

Symbolic of our friendship, this summer America will greet the first contingent of French experts coming to New York to aid in the restoration of the Statue of Liberty. This year we will begin celebrating the centennial of that lady of light. That magnificent gift, a beacon of liberty for all mankind, is a lasting reminder of that precious heritage that we, the French and American people, share.

Mr. President, I'm pleased that your visit will include travel to parts of America that, as President of France, you have not yet been able to visit. You've already seen a good part of our east coast, especially the tidewater section of Virginia which you visited during the celebration of the French and American alliance at Yorktown, and again when we met with summit colleagues at Williamsburg.

Then you will also journey to America's heartland, the Midwest, the farm country, for a firsthand look at American agriculture. And you will travel to the American west coast and visit our home State of California. There, innovations in energy and electronics, spurred by tax incentives that reward personal initiative and risk-taking, are paving the road to the 21st century and a new era of high technology.

It's comforting to know that no matter what changes technology brings to our way of living, the good will between our peoples will remain solid and lasting. America is delighted that you have set this week aside to be with us as a friend.

During your visit to Washington, Nancy and I look forward to deepening our personal relationship with you and Madame Mitterrand and with your colleagues. We offer you a warm welcome and our best wishes for a rewarding and memorable visit.

Now, I may say that this is perhaps a case where chance has been on our side, but I think that there is more than this. There is something symbolic. And, in fact, there is no such thing as chance in the history of peoples of the world. There is, however, something that is called destiny. And our destiny is indeed a common destiny.

And so, I think it is natural that my first thoughts should go to the Americans and the French, brothers in arms, who from Yorktown all the way through the ages to Beirut have, in fact, shed their blood together. And history shows that these sacrifices have never been made in vain, because their purpose was not to conquer nor to achieve power, but to defend freedom.

Now, despite all this, perhaps our two peoples do not yet know each other well enough. And so there is sometimes, shall we say, room for certain uncertainties. Now, after having had conversations with yourself, Mr. President, I will have the opportunity of spending 5 days traveling through the country in order to see again places that I've learned to know in the last 38 years since my first visit to this country, but also to get a better understanding of the dynamic qualities of the country, the great diversity of the United States, its culture and its modernness.

But my ambition is also to show you -- during my visit and during our conversations on world affairs and the affairs that concern our two countries -- I want you to see the true picture of France: France, which is, all right, a country of tradition, but is also a country of economic and technological power that is looking towards the future; and France that is preparing herself with determination for the world of the future that the next few years are going to bring to us; France, which is a constant ally that can be counted upon and which intends to bring her own original contribution to the quest for peace and the pursuit or the resumption of development, because relations between our two countries obviously cannot only be a matter of celebrating our glorious past.

And here the firm and clear orientations that I have given to French diplomacy are known to yourself and to your administration and to our friends throughout the world and based on the basic idea of unfailing loyalty to our friends and the concept of the balance of forces worldwide and in Europe. Firmness and determination are indispensable qualities, but they must go together with keeping the dialog open, particularly with the Eastern bloc.

Now, France is strong, independent, and sure of herself and, therefore, is willing and prepared and determined to dialog with everyone on all subjects. And France, sure of her own citizens, is, as I say, open within her means to a discussion on all matters while being always loyal to her friends.

Now, it is true, we recognize that the upturn, the economic circumstances in the United States and the presence of American diplomacy worldwide -- all this creates favorable conditions for a recovery of world affairs in all sense of the term. And it is true that the serious dangers that were threatening the international financial system last year have been able to be met. But our efforts must never be relinquished in such areas.

And yet, despite all this that we have achieved, I think the main task is still ahead of us. We must consolidate what has been achieved, which is still fragile. We must push back the frontiers of poverty, which remain in so many regions of the world the true, the genuine roots of war. And we must guard ourselves against too much indifference -- any indifference towards the Third World, in particular. We must remember that the Third World is in the same universe, although in difficult conditions, as ourselves. And what will happen, the future of the Third World is something that of course depends on them, but also on us.

Now, Mr. President, Madame, I am really happy to be here, in front of the White House, in this city of Washington, in this garden, in these places which mean so very much to all of us. For you and I this will be another of our meetings, and we have always been able to communicate among each other concerning our plans and projects. And it is my earnest wish that this visit should establish yet closer ties of friendship and fraternity between us, because I think that that would be the best way of ensuring even speedier progress towards that region of the heart, perhaps, where liberty exists. We're moving in that direction, but we still have some road to follow.

I support Ed Meese's request to the Attorney General for the appointment of an independent counsel. I know that an impartial, prompt, and thorough inquiry will demonstrate the high level of integrity and dedication which have marked Ed's long career of public service. I will not withdraw his nomination for the position of Attorney General.

He has been my trusted colleague for 17 years. He will remain as my Counsellor to the President until confirmed. I am confident that the results of an independent inquiry will permit the Senate to confirm rapidly his nomination.

Note: On the same day, Mr. Meese sent a letter to Attorney General William French Smith requesting that the Attorney General recommend the appointment of an independent counsel to investigate the allegations raised before the Senate Judiciary Committee which relate to Mr.

It is appropriate that Americans express our appreciation to the many thousands of dedicated men and women in all parts of our Nation who have devoted their lives to helping those in need. For more than a century, social workers have been committed to the betterment and general welfare of all our society. They have helped implement social services with creativity, resourcefulness, and true professionalism.

Those closest to the problem -- the social workers in State and local governments, area agencies, and private and voluntary organizations -- are usually the most qualified persons to decide what help is needed and the best way to provide it. In this way, they carry on and enhance our proud American heritage of neighbors helping neighbors, and people helping people.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-second day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

The theme of this year's ``National Safe Boating Week'' emphasizes the dangers of combining alcohol consumption with boat operation. The use of alcohol and other intoxicating substances is a major factor in boating accidents and fatalities. Boat operators who drink impair their ability to recognize and react to hazards and thereby endanger not only themselves but also others on the water. The use of even small amounts of alcohol can significantly reduce an operator's judgment and boat handling skills. This is particularly true as fatigue caused by sun, glare, noise, wind, and boat motion intensifies the effects of alcohol. Through the observance of ``National Safe Boating Week, 1984,'' Americans should be alerted to these dangers.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-second day of March in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

As Americans, we enjoy a rich heritage of freedom. How fortunate we are that the founders of this great country were committed to the ideal that all people share inalienable rights to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness. This ideal has been the inspiration for many generations of Americans in the building of what is today the greatest and most prosperous Nation in the world.

The people of the United States cherish their liberties and recognize that our freedoms of conscience and action are at the heart of the unique American tradition. To preserve this great tradition, it is important for us all to pause from time to time to rededicate ourselves to the democratic ideals which have served us so well.

Our evening together has rekindled some pleasant memories of warm June nights in the beautiful gardens of Versailles, of observing the colorful and moving commemoration of the union of French and American forces at Yorktown, of the many distinguished world leaders at Williamsburg just last year. Soon, I look forward to bringing home yet another memory in which President Mitterrand will be a major part.

We will meet later this year to commemorate the anniversary of the landing of Allied Forces on the Normandy beaches 40 years ago. That event tied the hearts of our people, and for all time sent a message to tyrants that free men are all citizens of the same land.

Mr. President, your visit to America this week is yet another milestone in the common heritage and close association of our two freedom-loving nations. France was America's first ally. The trust and confidence which have characterized our long relationship is undoubtedly an object of great envy throughout the world. France and America share many traditions. We have innumerable ties, cherished by our people, nurtured by our governments.

Foremost among our ties is a profound commitment to democracy and liberty, a heritage inscribed in the Constitution of both our countries. These values lie at the heart of the Atlantic alliance. And this commitment between the great democracies of Europe and North America has preserved peace for a longer period than any [other] in modern European history.

America also strives to achieve greater East-West dialog. We will continue to work for a more stable relationship with the Soviet Union -- one that will lead to better understanding and a relaxing of existing tensions.

Franklin, we must also salute those contemporary figures who personify the richness of the bonds between us. I'm struck by how many of our guests here tonight share close ties to France and to French culture. Both our nations can be proud of our citizens whose work and creativity have contributed so much to the quality of our lives and who are recognized on both sides of the Atlantic.

I'm particularly pleased that France and the United States are engaging in two new endeavors -- an artists exchange program and a cooperation in environmental affairs. These agreements will greatly contribute to the cultural and scientific enrichment of our societies.

European Community as a whole. And such dialog between us can only serve the interests of both our countries. In the years ahead, Americans and Frenchmen will be as they always have been -- proud and independent, but united together in the cause of freedom, security, and economic progress. All Americans are grateful for your friendship and appreciate the courageous stands France has taken throughout the world in the cause of liberty.

Pleasant, our meetings have been, since this morning when we first got together from the very first moment. Thanks to yourself, Mr. President, and your wife, and all those who have contributed to make our visit so pleasant, we have enjoyed the warmest possible hospitality. And I'm speaking on behalf of myself and Mrs. Mitterrand and those accompanying me. At the same time, we have been able to engage in serious conversation, but in a climate of friendship. And you have been, I think, particularly, if I may say so, nice to France, and this is particularly due to you, Mr. President, and to you, Madame. You're responsible for this -- for the warmth of our reception -- and I want to thank you.

Now, I hope also that our meetings will prove to be fruitful. We have, in fact, already started discussing a number of aspects of the life of this world we live in, and sometimes those aspects are somewhat tragic and, at any rate, dramatic. We have talked about war. We have tried to find ways of overcoming and preventing war and how it can be possible, perhaps, to develop the machinery to ensure that thing that is so difficult to achieve and is so mysterious, perhaps -- peace.

We have, perhaps, not yet found the secret of the key to peace, but we are craftsmen working on the job, and we are looking and we are seeking for the secret and for the key. And I think our work will prove to be fruitful because, in any case, it is always fruitful and useful to compare the assessments of the world situation of two countries who are united by friendship, and such friendship that has existed for so long, for so many years, that it becomes just a natural way of life. And I think that that is the right way to talk together and, indeed, to do good work together.

Now we have reached the end of the day and not the least pleasant moment of this very pleasant day. We have reached a moment of rest and a pleasant moment of relaxation; at the same time, a rich and useful conversation which, at the same time, carries with it the great pleasure, the warmth of just being together and, for a moment, forgetting perhaps the requirements of our official ties and existence.

Reagan has invited the President of the French Republic. But all the same, tonight for a few hours we have perhaps been able to shed the mantle -- the somewhat heavy mantle of protocol and official ties and relations which we will, of course, resume very seriously tomorrow. But for the moment, we have a few hours just to live our life, and to live our life in a pleasant environment and, also, in a few moments, in an artistic environment.

And so I wish to thank you, Mr. President, and you, Madame, for the exceptional warmth and quality of the way you have received us here today and particularly tonight, and I want to thank you on behalf of my country, on behalf of France. Life -- everyday life is not always particularly easy. Washington and Paris -- well, there is some distance between them, naturally. And we do not always -- our eyes are not always turned in exactly the same direction. And that, in a way, is perfectly natural, in view of the fact that we aren't sitting in the same place. But when it is necessary, you are present and we are present. And we know that. You know it, and we know it.

And that, I think, is the best assurance that when we are gone, our successors will be able to say that that friendship which was struck up at the end of the 18th century stood well the test of time until the end of the 20th century, and then, as far as the future is concerned, well, that will be their problem.

But I think that I would like to close, Mr. President, by raising my glass. And I would like to drink to your health, Mr. President. You are responsible for a great country whose tremendous diversity reflects so much charm and strength. And to you, Madame, to your own health, to the health of your family. And to you, ladies and gentlemen, I want to drink to your health and to your life, your work, and your hopes. In other words, your life, to coin a phrase. And I hope that your life will be a long and prosperous one. In other words, what I'm saying is that I'm raising my glass to the American people so admirably represented here tonight.

Sec. 2. Functions (a) The Council shall advise the President and the Director of the Peace Corps on initiatives needed to promote the purposes of the Peace Corps Act and actions of the Peace Corps which do so.

Nancy and I were very sorry to learn of the death of your husband. Clarence Mitchell was without any doubt one of the most effective and respected men in Washington during his long career as a leading advocate for the NAACP.

The civil rights revolution that began in the '50s has been one of the most dramatic and beneficial events of our time. It would be hard to name anyone who made a larger contribution to the success of that revolution than your husband. His victories did not often gain him headlines, but his patient, behind-the-scenes effort shaped all the important civil rights legislation of that era. He changed the world we live in more rapidly and completely than perhaps even he imagined possible.

Department of Defense Distinguished Civilian Service Award. His distinguished academic career includes publications and commentaries on national security and foreign affairs. He is a member of the Council on Foreign Relations.

The President has recently made a number of decisions relating to the export control program under the Export Administration Act (EAA) to ensure that there is an appropriate balance between national security and export interests.

Department's review of distribution licenses that permit multiple shipments of goods to non-Communist countries. This review will be carried out in a phased manner and will depend on successful implementation of a Memorandum of Understanding between Defense and Commerce for Defense review of individual validated licenses for East-West trade for selected countries and commodities.

Second, the President has also determined that a dual capability to enforce export controls should be maintained in that both the Commerce and Treasury Departments bring important, complementary assets to this important problem. The President has also directed that the two Departments vigorously implement the January 16, 1984, Memorandum of Understanding which designates Customs as the agency responsible for liaison with foreign governments in the conduct of export enforcement investigations, with certain specific exceptions. In addition, the two agencies are to engage in a process of more complete information sharing.

Finally, the President reaffirmed his opposition to any statutory change relating to Defense review of licensing and to EAA enforcement. As Congress prepares for its conference on the export administration bills, the President hopes that the conferees will work towards developing a bill that maintains an appropriate balance between national security and export interests.

The President affirmed the Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) that has been reached between DOD and Commerce on individual validated licenses, providing for Defense review of license applications for 12 countries and 7 commodity groups.

An NSC-chaired Monitoring Committee will be established immediately to set forth criteria to assure administrative efficiency in implementing the MOU and to assure that it is satisfactorily administered.

Understanding (MOU) reached on EAA enforcement between Commerce and Treasury. This designates Customs as the lead agency responsible for liaison with foreign governments in cases under investigation, except for Austria, Belgium, India, Japan, Sweden, and Turkey, where the trade ministries are responsible for enforcing export controls.

Under Section 10(g) of the current EAA, Defense can review all applications for licenses to export goods or technology to any country to which exports are controlled for national security purposes. In general, only license applications for Warsaw Pact countries and the People's Republic of China have been referred to Defense. However, the EAA does not prohibit Defense review of any license application which may be referred from Commerce. The question of expanding Defense review to include shipments to non-Communist destinations results from concerns that tightened controls over direct exports to Communist countries have increased the incentive to divert shipments through friendly countries.

General authority for enforcement is given to any department or agency exercising functions under the EAA. The Department of Commerce has had the basic authority for EAA enforcement since 1949. The Secretary of Commerce, by regulation, has historically authorized the Customs Service (Treasury) to exercise certain enforcement-related functions.

Tomorrow is an historic day for the beleaguered nation of El Salvador. Scores of international observers will watch as the people of El Salvador risk their lives to exercise a right we take for granted -- the right to vote for their President.

This right of choice is not something that is common in all of Central America. It contrasts sharply, for example, with Nicaragua, where the Sandinistas staged a revolution in 1979 promising free elections, freedom of the press, freedom of religion. Despite these promises, the Sandinistas have consistently broken their word, and the elections that they've announced for November seemed designed only to consolidate their control.

Unlike El Salvador, the Nicaraguans don't want international oversight of their campaign and elections. When the members of the National Bipartisan Commission on Central America visited Nicaragua, the Sandinista dictators briefed them with Soviet intelligence and said the U.S. is the source of all evil.

In El Salvador the members heard appreciation for our country's efforts to promote peace, democracy, and development. El Salvador is an emerging democracy plagued by a Communist insurgency and human rights abuses which must stop, but a nation which is strongly pro-American and struggling to make self-government succeed.

The stability of our Latin friends -- indeed, the security of our own borders -- depends upon which type of society prevails -- the imperfect democracy seeking to improve, or the Communist dictatorship seeking to expand.

The Bipartisan Commission warned that new Communist regimes could be expected to fall into the same pattern as Nicaragua; namely, expand their armed forces, bring in large numbers of Cuban and Soviet bloc advisers, and increase the repression of their own people and the subversion of their neighbors. And the Commission warned that a rising tide of communism would likely produce refugees, perhaps millions of them, many of whom would flee to the United States.

Now, these tragic events are not written in stone, but they will happen if we do nothing or even too little. Based on the recommendations of the Commission, I sent the Congress in February a proposal to encourage Democratic institutions, improve living conditions, and help our friends in Central America resist Communist threats. Three-fourths of our request is for economic and humanitarian assistance.

And that brings me to an important point: The people who argue that the root of violence and instability is poverty, not communism, are ignoring the obvious. But all the economic aid in the world won't be worth a dime if Communist guerrillas are determined and have the freedom to terrorize and to burn, bomb, and destroy everything from bridges and industries to power and transportation systems. So, in addition to economic and humanitarian assistance, we must also provide adequate levels of security assistance to permit our friends to protect themselves from Cuban and Soviet supported subversion.

Military assistance is crucial right now to El Salvador. The Salvadoran people repudiated the guerrillas when they last voted in 1982, but continued Soviet-Cuban-Nicaraguan support for the guerrillas, combined with the failure of our Congress to provide the level of military aid I've requested, have put El Salvador in an extremely vulnerable position. The guerrillas have been seizing the identification cards that allow citizens to vote. One of El Salvador's principal guerrilla commanders has pledged an all-out effort to disrupt the elections. And, should there be a need for an election run-off in late April or May, these same guerrillas, who have already assassinated elected congressmen in El Salvador, will do everything they can to disrupt that election as well.

We're looking at an emergency situation. So, I've asked Congress to provide immediate security assistance for El Salvador while the comprehensive bipartisan legislation makes its way through the Congress over the next several months.

This is the moment of truth. There is no time to lose. If the Congress acts responsibly, while the cost is still not great, then democracy in Central America will have a chance. If the Congress refuses to act, the cost will be far greater. The enemies of democracy will intensify their violence, more lives will be lost, and real danger will come closer and closer to our shores. This is no time for partisan politics.

Thank you very much. We're delighted to welcome you to the White House. Over its history this room has been the site of many occasions honoring America's heroes, and today we carry on in that tradition.

During my inaugural address, I noted that those who say that we're in a time when there are no heroes, they just don't know where to look. A few months ago, we had a reception on the White House lawn for some of America's latest heroes: the soldiers, sailors, and marines who rescued the American medical students on the island of Grenada. It's a memory that we'll long cherish; seeing those medical students -- some who once had admittedly negative feelings toward the military -- throwing their arms around those brave young men who had rescued them, taking pictures of them, and introducing them to their parents as heroes. All of us can be proud of the courage and dedication of our military personnel in Grenada, in Beirut, wherever they're stationed, domestically or on foreign shores.

This is also a good opportunity to note the heroism of some other Americans who cherish freedom: the people of El Salvador. Yesterday those valiant people braved guerrilla violence and sabotage to do what we take for granted -- cast their votes for President. While the final vote count is not yet in, it looks like the turnout is another victory for freedom over tyranny, of liberty over repression, and courage over intimidation.

We have already heard by phone from so many of our Congressmen who were down there as observers, both Democrat and Republican, and some who in their legislative activities have not looked with too much favor upon what we've been doing. But the calls we're getting back are, all of them, just complete enthusiasm of the heroism they saw there on the part of these people who, in spite of everything, insisted on going to vote.

But these are the very qualities that we're here to honor today in a group of our own heroes -- individuals whose bravery, dedication, and creativity have enormously contributed to our quality of life and the cause of human freedom.

The people we honor today are people who refused to take the easy way out, and the rest of us are better off for it. They're people who knew the risks and the overwhelming effort that could be required, but were undeterred from their goals. They are people who set standards for themselves and refused to compromise. And they're people who were not afraid to travel in unexplored territory.

As a Member of the United States Senate, one of the country's most powerful and influential citizens, and an individual whose character shines brightly as an example to others, Howard Baker has been a force for responsibility and civility on a generation of Americans. In his almost 20 years of service, he has earned the respect and admiration of his fellow citizens regardless of their political persuasion. As Majority Leader of the Senate, his quiet, cooperative style and keen legislative skills have honored America's finest traditions of enlightened political leadership and statesmanship.

As a giant in the world of entertainment, James Cagney has left his mark not only on the film industry but on the hearts of all his fellow Americans. In some 60 years in entertainment, performing on stage and screen, he mastered drama and action adventure, as well as music and dance. One of his most remembered performances, as George M. Cohan in ``Yankee Doodle Dandy,'' was a whirlwind singing and dancing film that inspired a Nation at war when it sorely needed a lift in spirit. James Cagney's professional and personal life has brought great credit to him and left unforgettable memories with millions who have followed his career.

Could I add something else? And this didn't have anything to do with the award. As a great star at the same studio where I started, he was never too busy to hold out a hand to a young fellow just trying to get underway.

Although he has never held elected office, Leo Cherne has had more influence on governmental policy than many Members of Congress. Since the late 1930's, Leo Cherne has stepped forward and with brilliance, energy, and moral passion helped this Nation overcome countless challenges.

His lifetime devotion to aiding his country and to serving the cause of human freedom, especially through his work on behalf of refugees, reflects the strong and generous character of a man who deserves the respect and gratitude of all Americans.

In an outstanding professional career, Dr. Denton Cooley has distinguished himself time and again in the field of medicine. As one of this country's leading heart surgeons, he has charted new territory in his search for ways to prolong and enrich human life. His efforts have saved the lives not only of his own patients, but of those of many other doctors who have studied and mastered techniques developed by him.

Through his musical talents, warm personality, and quick ``down-home'' wit Tennessee Ernie Ford won the hearts of the American people. Ford's music, which revealed his character and soul to all who listened, inspired as well as entertained his audiences. His respect for traditional values, his strong faith in God, and his unlimited capacity for human kindness have greatly endeared him to his fellow countrymen.

Dr. Hector Garcia's patriotism and community concern exemplify the meaning of good citizenship. His many community-building endeavors included his work as a founder and first National Chairman of the American G.I. Forum, a veterans' organization which has done much to improve the lot of Americans of Mexican descent. Over the years, he has faithfully represented our government on numerous occasions, overseas and domestically. Dr. Hector Garcia is a credit to his family and community, and to all Americans.

During his long service to his country, General Andrew Goodpaster shouldered heavy responsibility and worked tirelessly with the highest professional standards. His organizational and diplomatic skills helped shape the NATO Alliance and develop American military and foreign policy over three decades. As Supreme Allied Commander of the NATO Alliance, Presidential representative, and soldier, General Goodpaster has earned a well-deserved reputation as a thoughtful and diligent public servant. His work has contributed immensely to the security and freedom of his country and to the cause of peace.

Lincoln Kirstein is an author and entrepreneur who has honored and delighted Americans through his enormous contribution to ballet in our country. Through his commitment, two major institutions of American dance, the New York City Ballet and the School of American Ballet, were created and flourished. Developing and fostering appreciation for the arts have always depended on the energy, creativity, and commitment of individual citizens. Lincoln Kirstein stands tall as one of a select and treasured few in the world of American art.

Through his western novels, Louis L'Amour has played a leading role in shaping our national identity. His writings portrayed the rugged individual and the deep-seated values of those who conquered the American frontier. Starting out from humble beginnings, he has lived a fulfilling and adventurous life. An eminently successful writer, more than 100 million copies of his novels are in print, L'Amour's descriptions of America and Americans have added to our understanding of our past and reaffirmed our potential as an exploring, pioneering, and free people.

Foundation of Religion and Psychiatry and his many books, Dr. Peale became an advocate of the joy of life, helping millions find new meaning in their lives. Few Americans have contributed so much to the personal happiness of their fellow citizens as Dr. Norman Vincent Peale.

Americans when, in 1947, he became the first black baseball player in the major leagues. He bravely demonstrated to all that skill and sportsmanship, not race or ethnic background, are the qualities by which athletes should be judged. In doing so, he struck a mighty blow for equality, freedom, and the American way of life. Jackie Robinson was a good citizen, a great man, and a true American champion.

President Anwar el-Sadat, as a soldier, led his country in war, but his greatest acts of courage came in pursuit of peace. He captured the imagination of people everywhere by taking the first great step toward achieving a lasting peace between Egypt and Israel. His humanity and sense of responsibility, even now that he is gone, remain a giant force for peace and stability in the world.

With enormous conviction and unrelenting effort, Eunice Kennedy Shriver has labored on behalf of America's least powerful people, the mentally retarded. Over the last two decades, she has been on the forefront of numerous initiatives on the behalf of the mentally retarded, from creating day camps, to establishing research centers, to the founding of the Special Olympics. Her decency and goodness have touched the lives of many, and Eunice Kennedy Shriver deserves America's praise, gratitude, and love.

Well, that concludes our presentations. And again, I offer my personal congratulations to the recipients. As a representative of the American people, I want to thank each of you for what you've done that has added so much to our lives.

I have signed H.R. 2809 because it promotes important conservation and preservation goals and encourages private sector initiative to aid us in attaining those goals. I must note my serious reservations about the approach taken in the bill. Before this bill was passed, the Department of Justice advised the Congress that the bill's provisions, taken together, create ambiguity about whether the Foundation is to be a private entity or an establishment within the executive branch.

The statements in the bill to the effect that the Foundation shall be a nonprofit, charitable corporation and that it shall not be an agency or establishment of the United States are contradicted by the facts that the Foundation is established by Congress, funded by Congress, and endowed with the sole purpose of assisting and benefiting a Federal agency, the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service; its property is made exempt from condemnation by State and local governments; and its Directors are all appointed by the Secretary of the Interior. Moreover, the bill exempts the Foundation from certain provisions of the United States Code which would be clearly inapplicable if the Foundation were truly nongovernmental.

Supreme Court has recently warned against constitutional innovations merely because they seem to be expedient. Establishment of the Foundation under the terms of the bill is an unwise and dangerous precedent. I have, therefore, given serious consideration to vetoing the bill even though I support its laudable objectives. I have not done so because the Attorney General has advised that the bill can be given a constitutional construction.

I have been advised by the Attorney General that the governmental character of the Foundation predominates. Under the Supreme Court's cases, the character of an agency will be determined by its functions, not its label, Buckley v. Valeo, 424 U.S. 1 (1976). On this basis, the Foundation must be regarded as an establishment within the executive branch. The Directors of the Foundation, therefore, will be removable at the discretion of the Secretary of the Interior, because they are appointed by him and they exercise no powers which insulate them from removal at will.

Accordingly, I will direct the Secretary to ensure compliance by the Directors of the Foundation with their statutory purposes through the exercise of the removal power. It will not be necessary to enforce compliance through suit by the Attorney General, an aspect of the bill which raises significant constitutional issues. In addition, I have directed the Attorney General and the Secretary to examine the other provisions of the bill to determine how they should be given effect consistent with constitutional principles.

You may be aware that I've got my own independent insurance agent, Jim Norris, a member of your California association. And I'm hoping I'll have to call on Jim about including our present residence on the homeowner policy on our ranch for about, say, another 4 years. [Laughter] But I appreciate this opportunity to be with you at this national legislative conference.

You make your living providing people with insurance for their lives and property. But the only insurance of good government is the involvement of solid citizens. For far too long, while you were focusing on your jobs and families and communities, special interests were hard at work in Washington. A political coalition of these interests and well-intentioned politicians of a liberal persuasion brought this country to the edge of economic catastrophe. They gave us out-of-control spending, oppressive taxation, near runaway inflation, sky-high interest rates, and economic stagnation. There was an adversary relationship between government and the business community.

In these last 3 years, we've done our best to reverse the policies of tax and spend and inflate that wrought such havoc on our country. At first, we were told that turning the situation around would be impossible. We were told, for example, that it would take 10 years to wring inflation out of the system. Well, I just kept in mind something President Coolidge reportedly once said. ``I have found it advisable,'' he said, ``not to give too much heed to what people say when I'm trying to accomplish something of consequence. Invariably they proclaim it can't be done. I deem that the very best time to make the effort.'' Well, now, contrary to some reports on my age, Cal didn't tell me that personally. [Laughter] I read it.

They said there was no way to get control of spending. It tripled during the decade of the seventies and was growing at 17 percent annually when we got here. We've cut that in half. And more progress can still and must be made on this front.

I've often said that our country was in trouble because government was spending too much and taxing too much. Well, our 25-percent, across-the-board reduction in the tax rates have prevented the people from being further sapped by built-in tax increases. And we've indexed those rates so that starting next year government will no longer make a built-in profit off the taxpayers' misery.

You may have noticed that there's been considerable pressure to back away from our tax rate reductions. Clearly, the deficits remain a problem. But the answer is not undercutting economic recovery with higher and higher taxes. Recently we offered a balanced budget amendment, and we offered a 3-year deficit reduction package providing for a $150 billion cut in the projected deficit.

The proposal is realistic and a good first step. We've started the process moving, but I have no intention of giving in to those whose only answer is taking the American people back into the poorhouse. We must have meaningful cuts in spending. As we look to the future, we can balance up with tax increases and lock ourselves into economic bondage, or we can balance down with lower tax rates and spending, permitting our economy to break free.

This is no time to go back to the failed policies of the past. It took time to put our program in place, and it took time for it to take effect. But we're now in the beginning phase of an economic renaissance that will touch the lives of all Americans.

So, from the ashes of pessimism, a stronger and more vibrant America is emerging. Productivity, after falling for 2 years before we took office, rose 3\1/2\ percent last year. The gross national product was up a healthy 6 percent, and it appears that the first quarter growth this year was even stronger -- 7.2 percent. Unemployment is dropping faster than anyone predicted. Housing starts, auto sales, and retail shopping are all up. Venture capital, which lays the foundation for a better tomorrow, rose less than $1 billion in 1980. It shot up over $4 billion last year.

And lo and behold, the deficit, which all the pessimists predicted would keep going up, is now coming down -- and is being brought down by economic growth. I might say that in this same hotel just a few nights ago, we had the famous and traditional Gridiron in which you're supposed to say outrageous things. So I said one. I said that all this talk about the deficit, I just wasn't going to worry about it, that it's big enough to take care of itself. [Laughter] But I do worry about it.

Now, most of those represent small business ventures, spearheaded by individuals like yourselves, proud and independent, taking risks and putting in long, hard hours to earn a living and be your own boss. Each one is just a minuscule part of our economy. But, taken together, small business represents a dynamo of energy and creativity that is catapulting our country toward new levels of opportunity and freedom.

John Naisbitt, futurist and author of ``Megatrends,'' is saying that ``1984 has arrived just in time to witness an explosion of bottom-up entrepreneurialism and the dawn of an era that may offer our best hope yet. . . .'' Well, all of this is no accident. Instead of channeling an increasing percentage of working people's paychecks to Washington, we're letting people keep more of what they earn. Instead of centralizing power in the Federal bureaucracy, we're giving more autonomy to State and local government, transferring programs and resources to them in the form of block grants. We're freeing people from hundreds of millions of hours required to process needless Federal regulations and redtape, unleashing them for more productive endeavors.

We've come a long way. Our next step is putting in place fundamental reforms that will prevent us from sliding back into the pit from which we've just emerged -- reforms that will enable all Americans of every age, race, creed, and color to go forward together to build a true opportunity society. The first thing we need, which would take us a long way toward responsible spending, is what I mentioned earlier, a constitutional amendment requiring a balanced Federal budget. Now, many States already have such a requirement for their own budgets.

Executive a line-item veto, so porkbarrel projects can't be attached to needed legislation. Now, this, too, is a tool that's available to many Governors that could be put to use in Washington. I had it when I was Governor of California. And I know that during those 8 years, I vetoed several hundred, almost a thousand, of those items in line-item veto and was never overridden once. They could vote for them when they were concealed in another package of legislation. When they had to vote to override the veto on that particular item, no one would stand up and vote to override, or not enough to override the veto.

Now, much of what we've done has been simply making up for the nonsense of the last few decades. Putting our economy back on the right track was priority number one. But there are other life or death issues confronting us.

Today, far too many of our citizens feel unsafe in their own neighborhoods and even in their own homes. Now, instead of just a lock, many of our citizens peer out of their dwellings, relying on bolts, chains, and even metal bars propped grotesquely against their door. They hire private security guards to patrol near their homes. They have dogs and burglar alarms. They find themselves behind barred windows. And even with all this, they do not feel safe. It's about time the American people start asking who's to blame for this.

The crime epidemic we suffered in the last two decades was no more a result of an uncontrollable cycle than were the inflation and stagnation that ravaged our people. It can be traced to policies that make it ever more difficult to convict the guilty, but have nothing to do with protecting society. The headlines in newspapers throughout the country tell the story. Our criminal justice system is long overdue for reform. It is about time we take the handcuffs off law enforcement and put them on the thugs and murderers where they belong.

Our national security is no less vital than our citizens' personal security and was no less ill managed in the last decade. Defense spending in real terms was permitted to erode by over 20 percent in the 1970's. Weapons systems were unilaterally canceled. The real pay of our military personnel dropped as inflation took off. The CIA was gutted, as longtime agents were let go.

But let's not kid ourselves, national security has a price tag. It's an expensive proposition, and it's been made even more so because we've been playing catchup -- making up for the irresponsibility of the past. The ones you hear yelling the loudest these days are the ones who put us behind the eight ball in the first place. Many of them publicly oppose the modernization of our strategic systems, while at the same time loudly proclaiming their intent to negotiate arms control agreements with the Soviet Union. Well, it's about time to get serious and ask these would-be leaders what they expect to use as incentives with the Soviet Union. Good will and sincerity will get them a smile and a glass of vodka -- [laughter] -- and you can guess why the Soviets will be smiling.

I recently agreed to scale down our planned increase in defense spending. It's played heavily on my mind. It was done only after great thought and regard to all factors. I've looked into the faces of the young people in our military, and as long as I'm President, we're not going to ask these brave young men and women who defend this country to put their lives on the line using obsolete weapons and bargain-basement equipment. We as a people must have the courage to stand behind them.

Now, all of that is true, but no one has added in the stories that we're the ones that have provided those figures. It is our Defense Department that has found this out and that it was going on and has gone to work to change it and so far has gotten back hundreds of millions of dollars in rebates and hundreds of convictions for fraud in this type of operation. And the rebates are still coming in, many voluntarily now, from businesses that have found out what was going on.

Our administration has proposed a modest investment promoting economic growth and the development of democratic institutions in Central America, as well as providing our friends the means to protect themselves against the attack of Soviet-backed insurgents. Being in the business you're in, I hope you can appreciate what we're asking the Congress to approve: Our program is an insurance policy to protect against the chaos that would result from allowing anti-American Marxists to shoot their way to power in Central America. We must not permit that to happen.

Like any insurance policy, there's a premium to pay, but it's cheaper now than to wait for a crisis, and there's no time to lose. The National Bipartisan Commission on Central America clearly warned that our own national security is at stake in this struggle.

And this last weekend, we witnessed dramatic confirmation by the people of El Salvador of their commitment to democracy. Intimidation and threats by Marxist guerrillas couldn't keep these brave, these courageous people from casting their vote for democracy. Many of them walked as far as 20 miles and stood in the hot sun for hours, braving the wrath of guerrillas to vote. The El Salvadorans are worthy of our support.

Democratic and Republican Congressmen and Senators, added to them people from the private sector -- from ranks of labor, ranks of business, a clergyman -- had gone down to observe these elections. And yesterday they came into my office to report on what they had seen. Many of them admitted they went there with a different idea that maybe we were wrong about what we were doing there. They came back, all of them, totally converted.

Now, for the last 3 years we've been trying to build a strong America, not just militarily but economically and, yes, spiritually. We all appreciate the necessity of maintaining the military power to deter aggression and to prevent war. Yet we must also acknowledge that the greatest source of our strength is not weapons or laws, but, instead, the character of our people -- our standards as individuals and our recognition of those values that transcend the politics of the moment.

Four years ago, a cloud of pessimism hung over this land. A negative and cynical attitude, totally inconsistent with our traditions, like a wet blanket, smothered that resilient spirit so long associated with America and Americans. I'm proud that this, too, is something else we've helped change. And I say ``we'' because this kind of transformation can't be from the top. It reflects a change of heart, not just a change of politics [policies].

I'd like to take this opportunity to thank each of you for what you've done, and continue to do, to keep this blessed land the good and decent place God intended it to be. And I want to congratulate you as an association. Your national, local, and State boards are, for example, in the forefront of the campaign against drunk driving, and at the same time, you're promoting highway safety programs throughout the country. You've also been involved in anticrime programs, especially concerning arson. But this doesn't even scratch the surface.

Prevention of Blindness and speaks on their behalf across the country. Your national State director from Hawaii, Norm Westly, has, for years, devoted his personal time to drug rehabilitation programs. I know that these individuals are not unique. They represent thousands of people in your profession.

More than a century ago, a French philosopher came to this country, as he said, to find out the secret -- then, a hundred years ago -- of our greatness. And he said that he had looked everywhere, in our business, in our busy harbors, in our factories and industries, and then, he said, he discovered that America is great because she is good. And if she ever ceases to be good, America will cease to be great. You are helping America to live up to its potential. Together we can keep America the shining light of liberty God intended it to be.

Cleveland on March 26. Sekou Toure was an internationally respected statesman whose efforts on behalf of peaceful settlement of disputes had earned for him and his country an enviable reputation for peacemaking. He exercised a unifying role within the Organization of African Unity and in African affairs generally.

In his letter to the President transmitting the FY 1983 annual report, ISOO Director Garfinkel stated: ``This reduction [in original classification] is an unprecedented accomplishment, especially in the context of improved protection for national security information.'' Garfinkel also noted that to date the President's announced objective of ``enhancing protection for national security information without permitting excessive classification'' is being achieved.

The report also addresses several areas of the information security program in which greater efforts are needed to meet the goals established by the President. These include the generating of additional classified documents deriving from original classification decisions, the program for systematic declassification review of the historically valuable classified records in the National Archives, the quantity and quality of agency self-inspections designed to detect security infractions, and delays in processing researchers' declassification review requests. The President has asked that the Information Security Oversight Office pay particular attention to these areas in the coming year.

I was very pleased to review your FY 1983 Annual Report and to learn that the system we have established under Executive Order 12356 to provide better protection for national security information without excessive classification is working. While we anticipated that the revised information security system would improve credibility and efficiency of the program, its success is also dependent upon the outstanding oversight efforts of you and your staff and the thousands of other persons throughout the executive branch who are dedicated to making it work. Please convey my appreciation to all those whose efforts made these achievements possible.

I ask for the same commitment in the future to improving our performance even more. We must continue to insure that information is being classified only when this extraordinary protection is necessary; that those entrusted with access to national security information appreciate the seriousness of their responsibility to safeguard it; and that systematic review and other declassification efforts are made in accordance with the order's goal of making information no longer requiring security protection available to the public.

Government to address these and other issues that relate to the administration of the information security program. I look forward to future reports on the progress that has been made as a result of these efforts.

I am pleased to transmit this report on the extent to which programs and policies recommended in the 1985 budget meet the standards in the Statement of Policy and recommended program for soil and water conservation programs sent to Congress on December 21, 1982.

In the Statement of Policy, I indicated that future budgets for conservation programs would be consistent with overall economic and fiscal policy requirements and the need for resources for other national goals and interests. The 1985 budget for conservation activities proposes new budget authority of $725 million, $10 million or one percent less than the lower level of the recommended program. It is consistent with overall fiscal policy. It provides adequate resources for the most important conservation activities, technical assistance, soil surveys, and research and analysis, while recommending reductions for other activities that might be postponed or carried out by State and local governments or landowners themselves.

A key feature of the recommended program was the plan to target a larger share of conservation resources to critical problem areas. 1985 will be the third year of the five-year program under which the Department has been allocating additional assistance for soil and water conservation in these critical problem areas. In 1985, 15 percent of all technical assistance will be so targeted. The goal for 1987 is to target 25 percent of all technical and financial assistance. This policy is producing results as total soil savings is expected to be considerably more in 1985 than in 1983.

Block, to conduct a comprehensive review and assessment of current food and agriculture problems. One of the important tasks for the Council will be to develop recommendations for farm programs that will achieve both price support and conservation objectives.

Mr. Weisman. No problem. The first question we'd like to ask you, Mr. President, is one that we've asked the Democratic Presidential candidates, and that is: What do you think is the most important problem facing the United States in the next decade, and what ideas do you have for dealing with it?

The President.  --  -- but right now, I think that's covered basically: the economy, the economic expansion that is needed and that we have embarked on, and peace in the world and reduction of the tensions and the armaments.

Mr. Clines. Sir, on the deficit question, I noticed yesterday you joked slightly about it and then emphasized how seriously you take the deficit problem. Could you be more specific? How serious a problem is it, and what would you do to deal with it?

The President. Well, that would be a part of the overall generic answer that I gave about the economy. Yes, the deficit is a problem; no one can ignore it. But it's been going on for some 50 years, and for most of that time, almost totally in that time, it has been a deliberate part of government policy. And some of us who complained about it back through the years always said that it would get literally out of control, that you could not go on that way without coming to a day of reckoning. And we now are at that day of reckoning. I think the basic part of that deficit is due to government itself and the excessive share of the people's earnings, the gross national product that the government is taking.

And so, we're going to continue. We've made a proposal for a downpayment over the next 3 years that is pretty evenly divided between some revenues, not by raising rates, but by eliminating some tax practices that we think aren't fairly distributed. And that, of course, is part of this temporary downpayment. But at the same time, I have ordered the Treasury Department to embark on a study of the entire tax structure -- as to how we can collect the uncollected tax that is being evaded by people who owe it and don't pay, simplify the tax structure, broaden the base, hopefully reduce the rates on individuals.

Mr. Clines. You -- excuse me -- you had mentioned last week in passing that you saw the need at some point to restructure social security for new workers coming into the program. Could you elaborate on that?

The President. Well, I think we have to -- we've got to look at the whole governmental structure, and this includes the entitlement programs. There have been demographic changes that have been ignored that make some policies now leading inevitably toward another day of reckoning if we don't reorder those programs. About half of your deficit has been structural. About half of your deficit has been cyclical, the result of the recessions. And we are eliminating that half -- the cyclical -- by the recovery that has taken place. An evidence of that is that just between August and the first of the year our own projections of the deficit were reduced by $15 billion, because we obtained that much more tax revenue than we had anticipated due to the recovery in the economy.

Mr. Weisman. Mr. President, on the entitlements, can you be more specific about how this restructuring -- it is a year in which you're asking voters to return you to office. Can't you be more specific about what you would do for medicare and social security?

The President. Well, I had tried -- and everyone seemed to ignore it -- I have said over and over again in talking about social security's problem, that nothing must be done to penalize those people who are now dependent on those checks. But what we need to do is a revamping of the program.

And maybe also it would be well if you printed that the rebuttal to the demagoguery of the '82 campaign is the fact that today the average couple, married couple on social security is getting $180 a month more than they were getting before we came here.

Mr. Weisman. But let me take one more pass at this. Do you think, then, in a second term, should you win reelection, that you will want to take another look at these structural problems in social security, as well as medicare?

Mr. Weisman. Okay. May I ask you a question about the, what you mentioned a moment ago, about broadening the tax base, as being an objective in your tax simplification study? Would you accept a tax simplification that does lead to an, in effect, an increased tax burden on Americans?

The President.  --  -- and simplification -- what we are looking toward, and I can't answer now, because this is a study that has to be made, and it's a very complex subject -- when you say ``broaden the tax base,'' again, you're talking about involving, in the payment of taxes, people now who, for one reason or the other, have been able to, in many instances, remain totally tax free or remain well below what they should be paying. And thus it limits your ability to reduce the overall burden on individuals by tax rate cuts because of the lost revenue which, right now, is estimated around a hundred billion dollars a year.

Mr. Clines. On the subject of defense spending, sir, you've accepted a reduction this time around in the budget fight, in the rate of defense growth. We wanted to know whether that's a real reduction, or are you just stretching it out? In other words, you'd have the same buildup at the same cost over a longer period of time.

The President. Well, obviously, to have such a -- to be able to make such a reduction as we did involves some elements of stretching it out, which means that over a longer period of time the same amount of money is distributed so that you have people taking a longer time with their taxes to pay for it. But the defense budget is not determined by how much you want to spend. It's determined by what is necessary to guarantee our security and thus the ability to preserve the peace. And for those who approach the budget from the standpoint of, ``Well, let's make it this percentage of the budget or let's cut this amount of money,'' how do you have national security on that basis?

Now, we have been doing this, and we have -- we ourselves, with all of the talk about defense spending as being the source of added funds for reducing the deficit -- and I've seen the terms used many times in the media that -- ``record defense spending.'' It's record if you take the number of dollars without regard to the value of those dollars. It is far below any record at all. There is no hint of such a thing if you take it as a percentage of the budget or as a percentage of gross national product. And in either one of those ratings, our defense spending is far below what was customary back through the years.

In the Kennedy era, 1962, I believe it was, the defense budget was about 47.8 percent of the total budget. It's down around 27 percent or so now of the budget. It is a smaller percentage of the gross national product than it was then. So, we think that we are really tightening our belt to make this reduction that we're proposing.

Now, how do you arrive at lower defense spending ever? You arrive at it by the other thing that we're trying to bring about, and that is a reduction in armaments with those who could be considered possible adversaries. Then, if you have a reduction of the threat, you can have a reduction of the deterrent on our side. And that is a road toward lesser defense spending.

Mr. Weisman. We'd like to move on to that subject, but before I ask you about that, let me just ask once more if it's correct to assume that you see this reduction in the rate of growth that has been accepted now as primarily a postponement of the buildup, a deferral of the buildup, or do you see it as causing any elimination of anything that you had in mind?

The President. Not in the sense of weapons systems or reducing manpower. There are -- let me be honest and say this whole thing is definitely not all postponement. We have been working and, as a matter of fact, had made $16 billion cut in the defense budget ourselves before we even, then, took this further step. But much of that was based on the things that we, ourselves, have been discovering, as we have in every other area of government, of government practices that could be changed. Some of that spending cut reflects the findings of the Grace commission that we're now implementing.

All of this thing that you all have had such a field day with, with regard to wrenches costing thousands of dollars and bolts costing $4\1/2\ when they should cost 4 cents and so forth -- no one has published those are our figures. We found that that was going on, and we are the ones who have changed that. And already the savings are at hundreds of millions of dollars of rebates that have come back to us, to say nothing of the future savings now of correcting that practice.

The President. Well, it had to be quite a shock, when you first came up with a finding of some little gizmo that you could buy in a store off the shelf for about a tenth or less of what we were paying for it.

Mr. Weisman. May I ask you about the East-West tensions, which you raised or mentioned a moment ago? Are there no further steps that the United States can take unilaterally, now, to reduce tensions with the Soviet Union or to persuade them to return to the negotiating table? For instance, submitting the threshold test ban treaty for ratification, which, I think, is on their list.

And on things like -- we'll soon be talking about a chemical warfare treaty -- and with regard to their position, I think the tensions are, frankly, more evident in rhetoric than they are in actuality. I think that there is less tension today and less threat and danger with the rebuilding that we have done that makes us more secure than there was earlier when our defenses were so lax that there was a window of vulnerability.

No, we -- and they have agreed now to come back into negotiations on one of the three treaties that they walked out on, the conventional weapons treaty, the multiple balanced force [mutual and balanced force reductions] MBFR treaty. We're hopeful that they will come back in the others.

We've made it plain that we're flexible, that while we have made a proposal, we have evidenced our willingness to negotiate in what may be differing views of theirs. An example of that in the intermediate-range weapons in Europe: My first proposal was -- and I think it was a commonsense proposal -- and that was zero on both sides, eliminate them all, and that type of weapon. Well, the Soviets would not hear of that.

We said all right, then, granted that would be our goal -- and we think it's a good goal -- but we're willing, then, to talk whatever reduction in numbers that we can make that will be verifiable, that will be fair and even for both sides. And that still remains on the table.

Mr. Weisman. But the administration seems to have taken the position now that no new revisions or new revised proposals will be offered until they come to the negotiating table, and then you might have something. Is that a correct description?

The President.  --  -- waiting to see what we'll finally come up with. That would be very poor negotiating strategy. We have said to them, we're flexible. We're willing to negotiate fair and verifiable agreements when they're ready to come back to the table.

The President. Oh, I don't think someone could rule that out. I'm not going to make the charge, but I'm not going to also guess at what might be their -- part of their problems might simply be with the change now in leadership, that they're in a period of putting their shop together.

States Government might have misjudged the stability of Lebanon and the Lebanese Government and the effectiveness of its army and the willingness of Syria to cooperate with some of our stratagems. Are you satisfied with the basic information you've gotten on what -- that was the underpinning for your strategy there? Were you misinformed in the first place or what?

The President. No, we knew that what we were attempting to help with was a very complex and complicated problem. And what we and our allies joined together to do was based on the necessity for a withdrawal of the foreign forces that were in there.

Remember that when this all started, Israel, because of the violations of its own northern border by the Palestinians, the PLO, had gone all the way to Beirut. War was being fought in the city streets there with the PLO. Casualties among civilians were probably exceeding those of the military. The Syrians, they were also on Lebanese soil. And we went in to help bring about the removal of the PLO, who felt that any effort to surrender could result in a massacre, and they were -- some ten to fifteen thousand were removed from the country. Syria had indicated that it, too, would leave, the Israelis would leave, and then Syria changed its mind. That was unanticipated.

But even so, the purpose of the troops of Italy, the United Kingdom, France, and ourselves were there to more or less help maintain order while a government, a viable government of Lebanon was created and then to help train -- which we did -- their army to then go out and occupy the areas occupied by foreign forces -- Syria and Israel -- as they withdrew, because, also, in those areas were the militias, the unofficial armies that had been fighting each other and fighting the government, such as it was, in Lebanon.

Now, for quite some time, progress was made. And I still have to say right now the progress, the meetings that have taken place in Switzerland would not have taken place had all of us not done what we did. It is true that when Syria balked and began supporting some of the rebel elements -- but our whole idea was that for Libya -- or for Lebanon to have a government, they were going to have to make peace with those militias and find some kind of a broad-based government. And they've set out and they've tried to do that. It didn't succeed.

But the very fact that all of us began to be subject to terrorist attacks and change the basing of our troops -- us putting them on ships offshore and so forth -- actually was evidence of the fact that we were succeeding. And those who didn't want success knew that one of the steps in having their way was to force the withdrawal of our own forces.

The President. I don't know how you answer this thing that is becoming worldwide now, the terrorist method of suicide attacks and so forth. I'd like to say that there is no cause that's worth the life of any man, but we know that isn't true.

We did not succeed in what we thought could have gone forward. There has not been -- they are still working at it there, the Lebanese Government. One thing, also: We did a good job of training their military and equipping it. What we couldn't anticipate then was at the instigation of Syria, on ethnic and religious bases, some of the elements of that trained army then refused to perform against the radical forces that the army had been trained to handle.

But that doesn't change the need for us to continue in the Middle East overall with what must take place. And we hope if we can be helpful that we can bring about, and that is a meeting of the moderate Arab States and Israel and the bringing about of peace just as Egypt and Israel brought about peace.

Mr. Clines. If the circumstances were the same, but, hypothetically, we were back 4 years and you were running against President Carter, wouldn't you be hammering him for the death of the marines in Beirut?

The President. No, if I had all the knowledge that I presently have about the situation. There was one thing, whether it was campaigning or just making speeches in the past that I have always recognized, and that is that there are a number of areas in which only a President has the information, all the information, on a situation. And those who criticize are criticizing without having access to that same information.

The President. I am hoping I won't have to, but like the several previous Presidents before me, I think that that is a most unwise thing. It should never have been introduced in our Congress. The effort should never have been made, because if we are to have a negotiated peace that will end once and for all the literally -- well, the hostility between the Arab world and Israel, then that would be one of the things that must be negotiated. The place of Jerusalem, the West Bank, things of this kind -- these are all the matters that must be negotiated between these forces. And the United States has no right to put itself in a position of trying to lean one way or the other on those areas for negotiation.

President. I wonder if I could ask you to explain or justify how the United States can go about assisting people who are, as you have called them, freedom fighters who are seeking to overthrow a government that we have diplomatic relations with, and answer, if you could, critics who are worried that this is increasing our involvement in Central America.

The President. Well, the answer to that is, first of all, this particular government of Nicaragua's is a government that was set up by force of arms. The people have never chosen it. It's a revolutionary government. And that government, in violation of its pledge to us at a time when it was a revolutionary force trying to become a government, had promised that it would not aid the guerrillas in El Salvador, who are attempting to overthrow a duly elected government and a democratic government. And they have violated that. The guerrillas are literally being directed from bases near Managua. They're being supplied by that government. And the other factor with regard -- and why I have referred to them on occasion as freedom fighters is because many of them are elements of the same revolution that put the Sandinista government in force.

The revolution against the Somoza dictatorship -- and our government, under the previous administration, sat back and never lifted a finger in behalf of Somoza and then, when the fighting was over, did start to give financial aid to the revolutionary government to help it install itself -- and had to cancel that when it discovered what that government was doing. During the revolution against Somoza, the revolutionaries appealed to the Organization of American States -- of which we're a member also -- and appealed to that organization to ask Somoza to step down and end the bloodshed. And the Organization of American States asked for a statement of what were the goals of the revolution. And they were provided: democracy, a pluralistic government, free elections, free labor unions, freedom of the press, human rights observed -- those were the goals of the revolution, submitted in writing to the Organization of American States.

After they got in, they followed the pattern that was followed by Castro in Cuba. Those other elements that were not Sandinista, other groups who wanted -- and they thought all the same thing, democracy -- to rid themselves of a dictatorship. Those elements were denied participation in the government. Arrests were made. There were some who were exiled. There were some, I'm afraid, were executed. And many of the people now fighting as so-called contras are elements of the revolution. And it is less an overthrow that they're fighting for as it is a demand that they be allowed to participate in the government and that the government keep its promises as to what it had intended for the people.

Now, they've finally been pressured; the pressure's led to them saying they'll have an election. I think they've scheduled it for next November. But there isn't anything yet to indicate that that election will be anything but the kind of rubberstamp that we see in any totalitarian government.

The President. Oh, well, I have to see him pretty frequently. Every couple of weeks or so, I stop in to get my sneeze shots. I still have my little hay fever allergy, and I've discovered that Sacramento and Washington have something in common. They must be the allergy capitals of the world.

Ms. Devroy. I want to clear something up. The Times reported on your birthday that you haven't had a physical in 2 years. Is that the case? The last -- basically, the last one was April when you went out to the hospital by helicopter?

The President. Well, Dan doesn't happen to be a believer in those. After that length of time, he doesn't think they're that essential. Now, this year we will. He's told me that we'll do some testing when we clear the schedule here a little bit.

The President. No, because I felt so good. Part of my workout is I get on a treadmill and climb uphill on that treadmill -- they have a set climb -- and that's part of the workout. I do that every day. And I know how I feel.

Ms. Devroy. When you were campaigning in 1980, when some of your advisers thought that age might be an issue -- it didn't turn out to be -- you pledged to take regular physical and mental tests and release them to the public while you were in office.

The President. Occasionally, if I look out the windows, it's to see if the squirrels are still eating the acorns. I brought down a great big bag of acorns from Camp David, and I put them out there in the -- [inaudible].

Ms. Devroy. Well, when I spoke to him, he said that most of that information really isn't the public's business. It's between you and he as your doctor. And, as you know, we haven't seen a report like that. And I'm wondering, this being an election year and people perhaps wanting to be reassured, if you would make that public.

The President. Well, I'll venture to say that when the campaign gets underway, it will be the same as it's been all the way back to those years when I was traveling a mashed-potato circuit for the GE Theatre; and that is that I'll be still going when the rest are in a state of collapse.

Ms. Devroy. I'm not implying anything other than the fact that we haven't seen an actual report like that, and some of the Democratic candidates are starting to release reports from their physicians. Do you think your age will become an issue? It didn't in '80.

Institute that a government -- I know you're not going to like this -- that a government panel be set up to examine all candidates for the President to report to the public on their health. Would you accept that?

The President. [Laughing] Well, certainly I would accept it if that was what they wanted, and everyone felt that's what should be done. But I just wonder if we haven't gone so far anymore in the restrictions that are being placed on people in government, in the suspicions that motivate so many things that are being done, not only to elected officials but to appointees in government, that pretty soon we're going to find that the best people won't seek government as a way to -- service to their country.

But to get back to the health factor, at a time when an awful lot of people I know are worried because their belt size is changing, my worry is that I'm growing out of my coats because I've added an inch and a quarter around my chest.

The President. I take vitamins. Nancy's father was a surgeon, as you know, and got us in that habit a long time ago. And I don't know what effect it's had, but it must have done something right. And that was -- he said that he always -- he was not a great believer in a lot of vitamins or anything, but he said -- and he prescribed a certain multiple vitamin -- he said we're all of us so careless about our food. You know, lunch time is when you grab a sandwich or something, a cup of coffee and a roll, that sort of thing. And he said that he'd always believed that this one multivitamin every day would make up for any deficiencies in your diet.

Ms. Devroy. Well, I'll try -- how about -- everything I've read or know about you indicates that you are very optimistic. Do you ever go through periods when you're bothered by stress or -- of the job -- or depression about something that's happening?

The President. No. I think I do some reasonable worry about whether a decision that I have to make -- the hardest decisions are the ones when there's so much right on both sides. They're not clean-cut this way or that way.

But, no. And I think maybe this comes from the previous experience of having been a Governor of the largest State in the Union -- not in acreage, in population. I remember when I first started that job, yes, I discovered what stress was.

The President. And I just said to myself one day, ``Look, all I can do is make a decision based on what, to the best of my ability, is my belief in what is right for the people.'' I had already told the Cabinet and others, as I have here, that I don't want anyone suggesting things on the basis of the political context; that the decisions will be made on what's right or wrong for our people. And I haven't had that since.

Ms. Devroy. Well, what about anger? You have to have, in the past -- this morning, I got up and saw the Meese stuff all over TV. It was all over TV last night. That sort of thing has to affect you in terms of anger. You must have to cope with that. How do you cope with that?

But, yes, I think that's something that is very frustrating. Look, I'm the guy they're after with their demagoguery. Well, all right, then, come after me. But quit picking on people who haven't done anything wrong and who actually have made a sacrifice in order to serve in government -- and try to destroy human beings the way they are.

The Secretary and the Governor recommend that no such scenic highway be established and, further, that the Congress move immediately to repeal the public lands withdrawal from mining and mineral leasing imposed by section 1311. I concur in those recommendations.

I, Ronald Reagan, President of the United States of America, find that the unrestricted access of foreign parties to United States commercial goods, technology, and technical data and the existence of certain boycott practices of foreign nations constitute, in light of the expiration of the Export Administration Act of 1979, an unusual and extraordinary threat to the national security, foreign policy and economy of the United States and hereby declare a national economic emergency to deal with that threat.

Sec. 2. All rules and regulations issued or continued in effect by the Secretary of Commerce under the authority of the Export Administration Act of 1979, as amended, including those published in Title 15, Chapter III, Subchapter C, of the Code of Federal Regulations, Parts 368 to 399 inclusive, and all orders, regulations, licenses and other forms of administrative action issued, taken or continued in effect pursuant thereto, shall, until amended or revoked by the Secretary of Commerce, remain in full force and effect, the same as if issued or taken pursuant to this Order, except that the provisions of sections 203(b)(2) and 206 of the Act (50 U.S.C. 1702(b)(2) and 1705) shall control over any inconsistent provisions in the regulations with respect to, respectively, certain donations to relieve human suffering and civil and criminal penalties for violations subject to this Order. Nothing in this section shall affect the continued applicability of administrative sanctions provided for by the regulations described above.

U.S.C. 2778(e)) may be made and shall continue in full force and effect until amended or revoked under the authority of section 203 of the Act (50 U.S.C. 1702). To the extent permitted by law, this Order also shall constitute authority for the issuance and continuation in full force and effect of all rules and regulations by the President or his delegate, and all orders, licenses, and other forms of administrative action issued, taken or continued in effect pursuant thereto, relating to the administration of section 38(e).

Sec. 4. This Order shall be effective as of midnight between March 30 and March 31, 1984, and shall remain in effect until terminated. It is my intention to terminate this Order upon the enactment into law of a bill reauthorizing the authorities contained in the Export Administration Act.

There is enclosed a draft of a Joint Resolution to approve the ``Compact of Free Association,'' the negotiated instrument setting forth the future political relationship between the United States and two political jurisdictions of the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands.

Marshall Islands would fulfill our commitment under that agreement to bring about self-government. Upon termination of the Trusteeship Agreement, another political jurisdiction of the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, the Northern Mariana Islands, will become a commonwealth of the United States.

U.S. foreign policy interests in Lebanon have not changed, and remain as stated in my last report to Congress on February 13. The U.S. is committed to the goals of the restoration of a sovereign, independent and united Lebanon, the withdrawal of all foreign forces, and the security of Israel's northern border. However, the continuation of our participation in the MNF is no longer a necessary or appropriate means of achieving these goals. We have discussed our decision with the Government of Lebanon and the other MNF participants, and the other MNF countries have made similar decisions.

As you know, prior to their earlier redeployment to ships offshore, U.S. MNF personnel had come under intermittent hostile fire as a result of continued fighting in the Beirut area, including the round of serious fighting that occurred in late February. On February 25 - 26, and again on February 29, U.S. warships returned fire against artillery and rocket positions in Syrian-controlled territory that had fired on U.S. military and diplomatic locations and on U.S. reconnaissance flights.

These were heavy burdens and grievous losses for our country. We owe a great debt of gratitude to those military and diplomatic personnel of the United States and other MNF countries who served their countries so proudly to give the people of Lebanon a chance to achieve peace and national reconciliation.

The United States has not abandoned Lebanon. The U.S. Embassy in Beirut remains in full and active operation and a Marine detachment of approximately 100 personnel drawn from the Marine unit afloat remains to provide additional external security for our diplomatic mission. In addition, a limited number of U.S. military personnel (equipped with personal weapons for self-defense) will remain to provide military training and security assistance liaison to the Lebanese Armed Forces. These personnel will not be part of any multinational force; they will be deployed under the authority of the Foreign Assistance and Arms Export Control Acts, and my Constitutional authority with respect to the conduct of foreign relations and as Commander-in-Chief of U.S.

Forces. I do not intend or expect, under present circumstances, that these personnel will become involved in hostilities; nonetheless, U.S. naval and air forces in the Mediterranean area, including the U.S. Marines redeployed from Lebanon, are available to protect our military and diplomatic personnel should that need ever arise.

A few weeks ago, George Gallup, who regularly surveys the pulse of America, released a poll with very upbeat news. Gallup said the current mood of the American people is the brightest in 5 years. Our citizens still feel the burdens of everyday problems, but there's a feeling among us that we've finally turned the corner. Real progress is being made, and America is moving forward again.

Better days for America may be bad news for some, but even the most committed gloom mongers can't deny the truth forever. Our economy is strong, prices are stable, jobs are increasing, and our nation is at peace. We're building a true opportunity society, and this is especially true for today's women.

Well, no role is superior to another. What's important is that every woman have the right and opportunity to choose the role she wishes -- or, perhaps, try to fill them all. And whether the choice be homemaking, career, or both, our administration is trying to help in many different ways.

We've increased training opportunities through the Job Training Partnership Act so women can secure permanent, productive employment. For those whose former spouses are delinquent in child-support payments, we've strengthened the Federal child-support enforcement system, and we have additional proposals pending before the Congress.

For all women we've provided several forms of tax relief -- relief, by the way, which could and should have been passed long ago by those in Washington who had a monopoly on power and who still claim a monopoly on compassion.

We've reduced personal income tax rates by 25 percent. We've greatly reduced the marriage tax penalty. We've almost doubled the maximum child care tax credit for working mothers. We've expanded IRA accounts, benefiting women whether they work at home or in paid jobs, and we're moving to bring even greater equity to those accounts. And we've eliminated the widow's tax, the estate taxes levied on a surviving spouse. This will help women who've been hard-working partners on family farms and small businesses.

We're also working with the Congress on historic legislation that reforms inequities against women in private pension plans. This legislation has passed the Senate, and we're waiting for final action in the House. I hope it will come soon. The reforms would lower the age employees can participate in company pension plans, protect spouses from losing death benefits without their knowledge, permit a break in service of up to 5 years without loss of pension credit, coordinate State and Federal laws so divorced spouses can collect court-awarded pension benefits more easily, and require private pension plans to survivor's benefits -- offer survivor's benefits, I should say, protection to workers after they're 45.

I've always believed the greatest contribution we can make is to get our economy moving and keep it moving. Economic growth will provide more opportunities for women than if all the promises ever made in Washington, DC, were enacted into law.

Well, economic growth is very strong. And job opportunities for women are popping up like springtime tulips. Three million more women are working today in our economy than in January 1981. One exciting area of growth is that of women-owned businesses. The number of businesses owned by women is increasing four times faster than those owned by men.

Business Administration on conferences across the country to help women acquire skills to own businesses and compete effectively. They're also trying to identify problems business owners and potential business owners are meeting. Now, if you've had any, please write to me at the White House, and I'll share your thoughts with the Advisory Committee.

Through the efforts of 93 eyebanks across the Nation, these problems are being alleviated. The eyebanks help coordinate the nationwide distribution of donated eye tissue for use in medical education, continuing research efforts, and cornea transplants. Developing from a single institution in 1944, the eyebanks have greatly encouraged research into the prevention and treatment of eye disease and helped increase national awareness of the urgent need for more eye donations, so that others may receive the gift of sight.

I am pleased to transmit this report on my Administration's policy on arms control for antisatellite systems as required in the Conference Report for the Department of Defense Appropriations Act for Fiscal Year 1984.

The United States is committed to the exploration and use of space by all nations for peaceful purposes and for the benefit of mankind. Among the activities conducted by the United States in space is the pursuit of fundamental national security objectives. Arms control arrangements for space would serve these objectives if they contributed to our overall deterrence posture and reduce the risk of conflict.

Guided by these criteria, the United States has been studying a range of possible options for space arms control, with a view to possible negotiations with the Soviet Union and other nations, if such negotiations would serve U.S. interests. Within the U.S. Government, this work is being conducted by an Interdepartmental Group chaired by the Office of the Secretary of Defense and the Arms Control and Disarmament Agency. The United States is also prepared to examine space arms control issues in the Conference on Disarmament (CD). However, no arrangements or agreements beyond those already governing military activities in outer space have been found to date that are judged to be in the overall interest of the United States and its Allies. The factors that impede the identification of effective ASAT arms control measures include significant difficulties of verification, diverse sources of threats to U.S. and Allied satellites, and threats posed by Soviet targeting and reconnaissance satellites that undermine conventional and nuclear deterrence.

Notwithstanding these difficulties, the United States is continuing to study space arms control, in search of selected limits on specific types of space systems or activities in space that could satisfactorily deal with problems, such as those described above. Until we have determined whether there are, in fact, practical solutions to these problems, I do not believe it would be productive to engage in formal international negotiations. The United States remains ready, however, to examine the problems and potential of space arms control at the Conference on Disarmament in Geneva.

The attached Report on U.S. Policy on Antisatellite Arms Control sets forth in greater detail the views of my Administration on this important issue. It is unclassified and is suitable for general release. As you are aware, information regarding certain U.S. and Soviet space activities involves sensitive information. Accordingly, I am also transmitting a classified Report providing such information under separate cover. In preparing both Reports, every effort was made to respond to the questions asked by various Committees and Members of Congress.

I have today concluded a review of a number of elements of the U.S.-Japan trade relationship, including Japanese restraints on the export of its automobiles and other market access issues. I have concluded this review believing in the wisdom of maintaining the principle of free and fair trade for the benefit of the world's consumers, and I will continue to actively support further liberalization of the global trading system.

In this context, it is my decision not to urge the Japanese to extend their voluntary export restraints on automobiles to the United States. I take this position in the spirit of the common understanding reached between me and Prime Minister Nakasone during our January 2 meetings in Los Angeles. As a separate matter, I would like to commend the improved performance of our own automobile manufacturers. In taking this action, I hope that we can look forward to reciprocal treatment by Japan concerning the high-level discussions underway between our countries in the weeks and months ahead.

The past four years have seen great changes not only in the substance of economic policy but, more importantly, in its direction. You have been an important and valued adviser throughout this period when we have been turning once more to the creative energies of individuals in the marketplace to provide our Nation with stable, long-term growth.

As a distinguished professional economist who advised me even before I became President and as a longtime defender of the principles of a free society, you have done an outstanding job of helping me to craft sound economic policies. I believe that the change in direction we have instituted during the past four years will continue even beyond this Administration, and I want to thank you personally for the excellent job you have done as one of my principal advisers.

I have been honored to serve you as an economic adviser over the years since you first recruited me as a member of the group to draft Proposition 1. Your consistent support of the principles of a free society has changed the debate about the economic role of the government. Stay the course.

There's so much I want to talk about tonight. I've been thinking, in the weeks since the inauguration, that we are at an especially dramatic turning point in American history. And just putting it all together in my mind, I've been reviewing the elements that have led to this moment.

Ever since F.D.R. and the New Deal, the opposition party, and particularly those of a liberal persuasion, have dominated the political debate. Their ideas were new; they had momentum; they captured the imagination of the American people. The left held sway for a good long time. There was a right, but it was, by the forties and fifties, diffuse and scattered, without a unifying voice.

But in 1964 came a voice in the wilderness -- Barry Goldwater; the great Barry Goldwater, the first major party candidate of our time who was a true-blue, undiluted conservative. He spoke from principle, and he offered vision. Freedom -- he spoke of freedom: freedom from the Government's increasing demands on the family purse, freedom from the Government's increasing usurpation of individual rights and responsibilities, freedom from the leaders who told us the price of world peace is continued acquiescence to totalitarianism. He was ahead of his time. When he ran for President, he won 6 States and lost 44. But his candidacy worked as a precursor of things to come.

This great turn from left to right was not just a case of the pendulum swinging -- first, the left hold sway and then the right, and here comes the left again. The truth is, conservative thought is no longer over here on the right; it's the mainstream now.

And the tide of history is moving irresistibly in our direction. Why? Because the other side is virtually bankrupt of ideas. It has nothing more to say, nothing to add to the debate. It has spent its intellectual capital, such as it was -- [laughter] -- and it has done its deeds.

They did win support. And the result was chaos, weakness, and drift. Ultimately, though, their failures yielded one great thing -- us guys. [Laughter] We in this room are not simply profiting from their bankruptcy; we are where we are because we're winning the contest of ideas. In fact, in the past decade, all of a sudden, quietly, mysteriously, the Republican Party has become the party of ideas.

All of a sudden, Republicans were not defenders of the status quo but creators of the future. They were looking at tomorrow with all the single-mindedness of an inventor. In fact, they reminded me of the American inventors of the 19th and 20th centuries who filled the world with light and recorded sound.

The new conservatives made anew the connection between economic justice and economic growth. Growth in the economy would not only create jobs and paychecks, they said; it would enhance familial stability and encourage a healthy optimism about the future. Lower those tax rates, they said, and let the economy become the engine of our dreams. Pull back regulations, and encourage free and open competition. Let the men and women of the marketplace decide what they want.

But along with that, perhaps the greatest triumph of modern conservatism has been to stop allowing the left to put the average American on the moral defensive. By average American I mean the good, decent, rambunctious, and creative people who raise the families, go to church, and help out when the local library holds a fundraiser; people who have a stake in the community because they are the community.

These people had held true to certain beliefs and principles that for 20 years the intelligentsia were telling us were hopelessly out of date, utterly trite, and reactionary. You want prayer in the schools? How primitive, they said. You oppose abortion? How oppressive, how antimodern. The normal was portrayed as eccentric, and only the abnormal was worthy of emulation. The irreverent was celebrated, but only irreverence about certain things: irreverence toward, say, organized religion, yes; irreverence toward establishment liberalism, not too much of that. They celebrated their courage in taking on safe targets and patted each other on the back for slinging stones at a confused Goliath, who was too demoralized and really too good to fight back.

But now one simply senses it. The American people are no longer on the defensive. I believe the conservative movement deserves some credit for this. You spoke for the permanent against the merely prevalent, and ultimately you prevailed.

I believe we conservatives have captured the moment, captured the imagination of the American people. And what now? What are we to do with our success? Well, right now, with conservative thought accepted as mainstream thought and with the people of our country leading the fight to freedom, now we must move.

I spoke in the State of the Union of a second American revolution, and now is the time to launch that revolution and see that it takes hold. If we move decisively, these years will not be just a passing era of good feeling, not just a few good years, but a true golden age of freedom.

The moment is ours, and we must seize it. There's work to do. We must prolong and protect our growing prosperity so that it doesn't become just a passing phase, a natural adjustment between periods of recession. We must move further to provide incentive and make America the investment capital of the world.

We must institute a fair tax system and turn the current one on its ear. I believe there is natural support in our country for a simplified tax system, with still lower tax rates but a broader base, with everyone paying their fair share and no more. We must eliminate unproductive tax shelters.

We must institute enterprise zones and a lower youth minimum wage so we can revitalize distressed areas and teenagers can get jobs. We're going to take our revolution to the people, all of the people. We're going to go to black Americans and members of all minority groups, and we're going to make our case.

Part of being a revolutionary is knowing that you don't have to acquiesce to the tired, old ideas of the past. One such idea is that the opposition party has black America and minority America locked up, that they own black America. Well, let me tell you, they own nothing but the past. The old alignments are no longer legitimate, if they ever were.

Now, whether government borrows or increases taxes, it will be taking the same amount of money from the private economy, and either way, that's too much. We must bring down government spending. We need a constitutional amendment requiring a balanced budget. It's something that 49 States already require -- no reason the Federal Government should be any different.

But the domestic side isn't the only area where we need your help. All of us in this room grew up, or came to adulthood, in a time when the doctrine of Marx and Lenin was coming to divide the world. Ultimately, it came to dominate remorselessly whole parts of it. The Soviet attempt to give legitimacy to its tyranny is expressed in the infamous Brezhnev doctrine, which contends that once a country has fallen into Communist darkness, it can never again be allowed to see the light of freedom.

Grenada. We only did our duty, as a responsible neighbor and a lover of peace, the day we went in and returned the government to the people and rescued our own students. We restored that island to liberty. Yes, it's only a small island, but that's what the world is made of -- small islands yearning for freedom.

They are our brothers, these freedom fighters, and we owe them our help. I've spoken recently of the freedom fighters of Nicaragua. You know the truth about them. You know who they're fighting and why. They are the moral equal of our Founding Fathers and the brave men and women of the French Resistance. We cannot turn away from them, for the struggle here is not right versus left; it is right versus wrong.

Now, I am against sending troops to Central America. They are simply not needed. Given a chance and the resources, the people of the area can fight their own fight. They have the men and women. They're capable of doing it. They have the people of their country behind them. All they need is our support. All they need is proof that we care as much about the fight for freedom 700 miles from our shores as the Soviets care about the fight against freedom 5,000 miles from theirs.

All of you know that we're researching nonnuclear technologies that may enable us to prevent nuclear ballistic missiles from reaching U.S. soil or that of our allies. I happen to believe -- logic forces me to believe -- that this new defense system, the Strategic Defense Initiative, is the most hopeful possibility of our time. Its primary virtue is clear. If anyone ever attacked us, Strategic Defense would be there to protect us. It could conceivably save millions of lives.

SDI has been criticized on the grounds that it might upset any chance of an arms control agreement with the Soviets. But SDI is arms control. If SDI is, say, 80 percent effective, then it will make any Soviet attack folly. Even partial success in SDI would strengthen deterrence and keep the peace. And if our SDI research is successful, the prospects for real reduction in U.S. and Soviet offensive nuclear forces will be greatly enhanced.

It is said that SDI would deal a blow to the so-called East-West balance of power. Well, let's think about that. The Soviets already are investing roughly as much on strategic defenses as they are on their offensive nuclear forces. This could quickly tip the East-West balance if we had no defense of our own. Would a situation of comparable defenses threaten us? No, for we're not planning on being the first to use force.

As we strive for our goal of eventual elimination of nuclear weapons, each side would retain a certain amount of defensive -- or of, I should say, destructive power -- a certain number of missiles. But it would not be in our interest, or theirs, to build more and more of them.

Now, one would think our critics on the left would quickly embrace, or at least be openminded about a system that promises to reduce the size of nuclear missile forces on both sides and to greatly enhance the prospects for real arms reductions. And yet we hear SDI belittled by some with nicknames, or demagogued with charges that it will bring war to the heavens.

They complain that it won't work, which is odd from people who profess to believe in the perfectability of man -- machines after all. [Laughter] And man -- machines are so much easier to manipulate. They say it won't be 100 percent effective, which is odd, since they don't ask for 100 percent effectiveness in their social experiments. [Laughter] They say SDI is only in the research stage and won't be realized in time to change things. To which, as I said last month, the only reply is: Then let's get started.

Now, my point here is not to question the motives of others. But it's difficult to understand how critics can object to exploring the possibility of moving away from exclusive reliance upon nuclear weapons. The truth is, I believe that they find it difficult to embrace any idea that breaks with the past, that breaks with consensus thinking and the common establishment wisdom. In short, they find it difficult and frightening to alter the status quo.

And what are we to do when these so-called opinion leaders of an outworn philosophy are out there on television and in the newspapers with their steady drumbeat of doubt and distaste? Well, when all you have to do to win is rely on the good judgment of the American people, then you're in good shape, because the American people have good judgment. I know it isn't becoming of me, but I like to think that maybe 49 of our 50 States displayed that judgment just a few months ago.

What we have to do, all of us in this room, is get out there and talk about SDI. Explain it, debate it, tell the American people the facts. It may well be the most important work we do in the next few years. And if we try, we'll succeed. So, we have great work ahead of us, big work. But if we do it together and with complete commitment, we can change our country and history forever.

Once during the campaign, I said, ``This is a wonderful time to be alive.'' And I meant that. I meant that we're lucky not to live in pale and timid times. We've been blessed with the opportunity to stand for something -- for liberty and freedom and fairness. And these are things worth fighting for, worth devoting our lives to. And we have good reason to be hopeful and optimistic.

Perhaps you've noticed, as I have, an interesting change in the country in recent weeks. All last year, right through the election and into January, we witnessed a nonstop barrage in speeches, commentaries, and editorials about the dangers of deficits and what must be done to reduce them.

I was actually becoming hopeful that new courage was taking root, hopeful that a new consensus to cut Federal spending growth was even emerging among those who've labored a lifetime to expand government size and power.

What caused this sudden change of heart? We submitted our budget to Congress, a budget designed to do just what we pledged during the election: tackle the deficits by cutting spending where it's wasteful, where it is not urgent, and where it subsidizes some people at everyone else's expense.

Many of its proposals follow the spirit of recommendations by the Grace commission, some 2,000 citizens who compiled a report on how to cut spending growth without harming the needy or impairing any essential purpose of government. For example, the Small Business Administration has made subsidized loans to only a fraction of the small business community, while the remainder relied on commercial rate financing. Yet, at a time when small business is thriving, many of these subsidized loans are in or near default. We propose ending such subsidies for the benefit of taxpayers at large.

Subsidizing Amtrak costs taxpayers $35 per passenger every time a train leaves a station. But that's not the only unwise transportation subsidy. Why, for instance, should the Federal Government be forcing taxpayers in, say, Colorado to subsidize subway fares in New York? Why should any taxpayer subsidize the operating costs of the Washington, DC, transit system, an area with the second highest per capita income in America?

Consider the political spectacle of recent days. The House Budget Committee, with its members insisting the deficit must be reduced, travels the country inviting special interest groups to resist every proposal for budget savings. The president of the U.S. Conference of Mayors accuses us of abandoning the Federal Government's commitment to urban America, when the growing noninflationary economy has been creating almost 300,000 jobs a month and record revenues for State and local governments.

Leaders of four higher education associations shiver outside the Department of Education to symbolize, as they put it, that higher education is being frozen out of the budget. Their word ``frozen'' is meant to describe a proposal that would spend more than $7 billion more than in 1982 and '83 and nearly three times what it was just 10 years ago.

Farm State Senators push multibillion-dollar bailouts for banks and farmers, and one Member even rebukes proposed cutbacks in spending on opera and music in our budget for the National Endowment for the Arts.

This past week the Nation's Governors were in Washington. To their credit, they urged Congress to pass the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment. But they adopted a resolution that would disallow cost-of-living increases for Social Security recipients and rule out any real increases in defense, yet, as California's Governor Deukmejian pointed out, still leave a higher deficit while paving the way for tax increases.

I won't deny all the groups I mentioned represent valid interests, which may seem compelling. But there is a larger interest to represent, more compelling and urgent than all the rest -- the freedom and security of American taxpayers who must not only work, save, and invest to pull our economy forward but also pay all the bills for everything this government does.

Well, as long as I'm President, we're not going back to the days when America was fast becoming an impotent democracy, too weak to meet defense commitments or to resist Communist takeovers and, yes, too weak to stop a Federal spending machine from impoverishing families and destroying our economy with runaway taxes and inflation.

We're asking Congress to have the political courage to cut $50 billion by Easter. If there isn't enough courage to approve these cuts, then at least give me the authority to veto line-items in the Federal budget. I'll take the political responsibility. I'll make the cuts, and I'll take the heat.

Without the Peacekeeper our chances of reaching an equitable agreement with the Soviet Union to reduce significantly the size of our nuclear arsenals are substantially lowered. Indeed, should Congress delay or eliminate the Peacekeeper program, it would send an unmistakable signal to the Soviet Union that we do not possess the resolve required, nor the continuity of purpose, to maintain a viable strategic triad and the policy of deterrence the triad represents.

I urge each member of Congress to approve the Peacekeeper and join me in a bipartisan and united effort in Geneva. With your support, and the support of the American people, our efforts at the negotiation table could lead to the more stable world we all seek, and lead to that day when mankind is free of the terrible threat of nuclear weapons.

The report also details the buildup in new Soviet strategic weapons, including two new ICBM's, three new bombers, and additions to its submarine missile force. The pace of the Soviet strategic force improvements has given no indication of slackening over the past year.

United States is unable or unwilling to take the steps necessary to offset their growing strategic power, giving the Soviet leadership confidence it can use its political and military leverage to exert influence against other nations in the world. Furthermore, a growing risk of direct confrontation with the Soviet Union could cause regional powers to become more inclined to accept a greater level of Soviet interference in their affairs. And most dangerously, this perception, the President believes, could over time suggest to the Soviet leadership that the threat or actual use of military force, including nuclear weapons, against the United States or its allies could result in significant military advantages for them.

The report describes all facets of the President's strategic modernization program: the deployment of B - 52 bombers with the air-launched cruise missile, continued production of the B - 1B strategic bomber, operational deployment of new Trident submarines, initial deployment of the sea-launched cruise missile, new communication systems, preliminary research and development efforts for the new small ICBM, and the successful flight test for the MX/Peacekeeper ICBM.

This final and cornerstone system of the President's strategic program is described as being on cost, on schedule, and as meeting or exceeding every performance goal set for it. The Peacekeeper's superior performance has been verified by seven consecutive successful flight tests of the missile, during which it met or exceeded performance goals. The report points out, however, that a strong modern triad and maintaining deterrence requires more than Peacekeeper flight testing; continued production and deployment of this missile is essential.

The President makes clear the vital role of the Peacekeeper in the forthcoming arms reduction negotiations in Geneva with the Soviet Union. He believes continued procurement and deployment of Peacekeeper is necessary to show U.S. national resolve to modernize the strategic forces, which underpin our national policy of deterrence. The President points out that if we fail, on the eve of these new negotiations in Geneva, to proceed with Peacekeeper production and deployment, the impact of our lack of resolve may not be limited to failure of the strategic negotiations, but may affect the broader East-West relationship as well.

In this respect, the President believes a cancellation or slowdown of Peacekeeper deployment in existing Minuteman silos would give the unmistakable appearance of a lack of national resolve on the part of the United States. There would be little reason for the Soviets to engage in meaningful arms reduction initiatives without Peacekeeper because they will have achieved their desired goal with no concessions on their part whatsoever.

United States, necessary for meaningful arms reductions negotiations, and vital to our continued deterrent posture. He urges the Congress to continue funding the Peacekeeper missile system, the cornerstone of the strategic modernization program.

Well, thank you very much. I'm delighted to have another chance to talk to NACo. Before I say anything else, I want to thank you for the solid support that you've given us during these past 4 years. It's been a pleasure working with Phil Elfstrom and with all of you, and congratulations on 50 years of service to America's 3,106 counties, and a special welcome to the 7 past presidents of your outstanding association who are with us here today.

Washington and in counties all across America. Just before I came over here, I had the chance to look at your association's statement on our budget proposal. As you know, last week we met with our nation's Governors and with State legislative leaders, and I couldn't help thinking that if the definition of a good budget proposal is to distribute dissatisfaction evenly, ours is a real winner.

And, you know, because of wrongheaded thinking like that, when we met during your 1981 legislative conference, there wasn't much good news to report. Our national economy was near the breaking point, and so were our local communities. We'd paid a steep price for years of good intentions badly misdirected. Families were desperate in the face of double-digit inflation, 21\1/2\-percent interest rates -- the prime rate -- and high taxes, all of which sent the economic growth into a tailspin. And local governments didn't escape the punishment.

High inflation and low growth hit your counties with a double whammy, increasing your costs and squeezing your tax base. Your cost-revenue gap widened. Labor costs increased, and services had to be cut. Dramatic increases in bond rates knocked many of you out of the bond market, and there was no choice but to delay infrastructure projects.

As you know too well, Federal programs provided no magic solution. In fact, years of compulsive spending had taken a heavy toll. It was almost as if some economic medicine man had the idea that since money could buy anything, and Federal programs could provide everything, then more money and more programs were the answer to all our problems. But the dramatic increase of Federal participation in local government only complicated your problems.

No wonder communities had lost control of some of the most basic decisions affecting everyday life. As the Federal Government grew more intrusive, you became less able to respond to community needs. And to top it off, Federal oversight -- a fancy term that usually means burdensome regulations and unnecessary paperwork -- did little more than put you in handcuffs.

We knew that America could not move forward until local communities were back on their feet again. And that's why, back in March of 1981, we asked for your support to embark on a new course. It's been 4 years, and we've begun well, but it's only a beginning. I believe that in lifting your communities toward a new era of lasting prosperity and stability there are four keys to success.

First, we must continue working to return power to levels of government closer to the people. We believe that when it comes to running county government, county officials will always do better from the county seat than bureaucrats could ever do from Washington.

From the first days of our administration, I heard over and over from local officials that you wanted regulatory relief and reform. We agreed and have been reducing cumbersome and unnecessary Federal oversight regulations. The cut in wasteful overhead has been dramatic: 647 pages of regulations have been eliminated, and the paperwork burden at State and local levels has been cut by 90 percent. We estimate that local governments have been spared at least $2 billion in annual costs and between $4 billion and $6 billion in startup costs. And we're still looking for ways to save you more.

Now, the second key to success is a revitalized public-private partnership, pooling our resources to harness the power and creativity of the marketplace for the benefit of all Americans. No single sector of our nation -- government, business, labor, or nonprofit organizations -- can solve our problems alone. But by working together, pooling our resources, and building our strengths, we can accomplish great things.

And there are more genuine partnerships that can be ours, if only the Congress would give our enterprise zones and our youth employment opportunity wage bill a full hearing. We want hope and opportunity to reach every nook and cranny of our great land, and these initiatives deserve your support.

The third key to our nation's prosperity is strengthening traditional values for a modern age, promoting a renewal of community life, and reviving the social fabric of our society -- safety on the streets, excellence in education, voluntarism, and a sense of responsibility.

People coming together in a spirit of community and neighborhood is what makes the smallest rural hamlet or the largest urban center worth living in. It's what keeps businesses in your counties and attracts new ones, and it's what keeps faith with the fine traditions of the past, as we turn to build the future.

Well, common sense is beginning to pay off. For the first time in 20 years, the crime index has fallen for 2 years in a row. We've convicted 7,400 drug offenders and put them, as well as leaders of organized crime, behind bars in record numbers. And as you've read and seen recently, we are stepping up the pressure, and we're not going to stop until we wipe out organized crime in America.

In the area of education, we're seeing a strong, new commitment to excellence, stressing the basics of discipline, learning, rigorous testing, and homework. And that commitment, too, is also paying off. For 20 years scholastic aptitude test scores of our high school students went down.

Orange County, California, is the American spirit at its best. And we see it everywhere we look, from the record rise in corporate and private giving to thousands of exciting and important private sector initiatives, from neighborhood watch programs to increased attendance in places of worship, and from love of country rediscovered by our young people who've led the way to the millions of Americans who, in their quiet, caring way, are pulling together to move us forward and upward.

The fourth and most important key to success is strong and steady economic growth. A vibrant economy is our single most powerful tool for revitalizing every county in America. In fact, I believe that our economic expansion is the most important county improvement program, urban renewal program, and rural recovery program in America today.

The final economic figures for 1984 are in, and they're even better than anticipated. The U.S. economy grew at a rate of almost 5 percent in the fourth quarter, and final sales increased at a rate of 8\1/2\ percent. Overall economic growth for the calendar year measured just a shade under 7 percent. Inflation was under 4 percent for the second year in a row, and that's the lowest in 17 years. And when you add it up, 1984 gave America its strongest economic performance since 1951.

We intend to prolong and protect this wonderful expansion with a sweeping program of tax reform and with a Federal budget that reflects the reality that our economic recovery is a triumph of free people and their institutions, not government.

Tax reform and simplification will be a giant step toward lasting prosperity. I believe our tax system currently acts as the single, biggest threat to stronger enterprise and lasting economic expansion. Many of our citizens are required to pay more than their fair share of the tax bill, while others are permitted to pay far less. Today's tax code drives money needed for investment and future growth and unproductive tax shelters -- or into unproductive tax shelters. And hundreds of millions of dollars are wasted in needless paperwork. Plain and simple, the tax code is unfair, inequitable, counterproductive, and all but incomprehensible.

And there's something else to keep in mind, something I told our nation's Governors just last week. During the debate of our 1981 tax bill, we pointed out that the most important effects of substantially reducing tax rates just might be the intangibles: the feeling of a positive political and economic climate for enterprise and growth and the message that government wants the people and business to succeed.

Well, it's time to send out another message -- one of determined commitment to lasting growth and a secure future -- by making the system more fair and easier to understand, so we can bring personal and corporate income tax rates further down.

If there's to be a secure economic future for our children, we must make sure that those days never return. The public treasury is a trust, not a gift shop. And we must move toward a budget that spends no more than government takes in. Either we move in that direction or we will never be able to pass on a legacy of economic security.

The fiscal 1986 budget stops the built-in momentum of spending increases dead in its tracks. Our proposal will freeze overall Federal program spending at the fiscal 1985 level, cut $51 billion out of programs in need of restraint, and reduce spending growth by half a trillion dollars over the next 5 years.

Less than 3 months ago I met with Earl Baker, the chairman of your tax and finance committee, to discuss the unique problems facing local government. And over the past few weeks, many of you've taken the time to write to me about our plans for general revenue sharing. I appreciate your comments, and I was aware that nearly $2 billion of the $4.6 billion in annual funds went directly to your counties. Indeed, I've been one of the strongest boosters for general revenue sharing, as you've been quick to point out. General revenue sharing has served us well.

But the fundamental question remains: How can we afford revenue sharing when we have no revenues to share? How can the Federal Government justify, strapped as it is with a deficit, borrowing money to be spent by State, county, and local governments, some of which are running surpluses?

I sympathize with your position on this issue, but the Federal spending dollar is not magic, and it certainly isn't free. It comes straight out of your pockets, and I just have to believe that over the long haul you'll be a lot better off with the Federal Government's hands out of your pockets.

Every time a passenger boards an Amtrak train, the American taxpayer pays about $35. But on the New York to Chicago train, it's much higher. In fact, on that run it would cost the taxpayer less for the Government to pass out free plane tickets.

And then there's the air carrier subsidy, started in 1978 for communities thought to be hurt by airline deregulation. At one time the General Accounting Office found that the subsidy for one round trip airline ticket from Blythe, California, to Los Angeles cost $1,096. For that money the air traveler could have flown to Hawaii, stayed a week on the beach, and returned with money left over. And with due apologies to Los Angeles, I'll bet he or she would have had a better time.

Nearly 50 years of government living beyond its means has brought us to this time, to this budget, to this day of reckoning. It's up to us to have the courage to make sure that the American taxpayer is protected from the Government.

And, as usual, it's the people outside of Washington who are providing leadership. 32 States and, as of last week, the National Governors' Association as well, have called for an amendment long overdue, an amendment mandating the Federal Government spend no more than it takes in.

It seems incredible that the chief executives of 43 States and many of your own county executives have line-item veto authority, but the President of the United States does not. I've told the Congress that this is a time for political courage. We're asking for $50 billion in spending cuts by Easter. If that courage is lacking, then let them at least give me the line-item veto. I'll take the responsibility, I'll make the cuts, and I'll take the heat.

American negotiators will leave for Geneva for the most important set of arms discussions this nation will likely conduct in this decade. As talks begin, each House of Congress will cast a vote that will directly, perhaps dramatically, affect the outcome at Geneva. Now, that vote is on release of the funds for the Peacekeeper missile, or MX -- a vital component of a long-overdue modernization of America's deterrent, the deterrent that has kept the West free, independent, and secure for nearly 40 years.

Just as a strong bipartisan congressional vote to move ahead with Peacekeeper would send a signal that America comes to Geneva united and resolute, so a negative vote in either House would undercut our negotiators and send a message to Moscow that America is an irresolute and divided nation, whose divisions can be exploited at Geneva. That must not happen. When it comes to standing up for a national defense that is second to none, there should be no Democrats, no Republicans, only Americans.

You and I know that reaching a new era of lasting prosperity and stability will take much effort and patience and great cooperation between us. I just hope that I can count on NACo to continue to work with us in a spirit of good will in the months ahead. I've sought and appreciated your advice and will continue to do so.

And let me just say one more thing. I have felt for a long time, and felt especially as a Governor in one of our States, that many of the problems that had come to local government had to do with that shift from two-thirds of the tax dollar going to local and State government, instead of almost two-thirds going to the Federal Government. And I believe that one of the things in this partnership I've mentioned that I can do -- or we can do for you is continue to bring down the Federal Government's share of the tax burden, instead of preempting and confiscating so much of the tax source that when you're faced with a problem, there's no place left for you to turn, except to ask for money from the Federal Government. I think it would be a lot better if we get back to only taxing what should be our fair share and leaving you tax sources out there that you can use for problems which you see at your own level and have decided to do something about.

America's economy has been revitalized by the highest level of consumer confidence in nearly twenty years. Our free enterprise system and the high productivity of American workers have made such economic growth possible, providing the American consumer with an unprecedented choice of goods and services.

As the range of consumer choice increases, competition compels our businesses to provide even greater value for consumer dollars. Increasingly, business leaders respond to consumer expectations by improving the quality, safety, and effectiveness of their products. Competition also generates reliable servicing.

This year's slogan for National Consumers Week, ``Consumers Should Know,'' highlights the right of consumers to information about the products offered them. Knowledgeable, selective consumers make their dollars count. In that way, families not only enjoy better products but are able to put more money aside for future needs. Those savings translate into business investments, and that means growth for our Nation's economy.

Buyers and sellers alike should recognize the basic rights of consumers: the right to choice among products and services; the right to information enabling them to make sound purchases; the right to healthful and safe products; the right to be heard when products do not meet standards.

Government at all levels will continue its responsible stewardship of consumer safety as well as its vigorous prosecution of illegal and deceptive practices. But in the final analysis it is the knowledgeable consumer and the responsible business person whose decisions will determine the success or failure of products and services in the competitive marketplace.

In celebration of National Consumers Week, I encourage schools, community organizations, labor unions, businesses, the media, and consumers themselves to help further public awareness of consumer issues and services. I urge American consumers to take advantage of this opportunity to seek and use the wealth of information available to all.

We came to Washington in 1981 pledged to reduce the size, cost, and inefficiency of the government. Much has been achieved in only four years, but this huge task is not completed. In 1984, we promised renewed commitment to the full and lasting achievement of our management goals. Now, it is time to redouble our efforts.

Federal government by reducing the size of the Federal work force in civilian agencies, controlling administrative overhead costs, developing effective cash and credit management systems, improving the delivery of services, reducing program error rates, enhancing Federal productivity, and making more effective use of modern computer and communications technology. It is an evolving success story and one in which we can all take pride.

Government. The implementation of a massive management improvement program like this requires your personal support. Therefore, I am asking you, as the head of your agency, to commit to an increased effort to implement the initiatives in our new management report to improve the management efficiency and effectiveness of your agency.

Only through your continued commitment, the enthusiastic support of your staff, and a redoubling of our efforts can we leave the American public with a permanent legacy of a more efficient and effective Federal government.

Q. We've come to talk as much about the SDI as possible today. And one of the concerns that we have is that, by your own admission, this is a 20-, 30-year process before it really bears fruit. Why so much publicity, so much investment in terms of political and financial resources so early on this?

The President. Well, the only thing I can say about technology and science is that, yes, it could take that long. But how many times have we seen the breakthroughs once you embark on a program of this kind, where suddenly you have it at hand?

And now the only defense that we have are two sides sitting here with increasing numbers of these weapons saying that our defense is that if you blow our people up, we'll blow your people up. Well, there's certain immorality about this.

I can remember when the rules of warfare, usually negotiated in Geneva, protected noncombatants against war and against the threat of it, that war would take place between the armed forces. And we've departed a long way from that now, when the principal weapon is one whose main characteristic is it would be wiping out populations.

But to go on and think, all right, suppose it takes 20 years? But then suppose for the next 20 years the world is sitting here with ever-mounting piles of nuclear missiles aimed at each other -- isn't it worth it to see if we can't come up with a nonnuclear weapon that won't destroy people, will prevent those weapons from reaching their targets, and the goal would be to nullify them, to destroy them before their warheads were separated out -- and in a nonnuclear way -- so that there wouldn't be any nuclear explosion.

The President. I know and it kind of amuses me that everybody is so sure I must have heard about it, that I never thought of it myself. And the truth is, I did. Oh, there's been talk -- I think there's a general conversational talk about things of this kind -- about what I said earlier that every weapon has a defensive weapon -- and then, of course, the antiballistic missile, some years ago, came on the scene and was ruled out.

I know, too, that some of our scientists were thinking in terms of a nuclear response in which nuclear explosions from here that would then prevent the others from coming through. And in one of my regular meetings with the Chiefs of Staff, I brought up this subject about a defensive weapon and that every other weapon had always -- there had been a defensive weapon. And I asked them -- I said: Isn't it possible that our modern technology today and all that we have been able to develop, that it would be worthwhile to see if we could not develop a weapon that could perhaps take out, as they left their silos, those nuclear missiles? And the Joint Chiefs said that such an idea, they believed, was worth researching.

The President. No. This idea -- this latter idea came after I'd heard the other things and, as I say, had been called upon by some of the scientists who were thinking in terms of nuclear explosions to destroy a nuclear explosion. And this came to me -- actually, the first time I ever voiced it, I think, was in that room -- in the Cabinet Room in there -- after we'd had the meeting -- it was coming toward the end of the meeting. And when they so much did not, you know, look aghast at the idea and instead said yes, they believed that such a thing offered possibility and should be researched, and I gave the order -- I said go.

Q.  --  -- came in a speech that was particularly harsh on Soviet behavior and recent Soviet behavior. Are you at all concerned that this will be read as a bargaining chip to be used in the current negotiations with the Soviet Union and future negotiations?

The President. They will find out very quickly that it isn't because -- no, what we're doing is not prevented by any treaty -- research, there it is. And even Mr. Gromyko himself admitted not too long ago that research -- that there's no one who could know whether you're researching or not -- there's no way to prevent that. We know that they've been on this kind of research themselves; they've probably been at it for a while longer than we have.

Q. Again, going back to the long time frame for the development of these weapons, many people have suggested that in this interval the Soviets will take every advantage of the time to build up offensive weaponry to defeat such a system and that perhaps it will be destabilizing in the development period.

The President. Well, no, and let me say -- and this ties in with my previous answer also -- first of all, I thought in speaking as quickly as I knew that actually research was going forward -- and there were legitimate scientists saying, ``Yes, there is a potential here,'' that the people ought to be given the hope, that our people ought to know that there may be an answer other than just saying, ``Well, if they slaughter us, somebody will slaughter them.'' Both sides will blow each other up.

There's no intention for this ever to be viewed as giving us a first-strike capacity. I'd be the first one to say, if we had such a weapon, we don't need the offensive weapons. And I would think that it would be very worthwhile if the other side of the world has this -- if the potential for the weapon is there and that the research reveals that -- but I wouldn't want them to think that we were ever trying for a first strike. I don't think there's an American alive that ever believes that this country would for some reason want to be the first to use nuclear weapons on them.

Q.  --  -- they don't have our sensibilities. Then why wouldn't they look at this and look at the technological, perhaps, superiority of the United States and be scared that we were going to use it for that reason and build up as many offensive weapons as they could in the meantime?

We're going to Geneva and both Gromyko and Chernenko -- maybe others, I don't know about them; but at least these two on several occasions lately have said that their purpose, their goal is the total elimination of nuclear weapons. Now, we'll accept that goal and strive with them to meet that goal. And it seems to me that this, if it developed, could be an aid in bringing that about.

The President. No, the MX is not a bargaining chip in the sense of we'd need something to give away -- not at all. This is a long-overdue modernization, and modernization in all of the treaties, including the one not signed, SALT II, has been recognized. We are sitting here with our land-based missiles outdated by anything and any comparison with the Soviet Union. They have come up with at least four new weapon systems, all superior in accuracy and megatonnage than our Minuteman missiles. And, as you know, some years ago we even shut down the Minuteman assembly line. We don't even have anything with which to build them. So, here is a weapon that is very definitely needed until and unless we come to a total elimination of weapons.

The President. Oh, no. I just say this about the MX: I can't guarantee that if we build the MX we will get the kind of a reduction agreement that we want, but I believe I can guarantee you that if we don't get it, we won't get an agreement.

Q. What is the incentive for the Soviet Union to destroy forces that they have in being if they can't trade -- if we're going to go ahead with the MX no matter what and we're not willing to trade Star Wars research or Star Wars deployment? What are we willing to trade for a build-down on their side?

The President. Well, as I say, we're talking nothing but research. And I have made it plain, come deployment time if the research yields such a weapon, come deployment, then you sit down. You don't hoard it and say, ``Ah, we're stronger than they are.'' No, you sit down and see how you can internationalize it and use it to further get rid of whatever nuclear weapons might remain.

Isn't there the possibility that -- I don't know, I'm not a scientist -- but what if they would use that research then, instead, to find out how to make offensive weapons impervious, that could defeat your defensive weapon?

They are the force that has revealed itself as expansionist; we haven't shown any tendency to be that way. We know, Americans know, that however they may fear us over there, they may think that we're the other -- you know that we don't have any aggressive intentions of suddenly going after them with a weapon of this kind. But on the other hand, we have to look at their whole expansionist policy and say they constitute the threat.

As a matter of fact, their own words -- there hasn't been a Russian leader yet who has not at some time or other confirmed that he is committed, as they have always been, to the world revolution -- the idea of the one world Communist state. Now, can they blame us for sitting here saying we have to protect ourselves against you?

The President. No, because I've never thought of that from the standpoint of destroying them and leaving them in rubble. No, I have thought of it that the desire and the soul of man -- more than any other, as long as man has lived on this Earth -- has been for freedom. And I just can't believe that a system such as theirs can continue to hold its people and to hold other peoples in subjugation, and that someday, the people are going to say, hey, there's a better way to do things.

This is my reference to -- that their system has been tried and failed. And the other things of calling them evil empire and everything, that wasn't just done for words, the sake of words. I felt, after all of the years of pursuing detente, and detente was usually a one-way street, it never really became a two-way street; unilateral disarmament -- hoping they would follow suit and they didn't, they just grew stronger. I thought it was necessary to let them know we were looking at them realistically; that we didn't have any illusions about that they would suddenly take off the wolf's clothing and put on sheepskins. Then -- and I think that it maybe has played a part in their willingness to come now and negotiate -- they know -- for once, maybe for the first time -- they know that we're not going to sit here and let them go on piling up a massive advantage over us.

The President. Well, no, and I guess because it was first used in an effort to denigrate the whole idea. But again, Star Wars has a sound of -- brings an image, maybe from too many television shows or something -- but an image of destruction back and forth. And I'm talking about a weapon, nonnuclear, that is, as I say -- only destroys other weapons, doesn't kill people.

Q. Right. Do you suppose that the expenditure that they would have to go through in order to build a defensive system of their own would be so onerous on their tottering economy that it could hasten the day of putting them on the ash heap of history?

The President. Well, no, because, as I said, I've never thought of using this weapon offensively, in an offense against them. If their goal is really what they've said it was, we'll meet their goal of the elimination of the nuclear weapons.

Now, if you have the defense weapon, even though the others are supposed to be gone, you don't have to fear whether your verification has been complete or whether someone down the road -- a latter-day Qadhafi or someone -- is going to say there's a weapon. And if we make it, we can -- you know, the mouse that roared -- we can rule the world. You've got a proof against that, and I like to draw the parallel -- I mentioned gas, earlier -- 1925, after World War I, everybody met in Geneva and decided to outlaw poison gas; no more poison gas in war.

But isn't it funny. Everybody kept their gas masks; they remained standard issue on all sides as military equipment. And now today, what has happened? We have found that some countries do have it and have used it. So that's, I feel, a little bit -- if such a weapon as we're talking about can be developed -- that it would be like the gas mask. It'd just be nice to have in case somebody got out the textbook -- how you build a nuclear missile -- and built one someday.

Q. Is there anything in your experience in dealing with the Soviet Union that suggests to you that they will not try to build up offensively while we are researching Star Wars or that they will not try to match the SDI program?

The President. Oh, I think they're trying to match it, and, as I say, I think they started ahead of us on that, which would be all the more reason, then, why we should have it. If we're right in our suspicions that they are expansionist and -- they already outnumber us greatly in the offensive weapons, and then they alone developed a defensive weapon before us, then they wouldn't have to worry about our deterrent -- a retaliatory strike. Then they could issue the ultimatum to the world.

The open skies proposal of Eisenhower to open both countries up to complete inspection -- and all of these things and always the Soviet Union has resisted, even when they didn't have it and when we had the monopoly. But they evidently had seen what it could mean to them, so they were going forward.

So, what leads me to believe there's hope is not the idea, as I said before, that too often in the past when we've said, well, if they understand how nice we are, maybe they'll be nice, too. No, you'll get an agreement when it is to their practical interest also. All right, we have announced our determination to not let them have the monopoly of power that they've been building.

They know they cannot match us industrially. They sat there in World War II taking the horrible losses that they took before victory, and they saw us -- two oceans and two sides of the world -- fighting a war. And we even had the one line that -- contrary to things they've said since -- when Stalin after the war said that without our industrial might, without our help, victory could not have been theirs.

Well, they've never admitted anything like that since. But I think now that that could be the way in which they can say, look, if we're faced with an ongoing arms race with the United States -- and they're already pretty much up to full capacity with how far down their people's subsistence level is and all -- that they could now see the practical value in saying, well, there is another way -- if we start reducing them instead of increasing them.

Q. This will be the last one. If you say that you want them to say ``Uncle,'' doesn't that practically mean that they should give up power, do it our way, and get themselves out of office? I mean, if you were the President of -- you are the President of a country -- and somebody said that they wanted you to say ``Uncle,'' you'd think that they wanted to take you over. Why shouldn't they think that we want to topple them?

The President. Well, maybe that was an unfortunate choice of words for what I was trying to say, because it inevitably has created a different image than I had in mind. The questions had to do and was dealing with the military pressure from the contras, which is certainly affecting their economy. And we know that there is widespread dissatisfaction among the people.

We know that their new increase in the draft has driven the families that can do it to getting their young men -- their sons out of the country. There's quite a traffic to Panama and from there then on to other places -- of these young men -- so that pressure, and then with the Contadora and what they've been trying to impose on them or persuade them to adopt.

And he stepped down. The revolution was over, except that the Sandinistas then kept on with their own kind of revolution and gradually got rid of -- gradually -- almost suddenly -- got rid of the other elements in the revolution that really wanted the democracy, because the Sandinistas were Communist to begin with. And now they have a totalitarian government.

Now, here are the contras -- here's a funny situation. Here in El Salvador is a democratic, elected government that has tried repeatedly to negotiate with its guerrillas and say, come in and participate in the elections -- be a part of the democratic process. And the guerrillas won't.

Mr. Norton is currently president and chief executive officer of J.R. Norton Co., an agricultural production company which he founded in 1955. He is involved in numerous business and civic organizations, holding various positions including director and past chairman of the United Fresh Fruit and Vegetable Association; director of the Arizona Public Service Co.; director and member of the executive committee of the Central Arizona Project Association; and director and past chairman of the Western Growers Association.

The U.S.-Italy social security agreement is similar in objective to the social security agreements in force with Belgium, Canada, the Federal Republic of Germany, Norway, Switzerland, and the United Kingdom. Such bilateral agreements, which are generally known as totalization agreements, provide for limited coordination between the United States and foreign social security systems to overcome the problems of gaps in protection and of dual coverage and taxation for workers who move from one country to the other. The present Supplementary Agreement with Italy would amend the original agreement to update and simplify several of its provisions which have caused both countries unforeseen and unnecessary administrative difficulties.

We're pleased to have had this opportunity to meet with you as a friend, as a leader of a great nation, and as the representative of the European peoples. Cooperation between Italy and the United States is at a level unsurpassed in our history.

Europe for almost 40 years. Italy has played an active role in the cause of peace. It continues to do so today in the Middle East, an area which, as Prime Minister Craxi explained, is of special importance to Italy.

And today the Prime Minister and I also discussed East-West relations and arms control. We reviewed the approach the United States will take in the coming Geneva talks. And the Prime Minister reconfirmed Italy's continued steadfastness on INF development -- deployment, I should say.

We also discussed the Strategic Defense Initiative. The Prime Minister assured me of Italy's full understanding of the program's objectives, and we agreed on the great potential benefits this research effort could provide. We firmly agree that now is the time for alliance solidarity. And our goal remains the reduction and eventual elimination of the means of aggression, nuclear and conventional.

Prime Minister the high priority we place on undertaking a new round of trade negotiations by early 1986. These talks are necessary, not just to forestall a possible slide back toward protectionism, but to take new steps for freer and more open trade and a stronger world economy.

The United States and Italy are two of the world's great democracies. Our bilateral relations, reflecting our shared values, are on a high plane. When the Prime Minister last visited, we decided to improve our coordination and cooperation against narcotics. And I'm happy to report that our initiative has now yielded an effective new instrument to combat this scourge -- our Binational Working Group on Narcotics and Organized Crime.

Our common fight against terrorism is another area of close cooperation, and Italy deserves accolades for its courageous struggle against terrorism. I know I speak for all Americans in thanking you publicly, Mr. Prime Minister, for Italy's successful thwarting last November of a potential bomb attack against our Embassy in Rome.

As the head of a vital, vibrant democracy, nurtured by statesmen like yourself and your illustrious predecessors, you and your coalition partners have put Italy in the forefront of the world's functioning democracies. You've demonstrated your unequivocal and compelling commitment to Western values. We're grateful to the Italian people as our friends and allies. And we're also proud, Mr. Prime Minister, to welcome your historic address to the Congress tomorrow. It will, I'm certain, be another milestone in the numerous and long-lasting ties between our two countries.

The Prime Minister. I wish to thank President Reagan for the warm welcome he has extended to me. My visit to this great, friendly nation has a particular importance in view of the responsibilities which fall upon Italy now that it is holding the Presidency of the European Community. Our talks have been extensive, open, and very constructive.

I have renewed to President Reagan the heartfelt congratulations of the Italian Government and my own personal ones for the great consensus received at the recent Presidential elections. I have also congratulated him for his success in expanding the American economy which has resulted in greater employment.

The United States has succeeded in the hard task of combining modernization of productivity with the creation of new jobs. Europe and the United States should work together to achieve coordinated action and initiatives which are necessary to improve transatlantic economic cooperation to mutual benefit.

I have expressed to President Reagan my assessment of the issues which Italy follows with the utmost attention: first of all, those of peace, security, development, and the safeguarding of the rights of peoples. And while also illustrating the programs and prospects of the Ten [European Community member nations] for a wider community integration, I have stressed that our willingness to proceed towards European unity is consonant with the framework of constant strengthening of the European-American partnership through a balanced relationship and more effective mutual responsibility.

Again, on this occasion, I have realized how deep and strong are the bonds of friendship, alliance, and cooperation between Italy and the United States. It is our firm intention to continue to strengthen them. I have particularly appreciated the special consideration shown by President Reagan and his administration for Italy and for the development of Italian-American relations. I consider this attention as a recognition of the consistency and the commitment shown by the Italian Government in making a positive contribution to the search of more stable international equilibria in the field of defense, as well as in the economic and political ones.

Our exchange of views confirmed the existence of broad and encouraging convergence, since I am convinced that the basic goals of the United States policy remain defense and peace based on a balance of forces. The President has assured me that these same goals will be pursued through the SDI, from whose research program we will draw mutual advantages in the scientific and technological field.

We attach a fundamental importance to the success of the forthcoming Geneva negotiations. We are firmly convinced that a substantial, balanced, and verifiable reduction of armaments is the essential condition for a stabler and safer peace. We will work hard to strengthen confidence so that this negotiation and those which are taking place in other fora may develop under the best possible circumstances.

There are no substitutes for the negotiation process. An agreement on a gradual and balanced elimination of armaments and on the organization of peace based on an accepted and recognized balance is in the interest of all.

We have discussed the Middle East situation and noted with satisfaction the emergence of positive signs indicating that there is a possibility of reactivating the negotiation process towards a political solution of the Arab-Israeli crisis. We both noted with interest the recent Jordanian-Palestinian dialog. We hope that this agreement will shortly allow for a joint Arab stand on the opening of realistic negotiations with Israel.

In my talks here in Washington, we also examined the international economic situation and exchanged views on ways and means to consolidate and strengthen economic recovery within the context of greater stability. We must harmonize our national efforts so that the beneficial results of recovery will be fully reflected on the occupational levels.

However, we cannot pay attention only to our own economic prosperity. The increasing serious problems in the Third World are a matter of great concern. We must help in seeking solutions to them. We agreed to hold effective consultations between our governments on these issues in order to ensure the success of the summit conference of the industrialized nations, which will take place in Bonn on May 2d through the 4th.

Having just visited Latin America, I also emphasized, in my talks here, the great importance of the return of democracy in the highly civilized nations of that continent and drew attention to the expectations for the democratic solidarity of the peoples living there who aspire to a regime based on freedom.

Last year I worked out with President Reagan a program for a more effective bilateral cooperation in the fight against drug traffic and organized crime. The results have been positive and significant. Our cooperation has been carried out with mutual satisfaction. We will continue these efforts, while trying at the same time to improve bilateral and multilateral agreements so as to defend our democratic system against any rise of the threat of international terrorism.

I wish to thank President Reagan for this fruitful exchange of views. It was, for me, a confirmation of how much the sharing of values and aspirations, in a context of longstanding friendship, makes it easier to reach mutual understanding and agreement on how to cope with and solve problems for which we have responsibilities not only as governments but for which we have responsibilities to our own peoples.

Prime Minister Craxi spoke in Italian, and his remarks were translated by an interpreter. Earlier, the President and the Prime Minister met in the Oval Office and then attended a luncheon in the State Dining Room.

Mr. Rosborough is currently chairman of the St. Louis Community Foundation. He is also president emeritus of the St. Louis Art Museum. He has served as the director of the Business Committee for the Arts, a member of the board of the Associated Council for the Arts, and as a member of the trustees committee of the American Association of Museums.

Well, we can be thankful that we're not in that kind of situation, but we as a people do face a decision that's vital to the safety of our country. And that's why I've asked you here today. One of the most sacred duties of any President is keeping America secure and at peace. And peace and security are not free commodities; they're precious, and like everything of great value, there's a price to pay.

During the 1970's, perhaps as a reaction to the confusion and the division over the Vietnam war, the strength of our conventional and strategic forces was permitted to erode; and by 1980 it was clear that a weaker America was not a safer America and that it was time to get down to the business of strengthening our defenses.

I was elected in 1980 and reelected a few months ago, pledging to put our economy back on track and to rebuild our defenses. Modernizing our strategic forces was vital. We unilaterally refrained from deploying many new strategic systems in the 1970's -- unilaterally refrained, even as the Soviets rushed forward to expand and upgrade their nuclear capability, testing and deploying at least three new intercontinental ballistic missile systems and stationing them in the hardened silos.

That reality has worked well for 30 years. And yet if we're not willing to modernize our forces to keep our systems current, the credibility of deterrence will vanish. Knowing this, we began immediately to make up for the irresponsibility of the seventies and to revitalize the three legs of our nuclear triad. We've had some success -- the Trident submarine and the B - 1 bomber will go a long way toward filling the gap -- but you can't sit on a three-legged stool if there's only two legs. The third leg means the Peacekeeper missile, as we call it, the MX. Our current, aging land-based missiles are suffering from attrition. The 22-year-old Titan missiles are being retired, leaving our land-based missile force with less and less punch with which to deter aggression. And that's one of the reasons we need the Peacekeeper. It's the most reliable and accurate land-based missile America has ever produced. It'll bring our deterrent to a state-of-the-art level and reinforce the futility of attack on [by] any potential adversary.

Well, the Senator knew the price of living free, secure, and at peace. Senator Jackson -- well, I can assure you -- I might as well say -- I don't enjoy spending money, that might have struck you already that that's -- if it wasn't absolutely essential to the security of our country, my conservative philosophy would rebel at taxing money away from those who've worked hard to earn it. I grew up in the age of Coolidge. Some people think it was McKinley, but, no, it was -- [laughter] -- it was Coolidge. [Laughter] And he was a champion of thrift and economy in government, and yet even he knew the importance of strength -- there we were in that postwar period immediately after the war to end all wars when, I think, most of us felt that we had ended all wars.

Well, that's the spirit with which we must move forward in this debate. We've requested a minimum number of Peacekeepers -- only 100. This number is far too few for any first strike, and it underscores the purely defensive nature of our proposal. The missile is now in production, and the costs are reasonable and under control, and funding would not add to the deficit, because it's already been appropriated in the fiscal '85 budget. What's more, we've had seven excellent test launches.

Of course, there are those who will continue to search for any reason to vote ``No.'' If the decisions were determined that way, our military could have no weapons at all; and this would be fine, except that the Soviets would not be suffering from the same handicap. Our goal is to negotiate with the Soviets, to reach agreements which will permit us to reduce the number of weapons threatening mankind, both nuclear and conventional.

This isn't a new revelation. President Teddy Roosevelt said it a long time ago: ``We need to keep in a condition of preparedness,'' he said, ``not because we want war, but because we desire to stand with those whose plea for peace is listened to with respectful attention.'' The success we've had in getting the Soviets to the negotiating table or getting their ``respectful attention,'' as Teddy would say, can be traced not to vacillation, but to firmness and sense of purpose.

We pledged that if the Soviets would not work with us to reduce the number of their intermediate-range missiles aimed at Europe, we would deploy our cruise and Pershings to balance the threat. Our courage and that of our allies let the Kremlin know that we will not compromise our security and that we have the political will to stick with it. We mean no threat to them, but we'll not permit them to pose a threat to us.

There should be no mistake -- a rejection of the Peacekeeper will diminish our chance of reaching a fair and equitable arms reduction agreement now or in the future. Without the Peacekeeper, the Soviets will have little incentive to discontinue their buildup or to reach agreements with us.

Years ago I was a negotiator for my union. When we picked a team and sent them to the bargaining table, we stood behind them; unity was the key to success -- then we were seeking higher wages and better working conditions. The team we're sending to Geneva will be seeking peace and security for our country and the free world. It's the American team, and I need your help in backing them up.

I hope that we can count on you to get the message out that now is not the time to cancel a major weapons system or undercut our allies or to reward Soviet belligerence. Now is the time for American courage, unity, and resolve -- time to stand together behind our team in Geneva so they can represent us with all the vigor and confidence that they can muster.

Soviet Union, understands this. He won the Nobel Peace Prize, and he holds the respect of the world for his struggle for peace and human rights. Well, he wrote to a friend in the West that arms control talks with the Soviets would be easier if the U.S. were to have the MX. He knew the risk of sending a message like that.

Peace is not easy to maintain; it'll take hard work and diligence. It'll take unity and sense of purpose, and yes, it will cost money. This generation of Americans must meet the test. That's up to us.

And I hope I can count on you, all of you, to give us help in this. There have been four wars in my lifetime. And I've said before, I don't know of a single war -- one of those four -- that was fought because the United States was too strong. The truth of the matter is, the two World Wars were because people on the other side looked at us, looked at our military weakness, and decided we wouldn't fight.

And I would like to make a statement with regard to that to my fellow Americans. And they all know some of our farmers are facing severe financial problems. They're living with the results of a generation of failed policies that drove down farm prices, drove up the cost of their land, seed, and equipment. And then in the late 1970's, they were hit again by runaway inflation and interest rates, grain embargoes that robbed them of long-term markets.

Farmers who've toiled to make America productive, growing food and fiber for all of us and millions beyond our shores, deserve our sympathy and our support. And the Federal Government mustn't shirk its responsibility to help undo some of the damage that it created. And with spring planting upon us, we're meeting that responsibility.

This year, under plans that I approved, the Federal Government will make nearly $4\1/2\ billion in credit available to farmers. We will also spend just over $15 billion to support the price of farm commodities. We're doing a great deal to help farmers. But I've pleaded and warned repeatedly that, just as your families don't have a blank check for whatever your needs may be, neither can government -- and that means taxpayers -- bail out every farmer hopelessly in debt or every bank which made imprudent or speculative loans and bet on higher inflation. I asked for help. I asked Congress, which just days ago was bemoaning the size of deficits, to demonstrate courage -- hold the line and match rhetoric with deeds. Congress failed. In the first major bill since convening in January, a majority proved itself incapable of resisting the very tax and spend philosophy that brought America to its knees and wrecked our economy.

So, today I have vetoed this massive new bailout that would add billions to the deficit over the next several years. And let's be clear on one thing: The bill I vetoed would not really help farmers; it's too late in the season for that. This bill is merely designed to convey the impression of helping farmers.

But if Congress wants to help, it will help us reduce unnecessary spending and increase incentives for greater real economic growth, which will provide confidence to the markets and help interest rates come further down.

I applaud and thank the 35 Senators and 168 Members of the House who courageously stood with me on this issue. And now that I've vetoed this bill, I hope the Congress will get the message and work with me to reduce spending in a responsible way that does not threaten our national security. If it doesn't, then I'll do what must be done. I will veto again and again until spending is brought under control. So, please help me by telling your representatives to stop talking about deficits and to start helping me bring them down.

September initiatives: The Farm Credit Coordinating Group, chaired by him, will make sure that all Federal credit agencies work closely together to solve the farm liquidity problems; modified Federal regulations will make it possible for banks to work out lower payments for farmers having liquidity problems; and guarantees of up to 90 percent of operating loans will be provided for eligible farmers whose local banks fail and who can't find a new private lender without such a guarantee. Now, some lenders have been unwilling to participate in this program, but that was due to the uncertainty about whether something better might come out of the Congress. But these are the things we're doing.

The President. You'll have to ask them. But I certainly don't think that tying this to a bill on food aid for the starving people in Africa was exactly the way to go in this kind of legislation. As a matter of fact, it emphasized the real need for a line-item veto.

The President. Well now, Chris [Chris Wallace, NBC News], I took your questions here that had to do with the issue of the day, and I'd rather limit it to that. And I think I should, rather than we get into a general press conference. There'll be time coming up for us to talk about those other things.

The President. Yes, but I've been meeting and -- with a great many of them on both sides of the aisle -- and there's evidence of some willingness to stand together on these other matters. So, if you don't mind, I'll make my way out the door now, all right.

The President. But you're talking about something that has gone on for a great many years, that exists in our Embassies in all other countries. It's a standard practice that's been used for many, many years.

I am returning without my approval H.R. 1096, a bill to authorize emergency relief for victims of famine in Africa and to establish additional farm credit programs that would add a minimum of $2.5 billion to the deficit over the next several years.

I should note at the outset that my veto of this bill will not interfere with the African relief effort now under way. Using authority in existing law, we can continue to provide relief in the near term, but I urge the Congress to act expeditiously on the request for additional relief authority I submitted earlier this year.

I announced last September. The bill would institute a series of changes that would primarily benefit banks at the expense of farmers and taxpayers. Another of its provisions would establish a new program to pay banks to reduce the interest rate on loans to certain farmers. This program, although initially limited to $100 million, would soon grow into an uncontrollable, multi-billion dollar annual spending spree. A third section of this title would require bank regulatory agencies to refrain, under a vaguely delineated standard, from classifying adversely delinquent loans to farmers and ranchers. This provision would inject uncertainty into the authority of the regulatory agencies charged with ensuring the soundness of our banking system, provoke needless litigation, and possibly jeopardize the interests of depositors in banks that have made agricultural loans.

By distorting the purpose of the basic Federal mechanism for stabilizing farm prices, this provision risks serious disruption at harvest time as well as long-term damage to the soundness of Federal farm programs.

I share the concern for problems facing certain of our farmers this year. That is why I have taken a number of steps to strengthen existing programs and to institute a new Debt Adjustment Program to help financially strapped farmers refinance their existing debt.

It is time to get on with the job of making these programs work. That will require the cooperation of all concerned, but most important of all, it will require an end to the uncertainty that would be created by hasty legislation requiring massive changes in rules just as the planting season begins.

Q. Canadians long have suffered from a national inferiority complex in regard to our great neighbor to the south. How do you think of Canada, and what do you see as Canada's importance to the United States?

The President. No other country in the world is more important to the United States than Canada, and we are blessed to have such a nation on our northern border. Canada is a friend, a neighbor, and a trusted ally. We may have a larger population and a larger GNP, but we're also dependent on you. Canada consumes a fifth of our exports, and that's more than any other nation. You use more of our capital than other nations, and, of course, our mutual security interests are closely intertwined. It's up to both of us to make this partnership continue to work in both our interests.

External Affairs Minister Joe Clark will be in Moscow next month as arms control negotiations resume in Geneva. Is there a part we can play in conjunction with that or with the Contadora process in Central America?

II, a role which has reflected the talents of Canadian statesmen and the democratic values of its peoples. It has been an activist in the United Nations -- indeed, Canadians were amongst the founders in San Francisco 40 years ago -- and has shown time and time again that it is prepared to back up its convictions on peaceful settlement of disputes with courageous participation in peacekeeping operations in such hotspots as Cyprus and the Middle East. But I also note that your Prime Minister recently quoted Dante to the effect that the ``hottest place in hell is reserved for those who in times of moral crisis strive to maintain their neutrality.'' Canadians are not neutral -- they believe in democracy and work hard to protect it.

Prime Minister Mulroney has been very helpful, and we feel certain that Mr. Clark will convey to the Soviet leaders our continuing resolve to achieve significant, verifiable, and equitable arms reductions. With regard to the Contadora process, we value Canadian assistance, and I would note that Canadian suggestions on the verification process have been most helpful.

Q. What do you see as Canada's role in defense? How did you feel when the new government had to cut $154 million from military spending, for example, contrary to what they had promised during the election campaign? Is Canada doing its fair share in NATO, and will you be pressuring us to do more?

The President. When Prime Minister Mulroney was here last September, he expressed his personal commitment to enhancing Canada's role in the Atlantic alliance and to carry its full share of the allied defense burden. But he and I recognized then and now that domestic political pressures affect outcomes. I believe Brian Mulroney shares my conviction that there is no reasonable alternative but to work to protect freedom and democracy.

I understand Canada is now conducting a major review of its defense policy, and I believe that the review will conclude that the only meaningful defense question facing both our nations is how to meet the challenge now before us. And that challenge has nothing to do with pressure from Canada's allies, but rather, how best to defend freedom and democracy.

There have also been allegations that America is pressuring its allies to accept nuclear weapons. I have two comments to make on these reports. First, over the years NATO has worked out various defense plans designed to strengthen deterrence, but under these plans any deployments would be carried out only, let me repeat only, with the prior agreement of the states involved.

Second, it is contrary to the interest of the alliance and to the individual member states to talk publicly about confidential contingency planning. Such discussion would not serve our shared security interests.

Q. If Canada suddenly balked at going along with such contingency plans -- or refused to allow the further testing of cruise missiles or barred an American battleship from our ports as New Zealand recently did -- would the United States respond in the same way that it did to New Zealand, that is, threatening a broad range of countermeasures, including economic sanctions?

The President. Let me start by stressing that United States defense cooperation with our allies begins with a common understanding of our shared security interests and a determination to protect those interests against any threat. Each of us entered into our alliances -- whether ANZUS or NATO or NORAD -- as fully sovereign nations, not because we were pressured to do so.

Let me point out that we are not taking economic sanctions against New Zealand. Rather, we are reviewing our cooperation in security matters in light of New Zealand's decision to reduce cooperation with us in the ANZUS alliance.

Q. The Canadian Government has said it supports the Strategic Defense Initiative, but there has been an uproar each time it has been suggested that defense cooperation could lead to our actual involvement in the program. In your view, should Canada have a role in SDI research, and why?

The President. We have absolutely no intention of pressing any of our allies to participate in this program. It will be entirely up to Canada to decide the extent to which, if at all, it wishes to share in the research efforts. Should Canada decide such participation is in its interests, we would be delighted to work with you in this important undertaking.

But let's get this straight about the Strategic Defense Initiative: For more than a generation, we have believed that no war will begin as long as each side knows the other can retaliate with devastating results. Well, I believe there could be a better way to keep the peace. The Strategic Defense Initiative is a research effort aimed at finding a nonnuclear defense against ballistic missiles. It is the most hopeful possibility of the nuclear age. Nuclear weapons threaten entire populations; the SDI seeks to end that possibility forever. I was extremely heartened by the understanding and support for this research effort by Prime Minister Mulroney and External Affairs Minister Clark. It may take a long time, but now we have started.

Q. The Federal and Provincial governments have just taken substantial measures to control the contributions to acid rain on our side of the border. What is the United States prepared to do for its part?

The President. The United States is a world leader for a cleaner environment. We take pride that our Clean Air and Clean Water Acts and our other comprehensive environmental legislation have helped to set international standards. We have invested $150 billion -- yes, that's billions -- under our Clean Air Act, and as a result the air today is cleaner than in many years. Emissions of sulphur dioxide, a major concern, are down nearly 30 percent in the last decade. This trend is continuing: down 10 percent since I became President, including 2\1/2\ percent in 1983. We strictly control nitrogen oxides, which come mainly from auto emissions, and their level has also been dropping in recent years. For the future, I believe it is a question of doing what is reasonable and responsible after getting all the facts.

The President. As I understand it, the Canadian Government is reviewing its trade policy right now and hasn't yet decided whether to propose any negotiations. In our Congress, I believe there is a deep-seated appreciation that trade between the United States and Canada -- the largest trade volume between any two countries on Earth -- is beneficial to both countries and should be fostered. Of course, there are sensitive trade areas, and the Congress would want to be sure that any new bilateral understanding is in the interest of the United States -- so would I, and I'm sure Canada would do the same.

What is important is that we continue to work together to reduce trade barriers. Perhaps we can set an exmple for others to follow. We are not interested in building a North American island; rather, we would like to establish a trend toward trade liberalization that others can emulate.

But rather than talk about concessions, I believe that what has happened is that we've come to recognize that warm close relations serve both our interests. As a result, we both have become a lot more attentive to each other's concerns; we talk with each other more often. And I don't believe that means either nation becomes less independent.

The President. People respond more warmly to some than to others. We're all human. And I confess that I like Brian Mulroney a lot. He is a true Canadian patriot. He is honest, hardworking, intelligent, and articulate -- in two languages at that! So, let's just say that the chemistry is good.

All this talk about age is not really accidental; I'm aware that you're celebrating your 100th anniversary. And here at the White House we do issue our share of messages and congratulations, yet yours was and is very special. As the message of congratulations suggests, community newspapers had their origins in the early days of our nation in the struggle for independence and liberty. As our political parties grew and democracy flourished, the newspaper business also came of age. And today, with enormous advances made in technology, you're even more capable than in the past of bringing to your hometowns timely, provocative, and comprehensive coverage of what concerns and affects your readers.

I know that local news -- what's happening in your communities -- is one of the real important focuses for your newspapers. I think it's interesting that the new technology, leading to such mass developments as newspaper chains and television networks, is now being put to use by many of you to strengthen the very thing that so many people said the modern age would help to eliminate, and that is the sense of community -- the rich diversity and the difference that exists in America's towns and cities.

I think you also know that at the Federal level we're trying to do the same thing. The administration has always believed that the real source of America's economic and social progress is not national edicts and mandates that are issued from Washington, but the toil and creativity of her people working at the local level through their own private institutions and associations.

And that's why we are trying to shrink the cost and the size of the Federal Government, bring its expenditures under control, transfer as much of its power as we can back to the States and localities, where it will be subject to more control by the people themselves and, I might add, to more scrutiny by their watchdogs, those of you of the local press.

It hasn't been all that easy. Federal expenditures during the 15 years before we took office went up 400 percent, and the number of Federal programs escalated beyond belief, so much so -- and I think this is interesting -- no one's been able to come up with a way of counting exactly how many such programs currently exist in our government. Government and regulations were America's biggest growth industry.

And now, at last, we're putting a stop to that. I won't go through all the statistics about how we're cutting the number of programs and regulations, the rate of growth in spending, or elaborate on the amount of power that we're returning to the people in the local communities. I think the best measure of our success is the change in the climate here in Washington.

Washington politicians was to propose another Federal initiative in spending extravaganza, to laugh at the deficit and claim that we could spend our way to prosperity. Well, now, at least, our elected officials publicly acknowledge that deficit spending is a serious problem and that spending yourself rich is a little bit like drinking yourself sober. But they still have a ways to go from talking about bringing deficits down to bringing deficits down.

And you know one additional point here is important. Perhaps you've noticed that when some newspapers start to lose their impact, they do it by trying to cover everything on the international and national scale but lose their real focus -- what's important to the people in their local community. Well, it's always fascinated me that as government grows larger and larger and started to do more and more things it was neither intended to do or competent enough to handle, it grew less capable of carrying out its traditional and far more important functions: maintaining civil order and protecting our national security.

Even as we fought to get the Federal behemoth under control during these past few years, we were emphasizing these traditional and most important duties of government. I think many of you have been reading and writing about our success against crime, much of it the result of a sweeping organized crime initiative that we announced a few years ago.

So far, we've also been moving against the dangers to our national security. We've come a long way from the days when the growth of totalitarianism was unchecked and America was routinely held up to world humiliation.

But all the work of the past few years -- the rebuilding of our military strength and our international stature -- depends on the continued support of the American people and the Congress. And very shortly, one critical vote will be held on the Hill on one of the mainstays of our strategic defenses: the MX missile. And, oh, how I wish they had listened to Barry Goldwater when that thing started a few years ago, because he said, ``Why don't we just call it Minute Man IV and no one will raise a fuss of any kind.'' [Laughter] Because in reality, it is a modernization of what we have in the silos now -- the II and the III are out-dated and way behind the state of the art.

And I'm very grateful for the editorial support that all of you've given us in the past on so many issues, but let me emphasize this morning that MX is one of the most critical items on the national agenda. I know I don't have to tell you it just isn't those of us at home who will be watching the vote -- the world is watching too, and especially those with whom we're now trying to negotiate arms control and reduction measures in Geneva. A vote now against the MX would be interpreted as a sign of weakness, a symbol of disunity; and it could be interpreted by some as a signal to exploit rather than seriously negotiate the arms reduction process.

We need passage of the MX program; we need it now. We need it for the success of our arms reduction efforts, and we need it for the sake of our future. And there we are again talking about the future and the passage of time. I know that many of you during these past few years have gone through the business of hiring young reporters and executives in your business, and I know that sometimes you must reflect on how young they are and counsel them on the work and adventures that await them.

And that's what it really is all about. Passing on to another generation and the generations after them this thing called the American dream -- making sure it remains a beacon of hope to a troubled but waiting world. You've been doing that now through this association for a hundred years. And during the past 4 years, especially, all of us together have come a long way toward bringing back excitement and energy to that dream.

So, this morning I want to thank you all for your editorial support in the past and ask your support for the future, particularly on that crucial MX vote, and wish you, at the same time, all a very happy birthday.

I would like to just point out because I know that there's kind of an image created with regard to defense spending -- would you be interested to know with relation to the gross national product, defense spending is considerably lower than it has been over the past, back in the fifties and back in the Kennedy days, and as a percentage of gross national product. We tend to overlook that. It isn't the great stupendous increase that everyone thinks it is; it's actually a lower percentage. In Kennedy's years, it was almost 50 percent of the budget; here it isn't 30 percent, and it is a smaller percent of the gross national product at the same time.

But before I -- and, incidentally, also, our negotiators will leave this weekend for Geneva. And I can't tell you that passing the MX will guarantee a good arms reduction treaty with the Soviet Union; but I can guarantee you that a vote against it and not passing it will make that kind of a treaty much more difficult, if not impossible. The fellows on the other side of the table aren't there out of good will; they're there for the reason that Margaret Thatcher said to our Congress just a few days ago: They're there because of our strength; that's why they've come back to the table.

Well, before I close, I want to speak to you just briefly about a great power for public service that you possess. I'd like to suggest one especially tragic area where your newspapers can do a great deal of good: the problem of missing children.

Well over a million American children disappear from their homes or neighborhoods every year causing, as we can all understand, heartbreaking anguish. Parents cry out for help, many through letters to me. For example, I learned about Jonelle Matthews of Greeley, Colorado, who would have celebrated a happy 13th birthday with her family just last month. But 5 days before Christmas, Jonelle disappeared from her home.

We saw how reaction to the television program ``Adam'' led to recovery of at least 36 missing children. We also know how milk carton manufacturers have begun putting photos of missing children on milk cartons. If your newspapers -- and forgive me for sticking my nose into your business -- but if you could publish, as a regular feature, pictures and descriptions of children missing in or near your circulation areas, I know that you would give the police a welcome new source of leads that could solve some of these cases. So, I'm asking you to enlist your newspapers in this mission of mercy. Even if it only finds one missing child, it's worth it.

The challenge of statesmanship is to have the vision to dream of a better, safer world and the courage, persistence, and patience to turn that dream into reality. Since the dawn of the nuclear era, all God's children have lived with the fear of nuclear war and the danger of nuclear devastation. Our moral imperative is to work with all our power for that day when the children of the world can grow up without the fear of nuclear war.

So, today we reaffirm that vision: a world dedicated to the elimination of nuclear weapons, a world in which technology provides ever greater safety rather than greater fear. Today we set out on a new path toward agreements which radically reduce the size and destructive power of existing nuclear missiles.

Soviet leader Konstantin Chernenko said last month: ``Our ultimate objective here is the complete elimination of nuclear weapons everywhere on this planet, the complete removal of the threat of nuclear war.'' Well, I welcome that statement and assure Mr. Chernenko that the elimination of nuclear weapons is also the ultimate objective of the American government and the American people.

Next week the United States and the Soviet Union meet in Geneva to begin a new dialog on these issues. And above all, we seek agreement as soon as possible on real and verifiable reductions in American and Soviet offensive nuclear arms. For our part, the United States is ready with firmness, patience, and understanding to negotiate fair and equitable agreements reducing the dangers of nuclear war and enhancing strategic stability.

Kampelman, John Tower, and Mike Glitman -- which culminates an extensive round of preparations. In the meeting I gave my instructions for the first round of talks. These instructions enabled our negotiators to explore every promising avenue for progress. And they have my personal support.

Like Americans everywhere, I want these negotiations to succeed and will do everything I can to ensure that this happens. And I pray that the Soviet leadership is prepared to make the same commitment.

I want to thank our team for the fine work that they've already done in getting ready for this endeavor. As all of you prepare to leave for Geneva, I can't think of a more welcome message than an unmistakable vote of confidence from the American people and the Congress.

Ambassadors Kampelman, Tower, and Glitman and all the members of our negotiating team, I know that all of our fellow Americans wish you every success. And I know from my conversations with the bipartisan leadership of the Congress that the Congress of the United States joins in supporting you.

I'd like to talk to you today about the deep desire we all share to keep America free, secure, and at peace. In 3 days' time, American and Soviet negotiators will meet in Geneva to explore ways to reduce nuclear arsenals and lower the risks of war.

No issue concerns me more and none has taken up more of my time than our quest for a breakthrough on arms reductions. I do so willingly because as your President and as a husband, a father, and a grandfather, I know what's at stake for everyone. And I'm pleased that the Soviets, after staying away for more than a year, have agreed to return to the bargaining table. The renewal of these negotiations is an important step in the right direction, and America will be ready to move forward on all promising avenues for progress.

As I speak to you, our team is in Geneva. I cannot think of a more welcome message to give them than a strong vote of confidence from you the people and the Congress. I know that all Americans stand foursquare behind our negotiating team and wish them every success. In fact, you're the reason that the Soviet Union returned to the negotiating table. The Soviet leadership has seen your patience and your determination to keep America strong. They've seen the renewal of your spirit and the rebuilding of a robust and expanding American economy. They know we're going to continue moving forward to protect our freedom and our way of life.

I want to believe the Congress will follow your lead, but that's not yet certain, and I need your help. Each House of Congress will soon vote on an issue that will directly and, perhaps, dramatically affect the outcome at Geneva -- that vote concerns the modernization of our strategic forces with the MX Peacekeeper missile.

Let me take a moment to explain what that vote is all about. Nearly 2 years ago after a decade of indecision, confusion, and endless debate over the merits of modernizing our aging land-based strategic missiles, our political process forged a bipartisan consensus that united us in our common search for ways to protect our country, reduce the risks of war, and work for dramatically reduced levels of nuclear arms.

The MX Peacekeeper missile has been part of the consensus and with good reason: Time and again, America exercised unilateral restraint, good will, and a sincere commitment to arms reductions. As a result, many of the missiles protecting our security at this very moment are older than the Air Force men and women taking care of them. They're missiles of the sixties, originally equipped with 1950's aerotechnology. It's sort of like a 1963 jalopy with some new parts. You know as well as I do that in many States automobiles that old will soon qualify as antiques, but the Soviets don't deal in antiques. Their response was the same as it's always been: no restraint, just build, build, and build. While we debated and delayed, they developed three new types of land-based intercontinental missiles, and they've added to their arsenal 800 new missiles with more than 5,000 nuclear warheads.

It took us too long to realize there is no easy, cheap way to buy security. In 1983, based on the recommendations of a distinguished blue-ribbon panel, the Scowcroft commission, the Congress joined with us to approve the MX Peacekeeper program -- 100 up-to-date missiles that will replace aging Minuteman missiles. Since that time, the MX Peacekeeper has finished seven successful flight tests, and the Soviets are back at the bargaining table.

Well, once again, the moment of truth is at hand. As I mentioned a few minutes ago, each House of Congress will soon vote on whether to release the MX funds they approved last year and continue production of the missile. The Soviet leadership views the current debate on the MX as a key test of American resolve.

If the Congress acts responsibly, our negotiators will have a chance to succeed, but if we don't have the courage to modernize our land-based strategic missile systems, the Soviets will have little reason to negotiate meaningful reductions. And why should they? We would be signaling to them that they can gain more through propaganda and stonewalling than through serious negotiations.

My fellow Americans, the stakes are so very high. The vote on the MX Peacekeeper isn't a budget issue; it's about our nation's security. And when it comes to protecting America's security, we can't afford to divide ourselves as Democrats or Republicans -- we must stand together as Americans. It's up to you to let your feelings be known. Your voice matters; let it be heard.

The history of the United States is the history of women and men working together to realize their dreams. In times of war and peace, of hardship and prosperity, we have shared disappointments and achievements.

Today there are more opportunities open to women than at any time in our history, and women are using these opportunities to excel in every field. But even before our own era, courageous and persevering women had achieved leading roles in all walks of life. Women led reform movements, including the movement for women's suffrage; they ran businesses, entered the professions, and pioneered in activities such as art, literature, and science. These achievements have not always received the recognition they deserve, and one of the purposes of Women's History Week is to encourage all Americans to remember this sometimes forgotten part of our heritage. By doing so, we will encourage the women of today to pursue their dreams wherever they lead -- even to the stars, as our women astronauts have done.

But in remembering the achievements of especially talented individuals, we should not forget the immense contribution made to our Nation by millions of women whose names we will never know. These women raised families, worked part-time or full-time to support them, and passed on their love, hopes, and dreams to the next generation. They crossed deserts and mountains alongside their families and in times of national emergency, such as war, they undertook vital work in factories and on farms which enabled our Nation to survive and prosper. They were known only to their families, friends, and neighbors, but their influence on their communities was enormous. Whatever greatness our Nation has achieved, we owe in very large measure to them, and we should never overlook or forget their contribution.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this ninth day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

The President. Good afternoon, and welcome to the White House. It's an honor to have you join us today. And if I may say so, it's also refreshing. You are the editors and broadcasters who shape and reflect concerns in the place that is most important to every citizen -- not far-off Washington, but hometown America. I welcome this opportunity to get to know you, to thank you for your service to our country and through you to speak to your readers and listeners -- the people who live beyond the Potomac, in what I still can't help thinking of as the real America.

By the way, our administration has quite a few members who've spent part of their careers working with you on regional stations and newspapers, among them is our new Communications Director, Pat Buchanan, who was an editorial writer for the St. Louis Globe Democrat. There's another fellow who -- one who started as a sports announcer on radio station WOC back in Davenport, Iowa, who remembers his broadcasting days as some of the happiest in his life. I think you know his name, and -- [laughter] -- as an old radio man, I view welcoming you here as an honor.

Today we've learned of the death of the head of state, Konstantin Chernenko, and I've sent my condolences to the Soviet leadership and people. I want them to know that we will deal with Chairman Chernen-ko's successor with an open mind and will continue our efforts to improve relations between our two nations -- to settle our differences fairly and, particularly, to lower the levels of nuclear arms.

Tomorrow in Geneva, American negotiators will sit down with their Soviet counterparts to begin the most important arms talks in which our nation is likely to participate for the rest of this decade. I'm pleased that negotiations will begin as scheduled. Weeks of painstaking preparation have now been completed, and although in the interest of confidentiality I can't go into the details of our negotiating positions, let me assure you of this: Our team stands ready to put forward concrete and constructive proposals. And they will in turn respond to good-faith Soviet proposals with flexibility and an active interest. We earnestly hope that the Soviets are equally prepared for serious give-and-take.

Our goal for the medium term, if research goes as we expect, is to discuss how the United States and the Soviet Union can move away from sole reliance on the threat of nuclear retaliation toward greater reliance on defenses which threaten no one.

As our negotiators begin their work in Geneva, we at home must remain firm in our resolve to maintain an adequate deterrent to war. Our negotiating flexibility must be coupled with firmness and resolve if it is to be effective in producing the outcome we all desire: radical reductions in nuclear weapons, as a step toward the ultimate goal of eliminating them.

In Geneva we face a long and difficult road. To travel it, we'll need strength, patience, and allied unity. The effort will be great, and the final destination, which will so heavily depend on the Soviet intentions, is uncertain. But the road before us is the road of peace, and on that we dare not hesitate or falter.

So, I'd just like to close by saying: Let us travel it together, Americans united as never before. We have sent a congressional delegation, Members of the Senate and the House over there of both parties, for the sole purpose of impressing on the Soviet Union that when it comes to the water's edge -- we aren't Democrats or Republicans, we're Americans.

Soviet policy is really determined by a dozen or so individuals in the Politburo. They are the ones who chose him. It is a collective government. And while an individual once chosen by them can, undoubtedly, influence or persuade them to certain things that might be particular theories or policies of his, the government basically remains the same group of individuals.

Q. Mr. President, the question of Nicaragua and Cuba is in the minds very much of people from south Florida, as I am. If, for any reason, sir, if in Cuba there would be a change of that leadership, for instance, try to change the leadership of the regime of Cuba by overthrowing Castro, would the United States help that new government to give freedom a chance in Cuba?

The President. Well, I think all of us dream of a Cuba that will one day recognize that it should be once again a member of the American states in the Western Hemisphere and not a satellite of the Soviet Union.

Now, there have been statements by Castro at one time or another to the effect that he wanted to talk better relations with us. We followed up on those every time, and every time there's been no substance, only sound.

So, we'll continue to hope. I don't know what the result would be. I'm rather hesitant in my position now to say something that might -- if you're looking far afield -- might bring about some abortive undertaking that would cause great tragedy to a lot of people. But just let me say that we believe that Cuba belongs back in the Organization of American States, and it can only get there by becoming a democracy instead of the totalitarian government that it is.

The President. Well, no, as of 4 a.m. this morning, I started thinking about it after the phone call came. And no, I had a feeling -- first of all, there's an awful lot on my plate right now that would have to be set aside. I didn't see that anything could be achieved by so going. And we discussed it in the office this morning. But, no, I leaned the other way, that we have heads of state coming here; I have at the end of the week -- I'll be leaving for Canada for a meeting that's been set up for a long time there, things of that kind. And I didn't see where I could do it. And the Vice President is already in Europe, so that it would seem very logical for him to do that.

The President. Well, we have to believe that there will be a change. And this is one of the reasons why we're hoping we can still persuade the Congress to support us in our desire to support the contras that I call freedom fighters there, because these are people who are participants in the revolution that overthrew Somoza. And then they were thrown out of the revolution that they had helped bring about.

They did much as Castro did in Cuba in the beginning -- the Sandinistas, I mean. They simply took over that revolution, and they have violated their promise to the Organization of American States. They asked for help from the Organization in getting Somoza to step down. And he did step down at the request of the Organization, and that ended the bloodshed. And in doing that, they had promised the Organization of American States that their goal was democracy: free elections, free labor unions, freedom of the press, observance of human rights, as should be in a democracy. And they have violated every one of those promises with a totalitarian form of government.

The President. Very much so, and I was with the previous three also. [Laughter] I was ready to have a meeting -- and as they themselves said, at such a time as you could have a legitimate agenda and not just have a meeting to get acquainted.

But I'm looking forward to this, and -- I can give you one figure that would kind of spell out what my problem has been, because there have been some who've wanted to criticize me in contrast with previous Presidents.

So, you know, you have to wait for a new man now to get in place and establish his regime, and then I'll be more than ready because I think there's a great mutual suspicion between the two countries; I think that ours is more justified than theirs. And I -- at my own table here I spoke of -- reminded of the fact that when World War II ended and we had the monopoly of the nuclear weapon and our industry was intact and had never been bombed into rubble as it had in most of Europe, if we really were the aggressor the Soviets accused us of being, we could have taken anything in the world then, and no one could have stopped us. And we didn't do it, instead we went abroad with the Marshall plan to help everyone, including our erstwhile enemies.

Angola and yes, in Cuba and Nicaragua. So, I'd like to have a talk and see if some way we can't some day have a meeting of minds and recognize that we -- well, that delegation that's just going home from here -- I asked the leader of that delegation when they were going to go to Texas and California to see if they couldn't look at the American people -- the people around them, the working people of this country -- and ask themselves if they thought there was any way that Americans would rather be in a war than living the way we live. And they didn't get much time to look at that.

The President. I can't tell you in detail what we're doing, obviously, because those four lives are at stake. So, everything we're doing is trying to find where they're located. We have appealed to others that we believe have some influence with the terrorists who kidnaped them to begin with, and particularly since the one escaped. And we're doing, as I say, everything that we can. We can't give details on that. We must not do anything to endanger their lives. But terrorism is a new form of warfare, and all we can do is try to meet it with intelligence efforts -- to find out, if we can, where retaliation can take place, but, also, to work closely with our allies and other countries in the world because it's becoming more and more evident that there are some sovereign governments who are backing this terrorism. And if that's the case, then we would know exactly where to retaliate for terrorist deeds.

I've just been told that I can't take any more questions here, and you thought that I was the most powerful fellow here, didn't you? [Laughter] No, I'm sorry. It's just like a press conference. But I want to tell you, your questions were great, and I appreciated them very much. And if any of you had one particular one and you wanted to get it -- drop a line and we'll send it to you in writing.

Although the problems which divide our countries are many and complex, we can and must resolve our differences through dialog and negotiation. Our two delegations are sitting down in Geneva to begin negotiation on how to reduce and eliminate nuclear weapons. We must seize the opportunities for peace. We need to find ways to reduce the threat and use of force in solving international disputes. We must also establish a working relationship that builds greater trust and cooperation between us. I hope that the Soviet leadership will join with me with renewed dedication to create a firm and durable basis for better relations between our two countries.

Kuznetsov, on the death of Chairman and General Secretary Konstantin Ustinovich Chernenko. In his message the President reaffirmed his commitment to peace and to working for a cooperative relationship with the peoples of the Soviet Union and the Soviet Government. The President called upon the Soviet leadership to seize the opportunity offered by the negotiations about to begin in Geneva to make progress toward our shared goal of eliminating nuclear weapons from the face of the Earth.

In our relations with the Soviet Union, the United States has three basic goals: to reduce significantly the unacceptably high numbers of weapons which now exist; to eliminate the use and the threat of force in international relations; and to develop greater trust and confidence in our relations with the Soviet Union overall. Our nations share an interest in the development of stable and constructive relations for the long term.

We believe that the problems which exist in U.S.-Soviet relations can be resolved and that progress is possible in the near term. We cannot achieve progress singlehandedly, but we will do our part to bring it about. The United States hopes to work with the Soviet leadership to build on common interests in order to help create a better and safer world.

Sciences, School of Pharmacy, University of Mississippi. He has served as a consultant for various government agencies and private firms in the United States, Mexico, and Canada, as well as for the United Nations.

As close friends and partners in peace, we've had a good discussion, including a thorough review of developments in the Middle East area. The substantial economic and military assistance that we're requesting for Egypt reflects our strong commitment to Egypt's security and economic well-being.

U.S. assistance to support rehabilitation of Egypt's infrastructure, $300 million in balance-of-payments support which will enable Egypt to buy needed goods from the United States. Egypt faces economic difficulties, and as your friend and full partner in the Middle East peace process, we'll be giving careful and sympathetic consideration to what we might do to help.

Recently, President Mubarak, you've made suggestions which have helped renew interest in the peace process. I regard them as a positive contribution, and I appreciate the constructive spirit in which you offered them. We note particularly your realistic assessment that the path to peace between Israel and its Arab neighbors is through direct negotiations.

United Nations Security Council Resolution 242, which provides both for the restoration of Arab land and the right of Israel, as all states in the region, to live in peace within secure and recognized borders. As reaffirmed in my initiative of September 1st, 1982, the United States also believes that the outcome of this process must recognize the legitimate rights of the Palestinian people.

Let us hope that the positive trends that have recently begun in the region will be strengthened and, that with Egypt's valued help, they will open the path to direct negotiations. In the full knowledge that the parties are still a long way from the negotiating table, the United States takes an active interest in these developments, and we'll support the parties' efforts to build on this promising beginning.

As ever, I found the conversations were most constructive and rewarding. Our friendly meeting today reaffirmed my belief that you are a man of honor and vision. It's a good omen that our meeting today coincides with the 150th anniversary of the establishment of relations between our two countries. Throughout these years we have endeavored to set up a model for cooperation among nations. Our bilateral relations are moving from good to excellent. We encounter no problems in setting the stage for more cooperation, which is equally profitable.

We conduct our relations on the basis of mutual respect and profound understanding. Your appreciation of the efforts the Egyptian people are exerting on the road of economic development and reform is recognized by every Egyptian. On the other hand, your commitment to peace and justice in our part of the world is unwavering. I am pleased to note that we agree, together, on the centrality of the Palestinian question to the situation in the Middle East. It is the key to progress and the source of despair and tension. Hence, we should devote ourselves to reaching a just and honorable solution, therefore, without delay.

I believe that no nation is more qualified than America to support the Palestinian peoples' right to self-determination. This is a stand that is consistent with the American heritage and values. This country was founded on the principle that all men are equal and were created by God Almighty to live in freedom and dignity.

I also believe that no leader is more equipped to play an historic role and fulfill a sacred mission in the Middle East. Destiny has chosen you to lead this great nation at a time when a golden opportunity for peace is emerging.

The Jordanian-Palestinian agreement to pursue a peaceful settlement is a major development that should not be discounted or discarded. We cannot afford another missed opportunity for peace, and not during your Presidency. I'm confident that the United States will act without delay in order to keep the momentum going and to pave the way for further progress. We have discussed the variety of available options for following up this move.

In the months ahead we shall work together as faithful partners on the road to peace. We shall persevere in our drive which aims at bridging the gap existing between the positions of the parts and ushering in a new era of peace and reconciliation.

Reagan, during the past few years you offered your help to African countries suffering from the drought and famine; this has been appreciated by fellow Africans. May I suggest that the United States champions a worldwide effort to cope with the problem on a long-term basis. May I also express our confidence that the United States will spare no effort in order to help end the plight of our brothers in southern Africa and secure the immediate independence of Namibia.

President Mubarak's visit here underscores the special bonds of friendship that have developed over many years between Egypt and the United States. Our two countries are partners in a broad range of endeavors, most notably as full partners in the search for a lasting Middle East peace.

Egypt's indispensable leadership position in the area is reflected in its important dialogs with two key countries -- Israel and Jordan. And, after all, we're engaged in a process that can only advance with the support of those directly concerned. In this respect, Egypt is uniquely equipped to help reconcile differing points of view and build the solid bridge of confidence necessary for progress.

Mr. President, as you recently emphasized, the path to a peace that recognizes the legitimate rights of the Palestinian people is through direct negotiations. The inescapable basis for such negotiations is U.N. Security Council Resolution 242, which provides both for the restoration of Arab land and for the right of Israel and all states to live in peace within secure and recognized borders. The challenge now is to clear the way so that negotiations can begin. We shouldn't underestimate the obstacles -- we never have -- but we shouldn't be daunted by them either.

And, Mr. President, you've wisely stressed the need for practicality. In our quest for peace, we reaffirm with you that in all stages of the negotiating process there should be Palestinian participation. As we've said many times before, these Palestinians should include representatives from the West Bank and Gaza and other Palestinians as mutually agreed to by the parties.

Now, these are wide parameters; they provide ample scope, and they should be put to use. And in this context we especially welcome the improvement in the Egyptian-Israeli dialog. And the integrity of this relationship is the cornerstone of the peace process.

Today we had a working session and a working lunch. I pursued the work by having two sessions in the Congress, where I met with friends in both the Senate and the House. It was a full working day, and I take it that you thought that we deserve to have this dinner and to see this magnificent, newly redecorated quarters in the State Department -- another good piece of work of my friend, George Shultz.

President Reagan, in my remarks today, as we departed after lunch, I referred to the establishment of formal Egyptian-American relations 150 years ago. There is, however, another aspect to this event: the role of individual Americans who began to visit Egypt since the early years of last century. Most of them were fascinated by the history of our people and of our land. They wanted to unravel the mystery of all the Egyptian civilizations. They sailed down the Nile. They lived by the monuments. They recorded their observations in articles and in letters. Some of them returned home with samples of antiquities, and some even remained and were employed by the Egyptian Government. The Washington Monument, which stands marvelously in your capital, was inspired by those early Americans who came to admire Egyptian obelisks. Thus, many achievements in American-Egyptian relations took place particularly on the human and the cultural levels.

The movement has not been confined to Americans traveling to Egypt; but Egyptians also traveled and even settled in America. In fact, a new phenomenon was born: the immigrant Egyptian settling in America. I am happy and proud to see many of them, all walks of American life: university professors, doctors, scientists, engineers, workers, et cetera. I am sure, Mr.

There is also something else to it that brings our peoples together. It could be a certain sense of optimism about life whose root is faith in God. I was touched during this visit by a distinguished Congressman who told me that he noticed the warmest friendly relations between the Americans and the Egyptian peoples even when our former relations were under strain for a brief period in the past.

Today Egyptian-American relations provide in their intensity an ever-greater example of solid friendship, based on mutual respect and whose objective is nothing more noble than strengthening the cause of peace in our part of the world. We both share an irreversible commitment to bring total peace to an area whose peoples have long suffered from conflicts and violence. Nothing is more worthwhile than an investment in peace. In the interdependent world in which we live, such an investment becomes even more precious, if not indispensable. It is in that sense that the American-Egyptian partnership is a partnership for peace in the Middle East and, as such, offers the greatest contribution to the world peace.

President of the great Nation by such an impressive majority of the American people. What stands behind that are great American values: faith in God, faith in human ingenuity, courage, and enlightened patriotism.

Dear President and dear friends, may I ask you to rise in a tribute of admiration and respect for the President of the United States, President Ronald Reagan, and for his great country, the United States, and the great American people. And thank you.

She is an author and editor whose essays and reviews have, over the past two decades, appeared in a number of periodicals including Harper's, the Atlantic, Esquire, and the Saturday Review. She has been a regular contributor to Commentary and is the author of three books.

She was one of the founders of the Coalition for a Democratic Majority, of which she is a past national chairman, and a cochairman of the Advisory Committee on European Democracy and Security. She is presently the executive director of the Committee for the Free World.

It's good to be meeting with you again. In the last 4 years, the American Business Conference has been a staunch and much-appreciated ally in the battle to liberate our economy from the old ideas of overtaxation, overspending, and government control. But as we've been seeing recently in Congress, old habits die hard, very hard.

The defense budget has also become a convenient scapegoat for those in Congress who aren't willing to face up to the tough budget decisions. The fact is, however, that the recent growth in the deficit has nothing to do with defense spending. I know that's going to be hard for some to believe in view of all that you're hearing and that has been printed. But in the last 2 years the projected defense spending we had projected for the fiscal year 1985 has decreased by $26 billion in real terms. Now, this wasn't waiting for someone up on the Hill to do it. We ourselves and the Defense Department found that we could reduce that much by differences in management and inflation and things that had happened. And during that same period, while that was going down $26 billion, expected total revenues for this year have increased $30 billion in real terms.

But projected nondefense, nondebt service spending has increased about double that amount -- around $60 billion. It seems that despite all the rhetoric about the deficit, Congress has been carrying on its old pork-barreling politics as usual. We're now seeing dramatic growth in our economy, the kind of growth that used to be called impossible. Revised figures for '84 show a 6.9-percent increase in the gross national product, but no economy can grow faster than Congress can write a check.

While I'm on the subject, let me say that we just need your support for our strategic modernization program, especially the Peacekeeper-MX. The Peacekeeper's already included in the budget. It's shortsighted in the extreme to try to make savings by cutting out a program so essential to our national security and to the success of our arms reduction talks that are now underway in Geneva. The effort of some to cut the Peacekeeper is just another example of scapegoating by those who are unwilling to face up to their budget responsibilities.

If special interest group pressures on Congress are too great for them to get spending under control, let's do as Senator Mack Mattingly has proposed and give the Presidential line-item veto a 2-year trial run. That's all that he's asking for. Let's try it for a couple of years; see if it works.

Somebody's got to stop this spending splurge, and I'm willing to take the political heat. To tell you the truth, I'll enjoy it. [Laughter] Somebody has to start looking out for the long-term interests of the American people as a whole.

Later in this session of Congress, we'll be presenting our proposals for tax reform that will lower tax rates, broaden the tax base, and make the tax code simpler and fairer. We're looking at a top rate on personal income taxes of 35 percent, very possibly less. And we'll be sure that incentives for capital formation are maintained. And I just want to reemphasize one thing: Tax reform will not be a tax increase in disguise. We're also moving forward on the new GATT negotiations -- a series of trade liberalization talks with our trading partners, developed and developing alike.

These three initiatives -- tax reform, budget control, and trade liberalization -- are the heart of our economic program. And taken together, they can produce an economic renaissance in this country. With the political will to carry these programs through, I'm convinced that we can grow stronger and faster than even the most optimistic economists are predicting.

We can look back to the midsixties to see another period of dramatic growth liberated by tax cuts and trade liberalization at that time. But we have an advantage they didn't have back then. Today's economy is being powered by a high-tech explosion whose effects are only beginning to be felt.

One such case is the story of Gene Amdahl, the inventor of what many consider the most successful computer ever built. Back in the seventies he decided to start his own company, but he couldn't find the venture capital that he needed in this country, and he was forced to go to Japan, to a large, high-tech competitor in Japan. They gave him the money in return for his ideas.

One of the first rules of economics is if you tax something, you get less of it. High tax rates discourage work, risk-taking, initiative, and imagination. And they're really a tax on hope, optimism, and our faith in the future. And they penalize the very people that give the most -- the risk-takers, the entrepreneurs who create whole new businesses and industries, often out of no more than a dream and some hard work.

Air Corporation, came to this country as immigrants. Entrepreneurs such as these may have started with very little, but they have added immeasurably to the wealth and the prosperity of our nation. They took hold of the opportunity that America offers, and they used it to create opportunity for others.

I got a letter from one such entrepreneur a few days ago -- well, let's say it's a week or so ago -- and they'd mentioned -- he and his partner mentioned what a pleasure it would be if someday they could come in and say hello. And I turned some people loose on this, found out that they had a business trip planned -- those two partners -- to Richmond, and so I had Kathy [Kathleen Osborne, Personal Secretary to the President] get on the phone and tell them that if it was possible for them to come by way of Washington, I'd be very happy to see them. I was kind of curious to see them, two very bright young fellows and their lovely young wives. They came in, and the reason I was intrigued was that the fellow's name who wrote to me was Cain. And he told me that he and his partner started a business in 1981 with $1,000 capital between them. And everybody told them they could never make it. Last year they did a million and a half in business and are expecting to do $2.5 million this year. And isn't this typical of entrepreneurs in America? The White House operators were kind of awestruck when they called me back to tell me that I had them on the phone, that they were there to talk to me, because their business is now known as Cain and Able. [Laughter] He found a fellow named Able and -- [laughter]. Cain and Able, an electric company -- [laughter] -- have 35 employees.

Taxes are simply the price of government, and democratic governments just like businesses exist in a highly competitive environment. Individuals are constantly making choices about the quality and extent of their participation in the taxed economy. Do high taxes make hard work less rewarding and increased leisure more attractive? Do they make investment less profitable and competition relatively cheaper? Do they channel the remaining investment out of the productive sector into tax shelters and nontaxable assets? And, finally, does the taxed economy begin to lose out altogether to an expanding underground economy?

This was the story of the high-taxed decade of the seventies when more and more Americans decided that the price of government was simply too high. But just as businesses can increase profits by cutting prices and expanding their share of the market, governments can increase revenues by cutting tax rates and expanding the tax base.

This is what Japan did between 1954 and '74 when they cut effective tax rates practically every year. These were, of course, years of unparalleled prosperity for Japan that catapulted them out of the league of underdeveloped nations and into the front ranks of the world's leading economic powers.

Our historic tax cut in '81 gave the United States the same kind of upward push. It's no accident that revenues increased by 11 percent in 1984, which was the first full year when all three elements of our tax cut were in place. There's no better time than now to follow through with a tax reform that will continue to stimulate the entrepreneurial genius of the American people.

But the American Business Conference and other companies that are on the cutting edge of our economy know the importance of the growth scenario of tax reform, budget control, and trade liberalization. We're poised on the threshold of an era of unrivaled prosperity, and we'll be looking to you for your support in the crucial months ahead to make it happen.

I am pleased to sign today H.R. 1251, which will release over $7 billion in urgently needed highway and transit construction funds. States can now move forward with projects to close the remaining gaps in the interstate system, and our goal of completing the interstate system by the early 1990's is once again attainable.

H.R. 1251 does not increase our deficit projections because expenditure of these funds is already anticipated in the 1985 and 1986 budgets. Furthermore, this spending is backed by fees paid by highway users who will benefit from highway improvements.

I recognize that many Members of Congress were faced with some hard decisions in supporting this legislation. I am pleased with the courage they showed in laying aside numerous provisions of considerable importance to them in order not to further delay release of these funds. It was a truly bipartisan effort, and I especially thank the leadership on both sides of the aisle in the Senate and House whose efforts made this possible.

You know, I've been accused, I know, of being a believer in Norman Rockwell's America; and that's one charge that, as a smalltown boy and a reader of the old Saturday Evening Post, I've always willingly pled guilty to that charge. But looking over your membership leads me to think that many of you are also among the guilty parties. The interests and the readerships that you represent are as wide and ranging as the makeup of our nation itself. That's just another indication of the diversity and the excellence that is so characteristic not only of America but especially her journalistic past and present -- another sign that where freedom prospers, many good things happen.

But actually, though, I've noticed that some stories recently suggesting some remarks of mine on taxes, defense, and freedom in our hemisphere have been, well, shall we say, plain and direct. And as I said at the start of my last press conference, we have an obligation now to be as candid as we were last fall when these issues were very clearly debated and, I think, emphatically decided by the people.

And then, too, I think those of you in the press like a little candor now and then, especially if it's emanating from Washington. Seems that 25 of San Francisco's top bootleggers -- this is a little story to illustrate what I've just said about candor -- they were arrested back there in those days of the Volstead Act. And as they were being arraigned, the judge asked the usual question, of course, about their occupation. And the first 24 were all engaged in the same professional activity.

Well, just like that bootlegger, this administration can make a pretty strong claim to being straightforward about its aims and views. And business is good because, unlike those realtors, we haven't been shy about where we stand. I think this has something to do with the mandate that we received last November.

You may remember a few years back, all of us were very much in need of some straight talk and decisive action. The economic pie was shrinking, and everybody was arguing about how to cut up and distribute a pie that was getting smaller everyday.

Government had grown too big, intrusive; and it seemed that government was subjecting everything we did to more rules, regulations, codes, and legal or quasi-legal proceedings. We were headed for a society where people spent more time getting around things than they did accomplishing them; where achievements were rare, but complaints many; where nothing functioned, but everything was discussed. Merit and excellence, enterprise and innovation, hard work and reward were being replaced by grievance and litigation, chatter and procedure, and gab and process.

Business frequently reacted to competition not by devising a better mousetrap but by filing a lawsuit. In fact, we lived in an era in which if you built a better mousetrap, the Government came along with a better mouse. [Laughter] And some businesses tended to concentrate not on their customers and how to improve for them its products and services but how to manipulate their cash flow or take advantage of inflation or the tax laws and report short-term profits and, ultimately, illusory gains.

On this point, let me mention that during the debate over the Kemp-Roth bill in 1981, we pointed out that a piece of legislation's most important effects were sometimes not easily recognized or quantified, didn't become immediately apparent, that sometimes its very passage, however, can send out a subtle message and create long-term changes in a political or economic culture that are infinitely more important. We said then that in adopting our economic recovery program, especially the tax rate cuts, we would be setting loose forces whose power could not be fully estimated at the time. I borrowed a phrase from George Gilder and called it the X factor: That spirit of enterprise and creativity that is sparked by the knowledge that government was no longer going to monopolize the future and rob hard-working people of their just rewards -- a spirit that could spark not just an economic recovery but an exciting economic expansion.

Well, we saw the X factor do just that. And I hope that you'll keep this in mind as we move ahead during the next few months with the second phase of our economic reforms, especially tax simplification. I also hope that as you see the special interests concentrating on the short-term effects and asking for special dispensations, you'll keep in mind the importance of keeping tax simplification simple. We need to take the long view, to keep in mind what we might call X Factor II or the Son of X Factor -- that long-term change in economic climate that tax simplification would cause and the creative forces it would release.

So, I think we have before us in tax simplification a tremendous opportunity to further the spirit of enterprise and growth as well as to complete the greatest deregulatory task of them all: to haul ourselves out of the morass that is the Federal tax code. And believe me, this administration intends to push for passage of tax simplification this year.

I'd like to believe, too, that in our foreign policy we've shown steadiness and consistency. I remember that early in the last term some people were a little bit critical of our emphasis on the danger posed to freedom by totalitarian expansion. But if you'll look at the record, you'll see that, while we didn't underestimate the dangers before us, we were taking very early on a view of things that was basically optimistic.

When Prime Minister Thatcher first visited us in February of '81, I mentioned then that totalitarianism had spent its moral energy and that perhaps, like Churchill at the height of World War II, he could sometimes turn our thoughts to a time of ``bright, sunlit uplands.'' Well, when totalitarianism then was only a distant and tragic memory, I can remember, too, a few months later the reaction of the students at Notre Dame when I suggested that, in a sense, the struggle between freedom and totalitarianism was always biased in favor of the democratic side -- democratic with a small ``d'' -- that the moral worth and elementary appeal of freedom appeals to everything that's great about the human spirit; communism does not.

The tides are running again in the cause of freedom, but this doesn't necessarily mean the whole world has grown less dangerous. And that's why our position in the arms talks in Geneva is critically important. So, too, our defense buildup and Secretary Weinberger's budget proposals are critical to the success of those talks, indeed, to the safety of the world. Nothing could endanger us more than a perception in the East that America, after making so much progress, was suddenly losing her will to keep the peace and negotiate from strength. And that, in a few words, is the importance of the upcoming MX vote.

The Soviets will be following the vote on the MX with keen interest. And the signal to them will be unmistakable. America will be seen as united and ready to negotiate if the MX moves forward or returning again to vacillation and weakness if the MX fails.

That's particularly true in Central America where a democratic revolution in Nicaragua was hijacked by a small cadre of Marxist-Leninists. They are totalitarians. They share an all too familiar obsession with personal power, and they hold to a prideful and corrupt desire to rule and dominate the lives of others. We owe those who oppose these totalitarians the best assistance that we can give them.

Q. Mr. President, Mr. Stockman said this morning that he found a lot of good things in the package passed by the Republicans on the Senate Budget Committee last night. Would you be willing to accept some moderation in the defense increases as part of a total package that came out of Congress?

The President. I've seen the general statement made in the press. I have not yet had time to look at the -- in detail -- what it was the Senate Committee came up with. So, I don't know what it is they've called for with regard to the defense budget. But I'd like to call your attention to just one thing about the defense budget, where it is different than anything else. I know over the years we've been accustomed to seeing Congress, anytime they needed money for another program or some favorite of theirs, to say, ``We can get it from the defense budget.'' And that's how we got to the position we were in in 1980, where half our airplanes on any given day couldn't fly for lack of spare parts or pilots, where ships couldn't leave port in the Navy because they didn't have enough noncommissioned officers left on board. And we started out to do something.

But I'd also like to point out that we have been conscious of the elimination of waste and fraud in the Federal Government, undue extravagance. Because right now our request for the 1986 budget is $26 billion less than our own projection for that budget 2 years ago. Congress didn't do that, we've done it.

And when you see those stories or even print some about $400 hammers, let me point something out that hasn't been noticed. Those figures were true. But that's what has been going on. We're the ones that are providing those figures because we're the ones that are finding the $400 hammers and doing something about it. And there have been hundreds of indictments, some imprisonments. There have been millions and millions of dollars, hundreds of millions of dollars in rebates made to us because we have been finding these things. And that's why, right now, our projected budgets are lower than the 5-year projected budgets of the previous administration.

And, so, I want to look very critically at what it is that someone there in the Budget Committee thinks we can do without. Have they actually specified something or are they just saying you can't spend as much money as you have listed?

Q. Mr. President, Secretary Gorbachev is of a different generation than his immediate predecessors, perhaps more pragmatic and worldly and less theological. You see all those private, high-level reports that, of course, we don't see. Do you have any reason to believe that he is fundamentally different from his immediate predecessors?

I think he has spoken out there to his own people about improvements in the economy there, particularly is he noted for advocating, you might say, more private venture in the agricultural section than the present system of government farms. And I look forward to dealing with him.

Union is in a different frame of mind than they've been in the past: That they are back at the negotiating table on arms reductions because they recognize a hard, cold fact, and that is that the United States isn't going to unilaterally disarm in the face of their military buildup.

And now that they know that they have to compete with us with regard to security needs, I think they've got a healthy respect for our technology and our industrial capacity and that they, I believe, are really going to try and, with us, negotiate a reduction of armaments.

That has never been done before. There have been agreements like the SALT agreements that only limited how fast you could increase. But this is the first time that they, themselves, have said they would like to see the elimination of nuclear weapons.

In that sports announcing, I also broadcast the Chicago Cubs games. And I was broadcasting something that still lives in the record books. It's never been equalled since. And that was when the Chicago Cubs only had one mathematical chance of winning the pennant, and they had to win the last 21 games of the season to do it. And the final series was with the team they had to beat for the pennant, and they did it. They came through straight, all 21 games. And it was quite an exciting experience. And then they lost 4 straight to Detroit. [Laughter] I've always said that I think, having been in athletics myself, it was the letdown after that other achievement that they couldn't get back up there. But it's also led me to hesitate to predict when they'll win a series.

Once the Protocol has entered into force, it is anticipated that the EEC will take the necessary steps to become a Contracting Party. At that time France will withdraw from the ICCAT. These actions are intended to recognize the competence of the EEC over fisheries matters on behalf of its member States and is consistent with the long-standing support of the United States for the process of European integration embodied by the EEC. Ratification by the United States will be necessary before the Protocol can enter into force, as the Protocol stipulates that all Contracting Parties must ratify the agreement in order for its provisions to take effect.

My decision to designate the Bahamas flows out of discussions held between this Administration and that nation regarding the designation criteria set forth in Section 212 of the CBERA. Our discussions with the Bahamas were concluded this past month.

The Bahamas have demonstrated to my satisfaction that its laws, practices, and policies are in conformity with the designation criteria of the CBERA. The government of the Bahamas has communicated on these matters by letter with Secretary of State Shultz and Ambassador Brock and in so doing has indicated its desire to be designated as a beneficiary (copies of the letters are enclosed). On the basis of the statements and assurances in this letter, and taking into account information developed by the United States Embassy and through other sources, I have concluded that the objectives of the Administration and the Congress with respect to the statutory designation criteria of the CBERA have been met.

I am mindful that under Section 213(B)(2) of the CBERA, I retain the authority to suspend or withdraw CBERA benefits from any designated beneficiary country if a beneficiary's laws, policies, or practices are no longer in conformity with the designation criteria. The United States will keep abreast of developments in the Bahamas and other beneficiary countries and entities which are pertinent to the designation criteria.

The President today announced the appointment of Alan Michael Kranowitz as Deputy Assistant to the President for Legislative Affairs. His primary responsibility will be liaison with the House of Representatives. He will join the White House in mid-March to effect a transition with Dennis Thomas, who will leave that post on April 5.

States of whom you, sir, are the great representative. Thank you. And St. Patrick's Day is a day which reminds us all of these ties of kinship and affection. This year, in particular, we recall with special pleasure your own visit to Ireland, your visit to Galway, my own hometown, sir, where you were given the freedom of the city, and your stay in Ashford Castle.

Ireland with a long tradition of silvermaking. Indeed, it is said -- a legend has it that Saint Finbarr, the patron of Cork and in a way the founder of the original settlement there, was himself a silversmith.

The President. Well, thank you very much. And I would like in return to present to you, before my remarks, this letter. And you will notice that there is a very special letterhead on this White House stationery.

And concerning Northern Ireland, I applaud and encourage the active Anglo-Irish dialog and support all those who are working for peaceful reconciliation there. And among them very prominently is Ambassador Tadhg O'Sullivan, who's working for that reconciliation.

And I can tell you that I know a little more about your victory than you think I do. I've heard about how Anthony Duckett, Emmanuel Jones, and Ernest Hall got together to control the boards; and I know that Robert Smith played with the flu; and I know that Sherman Douglas got 14 points; and I know Melvin Middleton played in spite of an injury that he received in the first play of the game. And I know that you faced a really strong and fine team in DeMatha -- do I have the name right on that?

We really are proud of you and of all the people who've helped you. I think you ought to be proud of your coach, John Wood, who, himself, graduated from Spingarn. And I hope you thank your assistant coach, Robert Burrell. This ceremony is part of a plot to wean him from his lollipops.

Spingarn has brought honor to this city. And even though Nancy and I came here just a few years ago -- we liked it enough to ask for a few more, as you know -- we feel like citizens or members of the city of Washington, and we personally feel that you've done us all proud here in this city.

I had hoped that there was going to be an opportunity -- you could have a little visit -- and I was reading about Reverend Jackson's appearance before your student body the other day, and I thought it was a very wonderful thing that he did with regard to drugs. I thought that was just great.

We found out, and we don't think that people with incomes of a hundred thousand dollars a year need your parents and others like them paying taxes to help put their kids through college. They ought to be able to do that themselves. And so what we've done is redirect the aid to people who really can claim a need for having help.

And we've set a cap so we can increase the numbers of -- $4,000 of student aid in the form of jobs, grants, so forth, which is the average across the country, total thing of tuition and fees and room and board and so forth -- all the State colleges and universities in the country.

This year I will be celebrating St. Patrick's Day with Irishmen from north of our border -- in a city more generally thought of for its French, not Irish, customs. Brian Mulroney, a great Irishman and Canadian, has invited me to participate in St. Patrick's Day festivities in Quebec City, and I look forward to sharing our Canadian friends' celebration of this very special day.

As we, all Irishmen, pay tribute to and revel in our shared heritage today, let us remember our kinsmen in the poetic ``land across the Irish Sea'' and reflect on how we can ensure that they too share fully in the blessings this great heritage has helped bring to us.

Is there a lovelier place on Earth? As a recent visitor, I must answer no. The whole island, from the glens of Antrim to the rugged coast of Cork, has a lyrical welcoming beauty, the memory of which a visitor will retain in his heart forever. Millions of Americans like me already know this; I hope that millions more will discover it.

Yet the tranquil beauty of the land itself is not sufficient to drown out the discord. We in America must make every effort to ensure that, whether knowingly or unknowingly, no material, financial, or psychological help originates from this side of the Atlantic for those who advocate and practice violence. As I have said on many occasions, such persons will find no welcome here. On the contrary, we have intensified our efforts to ensure that the United States is not the source of guns and money for such activities.

We encourage those who strive to peacefully resolve problems underlying the conflict. I also encourage Americans to let their foreign investment and vacation dollars find a profitable haven in the island, an approach that would benefit all. Indeed, we firmly believe that foreign investments, and the employment opportunities that would accompany such investments, can play an increasingly significant role in promoting peaceful change. In this regard, I urge that serious consideration be given to all economic as well as political proposals evolving from a spirit of consensus and reconciliation. We in the United States can be counted on to do our part to ensure that proposals which can be of assistance in promoting this process receive due consideration.

We applaud the increased political interchange in the last year regarding the Irish situation and hope that it leads to forward movement so that soon all Irishmen, whether on the green island or abroad, can share equally in the joy brought by a day like today in the United States, where it is marked by peace, friendship, and harmony.

Ray Donovan has not been convicted of anything; and, no less than any other American, he is entitled to the benefit of a presumption of innocence. While I agree with Ray that his need to devote himself fully to his defense now precludes his continuing in office, he leaves the Cabinet with my friendship and heartfelt gratitude for all of his efforts on behalf of this administration.

While I understand and appreciate your desire to devote yourself fully to your defense, I want you to know that you leave the Cabinet with my friendship and gratitude for the years of service you have given to this Administration -- and for the tireless efforts you have made in my campaigns.

Nancy and I are aware of the sacrifices you made to serve your country as Secretary of Labor, and the difficulties you and your family have endured. Know that in the days ahead, you and Cathy will be in our thoughts, and in our prayers.

President this country has ever elected. Under your leadership, we have renewed the vitality of our economy and restored our citizens' faith in this great Nation. I know your second Administration will continue on the path to ensure the economic and spiritual growth of America.

Tomorrow, in our first trip outside the States in this second term, Nancy and I will be heading north to visit our good neighbors in Canada. We're going at the invitation of Canada's Prime Minister Brian Mulroney, who is an articulate and effective defender of Canadian interests, a strong friend of the United States, and the best votegetter in his nation's history.

We're delighted that Brian Mulroney has chosen Quebec City, capital of his home Province, as the site of our meeting. With its old streets and charming ways, Quebec is one of the most intriguing corners of North America, right on our northeastern doorstep. Quebec is modern, too, supplying the United States with everything from electric power to aerospace parts for our defense industries.

States. Sometimes we overlook that fact. Sometimes our friendship and cooperation may not seem to warrant as much attention as the serious problems we're dealing with in other areas. But certain facts about our Canadian neighbors, with whom we share the world's longest undefended boundary, must never be overlooked.

We sold $45 billion in goods to Canada in 1984, which supported hundreds of thousands of jobs in the United States. Canada is our principal foreign supplier of natural gas and electricity, and Canada is the most important locale for our foreign investment. Walk around our cities and towns today, and you can see increased Canadian investment in real estate and many other parts of our economy.

Most important, the national security of the United States and of Canada are very closely interrelated. The commander in chief of the North American Aerospace Defense Command in Colorado Springs is from the States; his deputy is Canadian; and their staff is divided among U.S. and Canadian officers.

We will seek to strengthen our economic relations: Market-oriented policies without government interference hold out the best opportunities for our two countries to prosper as economic partners. So, we welcome Canadian investment in the United States and the Mulroney government's legislation to loosen restrictions on foreign investment in Canada, which is an important first step toward liberalizing Canada's own investment policies. It's the firm policy of this administration to resist protectionist pressures. So, we would like Canada and other countries to join us in a new round of multilateral trade talks in 1986.

We will encourage the sharing of our mutual defense responsibilities. Canada is a founding member of NATO, with a proud military history stretching from Vimy Ridge in France during the First World War to the skies over Germany in the Second, to the seas off Korea during that conflict. We're pleased with the commitment of Brian Mulroney's government to increase significantly Canada's overall contribution to our shared defense responsibilities.

On the quest for arms reductions and on other global problems, Canada's counsel will be a source of great wisdom and strength. The Prime Minister and I will exchange views on developments throughout the world, including the Geneva arms reduction talks and our own efforts to protect freedom, democracy, and peace in this hemisphere.

The United States is a pioneer in environmental protection, and we share with Canada a special responsibility for protecting our shared North American environment. The problem of acid rain concerns both our countries, and I'm anxious to hear the Prime Minister's views on that subject.

Today, more than ever, our progress, our partnership, and our friendship can be a model for others and a pattern for the future. Working together, Canada and the United States can accomplish great things for the cause of a safer, freer, and more prosperous world. And that's what our trip is all about.

Prime Minister, Mrs. Mulroney, thank you very much. Premier and Mrs. Levesque, distinguished ladies and gentlemen, and my friends, the people of Canada, it's a great pleasure to be here, for to be on Canadian soil is to be among friends, and Nancy and I are happy to return here.

Quebec. [And we are happy that our trip takes us to this beautiful city of Quebec.] Quebec is one of the most intriguing spots on the continent. Here New France was founded. Here French is the language of commerce, the arts, and everyday life. Here English Canadians and French Canadians came together over a century ago to set the foundations for a country in whose Parliament both French and English would be spoken. And here the Citadel and the walls of the old city remind us that Canadians and Americans long ago put aside their differences to become friends. In fact, we're more than friends and neighbors and allies; we are kin, who together have built the most productive relationship between any two countries in the world today.

This is my first trip outside the United States since I was sworn into a second term. Four years ago I took my first trip as President, and then, too, I came to Canada. And this is not a coincidence. For the United States there is no more important relationship than our tie with Canada. We're each other's most important economic partner. We each play an important role in world affairs. We share a responsibility for the protection of the continent that we peacefully share. We have a joint stake in its environment. And we're partners in space and in the technologies of the future.

Between two such independent and sovereign countries there will always be some differences, as there will always be opportunities for agreement. We can still use what Franklin D. Roosevelt, our last American President to visit Quebec City while serving at the White House, called for between us. He asked for frank dealing, cooperation, and a spirit of give-and-take. That's precisely what your Prime Minister and I will be engaged in here in Quebec. We will discuss many matters pertaining to the environment, economic growth, and our mutual security. We will discuss global affairs, including arms control.

Airport, where he was accorded a formal welcome with full military honors. In his opening remarks, the President referred to Premier Rene Levesque of Quebec Province. Following his remarks, the President went to the Chateau Frontenac Hotel, where he met with Prime Minister Brian Mulroney.

The Prime Minister. [In English] The President and I have had what I believe to be a very important discussion on the problem of acid rain. We have made a significant step forward, in that a matter that has been on the back burner really for the last 3 years has now been brought up forward, and I think on both sides we acknowledge that our problem is common in nature and requires a joint solution.

But to ensure that this matter -- this matter that the President and I both agree is of such great importance to our respective countries -- to ensure that this never finds its way again onto the back burner, we have agreed today to the appointment of two special envoys of great excellence and influence and uncommon access to us as leaders. They will carry the matters forward and I think help us achieve real results. They'll report to us on a regular basis. And I appreciate the President's commitment, as demonstrated by the caliber of his appointment, which he will announce momentarily.

For our part, the Government of Canada is particularly pleased to announce the appointment of the Honorable William G. Davis, former Prime Minister of Ontario, as our special Ambassador in this vital area.

So, therefore, the Canadian Government has already started its own national program in this respect. And it is with a great deal of delight that, in order that we ensure that this very vital question is no longer to be the poor one of the pack, both of us have designated personal Ambassadors, people of exceptional quality, to ensure that the matters be brought back to us at an opportune moment and on a regular basis. Therefore, I take great pleasure in confirming to the President of the United States the appointment of the Honorable William G. Davis, a former Premier of the Province of Ontario, as our Ambassador.

The President. Well, I'll only take a second here simply to endorse what the Prime Minister has told you. We're very pleased with the outcome of the discussion. We touched upon a number of things of interest, and we'll be dealing with those in the meetings to come tomorrow. But of particular concern to us was this issue of acid rain. And I'm very pleased with the envoys that have been chosen. The Prime Minister has named a man that -- I'm sure you all know his access to him -- and has a standing that will make him capable of carrying out what has to be a joint undertaking as the Prime Minister has said. And for our own part, my nominee -- and he has accepted -- is Drew Lewis, the former Secretary of Transportation, who has agreed to take on this task.

I think that it's very significant that our two countries should work together on all matters of environment, because entrusted to us is the care of a very unique continent and a very beautiful continent. And I think all of us share the desire to protect this for generations of Canadians and Americans yet to come.

During their tete-a-tete, the President and the Prime Minister discussed environmental matters at some length. They took note of the 75-year history of environmental cooperation between the two countries as exemplified by the Boundary Waters Treaty, the Great Lakes Water Quality Agreement and the recent Skagit River-Ross Dam Treaty. The President and the Prime Minister expressed their determination to continue to deal with U.S.-Canadian environmental issues in a responsible and cooperative spirit.

As we begin anew, we come again to be with friends. We come to share great dreams in a land where ``big'' is a word too small to describe the sweep of Laurentian peaks and prairie plains or the strength of Canadian spirit that tamed a giant continent and now looks to a future rich with promise.

When we look around the world today, when we see a scar of shame dividing families in Europe, east from west, and in Korea, north from south, see the anguish that aggression has wrought upon so many innocent lives across our planet, then, yes, we would do well to give thanks for the principles of democracy and human dignity that have cradled us with peace and showered us with abundance since the birth of our two nations.

Victor Hugo once observed: No army can stop an idea whose time has come. Well, today the tide of freedom is up, lifting our economies ever higher on new currents of imagination, discovery, and hope for our future.

We take a friendly neighbor's quiet pride in your campaign [Canadian] revival, and we share your great respect for the man doing so much to carry it forward, your Prime Minister and my friend, Brian Mulroney.

Canadians live at the top of North America, and sometimes we think of you as fellow homedwellers inhabiting the upper floors of the house. And we who live downstairs have heard some rumbling up here in that portion that we know to be Quebec. The changes in French Canada during the past 25 years, your revolution tranquille, propelled the transformation of Quebec into a modern community while emphasizing all along its French-speaking character.

In a unique referendum, the people of Quebec declared themselves Canadian and Quebecois. Now your long history as a French-speaking North American community is entering an exciting phase -- Quebec entrepreneurs competing across the continent, spreading business know-how with a French face.

There's a saying I've always liked: One should keep old roads and old friends. You have not strayed from the road of Canadian culture, from those good and graceful virtues that enrich your lives and keep you free to be kind and true, free to strive for progress and greatness, without surrendering your souls to a mad and mindless pursuit of the material.

Mes amis, the eyes of all America are on Canada. In our universities new programs for Canadian studies have been created, in our government new importance given to the Canadian-American relationship, and in our economy we feel Canada's heightened presence in our daily lives -- from Quebec electrical power to Alberta's oil and natural gas, and from your help in building our telecommunications industry to what many believe is the best beer in the world. [Laughter] We're with you, Mr. Prime Minister. We feel mighty grateful for Canada, and we always will.

At the heart of my nation's policies is one conviction, and please hear it well: No relationship is more important to the United States than our ties with Canada. We are by far each other's most important trading partner. Our two-way trade, the largest in the world, is valued at over $100 billion. We're allies. In North America and across the North Atlantic, we're proud to stand watch with you, and together we shall keep our people free, secure, and at peace. Above all, we're friends, and friends we shall always be.

Well, I believe your Prime Minister and I agree: Canada and America can invest together, grow together, and lead together. And leaders we shall be in a new partnership pointing toward the 21st century. That new partnership begins with our being more mindful of our need for close cooperation and constant communication, each of us carefully respecting the other's interests and sovereignty.

For our part, the United States has begun a great change in direction -- away from years of creeping socialism and ever-greater dependency that slowed our progress toward a new American revolution -- a peaceful revolution to be sure, rising from our conviction that successful action must begin with a vision of hope and opportunity for all.

The evidence is clear: Freedom works, incentives are key, and nations ignoring these principles will lose out in the economic competition in the 1980's and beyond. Japan, a devastated country after World War II, cut tax rates almost every year for two decades, producing an explosive, noninflationary expansion, making them a world economic power, and leaving Europe and North America falling behind. Other Pacific nations have also become champions for growth.

Let us, then, set our sights on a new vision: a renaissance of growth in a world come alive with entrepreneurial vigor; each nation trading freely with its neighbors; all of us together a mighty freedom tide carrying hope and opportunity to the farthest corners of the globe.

We in the States have tried to learn from our mistakes and show once again that nothing succeeds like freedom. Since our tax rate reductions took effect, we have enjoyed 27 straight months of economic growth and a record 7 million jobs, producing a dramatic increase in our purchases from other nations -- starting with Canada.

We know we must do much more to restrain the growth of government, break down barriers of trade, and become more competitive. And since tax rates, functioning as prices for producing, saving, and investing, are the keys to economic growth or decline, we're committed to an historic reform of our tax code, making America's aftertax rewards the brightest light for growth and stability in the industrialized world.

Protecting the environment is one of paramount concern to us both. The United States has the strictest auto emissions standards in the world, and during the last decade we spent over $150 billion to comply with our Clean Air Act. Emissions of sulphur dioxide are down nearly 30 percent, and nitrogen oxides are declining as well. But we must make further progress, and by acting reasonably and responsibly, we can and we will. Yesterday the Prime Minister and I issued a statement on our agreement to address together the problem of acid rain.

In all that we do, we seek to go forward with Canada as our partner, two leaders for progress through shared vision and enlightened cooperation. This afternoon at the Citadel, Prime Minister Mulroney and I will take further steps together to put our new partnership to work. We will issue a declaration on international security and sign a memorandum on the modernization of our North American air defense system. We will exchange the instruments of ratification that will bring the Pacific salmon treaty into effect, as he told you. We will sign a mutual legal assistance treaty which will aid law enforcement authorities in both our countries. And we will issue a declaration on trade.

The prosperity of Canada and the United States depends upon freer flowing trade within this continent and across the seas. We stand ready to improve further the Canada-U.S. trading relationship and to work with you to initiate a new multilateral trade round in early 1986.

Mr. Prime Minister, I'm confident there isn't an area where you and I cannot reach an agreement for the good of our two countries. Come to think of it, maybe there is one. I know it's a great concern to you, but I don't think I have the authority to send Gary Carter back to the Expos.

Canada can meet together the challenge of defending freedom and leaving a safer world for those who will follow. For more than 35 years, we and our European friends have joined together in history's most successful alliance -- the North Atlantic Treaty Organization. The world will not forget that Canada was in the forefront of the nations that formed and armed NATO.

Soviet aggression with conventional forces, the less likely such aggression will ever occur. NATO is engaged in a rebuilding program, and today I want to thank publicly Prime Minister Mulroney and the Canadian people for your commitment to enhance your contribution to NATO's conventional forces and our overall defenses.

Your deficit as a percentage of gross national product is bigger than ours, but you understand that protecting freedom is government's primary responsibility. And we salute Canadian wisdom and Canadian courage.

The United States will continue to pursue the arms control talks in Geneva with determination, flexibility, and patience. It is our deepest conviction that a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought. We must not rest in our search for a safer world dedicated to eliminating nuclear weapons, with technology providing ever greater safety, not ever greater fear.

We're enthusiastic about the research done so far on our Strategic Defense Initiative. The possibility of developing and sharing with you technology that could provide a security shield and someday eliminate the threat of nuclear attack -- it is, for us, the most hopeful possibility of the nuclear age, and we very much appreciate Canada's support on SDI research.

You know, it puzzles me to hear the Soviets describe research to protect humanity as a threat to peace. Their protests ring a little hollow. I did some research of my own and found that in 1967 former Soviet Premier Aleksei Kosygin said, ``The antimissile system is not a weapon of aggression or attack, it is a defensive system.'' And the Soviets took his words to heart and began investing heavily in strategic defense.

Let us all acknowledge that humanity will be far better served by moving away from offensive nuclear systems that kill people to nonnuclear defensive systems that protect people. We will be consulting closely with your government during these negotiations. And I have told the Prime Minister that I'm never more than a phone call away. As allies, we must maintain our unity and insist on agreements that are equitable and verifiable.

Yalta accord, pledging free elections, then proceeded to dominate Eastern Europe. They signed the Geneva Convention, banning use of chemical weapons; SALT II, limiting development of new weapons; and the ABM treaty -- but are now violating all three. And they signed the Helsinki accord, solemnly pledging respect for human rights, but then jailed the individuals trying to monitor it in the U.S.S.R.

Arms control is not the only issue on the East-West agenda, and the opening of the Geneva talks is not the only development in East-West relations. In most of our Western countries, our peoples can look forward to continued strong, stable governments, and our alliances are in good shape.

We have demonstrated unity and firmness in our dealings with the East. We're ready to work with the Soviet Union for more constructive relations. We all want to hope that last week's change of leadership in Moscow will open up new possibilities for doing this.

There's plenty to talk about -- in arms control, on regional issues, on human rights, and in our bilateral relations. My representatives in Moscow had good talks with Mr. Gorbachev, and Prime Minister Mulroney has given me his own assessment of the new Soviet leadership. If the Soviets are as ready as we are to take the other side's concerns into account, it should be possible to resolve problems and reduce international tensions.

Let us always remain idealists but never blind to history. Each of us -- I suspect that our lives grow richer and fuller as we help make other lives more secure and more free. We must never doubt the great good that Canada and the United States can accomplish together, never doubt for a moment our journey toward a world where someday all may live under freedom's star -- free to worship as they please, to speak their thoughts, to come and go as they will, to achieve the fullness of their potential, and yes, reach out to comfort those who have fallen with the godly gift of human love.

This is the idealist within us whose heart is pure and can power our journey with faith and courage. But the realist must be there, too -- our navigator at the helm whose eagle eyes discern each movement of the sky above and waves below. We must never stop trying to reach a better world, but we'll never make it if we don't see our world as it truly is.

We cannot look the other way when treaties are violated, human beings persecuted, religions banned, and entire democracies crushed. We cannot ignore that while Canadians and Americans have donated nearly $100 million from their own pockets to help feed starving Ethiopians, the Soviets and all their satellites have given almost no aid. But they continue to provide more than a half a billion dollars a year in military supplies that the Ethiopian Government is using against its own people.

These are painful realities, but history may well remember them as the birth pangs of a new, much brighter era. Brave men and women are challenging the Brezhnev doctrine that insists once a country has been taken from the family of free nations, it may never return.

Nicaraguan Communist regime as fought against Somoza. The weight of the world is struggling to shift away from the dreary failures of Communist oppression into the warm sunlight of genuine democracy and human rights.

Will history speak of freedom victorious? May we someday salute new heroes from nations reborn -- sons and daughters who might grow up to be like a Marc Garneau or Roberta Bondar, bringing honor to science and their nations; or perhaps like Andre Viger, who lost the use of his legs, but with his will of steel in a land of the free could keep on going to open six stores employing more than 40 people, many of them handicapped, and even win our Boston Marathon as well?

It'll depend on what we do or fail to do for the cause of millions who carry just one dream in their hearts: to live lives like ours, in this special land between the seas, where each day a new adventure begins in a revolution of hope that never ends.

You know, Prime Minister Mulroney once suggested that Americans and their President should be grateful for Canada. How can we not be grateful for the greatness of Banting and Best, of Mike Pearson, of young Steve Fonyo, and of so many we never knew. For the inspiration you give, for the success that you enjoy, and for the friend of America and friend of freedom that you will always be, yes, we say, thank God for Canada.

The Citadel of Quebec says so much about Canada and about the relations between our two countries. On this rock once flew the flag of France and then the flag of Britain. And today, the maple leaf flag symbolizes a united Canada.

Over two centuries ago Canadians and Americans battled one another in this city. But the walls surrounding us today were erected later for a war which never came. Canada and the United States put aside suspicion to build not only a lasting and permanent friendship but a great and productive relationship. Today the Citadel and other places like it in both our countries stand as monuments to a history of peace, good will, and cooperation.

Earlier today I suggested that Canada and the United States are forging a new partnership. This afternoon Prime Minister Mulroney and I have put that new partnership to work. The relationship between our two countries is complex and varied. The agreements we announced this afternoon reflect that variety.

We share the world's longest undefended border and the world's longest water boundary. Yet, more fundamentally, we share Earth's most bountiful continent. We're responsible for managing and preserving that common environment. We have a long history of cooperating in doing so. I'm personally committed to continuing this proud tradition. I know that our two governments share this commitment.

And I know that the issue of acid rain has received a great deal of attention in Canada. Let me simply say, cooperation on this issue is possible, and the appointment by the Prime Minister and by me of special envoys is another step forward. So difficult a problem deserves the best talent that our two governments can enlist.

For almost three decades the Distant Early Warning Line -- known as the DEW Line -- has been the northernmost edge of our early warning capability. It's been a vital part of the deterrent system which protects both our countries from attack, serving as a watchtower for NORAD. The technology of the DEW Line is now almost obsolete, but the need for an early warning line remains. Accordingly, the Prime Minister and I issued an agreement to modernize the North American air defense system.

Protecting the environment, defending our people, and ensuring that justice is done -- these are all special roles for government. Economic prosperity, however, requires the enterprise, work, and investment of the private sector. As each other's largest trading partner, Canada and the United States have long enjoyed profitable economic and commercial ties. And today Prime Minister Mulroney and I are issuing an important declaration which we expect will facilitate expanded trade.

We also exchanged the instruments of ratification for a U.S.-Canada Pacific salmon treaty. This brings a 15-year-old undertaking to a successful and mutually beneficial conclusion, as you've been told. The treaty will be a boon to our citizens along the Pacific coast. It symbolizes how we're able, with a combination of hard work and high-level attention, to turn an irritant in our relations into a form of cooperation.

We embark today on a joint effort to establish a climate of greater predictability and confidence for Canadians and Americans alike to plan, invest, grow and compete more effectively with one another and in the global market.

We are convinced that an improved and more secure climate for bilateral trade relations will encourage market forces to achieve a more rational and competitive production and distribution of goods and services.

Agreement on Tariffs and Trade as the cornerstone of our respective trade policies. We are determined to exercise the political will to make the open, multilateral trading system work better and to strengthen and extend the disciplines governing international commerce.

We believe that the challenge to our two countries is to invigorate our unique economic relationship. We intend to build on our success in resolving a number of disputes and achieve something of lasting significance to provide a model to other nations of the way in which two modern societies can work in harmony.

James Kelleher, Minister for International Trade, to establish immediately a bilateral mechanism to chart all possible ways to reduce and eliminate existing barriers to trade and to report to us within six months.

We have committed ourselves at Quebec to reinvigorate the defence and security partnership between the two countries. To reinforce deterrence and to reduce the risk posed by threat of nuclear attack, we agreed to strengthen continental defence, with particular reference to our joint participation in the North American Aerospace Defence Command. Accordingly, we concluded an agreement to modernize the North American Air Defence Surveillance and Warning System.

To permit systematic consultation and overall review, at the most senior levels, of arrangements bearing on the security of Canada and the United States, we resolved that the responsible ministers of our governments will meet together on a regular basis. We have also agreed to make greater use of the Permanent Joint Board on Defence, established at the historic meeting of Prime Minister Mackenzie King and President Franklin Delano Roosevelt at Ogdensburg forty-five years ago.

To provide for an effective use of resources and to aid both of our countries in bearing our share of the Allied defence burden, we reaffirm the Canada/United States Defence Development and Production Sharing Arrangements and agree to strengthen our North American defence industrial base. Recognizing the importance of access to, and participation of, Canadian firms in the U.S. defence market, we will work to reduce barriers, and to stimulate the flow in defence goods. We will seek to improve our joint access to information relating to defence procurement; we will explore ways to establish a separate designation for mobilization base suppliers for U.S. and Canadian firms, and we will seek to take greater advantage of flexibility inherent in second source suppliers. We will also undertake to establish a freer exchange between both countries of technical knowledge and skills involved in defence production, in order to facilitate defence economic and trade cooperation and joint participation in major defence programs. In this connection, we agree to strengthen our cooperation to ensure that transfers of strategic technology to our potential adversaries are effectively controlled. We have directed the responsible Ministers to give priority attention to all these issues and to provide a progress report within four months.

The security of Canada and the United States is inseparable from that of the European members of the North Atlantic Alliance. We remain fully dedicated to preserving the security of the Alliance as a whole through the maintenance of adequate military strength, an effective deterrent posture, and a stable balance of forces. We attach great importance to our continuing commitment to station Canadian and United States forces in Europe. We think it is essential to strengthen NATO's conventional capabilities and accordingly reiterate our determination to continue substantial real growth in expenditures for defence.

We share a commitment to deepening the dialogue among the Allies. Our Alliance draws strength from the unique and individual contributions of its sovereign members in the pursuit of our common goal of peace with freedom. The cohesion and political solidarity of the Alliance, maintained through frequent and timely consultations, remain the foundation for the protection of our common interests and values.

Significant, equitable, durable and verifiable arms control measures can play a role in strengthening strategic stability, maintaining our security at a lower level of force and armament, building trust and confidence between East and West, and reducing the risk of war. We have agreed to consider joint research efforts to strengthen our capacity to verify agreements on the control of armaments. We will work to gain agreement on effective measures in the international negotiations in Vienna, Geneva, and Stockholm, and we will strive, with the countries of Europe, to progress towards the aims enshrined in the Helsinki Final Act.

We further agreed that we can have no higher goal than the reduction and eventual elimination of the threat to peace, whether by nuclear or conventional means. Our aim is not to achieve superiority, but to enhance deterrence of armed aggression and bring about significant arms reductions between East and West. We seek a more stable world, with greatly reduced levels of nuclear arms. The prospect of an enhanced ability to deter war based upon an increasing contribution of non-nuclear defences against offensive nuclear arms has prompted the U.S. research effort embodied in the President's strategic defence initiative. We are agreed that this effort is prudent and is in conformity with the ABM Treaty. In this regard, we agree that steps beyond research would, in view of the ABM treaty, be matters for discussion and negotiation.

Dialogue and negotiation between the United States and the Soviet Union at Geneva provide a historic opportunity to set East-West relations on a more secure foundation. We hope that these negotiations will lead to major steps toward the prevention of an arms race in space and to terminating it on earth, limiting and reducing nuclear arms, and, ultimately, eliminating them everywhere.

The security of Canada and the United States is linked increasingly with that of other regions in the world. We will therefore encourage and support the strengthening of multilateral and international mechanisms for the control and peaceful resolution of disputes. We will vigorously oppose the exploitation of regional instability, and promote at the same time, each by our distinctive contributions, the social, economic, and political development essential to the achievement of a stable and enduring peace.

President Reagan. President Alfonsin, it is an honor today to welcome you to the United States. It was 26 years ago when the last Argentine President came to Washington on a state visit. I certainly hope that what we accomplish today will clear the path for increased good will and cooperation between our peoples in many more such visits, and let's make certain it's not another 26 years.

Argentina and the United States, though at different ends of the hemisphere, have much in common. The spirit of freedom and independence that freed the people of the United States, only a short time later, spread to Argentina. And your country is one of the oldest democracies of the hemisphere. The flame of liberty burned red hot in Argentina. And your country was the first on the continent to ban slavery. This was no mere coincidence, Mr. President; the Argentine people are the heirs of a great legacy. Similar to our own experience, Argentina was a frontier society, a land where people came from many parts of the world to better themselves and to live in freedom, an undeveloped land, yet one blessed by God with a richness of soil and resources. Our forefathers, here and in your country, shared the challenge of turning a wilderness into a modern nation.

Today we continue to share the challenge of maintaining the economic growth and development so vital to the well-being of our peoples. Keeping a national economy vital and robust requires hard work, vision, and commitment. It requires tough decisions today in order to make a better tomorrow. We appreciate here, Mr. President, the severe economic problems that you inherited.

Inflation and economic decline sapped our strength. Had we challenged our efforts into finding easy and short-term answers, had we looked to redistribution of existing wealth -- rather than creating more -- we would still be trapped in a seemingly endless morass. Instead, by focusing efforts on economic growth, increasing productivity, creating new incentives that encouraged citizens to work and save and invest, we unleashed a ground swell of economy-building activity in the private sector that turned decline into progress, inflation into stability, and national doubt into optimism and growth.

President Alfonsin, every country must make its own way and walk its own path, yet friends can and should help one another. The United States will do what we can to assist you in your efforts to improve the economic conditions of your country. Argentina, like the United States, is a land of few limits. Your people, educated and strong in spirit, have enormous potential. I can assure you in the strongest terms that the people of the United States want you and the people of Argentina to succeed and to prosper.

This prospect is made even more likely now that Argentina has returned to the ranks of democratic nations. As we've seen throughout the world, there was a strong relationship between freedom and economic development. Democracy frees the spirit of man to achieve, to build, and to create. It's the only system consistent with the decent and humane values at the heart of our societies.

Democracy means government derives its just powers from the consent of the governed. It means freedom of speech and religion, the freedom of assembly, and the rule of law. It's more than a form of government; it's a way of life, an ideal which seems to be a process, yet is an end in itself.

It's not the easiest system, but it is the most just, and it brings a better and a freer life for all. The spirit of democracy is not found in great halls or in marching armies but is enshrined in the hearts of the people.

Ninety percent of this hemisphere's population lives in democracies or in countries in transition to democracy. This trend, however, is threatened by Marxist-Leninists who continue, with the heavy support of the Soviet Union and Cuba, to undermine freely elected governments and democratic movements.

The vast majority of those fighting for true democracy in Nicaragua -- for freedom of speech, religion, and press -- actively opposed the former dictatorship. And the Nicaraguan people are joining the ranks of the freedom fighters. Nearly three times as many men are fighting the Communists right now as the Sandinistas had fighting Somoza before they seized power.

The free people of this hemisphere must not stand by and watch the Communist tyranny imposed on Nicaragua spread to the free lands of the Americas. We, like you, support the search for peace through the efforts of the Contadora group, strongly believing that if all 21 objectives were implemented, including the genuine democratization of Nicaragua, the Central American nations could live in peace and democracy.

Today democracy draws the people of the United States and Argentina, and all other Americans, closer in a bond of friendship and shared ideals. I welcome you, President Alfonsin, as an elected representative of your people and as a man committed to the political liberty we cherish so deeply.

As you have said, it's very important that we meet at this historical time when a real wave of democracy is going through Latin America. This is our hope, Mr. President: that the peoples of Latin America actually live in that respect and actually enjoy the prerogatives and the liberty that the people of the United States enjoy.

That's, on the other hand, what our Founding Fathers wanted for us -- both the Founding Fathers of the United States and those of Argentina. That's precisely what the men that gave us independence fought for, starting with General Washington in the North and General San Martin in Argentina.

As you know, as you said, Mr. President, it is necessary that these democracies actually achieve tangible economic results, so necessary to also achieve social democracy. That's why right next to hope, fear is also there in Latin America -- the fear that arises from nonsatisfied expectations of our peoples, our democracies having inherited very difficult charges in the economic order.

It's a debt that in my country reaches the $40 billion and that in Latin America reaches the $400 billion. That, of course, conspires against the democratic systems. That, Mr. President, is no doubt one of the big differences between our two countries.

For us, the philosophy you just mentioned -- the philosophy of the state of law, the respect of human rights -- that is equal to both of us. But a man, Mr. President, to be called such thing, not only has to have just the right to exercise his fundamental liberties; he also has to have the possibility of living a dignified life.

That's why, Mr. President, in Latin America we are ready to govern with the austerity that our times are demanding. We are making the necessary adjustments to suppress the obstacles of our economy, but we cannot make adjustments that will actually impose sacrifices on those who have less. It's different from those developed countries in which the entire GNP is received by only 50 percent; in our countries, it doesn't reach even the 40 percent. And to ask from our peoples in that precise sector a bigger effort is no doubt to condemn them to marginality, to extreme poverty, to misery.

Of course, then we would mean that the demagogues that are always there would find in the arms those simple satisfactions that democracy couldn't grant. That's why, Mr. President, it has been very important for me to listen to your welcoming remarks, because you've shown a deep understanding of our problems. I am indeed persuaded that it couldn't be otherwise.

I am indeed persuaded that the United States understands the development of democracy is, of course, entrenched in our country. That's why there's been great expectations about the dialog that we will start today.

We will talk about the present, and we will talk about the future. We, two Presidents elected by the will of the people, will get together. We will, of course, talk about bilateral subjects and also those items that regard the continent as a whole. And, of course, in our dialogs the subject of Nicaragua and Central America will not be absent.

I am convinced that it's through dialog that we will be able to reach peace. And on the basis of the principle -- a long-standing principle of international law in Latin America -- of nonintervention, that will give us, of course, the possibility of democracy and pluralism in democracy to succeed without extracontinental interventions and affirming, of course, the freedom of man.

We will talk about all this, Mr. President, and as I said, there will be two men freely elected by the will of our peoples. So, Mr. President, it will be a dialog of both our peoples. That way and because of them we will try to reach solutions. We will work for them, for our peoples. We will try to build the future that our peoples deserve.

Presidents Alfonsin and Reagan expressed their gratification and support for the spread and strengthening of democracy and individual freedom in the western hemisphere. They said the foreign policies of both countries are driven by the goals of peace, democracy, individual liberty, and the rule of law. They affirmed that the most just and lasting resolution of the major problems facing nations comes from leadership democratically chosen by the people in periodic free and fair elections, through the actions of independent legislatures and judiciaries and by close cooperation among democratic countries. Victories against poverty are more certain and peace most secure where people live by laws that ensure political and economic freedom. Both presidents confirmed that relations are warmest and cooperation closest with those countries which practice effective democracy with full regard for the fundamental social, political, economic and human rights for each individual. President Alfonsin said Argentina has instituted a new era of stable and strengthened democracy guaranteeing full protection of human rights. President Reagan reiterated that the United States attaches the highest priority to sustaining that democracy in Argentina.

But after lunch I'd like us to have a give-and-take. But before we eat, permit me to touch briefly on two issues: the budget and the Peacekeeper missiles. You knew I'd mention a couple of things like that.

Option one is a tax increase. Throughout the seventies, however, it was, in a large part, rising taxes that punished savings and investment and dragged our economy down. Then when our cuts in personal income tax rates restored simple economic incentives, the economy recovered, began the strongest expansion in more than three decades. And last year Federal revenues actually rose 11 percent.

Option two is a radical cut in defense spending. Yet already during the past 4 years, defense spending has been reduced by more than $150 billion below the 5-year plan that we produced in 1981. Indeed, our projected defense expenditures for 1985 are already almost $16 billion less than the figure the last administration had projected for 1985.

And that brings us to option three -- the cuts in domestic spending. And it's here that I think we must meet the needed reductions. It will be tough, yes. The record suggests that in a democracy the scaling back of domestic spending may well be the most politically difficult act a government can undertake. Yet when we succeed, we'll know that we fought the good fight with intelligence and skill and that we put our nation on a course of prosperity for decades to come.

We Republicans have not been entrusted with the White House and the Senate to make easy decisions but because the American people want us to wean our nation away from decades of growing dependency and political quick fixes. Together we can make the GOP the true majority party, the centerpiece for decades to come of a governing coalition based on liberty, limited government, and economic growth. To do so, however, this spring we must prove to the country that we can produce a sound and responsible budget, one that cuts the deficit and fosters continued economic vitality. So let us not shrink from this task or be seen to approach it with doubts and hesitations. Let us, instead, unite and rise to the challenge with vigor.

In 1981, as you know, I announced our strategic modernization program. This program was designed to redress the strategic imbalance that had been created during the 1970's, when our defense efforts went slack while the Soviets conducted the biggest military buildup in the history of mankind.

Although far from complete, the strategic modernization program is proving effective. The development of our new bomber, the B - 1B, is on track. Our new submarines, the Tridents, are on patrol in growing numbers. Before the decade ends, the Tridents will have improved missiles.

Despite these advances in the air and on the sea, however, there remains one important step: our strategic forces on the land. And today our land-based intercontinental ballistic missiles, or ICBM's, are technologically out of date. They're older, in many cases, than the Air Force men and women who are attending them. So, the Ford administrations -- four administrations, I should say, both Republican and Democrat, have proposed replacing our obsolete missiles with the MX. But political controversy has held up the actual installation of MX missiles for more than a decade.

While we debated, the Soviets deployed. Indeed, the number of MX-caliber missiles they have already in place is now higher than 600. Deployment of the Peacekeeper at this point, I believe, represents a simple necessity.

There's another point I must add here. Some of your colleagues have come up with the idea of simply putting a hold or a limit on MX production. Well, I strongly oppose those ideas, as the Soviets will see them for just what they are -- a collapse of American resolve.

On the Peacekeeper you have a clear choice. A no vote will gravely weaken our national defenses, waste the billions already spent on the Peacekeeper program, undercut our allies who have already stood firm in accepting new Pershing and cruise missiles, cripple the position of our negotiators in Geneva, and show the Soviets that, despite the progress our country has made, at a moment of historical importance, a majority in the Congress of the United States still lacks resolve. In the wake of world peace, that must not happen.

President Reagan. President Alfonsin and distinguished guests and ladies and gentlemen, it's a great pleasure for me to welcome you to the White House. And I thoroughly enjoyed meeting with President Alfonsin today.

President Alfonsin and I have much in common. We both have gone through many campaigns and asked for votes from many different kinds of people. Down in Texas during the 1976 primary, they had me out knocking on doors. And I remember one kind of rural area -- I'd been Governor of California, but I wasn't all that well known in Texas -- and I knocked on the door, and an old fellow in his undershirt and jeans came to the door. And I told him I was running for President.

But, seriously though, as I mentioned at our ceremony this morning, the people of our two countries have so much in common, not the least of which is the spirit of the frontier exemplified by the gaucho and the cowboy. More significant, however, is the bond of democracy, the love of freedom that's found in the hearts of our people. I'd like to take this opportunity to congratulate President Alfonsin, who is, on behalf of the Argentine people, accepting the international democracy prize from the Center for Democracy. And I can think of no finer example to others than Argentina's inspiring return to democracy. Congratulations, Mr. President.

This generation of Argentinians is laying the foundation for what will be enjoyed by your fellow countrymen hundreds of years hence. And this is in keeping with the tradition of San Martin, an heroic individual significant not only in your history but in that of the entire hemisphere. I think it's interesting to note that once San Martin was successful in freeing half a continent, he assumed the title of protector.

President Alfonsin, you've already demonstrated to your countrymen and to all the world that you're willing to live up to the enormous trust that you hold in your hands. I look forward to working closely with you in the years ahead. I salute you. And I ask all of you to join me in a toast to President Alfonsin, Mrs. Alfonsin, and the free people of Argentina.

President Alfonsin. Mr. President and Mrs. Reagan, ladies and gentlemen, we have ended a day of intense, frank, cordial, and mutually enriching consultations. The success of this day, characterized from the beginning by exceptional American hospitality, is due in great part to your warmth, Mrs. Reagan, as well as to the informal and friendly atmosphere that you, Mr. President, imparted to our meetings. My wife and my friends are sincerely grateful for this hospitality, and I sincerely thank both of you.

In discussing the different aspects of international affairs, we have discovered that on many points our views converge. And if we also discovered a few differences in our analysis, it should neither surprise us nor alarm us. As I imagine it, the relationship between Washington and Buenos Aires presupposes -- and I said that when I arrived -- that we assume the defense of our respective national interests from a perspective of cooperation, foresight, and mutual sincerity.

It seems to me that within this framework we should explore with a certain amount of audacity, imagination, and good will the profiles of a realistic and enduring relationship between Latin America and the United States.

How can we not link these words to the basic grounds that explain what the forces of democracy have achieved in Argentina to reestablish the sovereignty of our people. Why should two peoples whose convictions are nourished by such principles not be able to understand one another in fundamental matters?

Of course, no doubt, our responsibilities are different. But in our area, we've made, I think, a great contribution to peace, because in the southern cone we've settled peacefully a century-old dispute with Chile.

Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, as I toast for your personal well-being and that of all of you here tonight, I do so having specially in mind the American people. To your people we also offer this deeply felt tribute: They are a people who are the architects of the civilization where material achievements have always been united to a great spiritual force. Thank you very much.

I am pleased that the Senate today voted to support the MX Peacekeeper missile and to send a message of American resolve to the world. And I look forward to continuing to work with the Congress to build upon the consensus we achieved today.

As we continue to move forward to maintain the modern forces necessary for effective deterrence, let us remember that deterrence alone is not sufficient. The MX Peacekeeper will strengthen our national security and our negotiating position at Geneva. Deterrence and arms reductions go hand in hand, and our negotiators are working hard -- flexibly and with an open mind -- to achieve agreements leading to deep reductions in nuclear arsenals.

It is critically important that the second Senate vote and next week's votes in the House reaffirm this demonstration of America's determination to achieve effective deterrence and significant nuclear arms reductions.

Brock. He was our top choice from a blue-ribbon list of candidates, I have to say. He has an outstanding government background -- 6 years as a United States Senator from Tennessee, 4 years now at Cabinet level -- and he was no stranger to politics. He was chairman of the GOP, helped rebuild the Republican Party from 1976 to 1980, and I think laid the groundwork for what was one of the great Republican Party victories of quite some number of decades. And he has been a trade negotiator, and anyone who's spent 4 years dealing with international trade can negotiate with almost anyone.

Among his primary interest is rebuilding and maintaining the ties with labor -- organized and unorganized -- attacking the serious endemic problem of youth unemployment, in particular minority youth. And I know he looks forward to working with our job partnership plan that has been working fairly successfully now for some time in finding work particularly for the untrained, training them, and then placing them.

This Administration has recognized from the outset that the achievement of our most essential national goals -- enhanced national security, increased industrial competitiveness, better health and quality of life for all our citizens -- depends upon a strong and vital science and technology enterprise. In view of the impressive scientific and technological capabilities of many other countries, we are increasingly aware of the importance of international cooperation as a means of augmenting our strengths in these areas. The generation of new knowledge and progress in technology offer benefits to all nations committed to realistic and sustained economic growth.

Indeed, the future of the world depends largely on science, technology, and the willingness of nations to marshal their greatest resources -- human creativity and talent -- to work together to solve the problems that challenge mankind. We in the United States are determined to help make that future a bright one.

Substantial efforts were made during 1984 to implement the Title V legislation. In June, Secretary of State Shultz addressed a message to all our embassies abroad stressing the central importance of science and technology as a critical element of our foreign policy. In September, he followed that with a request for detailed descriptions of each mission's specific plans to better integrate science and technology into the conduct of our foreign affairs.

Consistent with our foreign policy objectives, we continue to emphasize government-to-government scientific cooperation in our bilateral and multilateral relations, in particular, fostering our cooperative relationships with the nations of Western Europe, with Japan and other democratic nations of the Pacific Basin, with India and the People's Republic of China, and with friends in our own hemisphere.

During 1984, we continued to participate in several cooperative scientific projects agreed upon at the Williamsburg Economic Summit in June 1983 and endorsed at the London Economic Summit in June 1984. As in the past years, we stressed the ability of cooperative efforts in science and technology to enhance the economic and military strength of the Western Alliance. We continue to support the NATO Science Committee's activities to stimulate collaborative research in significant frontier fields of science and to facilitate the exchange among member countries of their most promising young scientists and engineers. The importance the United States places on the NATO Science Committee was highlighted last Spring when we hosted the Committee's meeting in Washington.

Last January, we reviewed the range of activities that have been carried out during the first five years of our Bilateral Cooperative Agreement in Science and Technology with the People's Republic of China, and took particular pleasure in extending that agreement for five more years.

Cooperative research is now being conducted under twenty-three separate protocols within the broad auspices of that agreement, and accords in several new areas, including fossil energy, and space cooperation, are in the final stages of negotiation.

Significant strides were made in the special cooperative programs with India -- in health, agriculture, and monsoon research -- that emerged from my discussions with Prime Minister Indira Gandhi in July 1982. The government of India continues its support of these initiatives under the new leadership of Prime Minister Rajiv Gandhi.

While that behavior is often far from constructive, I have approved during 1984 renewed cooperative efforts in carefully selected areas such as agriculture, health, and environmental protection and safety, that recognize complementary strengths and ensure mutual benefits. I took this action to convince Soviet officials of our desire for peace and our willingness to explore whatever roads might be open to take us there together.

We recognize that there are important opportunities to address science and technology issues within the technical agencies of the United Nations system, but such opportunities should be pursued only where there are realistic expectations of shared benefit and success. Where success proves beyond our grasp, we must reevaluate our position and find more effective alternatives.

Such is the case with our participation in UNESCO. I stated at the end of 1983 our intention to withdraw from that agency should acceptable reforms not be undertaken within a year. That period expired on December 31, 1984, and we have withdrawn as planned. Despite U.S. withdrawal, we remain committed to the belief that genuine reform of UNESCO is a worthwhile goal, and in the coming year, we will work with all countries, individuals, and private organizations who seek improvement in UNESCO to achieve that purpose. When UNESCO returns to its original mission and principles, we will rejoin UNESCO and participate in the full range of its multilateral scientific programs.

In conclusion, I want to stress again the importance of cooperative scientific and technological arrangements in our assistance to developing countries. On November 22, 1984, in an address to members of an international association for research and development in nuclear energy, His Holiness John Paul II emphasized the importance he perceives in such arrangements.

During that period, he was active in natural resource management and agricultural activities and served as commissioner of the Missouri Department of Conservation; adviser to the Governor of Missouri's Soil and Water Commission; director of the Missouri Cattleman's Association; and a member of the Missouri Farm Bureau.

I am pleased to report that traffic fatalities have dropped for the third year in a row. The 42,584 fatalities recorded in 1983, while still unacceptably high and a tragedy to the Nation both in terms of lives lost and the economic consequences of the deaths, represent a 3 percent decrease from the preceding year, and a 17 percent decrease from as recently as 1980 when 51,091 people died in traffic accidents.

In addition, despite large increases in the number of drivers and vehicles, the Federal standards and programs for motor vehicle and highway safety instituted since 1966 have contributed to a significant reduction in the fatality rate per 100 million miles of travel. The fatality rate is a measure of the risk of death that a person is exposed to when travelling. The rate has decreased from 5.5 in the mid-60's to the present level of 2.57, the lowest rate ever recorded. This means that motorists can drive more miles today with less risk. If the 1966 fatality rate had been experienced in 1983, more than 91,000 persons would have lost their lives in traffic accidents.

A substantial number of deaths and injuries on our roadways can be traced in part to some human factor: the driver or passenger who was not wearing a safety belt; the drinking driver who continues to be involved in more than half of the Nation's traffic fatalities; speeding; or the habitual offenders whose privileges to drive have been revoked, but who continue to drive irresponsibly.

We will continue to pursue highway and motor vehicle safety programs that are most effective in reducing deaths and injuries. We are placing greater emphasis on the human aspects of traffic safety, reflecting the national concern that emphasis be on those activities that have the most realistic prospect of success, and which yield the maximum safety gain per dollar invested.

I am encouraged by the significant fatality reduction this Nation has experienced over the past three years and am convinced that even more progress can be made to ensure that American motorists and pedestrians will enjoy the greatest level of personal safety possible.

In a time of prosperity, we do not think of hunger and hardship. In a time of peace, we do not think of suffering and war. In a time when our families are together and healthy, we do not think of the pain we would feel if they were pulled apart. Yet, for the people of Afghanistan, it is impossible to escape such thoughts, because terror, hardship, and suffering have become an everyday way of life ever since the Soviet Union brutally invaded and occupied their country over five years ago.

March 21 is the start of a New Year for the Afghan people. It is traditionally a holiday when they bring their families together to celebrate life's new beginnings and to rejoice and give thanks for God's many gifts.

But in Afghanistan today it may be hard to remember the days when their country had peace, when there was enough food to eat, and when their homes were safe, for the overwhelming majority of Afghans are engaged in a fierce struggle to end the Soviet occupation of their country and the rule of the puppet regime headed by Babrak Karmal.

The year 1984 was an especially hard one for the Afghans. The Soviets have become frustrated with their inability to crush the spirit of the Afghan Freedom Fighters and are increasingly turning their military might against the civilian population of the country, forcing hundreds of thousands more innocent people into exile away from their homeland.

Reports of Soviet atrocities and human rights violations are increasingly gaining the attention of the world's public. Respected organizations such as the United Nations Commission on Human Rights, Amnesty International, and Helsinki Watch have recently released studies detailing the terror that the Soviets and the Karmal regime regularly inflict on the people of Afghanistan.

All Americans are united on the goal of freedom for Afghanistan. I ask the American people, at the time when we are blessed with prosperity and security, to remember the Afghan struggle against tyranny and the rule of government-by-terror. We stand in admiration of the indomitable courage of the Afghan people who are an inspiration to all freedom-loving nations around the globe.

Afghanistan Day will serve to recall the fundamental principles involved when people struggle for the freedom to determine their own future and the right to govern themselves without foreign interference. Let us, therefore, resolve to pay tribute to the brave Afghan people by observing March 21, 1985, as Afghanistan Day. Let us pledge our continuing admiration for their cause and their perseverance and continue to do everything we can to provide humanitarian support to the brave Afghan people, including the millions of Afghan refugees who have been forced to flee their own country.

Let me commend again the Senate of the United States for having approved production of 21 more MX/Peacekeeper missiles. The Senate has endorsed the decision of four Presidents that the Peacekeeper is a vital component of the American deterrent. Now is the testing time for the House of Representatives. The votes there will answer the question of whether we stand united at Geneva or whether America will face the Soviet Union as a nation divided over the most fundamental questions of her national security.

For more than a decade we've debated the MX, and while we were debating, the Soviets were deploying more than 600 such missiles and targeting them upon the United States. Now they're on the verge of deploying two new strategic land-based systems, and we're still debating.

Not long ago the parliaments of four NATO countries courageously voted to accept deployment of Pershing II's and cruise missiles. And these NATO countries are now looking to see if the American Congress is possessed of equal courage -- or resolve, I should say.

No request by an American President for a major strategic system deemed vital to the national security has ever been denied by an American Congress. It is that tradition of bipartisan unity on national defense that brought the Soviets back to Geneva. And unless that tradition is maintained next week in the House, there's little prospect of success at Geneva.

The President. Well, I don't really consider it being rebuffed, Helen, because the man has only been in office for a few days, and I have some idea of what is confronting him now. But I've felt the same way about each of the three previous leaders there and then things intervened that made it impossible -- that there are a number of things -- bilateral situations between our two countries, other things to talk about that we're negotiating or talking to each other on a ministerial level, and that some of those could probably be further advanced if we met at a summit.

And so, what I always meant by an agenda, a planned meeting -- not just one to get acquainted -- is one in which -- just as when we go in a meeting, even to Canada, we have announced things that we want to talk about, and they have an agenda of things they want to talk about -- mutual problems that confront us -- and I think it's high time that we did this.

The President. Well, I have to think that they should be good. I think in some of our people, we've had about an hour and a half conversation -- the Vice President, the Secretary of State did with him when they were there. And, so, I think there is a good chance of that.

The reason that I issued the invitation was because under the kind of protocol that exists -- and you look back over the history of such meetings -- why, it's our turn to be the host. So, that's why I proposed it, that if he would, the invitation was extended for whenever he found it convenient.

Mr. President, in your first term you proposed your own Middle East peace plan. You dispatched special envoys to the region to seek solutions, you even sent in marines to try to stabilize Lebanon. These days we hardly ever even hear you mention the Middle East, and last week President Mubarak went home disappointed when he asked for your help in getting peace talks started again.

The President. Well, it isn't disengagement, and let me point out, I believe it's a misapprehension that President Mubarak left disappointed. He made no requests. He told us what he was doing, and certainly we complimented him highly upon what he's doing, and I think it's great.

But our proposal, in the very beginning, was that we did not want to participate in the negotiations. It wouldn't be any of our business to do so but that we'd do whatever we could to help bring the warring parties together and, in effect, you might say, continue the Camp David process and continue trying to find more countries that would do as Egypt did and make peace.

And we still feel the same way. We have been trying to build up a relationship with the Arab nations, as well as the relationship that we've always had with Israel. And we discussed with President Mubarak the -- yes, the things that he has proposed, and the idea of the Palestinians -- we did have to make it clear that we couldn't meet if it was the PLO. They still refuse to recognize the U.N. Resolutions 242 and 338, and they refuse to agree or admit that Israel has a right to exist as a nation. But we have said Palestinian representatives -- yes. There's a large Palestinian community, and I'm sure that there are people that do not consider themselves represented by the PLO.

The President. Well, not the direct role in sitting at the table and negotiating, that must be done in direct negotiations between the Arab States and Israel. And I think that King Hussein -- the position he's taken -- that was the one that we had hoped, and he did take 2 years ago, when we suggested all of this, and then things broke down with the Lebanese conflict. And now, thanks to Mubarak pushing ahead and Hussein, I think that there is a reasonable chance, and we have another traveling Ambassador on his way back there in a few weeks.

Japanese in this. But I have to say I couldn't fault Bill Brock and what he has done. He's been as forceful as anyone could be. And we are still leaning on our friends and trading partners, including Japan, for continued lifting of restraints that they have, particularly with regard to their own markets. And in the talks in Europe that will begin in May, I am going to propose again another round of trade negotiations to further get us back to completely free trade.

And we've made some progress. I have to say that Prime Minister Nakasone of Japan had been very forthcoming on this. He has some political problems that -- just like me, he can't just give an order and have it happen. But he's working very hard on this. And Bill did a great job, and I'm quite sure that who we'll finally get to replace him will be equally forceful in those negotiations.

Q.  --  -- during some hostilities, were shot at by the Israeli Army today -- two were killed and one was critically wounded. I was wondering if you have a reaction to the incident and if you plan to lodge any protests with the Israeli Government?

The President. Well, first of all, I'd like to know all the details of this. I'm quite sure in combat of that kind this was not a deliberate killing. They were engaged in gunfire with armed persons who were in civilian, not uniformed as they would be in a war. So, these things can happen. And it is a tragedy. And all I can say is that I think all of us have a great feeling of sorrow about the tragedy that is going on there in Lebanon, and particularly in south Lebanon now as the Israelis try to withdraw. And whichever side, the acts of terror, the retaliation -- both of them are leading to tragedies that just seem to be so needless.

Q. So, you're saying that the Israelis were engaged in gunfire with other people at the time, because one report said that they just opened fire on the newsmen who were obviously taking pictures and covering the story?

The President. My goodness, your own news program tonight showed an awful lot of gunfire with very sophisticated weapons, including grenade launchers, and they were obviously being used by civilians, at least people in civilian uniform; they weren't Israelis. So, yes, this is one of the things that happens in this kind of warfare, where you're not fighting another country's army.

The President. No, we believe that it is time. It has been extended, you know, for quite some time through the emergency of the recession. But now we have about 300,000 people going back to work every month in new jobs. We believe that the place now is, for people who are having problems, is our job training program, particularly job training directed at those who have to be relocated because something has happened to the industries that they formally worked in. But we don't believe that we should continue with this program indefinitely.

Q. Sir, 17 blacks were shot to death in South Africa today by government authorities in what appears to be a continuing wave of violence by the white minority government against the black majority population. Are you considering changing your policy to put more pressure on the South African Government to mend its ways?

The President. No, Sam, I know the pressure that we are putting on them, and I know the gains that we've made. But we know there's still a long way to go. But I think to put it that way -- that they were simply killed and that the violence was coming totally from the law and order side ignores the fact that there was rioting going on in behalf of others there. And it is tragic, and, again, we hope that this can be corrected. But I think also it is significant that on the officer's side -- or the police side -- whichever -- whether they were military police, I think they were police -- it is significant that some of those enforcing the law and using the guns were also black policemen.

Africa that do not want a peaceful settlement of this, who want a violent settlement, who want trouble in the streets. And this is what's going on. I don't hold with what has happened, and, as I say, I think all of us find the system there repugnant, but we're going to keep on trying to contribute to a peaceful solution if we can.

Q. Yes, sir. Conservative groups have been talking recently about trying to take over one of the three major television networks, charging that our coverage is biased politically. You have occasionally been critical yourself of network news coverage, and I wonder what you think about a possible conservative takeover of a network?

And no, this is often talked about. It's even been talked about for some of the print media, too, at times by people that find themselves unhappy with what they think is a bias. I don't have any comments on that. I just turn it on, look, and every once in awhile scream a little, but to myself.

Q. Lets get back to the problem for a minute though, sir. Do you have any concerns about major sources of information, like news networks, being taken over by political activists, or do you think they already have been?

Q. Britain's Foreign Secretary, Sir Geoffrey Howe, has raised a long list of concerns and questions about your Strategic Defense Initiative, which conjured a public rebuke from Assistant Secretary of Defense Richard Perle. Was Mr. Perle speaking for the administration, and if not, how do you feel about an allied official publicly questioning SDI just as arms talks were starting in Geneva?

II limitations on building new missiles, and you said you'd have to decide in the next few months whether to join them in violating the agreement. Since the Soviets are insisting that all they're doing are making allowable upgrades of older missiles, won't an open violation by the United States run the risk of just dashing hopes for arms control and leading us into a real upward spiraling arms race?

The President. Well, I can assure you we're not going to do anything that's going to undercut the negotiations that are going on. We're hopeful that, for the first time, we really have an opportunity to get a reduction of missiles. I have said repeatedly -- and continue it, and I really mean it -- we're going to wait and deal with that problem when we come to that point -- and it has to do with some of our submarine missiles -- as to what our conduct's going to be.

The President. No, that's right, we don't know. But on the other hand, our record as compared to theirs with regard to observing all the niceties of all the treaties is so much superior that I don't think we're in a position to cause any great trouble.

The President. Yes, I'll tell you. I feel very strongly that this time in commemorating the end of that great war, that instead of reawakening the memories and so forth and the passions of the time, that maybe we should observe this day as the day when, 40 years ago, peace began and friendship. Because we now find ourselves allied and friends of the countries that we once fought against. And that it be almost a celebration of the end of an era and the coming into what has now been some 40 years of peace for us.

And I felt that since the German people -- and very few alive that remember even the war, and certainly none of them who were adults and participating in any way -- and they have a feeling, and a guilt feeling that's been imposed upon them, and I just think it's unnecessary. I think they should be recognized for the democracy that they've created and the democratic principles they now espouse.

The President. No, but in talking just informally some time ago with Chancellor Kohl and others, they all felt the same way -- that if we could observe this as the beginning of peace and friendship between us.

Q. Mr. President, there have been signals from the White House in recent days that you were, perhaps, somewhat dissatisfied with the level of loyalty of some Members of Congress on particular issues of importance to you. Could you tell us what you think is the responsibility of a Senator or a House Member who finds himself faced on an issue deciding between what he thinks his constituents want and his President wants?

The President. Well, I suppose this comes from the suggestion that I am supposed to penalize some Members in the coming campaign. No, I've never done that. I am a charter member of the California-born 11th commandment: Thou shalt not speak ill of another Republican. And, therefore, I'm dedicated to doing my best to see if we can't maintain the majority we have in the Senate and someday get ourselves a majority in the House, which we haven't had for more than 26 years. So, no, I'm not going to hold a grudge on anyone.

Q. Mr. President, what about those Senate Republicans who want to come down and talk to you, and I think they're going to tomorrow -- Senator Dole, Senator Domenici -- who've pushed through a budget of their own that is not exactly yours. Are you prepared to look at that budget and make some compromise?

The President. Oh, yes! We've put together a budget -- and after long, bloody hours -- that we think does the job. But we recognize that others may have other ideas. But now they've got something that we can sit down and talk about -- theirs and ours -- see where we come out. The thing that we must recognize: Both of us have the same idea. We want to reduce spending and start ourselves on a path toward eliminating the deficit.

The President. Social Security, I still feel, even though I did not refer to the COLA's in my statements during the campaign -- I was answering what I thought were some demagogic falsehoods that I had some kind of a secret yen to destroy Social Security. And I didn't mean it, but it was interpreted as meaning that. And, actually, I think we're wasting a lot of time talking about it. Social Security is running on a surplus. And it is totally funded by a tax that can only be used for that purpose. So, when we talk about Social Security, we're not really getting at the deficit problem at all.

Q. Mr. President, there's been some criticism that the Federal Government has not done enough in the Ohio banking crisis. Granted, these are State-regulated institutions. But on the other hand, there is some fear that what's happening in Ohio could quickly and easily threaten the entire national financial system. What is your view of the Federal Government's role in such matters?

The President. Well, I'm pleased to say that this is a matter of a group of savings and loans that had taken out either private or State insurance, had not availed themselves of the Federal insurance program. And it is limited to Ohio. This is not a major threat to the banking system.

Federal Reserve has stepped in and said that they will keep the window open for loans to those banks -- or those savings and loans -- any of them that meet the requirements of collateral and so forth, and the loans will be available for them when they reopen.

Q. Mr. President, I would like to go back to Chris' question and ask you about reporting standards. Some of your friends and political allies have been suggesting recently that members of the news media are somehow unpatriotic. Senator Jesse Helms, for example, has charged that members of the press have what he says is a smug contempt for American values and principles.

Q. Do you think, then, that it would be possible? Would you consider the Mubarak approach, which is for the United States to invite a joint delegation, if you had an understanding about the composition of the Palestinians?

The President. Well, this is what President Mubarak was talking about and that they're putting together. It's a case of their inviting us, not the other way around. And we've said that we'd be happy to discuss with them. But they've got to understand we are not getting into the direct negotiations. That's none of our business. We're only to do what we can to help.

The issue is the United States is trying to help people who had a Communist tyranny imposed on them by force, deception, and fraud. And either we continue with that tradition, which has always been ours, or we give that up entirely. And I don't think we should give that up. I think our position is clear.

Security aspect of it, but two other issues in the budget compromise that Senator Dole was able to work in the Senate involved deeper cuts in defense spending than you would have liked, on the one hand, and lesser cuts in domestic spending than you had recommended. If Senator Dole takes Social Security cap on COLA off the table and you can agree with the deeper defense cut and a lesser domestic cut, do you see the makings of an agreement there, or do you think you're too far apart to resolve that issue without the Social Security element in it?

The President. Well, I hate to predict in advance what might happen when we discuss, but I will have to say this. One of the objections that I've had in all of the discussions with many Members of Congress with regard to defense spending and the other is: Those who advocate more cuts in defense spending don't add those to the cuts already made in domestic so that the reduction in spending is bigger. No, they use the cuts in defense to augment spending in domestic affairs. And I think that in the discussion of defense spending, we've got to quit talking about how many dollars do we want to or not want to spend. We've got to talk there about: All right, what is it you can see that would be eliminated by cuts in spending, and what would that do to our national security.

And I would like to call your attention to something that no one seems to be aware of: that we, ourselves, have cut the defense budgets over the last 4 years. Our own proposed -- or projected 5-year defense spending -- we have to date reduced those by more than $150 billion. And today the 1985 budget is $16 billion less than the 1985 budget that had been projected by the Carter administration. So, we think that we have made sizable cuts already. The trouble is if we cut it in half, there are people on the Hill who would still think that it had to be cut more than that. And I think that we've made some progress, and we have a defense program that any further cuts are actually going to run the risk of lowering our capability at preserving national security.

The President. I have said repeatedly that when we have finally reduced spending to the point that we say: All right, here it is. This is the best that can be obtained if government is to perform the services it should. And then that percentage of gross national product or earnings of the people that the Government is taking is bigger than what the tax revenues are bringing in then is the time to look at bringing the tax level up to that level. We're nowhere near that on the spending side yet.

Q. Mr. President, going back to the Ohio banking situation, what measures are being taken to protect the commercial banks and the stockholder -- big, large banks owned by the stockholders, that they don't get involved in that, in particular, because many of them have correspondent banking relationships with the savings and loan. And what could start out in Ohio as a little virus could become a national epidemic, which could involve some of our major, largest banks. I'd like to know just what legislation is being proposed and what Federal accountants are doing to check these things so that this situation cannot ever happen again anywhere else.

The President. Well, I don't know of any legislation that's being proposed for that, and I know that our people are looking at this situation and don't feel that there is any emergency that warrants Federal interference at this time in there.

The President. I have not talked to Chairman Volcker about this, but I do know that he, himself, has put the Fed in there. And as I've told you what they are prepared to do and which they believe is pretty much the proper answer to this situation.

My Fiscal Year 1986 budget seeks to foster strong economic growth, lower interest rates, and expansion of export markets. These objectives are especially important for the long-term well-being of the agricultural sector of the economy.

The 1986 budget sets forth a vigorous and concerted effort to reduce the annual deficit built into the Federal budget structure. With no action to curb spending, deficits would exceed $200 billion for each of the next five years and the ratio of Federal debt to gross national product would continue to increase to intolerably high levels. Deficit reduction, without additional taxes, is absolutely necessary to meet our national economic goals.

Therefore, my 1986 budget proposes significant reductions in spending from projected current service levels in many programs and complete termination of some. In total by 1988, the budget recommendations would reduce spending growth by $105 billion and reduce the budget deficit by 42 percent. Achieving these savings will require cutbacks, terminations, reforms, and management improvement in many activities. It will require realignments of financial responsibilities among the Federal government, State and local governments, and beneficiary groups in many program areas.

The 1982 Statement of Policy called for a greater role for State and local governments in working with private landowners to solve their individual resource conservation problems. It called for more efficient use of Federal resources by targeting assistance to critical problem areas, by improving management efficiency, and by eliminating program overlap and conflicting objectives.

It called for focusing our efforts on those areas with critical erosion problems and pointed out that stewardship of the land is primarily the responsibility of the private landowner. All these themes are reflected in my 1986 budget.

The 1982 Statement of Policy anticipated future conservation budget levels within the range projected by the Program unless the demands placed on our financial resources by other competing national goals and interests made it necessary to propose lower amounts. The 1986 budget does envision reduced funding levels for Federal conservation programs.

Soil Conservation Service to establish national priorities and to continue to provide Federal leadership for a national conservation program. In addition, the Soil Conservation Service will continue a reduced soil survey information program and will continue to develop plant materials for erosion control. Basic research and extension activities will also be maintained. Resource data collection, analysis, and program development activities can be funded on an ``as needed'' basis rather than as continuous activities.

Other programs such as direct Federal payments to landowners for installing conservation practices and to local units of government for flood control projects and for local resource and economic development activities are proposed to be discontinued. For the most part, these activities are well within the financial capabilities of State and local governments and private landowners if they act together to deal with local resource problems. Many are already doing so.

These changes will produce a budget savings for the five-year period 1986 - 1990 of $2.8 billion and still provide the Federal leadership and technical assistance needed in the soil and water conservation area.

Skin cancer is the most common cancer in the United States. It accounts for between 30 and 40 percent of all cancers and is increasing at a significant rate. Approximately 18,000 Americans will develop a primary melanoma and over 500,000 Americans will develop nonmelanoma skin cancer this year. Epidemiological studies show that the incidence of melanoma has doubled every decade since the 1930s and is now increasing at a faster rate than any other cancer, except lung cancer in women.

Melanoma has a mortality rate of 25 percent and causes 5,000 deaths per year, and nonmelanoma skin cancer causes another 2,000 deaths per year. The 1983 National Institutes of Health Consensus Conference on Precursors to Malignant Melanoma found that the incidence of melanoma and the number of deaths from melanoma are increasing in many areas of the world and found evidence that early recognition and surgical removal of melanoma make it a highly curable cancer.

Sun exposure is an undisputed cause of nonmelanoma skin cancer and is an important factor in the development of melanoma. The number of skin cancers can be reduced through sun protection measures such as the use of sunscreening lotions and simple changes in lifestyle. The American Academy of Dermatology and State and local dermatologic organizations are committed to heightening the awareness and understanding of melanoma and nonmelanoma skin cancers among members of the general public and the health care community.

The first Melanoma and Skin Cancer Prevention and Detection Program, a coordinated national voluntary effort of professional dermatological organizations to reduce the increasing incidence of melanoma and nonmelanoma skin cancers and to better control such cancers, will be conducted in March 1985.

The past year has witnessed steady, encouraging progress against cancer. The latest data show that 49 percent of all patients diagnosed with cancer survive five years or more. This compares with 48 percent last year and 46 percent the year before. And because of the lag time in collecting data, we believe the true five-year survival rate is better than 50 percent. For some of the major cancers, more than two-thirds of patients will survive beyond this five-year mark.

In addition, we are seeing steady gains in survival for patients with a number of specific cancers: melanoma, Hodgkin's disease, and cancers of the lung, colon, prostate, and testis. For children under age 15 who develop cancer, the five-year survival rate has risen to 60 percent, up from 53 percent last year.

This is a realistic and achievable goal, built on the deeper understanding of cancer that we have derived from our research over the past decade and a half. We now have evidence, for example, that an individual can reduce personal cancer risk by a number of lifestyle choices. Quitting smoking is the single most important step an individual can take to reduce cancer risk. There are also a number of choices we can make in our daily diets that may help to reduce cancer risk, such as increasing the amount of fiber-rich foods, including fruits, vegetables, peas and beans, and whole-grain cereals. Another is to reduce the amount of fat in our diet.

Research designed to answer questions about ways to halt or prevent cancer is ongoing, including twenty-five studies concerning diet interventions. New community cancer programs have been formed to bring the latest in cancer care to patients in their own communities. A new computerized data base for physicians provides the latest information on cancer treatment. Trials of new therapies continue to seek better ways to help the cancer patient, and research to understand the nature of cancer at the cellular level continues to break new ground. We can look into the future with hope and optimism.

April 15th is fast approaching -- that dreaded deadline each year when we must turn our attention from jobs, finances, and families to the business of government and the taxes we pay to cover its bills.

I'm sorry to tell you that many of those you elected to keep watch over government's expenditures and to keep your taxes down have been hard at work since we submitted our budget doing something else: They've been promising special interest groups -- not to save your tax dollars, but their spending programs.

Let me give you some cold, hard facts. If Congress doesn't enact the level of budget savings we've proposed, we'll add nearly three-quarters of a trillion dollars in additional red ink over the next 3 years -- a crushing mortgage on America's future. But that ocean of red ink will not result from a deficit of tax payments. Even after cutting your personal tax rates, the Federal Government still takes away about 19 cents of every dollar America earns and produces -- the same as before we came into office.

Moreover, reducing those rates has stimulated economic output and led to a bigger tax base and greater tax revenues than almost anyone anticipated. So, if Congress wants to increase revenues further, it must put aside all talk of tax increases, put tax reform on the front burner, and reduce personal tax rates as low as possible so we can free America to challenge the limits of growth.

With revenues rising faster than expected, it's clear that the deficit problem is not a problem of taxes, but of spending. But don't believe the drumbeat of propaganda that blames defense spending for government living beyond its means.

Our bipartisan effort to rebuild America's defenses only began 3 years ago after more than a decade of neglect, while the Soviets surged ahead with the greatest military buildup in history, adding countries to their empire with the ease of a thief plucking apples off a tree.

Fifteen years ago our combined domestic and defense spending amounted to only 20 cents on every dollar of gross national product -- one-fifth less than today. Had spending not then soared out of control, today we would have nearly a balanced budget, far less national debt, and no threat to our current prosperity. But Federal spending didn't get off the track because of defense. We're spending less on defense this year than my predecessor predicted he would spend in his last budget. We're spending less on defense as a percentage of the Federal budget and our total economy than we did 15 years ago. And our budget calls for us to spend 2 cents less per dollar of the gross national product next year than we did in 1970.

Spending is zooming for only one reason: The domestic budget is still bloated with waste and unnecessary programs. Even after adjustment for inflation, nondefense program spending has almost doubled since 1970. Maybe it's time you asked Congress some questions of your own; for example: Why won't the Congress stop or cut back its $4.6 billion revenue sharing program that disburses money to communities, when the Federal Government has no revenues to share and local governments are in better fiscal shape? Why won't Congress stop subsidizing Amtrak, which costs taxpayers $35 per passenger every time a train leaves the station? Why won't the Congress stop subsidizing wealthy families earning up to $100,000 a year with thousands of dollars in annual student loan subsidies? Why won't the Congress stop subsidizing a few restaurants, bars, country clubs, and similar businesses with half a billion dollars in loans, when every other small business has to pay the full market rate of interest? And why won't the Congress stop its export subsidies to a handful of corporations which account for less than 2 percent of U.S. exports?

Yesterday I invited the Senate leadership to the White House. We had a candid and constructive meeting, and I'm confident that we're coming closer to a meeting of the minds. We agreed that uncontrolled spending poses a threat to our expansion, and we agreed that we must face that threat together and face it now.

For my part, I made clear that in further reduction in defense, vital weapons systems -- either conventional or strategic -- must not be touched, period. The deficit can and will be brought down, but not by raising taxes, which would just torpedo growth and make the deficit worse, or by gambling with America's security when the Soviet Union is every bit as aggressive, expansionist, and dangerous as before.

We're just delighted that all of you, the Special Olympians from Metropolitan Washington, were able to stop by on your way to Park City and Salt Lake City, Utah. Nancy and I share the pride of your families, friends, and countrymen for your hard work and dedication in getting ready for the third International Winter Special Olympics.

Let me take a moment to mention the uncelebrated story behind the Special Olympics. It's the grace and goodness of Eunice and Sargent Shriver and of all the volunteers and coaches, mothers and fathers, and private corporations, which stand behind our very special Olympians and who prove time and again that America is the most generous country in the world.

Sports have always been an important part of my life. Although my competitive playing days are over, except when it comes to arm-wrestling with Congress -- [laughter] -- I can appreciate what these games mean to all of you. There'll be the thrill of competition, the joy of meeting other athletes who love sports as much as you do. And I know that you'll have a glorious time in Utah and that each one of you will represent the American ideal, not necessarily by winning, but by doing the very best that you can.

The athletes who competed in Sarajevo may have posted faster times or combined more spins into their routines, but sports has less to do with things like times and double toe loops than with courage of the human heart.

When it comes to heart, the athletes from Sarajevo and from everywhere will have to tip their caps to you. By competing in the Utah games you are proving that a disability doesn't have to stand in the way of a full and active life, and you're showing all of us just how far individuals can go if only they set their minds to it.

Thank you all for being such fine representatives of our country. And thank you for being here today. We'll be cheering for you no matter what -- win, lose, or draw. In fact, no matter where you place in the competition, you'll soon be a part of that very elite group of Americans who have represented our country in Olympic competition, and that's a distinction that will be yours for the rest of your lives.

All of you are truly special. You and the more than 800 other athletes from 14 nations are a testimony to young people all over the world that no one should ever be afraid to dream big dreams or doubt his or her ability to try and make those dreams come true. You've warmed our hearts, and we wish you the very best.

The President. Well, now, normally I don't take questions at a photo opportunity. But I have to say with regard to this one, I think that it is very meaningful that Max Kampelman -- who is himself a Democrat, who is also an expert in that field, is heading up our negotiations over there in Geneva -- would take 2 days off and make the arduous trip back here just, for those 2 days, to tell them what it means to our negotiations to have an approval of this weapon system and how much it'll help them in the negotiations.

Well, welcome all of you to the White House. And I want to express my deepest appreciation to you, the Concerned Citizens for Democracy; to Carlos Perez, who helped you organize your Spirit of Freedom Flight; and to the Jefferson Educational Foundation, your hosts here in Washington. We welcome you as neighbors, and we welcome you as fellow Americans. You represent the countries of Colombia, Costa Rica, El Salvador, Guatemala, Honduras, Nicaragua, Panama, and Venezuela. And you've come to Washington at your own expense to share with us and our Congress the most compelling truth of our time: the dream of a bright future for democracy, economic progress, and stability in this hemisphere. And it's all within our grasp. But that dream can quickly become a nightmare if we don't stand behind the brave men who are putting their lives on the line for the cause of freedom in Nicaragua.

We, the people of the Americas, share a common language; it's the language of freedom. Words like democracia, justicia -- [laughter] -- I didn't do that right -- and liberty were handed down to us by the heroes that we share and honor together, Simon Bolivar and George Washington. And they gave us values that we cherish and strive to live by today: faith in a God of truth, love, and mercy; belief in the family as the center of our society; recognition of the unalienable rights of man; and a conviction that government must derive its legitimacy from the consent of the governed.

And so it is that the United States has a noble commitment to Central America. We're committed by geography, by treaty, and by moral obligation to stand with you, our American neighbors, in defense of liberty.

Minister Gromyko described as ``boiling like a cauldron.'' In the last 5 years, the Soviets have provided more military assistance to Cuba and Nicaragua alone than the United States has provided to all of Latin America. The Soviets' plan is designed to crush self-determination of free people, to crush democracy in Costa Rica, Honduras, El Salvador, Guatemala, and Panama. It's a plan to turn Central America into a Soviet beachhead of aggression that could spread terror and instability north and south, disrupt our vital sealanes, cripple our ability to carry out our commitments to our European allies, and send tens of millions of refugees streaming in a human tidal wave across all our borders.

Already the Nicaraguan people are fleeing the Sandinista tyranny, escaping into your neighboring countries. In just the last few weeks, thousands of Nicaraguans have fled to Costa Rica. They tell of rising resistance to the Sandinista dictatorship, a dictatorship that speaks reassuring words of peace to the outside world, even as it has moved to crush personal freedoms, attack the church, nearly wipe out an entire culture -- the Miskito Indians -- summarily execute suspected dissidents, drive leading democrats into exile, and force young boys to defend the revolution while Soviet-bloc advisers sit in Managua living off the people.

Vietnam, in Cambodia, Afghanistan, Angola, Ethiopia, Cuba, and elsewhere? And yet because we're such a trusting people, anxious to believe others and believe that they share our hopes and our dreams, some still find it hard to look reality in the eye or to rouse themselves even when our most vital interests are threatened.

United States the enemy of all mankind. They brought in East Germans to organize their state security. They became a rubber stamp for the Communist bloc in the U.N., voting against the democracies on virtually every crucial issue, from refusing to condemn Vietnam's invasion of Cambodia to not accepting Israel's credentials.

Sandinistas were building up an army that dwarfed and bullied their neighbors. While Americans were debating the Sandinistas true intentions, Tomas Borge, the Sandinista Minister of the Interior, who received his training from the Soviets, Cubans, and PLO, was saying, ``You cannot be a true revolutionary in Latin America without being Marxist-Leninist.'' Well, while we were bending over backward to be friendly and helpful, the Sandinistas were already conspiring to bring Communist revolution to all of Central America.

And, you know -- look, Nicaraguan freedom fighters don't ask us to send troops; indeed, none are needed, for the Nicaraguan people are coming over to their side in ever-greater numbers. The freedom fighters have grown to a force more than two times bigger than the Sandinistas were before they seized power. Their freedom fighters are people of the land; they're the true revolutionaries. They are the hope for a future of democracy, and with our help, democracy can and will be restored.

There are two among you here today -- Senor Alberto Suhr and Senor Carlos Garcia -- who have personally suffered the full range of Sandinista insults, persecution, and imprisonment. Alberto Suhr was jailed for helping to identify missing persons the Sandinistas had hidden in prisons.

Their story, just like your journey, is a profile in courage. We can only be thankful for all of you who care enough to speak the truth. And we can only pray that all who hold the fate of freedom in their hands will heed your words before it is too late. Let it never be said that we were not told, that we were not warned, that we did not know.

Thank you all. I'm greatly honored, and I appreciate this more than I can say. And your words there -- I'm just going to take a second and tell you a little experience -- a few years ago when I made my trip down into your countries, in Costa Rica. And I was invited to speak, and I think mainly the audience was made up of the legislature there. And before I could start to speak, a gentleman rose and started making a speech at me. And I wasn't familiar enough with the language to know just what was going on. And your statement about peasants and the poor and the people who really are on the side of freedom, when we hear so much from some others -- that they represent those people.

I stepped back and asked the President, and he told me that this man was a member of the legislature, he was a Communist member of the legislature, and that he was making a Communist speech. Well, in the pride and democracy that so characterizes Costa Ricans, they resisted any effort to, by force, keep him from speaking. But I also thought it was interesting that the President told me he was the only member of their legislature that drove a Mercedes.

We've made real progress in bringing down unemployment -- creating over 7 million new jobs in the last 3 years, and over 300,000 of those in the last month alone. But we can't rest until everyone who wants a job can find one.

And today I'm resubmitting legislation to establish a summer youth employment opportunity wage. And I want to thank Orrin Hatch, Trent Lott, Jerry Denton, Charlie Stenholm, who couldn't be here today, in advance for their work and leadership on this.

A minimum wage differential would allow business to create an additional 400,000 jobs, we believe, for our young people and would have plenty of protection in there. But it wouldn't -- no one could substitute, really, youth at the lower wage for legitimate wage earners.

Under the current Federal minimum wage, many inexperienced and disadvantaged young people are priced out of the labor market. There are jobs that, if you make them too expensive, there will be people who just figure they don't need to do those particular jobs.

This legislation will help provide the first job, with real work experience, for many of these young people. And it's experience that might never occur. I remember my first job. Do you remember yours?

And, you know, with all the best of intentions, today I look back and realize that we have passed various social reforms that would make it impossible for anyone to do this. I was 14 years old, found myself on a job where I was laying hardwood floor. Before the summer was over, I had shingled roof; I even painted. And so many of these things that just wouldn't be allowed today.

So, I think if we all work together, we can get this past Congress. And we know where the greatest numbers contributing to the unemployment figures are today, and they're among our young people, and particularly those who we want to help the most -- those in our minority communities. And it's been too long coming -- them shut out, in effect, of the summer job market.

The President. No. I know that we can't go on with this other subject, and I don't want to take it up here. We've got another subject in our minds. But I think if you'll check, you'll find that each country, the Soviets and the United States, are permitted under the terms of the Four Power Agreement -- we each have 14 military personnel. We have them in East Germany; they have them in West Germany. And what they can do and the areas that they can go into are all delineated, and he was doing nothing except what we're entitled to do under the agreements.

One of the Nation's most serious and longstanding problems is providing adequate employment opportunities for our young people. Even in times of great economic prosperity, unemployment remains a significant problem for young people, particularly young blacks and Hispanics. The purpose of the draft youth employment opportunity wage act of 1985 is to make it possible for employers to expand job opportunities for young people during a period of special need -- when young people are looking for summer jobs.

The proposal would permit employers to pay young people under 20 years of age, from May 1 through September 30, a wage of no less than either 75 percent of the otherwise applicable minimum wage or $2.50 per hour, whichever is less. The bill also provides explicit protections for adult workers and previously hired youth to ensure that they will not be adversely affected by the summer wage differential.

Studies over the past decade have repeatedly demonstrated that the minimum wage has reduced job opportunities for large numbers of our unskilled young people by pricing them out of the job market. This is particularly true for jobs that involve initial training. There is a growing consensus that summer job opportunities for youth, especially minority youth, will be greatly expanded if the summer wage differential can be implemented. This will allow more young people than ever to find jobs, earn money, and gain the experience and skills needed for future work and higher wages. The bill would in no way diminish the opportunities for higher wages for those with job skills.

One of the Nation's most serious and long-standing problems is providing adequate employment opportunities for our young people. Even in times of great economic prosperity, unemployment remains a significant problem for young people, particularly young Blacks and Hispanics. The purpose of the draft bill is to make it possible for employers to expand job opportunities for young people during a period of special need -- when young people are looking for summer jobs.

For many businesses, the existing minimum wage prices unskilled young people out of the job market. While some businesses can afford to hire unskilled youth and provide the training and experience expected to pay off in future productivity, such expectations are often unreasonable over a short summer employment span.

The proposal would enable employers to expand job opportunities for youth during the summer months. It would enable many young people to find jobs, earn money, and gain the experience and skills needed for future work and higher wages. The bill would not diminish the opportunities for higher wages for those with job skills.

Nicholson, a U.S. Army officer assigned to the U.S. military liaison mission which serves as a point of contact for our government with Soviet forces in East Germany. The precise details are being investigated by our Embassy in East Germany, and we do not have full information, but it is clear that this violence was unjustified. We have protested this unwarranted act of violence and have asked Soviet authorities for a full explanation.

The President. Thank you very much. Let me just take a moment and say first why I want you to know why I feel that support for the Peacekeeper is so very important, not only for our national security but for the solidity of our NATO alliance and for our successful arms reductions talks in Geneva as well. Afterward, Ambassador Max Kampelman, who's flown in from Geneva, will discuss arms control with you and take your questions. Max has been meeting with Mr. Karpov, his Soviet counterpart, for almost 2 weeks now -- too short a time, of course, to expect any dramatic breakthrough.

But I think we've already gotten a flavor of what those talks are going to be like. We have some tough negotiating ahead, but we expected that. The Soviets aren't going to compromise out of the goodness of their hearts, but only if they calculate that an agreement is in their immediate self-interest. We'd be doing the American people a disservice if we imagined otherwise.

We do, of course, have much common ground on which to negotiate. But if history is any guide, we can be sure that the Soviets are not going to simply give up their tremendous advantage in the MX-type missiles without some incentive, and without the MX that incentive is lacking.

For years, when the Soviets were planning an ABM system and we weren't, you'll remember we were trying to get negotiations on that. Only when you in the Congress appropriated funds for our own ABM system, the Soviets suddenly decided they wanted to talk seriously; and soon we had an ABM treaty. After staying away for more than a year now, they have returned to the bargaining table.

But let's not delude ourselves. The Soviets returned to the table only because they've recognized the failure of their efforts to divide us from our allies and weaken our determination to rebuild our national defense. Now, if we don't want to see our hopes evaporate, we must continue to demonstrate the resolve to carry the negotiations to a successful conclusion on a sound basis.

Peacekeeper. Each is convinced that the missile is absolutely essential to our national security and our hopes for peace. The bipartisan Scowcroft commission, a study group made up of our country's finest strategic thinkers, endorsed the Peacekeeper. Secretary Weinberger and all our Chiefs of Staff, as you know, are unanimous in their support of this weapons system.

Just last month, former Defense Secretary Harold Brown said, ``We have to proceed with the modernization program of offensive forces, including the MX.'' But while we've been debating, the Soviets have been deploying -- over 600 MX-class missiles in the last decade. As our land-based deterrence slips slowly but surely toward obsolescence, the Soviets are upgrading, modernizing their systems every day. And they're busy developing two new mobile ICBM systems in addition to the 600 MX-class missiles. Our own mobile system, the Midgetman, is still on the drawing board and at least 7 years from deployment.

The Soviets have seen our restraint only as an opportunity to gain the advantage. The modernization of our land-based deterrent must no longer be delayed in the vain hope that they will simply follow suit. For us to back down now on Peacekeeper deployment will deliver a telling blow to our allies' confidence in us. They stood firm in the deployment of Pershing II and cruise missiles in Europe. We asked them to walk through fire and brave a storm of Soviet propaganda and not-so-veiled threats, and they did.

Peacekeeper as a key test of our resolve. If we fail, we'll be signaling to the world that on this key issue we are irresolute and divided. And the Soviet Union will see that, in dealing with the United States, propaganda and stonewalling are much more profitable than good-faith negotiations. And our allies may wonder how much confidence they can place in an alliance whose largest member cannot even show the determination and fortitude of its smallest.

Tomorrow's vote in the House could very well spell the difference between success or defeat in our arms reduction efforts. It's important that together we send a message -- loud and clear -- that a united and resolute America backs our negotiators in their efforts to reverse the arms race and bring us closer to a stable, secure, and lasting peace, without fear for us and our children.

And now, I've talked too long. I'm going to ask Max Kampelman, Ambassador Kampelman, to come up here and speak to you. And I have to tell you, he has, as you know, just flown in, and he's due at a meeting back in Geneva tomorrow morning. And I think that's service almost above and beyond.

Affairs] Members of Congress, it is true that I do have a meeting tomorrow morning at 11 a.m. Our negotiating in Geneva is now moving into the stage where our three negotiating groups have agreed to meet separately, one with another, so that we could get down to the serious business of negotiating. We've been making statements at each other and by each other, but now I hope we'll have an opportunity to begin talking to each other. And I didn't want to be in a position of missing that first of those sessions tomorrow morning at 11 o'clock.

The whole issue of arms control is, of course, intimately related, for a democratic society, with the issue of public opinion. We don't live in governments where policies are made just by dictate and by fiat. We live in a government where policy is made as a result of healthy democratic discussion and debate. The task is to try to see to it that following that healthy debate and discussion, that we end up with resolve; that we end up with dedication, with determination, and with a broad unity of purpose which reflects American values and American security interests.

Democrat. But I operate out of the assumption that we have only one President at a time, and that when he is President, he is my President, as he is your President, and he's the President of the American people. And when he speaks and when he gives instructions to his negotiators to speak on behalf of the United States, I think it is essential that we do what we can to communicate to the world, and particularly to the other negotiating partner, that he speaks for a united country.

I am not speaking about a unanimous country; we're much too large to think in terms of unanimity. But I do believe that the American governmental system is facing a challenge today, which is to try to provide a kind of consensus -- obviously, short of unanimity -- behind these issues of American values and behind these issues of American national interests. And this is why I am very happy to serve as our President's representative in Geneva and pleased to return here in order to highlight one important aspect of the negotiation that is of particular interest to those of us who are negotiating now at this stage of the negotiation.

Our task is a difficult one of communicating with each other. We don't trust each other. We don't fully understand one another. One of the important first tasks that our delegation undertook was to suggest a procedure whereby we don't talk to the press about the substance of these negotiations. And I will not talk today about the substance of those negotiations in the few moments that I stand here.

But one of the reasons for that, as I explained to our Soviet colleagues, is I want to be talking to them about issues, about seeking understanding, and not necessarily engaging in a propaganda mechanism and in a propaganda device. And I hoped that they would respond.

Similarly, we have to communicate to them that we're serious about our objectives. I've learned, in many years of observing the Soviet Union and participating myself in negotiations with them, that they respect strength and determination, but that they also respect a trading position. Acts of good will, which we might do, for example, in negotiating with the Canadians, making a gesture of good will and then expecting something in return to reciprocate and foster that spirit, in my view, is not effective. It is looked upon, rather, as an absence of will, rather than an act of good will. And to negotiate successfully, we must have will and determination.

I, therefore, have long operated on the assumption, and I think the United States and the free world must operate on the assumption, that if the Soviets want something from us and if we feel it's in our national interest to weigh what they want, we must insist on getting something in return for it. The extent to which they receive something from us, without the necessity for them to give anything in return -- we are seriously interfering with the negotiating process, because as they enjoy the apple that falls from the tree that they did not have to pay for, they quite understandably wonder what other fruit will fall from that tree that they do not have to pay for.

I want to make something clear as a result of spending some time today on the Hill. People who differ with me on this MX issue include some very dear friends of mine, people whom I've worked with for a long period of time. I think they are wrong. But at no stretch of the imagination can we permit this debate to get to the point of saying that those who are wrong are necessarily unpatriotic or less interested in the success of the negotiations. I want to make that clear.

I think America's resolve at the negotiating table and elsewhere outside of the table, in the multifaceted approach we have in dealing with the Soviet Union, must be one of strength, and that must include important military strength; a willingness to talk and to negotiate, but to have strength behind that talking and that negotiating; a willingness to resolve issues.

Geneva -- and I can't answer that question in all honesty; I can't answer it because I can only speak for our resolve, I cannot speak for anybody else's resolve -- but if there is an agreement to come out of Geneva, your negotiators will find the means of coming out with that agreement and recommending it to the President of the United States.

I conclude by urging the President and the Secretary of State and the Vice President and others who represent the executive branch of our government to urge the urgency, the importance of bipartisan consultations and deliberations at all stages of policy development. And I also want to associate that by making a plea to my Democratic friends in this audience that you must respond to such an initiative constructively, because the best interests of the United States depend on it, our values depend on it, and the strength and integrity of the United States of America depend on it.

And I know that all of you will give this very important decision the careful attention and prayers that it deserves. And I can ask no more from any Member of Congress. But I would also have been derelict in my responsibility if I did not return here to tell you my judgment as to the effect of your decision on the vital, indispensable negotiations that are now taking place.

The President. Now, if you'll all be just patient for just a few moments, I will have to ask our friends of the press -- I hope they have another engagement -- [laughter] -- to move on in order to have some time there for discussion between us, but to preserve also the position of our negotiators, that we don't go public with anything having to do with the negotiations. So, that is the reason why we have to ask you to depart.

Today's vote is an important and unmistakable signal of American unity and resolve. By building upon the consensus achieved last week in the Senate, the House of Representatives has affirmed -- in a clear demonstration of American strength and determination -- our commitment to maintain the modern forces necessary for effective deterrence and to do everything possible to achieve significant arms reductions.

I know this issue was difficult for many Members of the Congress. But I am pleased that a majority of Members understood that protecting the peace and working for a more secure and stable future must begin with a strong America.

America has sent a message, loud and clear, that we back our negotiators, and we will continue to do so. Today's vote was a vote for peace, for a safer future, and for success in Geneva. And it is now essential that the House reaffirm today's vote for the MX Peacekeeper by a second positive vote to release appropriations.

The history of America is the history of a nation at work -- a nation of farmers, manufacturers, and merchants joining together to build a better society. The dedication and commitment of these early citizens provided the foundation for a growing and prosperous America -- an America built on individual initiative, a competitive spirit, and an intense pride in the achievements of a new nation.

Today, this enterprising determination to work and to prosper is embodied in more than 14 million small businesses, which provide the technology to keep the economy growing, the manufacturing and marketing skills to keep the nation competitive, and the innovation to guide us into a better future. It is this enterprising genius that has helped small business create most of our news jobs and provide economic opportunities unsurpassed by any nation in the world.

These aspiring entrepreneurs have always been on the leading edge of invention and progress in our society, and their confidence in the future has led to the creation not only of new jobs but of whole new industries. We all benefit from the contributions of small businesses and those who create them.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-seventh day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

The President. Neither the United States nor the Soviet Union can wish away the differences between our two societies and our philosophies. Our relationship is a difficult and competitive one, with many problems confronting our two nations. But we do have common interests, the foremost among them being to avoid war and reduce the level of arms. I am confident we can steer a course that does both.

Let me say how pleased I am that our negotiators are back in Geneva. The American delegation has instructions from me that will let them explore every promising avenue for progress. Like free people everywhere, I want these negotiations to produce agreements leading to deep reductions in nuclear arms and will do my utmost to make this happen. I just hope the Soviet leadership is prepared to make the same commitment.

We cannot assume agreements will be honored. A history of Soviet violations tells us we must be firm if our mutual security is to be strengthened. America has long been ready for a relationship with the Soviet Union that is based on peaceful competition, constructive cooperation, and progress on arms reductions. If the new Soviet leadership looks, they will find America a willing and fair partner in the search for a lasting peace.

The President. I want the negotiations in Geneva to succeed. My instructions to our negotiators are extraordinarily flexible. The American team will be openminded, and we will do our part to make the negotiations successful.

Both sides remain far apart on many crucial issues. And the Soviet compliance record with past agreements requires us to make certain that effective verification provisions are included in any future agreement.

If the Soviet Union is willing to meet us halfway, if they are willing to match our flexibility and openmindedness, then there is every reason to expect agreements leading to deep reductions in nuclear arms.

But we should also remember that the present situation -- in which the threat of massive nuclear retaliation is the ultimate sanction, the key element of deterrence and, thus, the basis for security and peace -- is unsatisfactory. It has kept the peace for 40 years, but the potential costs of a breakdown are immense. And because of continuing massive Soviet deployments of both offensive and defensive weapons, these potential costs are on the rise.

I directed a long-term research program to search for a defensive system that might reduce the danger of nuclear war. And because U.S. security is inextricably linked to that of our friends and allies, this Strategic Defense Initiative will not be limited solely to an exploration of technologies with potential against intercontinental ballistic missiles and submarine-launched ballistic missiles.

Q. Do you see the division of Europe in camps between East and West as a permanent thing, or do you see the possibility that Eastern Europe might move more toward Western Europe and the Soviet influence there could diminish?

The President. I don't think that any of us can believe that those countries would be subjected as they are to dominance by the Soviet Union forever. It was never part of the Yalta agreement. It wasn't part of the Helsinki final act, either. All the countries of Europe are supposed to have the right of self-determination. To me, it is unthinkable that in the future they will not demand to exercise that right; some of them are finding small ways to do so even today.

Soviet allies into the Western camp or threaten their security. They are trying to change the subject. The question is not one of boundaries or alliances; it is freedom. The Soviets are one of the few countries in the world who believe that freedom is a threat to their security. Our position in the West is that over the long term the denial of freedom is a much greater threat to the security of Europe as a whole.

Communist state -- this time on the mainland -- supported by the Soviet Union and working against the interests of the United States and its friends. And Nicaragua's harboring of Red Brigade fugitives is an example of how such a state can threaten interests outside this hemisphere.

In September 1983, in the Contadora document of objectives, Nicaragua agreed to establish a democratic system of government based on genuinely open elections. The Sandinistas acknowledged that democracy is indispensable to lasting peace in the region. The document of objectives also called for an end to support for subversion, a ban on foreign military bases, the reduction and eventual elimination of foreign military advisers, and reductions in arms and military personnel. We in the United States fully support these objectives, but Nicaragua has simply not come through on any of them.

The President. International terrorism is indeed a form of warfare. And as I'm sure your readers are aware, European allies -- and particularly Italy -- have sharply increased their cooperation to combat this ugly form of warfare.

And today the allies have increased the exchange of intelligence information, broadened areas of cooperation in improving physical and personnel security, and expanded cooperation in antiterrorist training programs. A great deal has been accomplished, and we're working hard to do even more.

Security Council Resolution 242. The PLO has refused to accept that principle and also refused to recognize the right of Israel even to exist. I don't see how an organization which has written off the one principle accepted by the parties and which refuses to recognize the existence of the party with whom peace must be negotiated can play a constructive role in the search for peace.

But our special relationship is not a matter of the past; it is a hope for the future. Our cooperation is expanding in many ways. Italy's growing contribution to the future political and economic development of the modern world brightens the prospects for a promising future.

Your Prime Minister, Bettino Craxi, completed a most successful visit to the U.S. just several weeks ago. And I can tell you that the relations between our two countries have never been better. Ours is a warm friendship linked by shared values that run very deep.

Americans have watched with admiration the success of Italy's political leaders in firmly establishing for Italy a place among the world's foremost democracies. Prime Minister Craxi is the latest successor to a proud democratic legacy. And I believe that under your government's coalition leadership, Italian democracy will grow even brighter.

But in the last 5 years, we've moved from malaise to hope, confidence, and opportunity. We knew that malaise for what it really was: Government, with its high taxes, excessive spending and overregulation, had thrown a wrench in the works of our free markets. In essence government was trying to run the economy, but was ruining it instead.

So, we cut tax rates and counterproductive regulations and moved to limit spending growth. On those regulations, our estimate is that we have eliminated enough regulations to save 300 million man-hours a year that the public and local and State governments used in filling out government forms to meet the regulations.

And I think we've seen some healthy results on this trading floor. Those tax cuts helped reenergize the stock market, with the volume of shares traded hitting record highs and more Americans than ever before participating in the market. An enormous rush of new equity issues, venture capital, and new investment became the driving force behind an economic expansion as strong as any we'd seen in more than 20 years.

The American economy is like a race horse that's begun to gallop out in front of the field. Other nations, hobbled by high tax rates and weighed down by oversized government spending, have been slow to catch up. And this has caused some painful dislocations, especially for America's exporting industries. But the answer is hardly to hamstring the American economy to make it drop back with the others. The solution is for our trading partners to throw off the dead weight of government -- cut their own tax rates, spending, and overregulation and join us in opening up their markets to foreign competition so they can catch up with us in our race to the future.

There's one sure method to cut the expense and price of American-made goods and increase our export sales. The surest way to make American products more competitive is to spur innovation, enterprise, and productivity by cutting tax rates again. And that's exactly what we intend to do.

It's time, too, that government got off its present spending spree before it squanders our future prosperity. Senate Republicans are trying to put together a package of genuine spending reductions, and they're going to need all of our support and encouragement in the coming weeks.

And let me repeat again, if the political heat of budget cutting is too much for Congress, then they should give the President what 43 Governors have -- a line-item veto. And if Congress can't cut, I will. And let me tell you it really would make my day.

With tax reform and budget control, our economy will be free to expand to its full potential, driving the bears back into permanent hibernation. That's our economic program for the next 4 years. We're going to turn the bull loose.

Note: The President spoke at 9:53 a.m. from the New York Stock Exchange trading floor rostrum. Following his remarks, the President met with members of the stock exchange and financial executives in the boardroom.

Now, it's true that I've heard about a rare and exotic flower that grows only in Queens. I think you call it the mulberry. And I wanted to see it. [Laughter] And it's true that I'm ever in search for candidates for our diplomatic staff -- [laughter] -- and so I wanted to meet a gentleman named Louis Carnesecca. I know he's elsewhere on a very important engagement right now. And it's also true that I wanted to see the school that some people are saying is just A - number one, top of the heap, king of the hill. And I know that right now that's being said in connection with college basketball, but from what I've learned of your university, the honor extends to a great many other areas as well. But there is more. For some time I've been hearing about a university in New York that boasts among its alumni the Governors of our two biggest States: Governor Mario Cuomo of New York and Governor George Deukmejian of California.

I've heard that this university has the highest bar exam pass ratio in the Nation; that it attracts more than a thousand students a year from 88 countries on six continents of the Earth; and that among its alumni are a third of one State legislature and more than 250 judges. So, naturally, I wanted to see the new Harvard. [Laughter] And thanks, St. John's, for inviting me.

I've come here today to talk about where our country has been for the past few years and where it's going. And I want to talk to you about our vision of the future and the kind of America that we now have a dazzling opportunity to create.

When I took office 4 years ago, many of you were in high school. But in spite of your youth, I know you were aware that America at that time was in a crisis. Inflation was over 12 percent, the prime interest rate was over 21 percent, unemployment was growing, and recent graduates were having trouble finding jobs. Government was weighing all of our people down with excessive personal taxes, with business taxes, and meddlesome regulations.

In 1981 we rolled up our sleeves and applied new thinking to these by now old problems. We cut tax rates for all individuals and businesses. We passed tax indexing so that inflation wouldn't force your parents into ever higher brackets as their income increased. We drove inflation down to below 4 percent. We got the economy moving again. And in truth, we can't take complete credit for the ideas that reignited our current economic growth. After all, John Kennedy had done what we had done, and great growth followed; and Japan had done what we had done, and became the economic dynamo of the East.

By 1984, last year, our economy was growing stronger and faster than it had in over 30 years, while inflation stayed lower than at any time since 1967. Civilian employment has grown by 7\1/2\ million new jobs over the past 2 years, and the number of unemployed has fallen by more than 3 million in the past 5 months alone. And that is more than a million-and-a-half Americans -- what is more, I should say, have found jobs.

We have made great progress the past 4 years, but it's what we do in the next 4 years that will determine whether the American economy really lasts. Now is the time, now is the key moment, to make dramatic change. I'm speaking of a change so fundamental that I could really call it radical -- radical as in reaching down to the roots.

The revolution that I'm talking about involves three things. One is taxes -- the amount you and your parents and friends pay to the Government that demands your money. Another is spending -- what the Government spends your money on and what effect that has on your life. But taxes and spending are like the foundation of a big house called growth. If our tax and spending policies are sound and balanced, the foundation will be rock solid, and the house of growth will stand and endure.

Our administration has reduced tax rates, as I've noted, but that's only the beginning. We have to do better. I believe we have to tear down our present tax structure and build a new one. We will propose a tax simplification plan. Tax simplification will make the rate structure simpler and more fair -- that will limit deductions and that will lower tax rates further.

With a simplified tax system, we would have a top rate far lower than the current top personal tax rate of 50 percent. A side benefit of this is that it will move us away from the whole strange world of unproductive tax shelters. For once, all Americans will know that their neighbors, as well as they, are paying their fair share and not hiding behind loopholes and shelters. We want to make the tax system simpler and more fair, and we want to push tax rates down still further. This is economic justice; it is economic sense and the key to America's economic future.

I want to talk a little here about how tax rates impinge directly on you. If you were a senior majoring in business, you'll get out of school and go into the job market in June. Let's say you have the good fortune to be hired as a salesperson for a firm with a starting salary of $20,000 a year. That's enough to live on with some comfort, but not luxurious by any means in these days.

Now, I could argue the morality of this -- of your paying so much and involuntarily finding yourself in a condition of something approaching servitude. And I will. But I wish right now to speak of broader practical purposes.

Now, some of you are only a generation or two removed from the immigrant experience. Some of you are the grandsons and granddaughters of sharecroppers who came north for jobs. Many of you are the first in your family to go to college. I was the first in mine, and I, too, am a grandson of immigrants. All of you come from hardy, risk-taking stock, and you're very much the sort of people who would, in a few years, take the few thousand you'd gain from a tax cut and pool it with friends and acquaintances in order to invest it.

Twenty of you might put up as much as $5,000 each and start a business -- a local newspaper, a small record company, a service industry, a small computer firm -- whatever. And that expands the economy, creating new businesses, new jobs, and new wealth. This is the magic that is and always has been at the heart of America's economic strength.

The technological revolution has seen to some of the things that I'm talking about. We have to recognize that and encourage the brave men and women who are taking risks in investing in the future. They ought to be honored. But to invest your time and money and concern is a leap of faith: a profoundly hopeful act that says, yes, I have faith in the future; I am the future; the future is what I make it.

Economic growth and economic freedom are the economic answer. But we cannot stop at reforming our tax structure; we must also reform our spending policies. You may remember what I said last summer: that we could compare the big spenders in Congress with a drunken sailor out on a spree -- but that would really be unfair to the sailor, because at least he's spending his own money.

Federal Government is now, and long has been, spending too much of your money. In the past 10 years tax revenues have grown by more than $400 billion, but spending by government has grown by almost $600 billion. That's about 50 percent more than the revenue. Government spending has grown more than one-third faster than the growth of our economy. Even our economy, the strongest in the world, hasn't been able to keep up with government's incessant demands.

Now, I've recommended a freeze on overall domestic spending for the recently submitted Federal budget, and I need your help in supporting these efforts. There's all sorts of ways for waste to be cut. There are many entitlements to be reexamined. We can and must do this, because if we don't get the size and weight of government down, then it will simply flatten the economy like a steamroller and make economic vitality an impossible dream.

I have asked for the support of Congress in getting spending down, and we're making some headway. But it takes a lot of courage for some Senators and Congress men and women to support us, because there's always more of a constituency for spending than for cutting. They'll have to make some brave decisions. And when they make them, they will deserve the support and the thanks of our country.

I want to mention, by the way, that I know that some of you are concerned about our proposed limits on financial aid for students. All right, well, we're trying to ensure an aid system that helps all those who need it. Now, you know that spending on higher education is still more than $7 billion -- as much as it was in 1982 and 1983, and more than double what it was 10 years ago. As Education Secretary Bill Bennett has pointed out, our student aid program is big, and our commitment to it will continue, and its primary purpose will be to provide the vital assistance to those who couldn't get an education without it.

Let's look at the facts. Defense spending accounts for less than 7 percent of our gross national product. That's far less than it was in the 1950's and 60's, when the threat facing us was not nearly so great. And since we first took office, we have cut $150 billion out of our own proposals for defense spending. In fact, right now, we're running almost $16 billion less than the Carter administration had projected would be their 1985 budget if they were still in office.

Now, at this point, it's a simple necessity to continue to bring our Armed Forces up to date. I've told the Senate leadership that I'm willing to consider more defense savings in noncritical areas, but I cannot compromise on the defense programs that are vital to our security.

The first responsibility of an American President is to see that this country is securely defended in a world in which trouble is, unfortunately, not the exception but the rule. All the great leaders of our time, from Winston Churchill to John Kennedy, have understood that to maintain the peace we must maintain our strength. If we don't, our adversaries will be inspired to wild action by our weakness.

Our economy is in good shape now, but we've got to make sure this isn't just a passing phase, a temporary pause in cycles of recession. We've got to see to it that economic growth becomes an unbreaking cycle of its own. And we can do that through getting tax rates down and spending down.

We live in difficult times; it's been a difficult century. Perhaps the biggest mistake mankind has made in this century is to think that the big answer is how difficult life is. Well, the big thing that will fill the void of the spiritual values that some of us rejected is the state -- that's their idea -- the state, with a capital ``S'' -- well, the political edifice that man has built to govern himself.

Some have said that this is the thing from which all blessings come. But if we've discovered anything these past few decades, it is that our salvation is not in the state. Our salvation is in ourselves and what we do with our lives and the choices that we make. It is in the things that we choose to worship.

We will always take care of the poor and the helpless among us, because that's the kind of people we are and have always been. But we're a people who've discovered anew what a deep fountain freedom is and how we cannot live without drinking deep from it.

I am no longer young. You might have suspected that. [Laughter] The house we hope to build is one that is not for my generation, but for yours. It is your future that matters. And I hope that when you're my age, you'll be able to say as I have been able to say: We lived in freedom, we lived lives that were a statement, not an apology.

And so, if you can help us, we welcome your support. And either way, we welcome your interest in how our country is governed and how together we can secure justice for our people. When I ask for your help, it's very simple. You are the citizens; government works for you. And it doesn't hurt if sometimes you decide to be the boss and tell 'em.

I know you have an exciting weekend coming up. And knowing your faith, you may have considered how far you would go in trying for victory. Well, can I just tell you something? When I was playing college football -- and I did -- I found out one night in a chalk-talk that was going on with the coach up in front, and I don't know how the conversation got around to prayer, but it did.

Now, I had never gone into a game in all those 4 years that I hadn't said a prayer. And I was surprised and amazed to learn -- I never told anyone that -- that everybody else on the team did, too. But, now, the subject was: What do you pray, and what do you ask for? And believe it or not, all of us had figured out for ourselves you can't ask God to help you win. How can He favor you over others of His children that are on the other team? And what we'd figured out for ourselves was that there be no injuries, that everyone, everyone do their best, that the best team win, and that, thus, we have no regrets when the game is over.

The President. Thank you very much. I can't tell you how deeply honored I am. I'd like to tell you also that during World War II, playing on a post basketball team, one of my teammates was an alumnus of St. John's and a great basketball player. Just so that I can even make it feel a little closer, in that school where I was playing football, we were called the Red Devils. Thank you very much. Thank you all.

Note: The President spoke at 12:07 p.m. at the university's Athletic Center. Prior to his remarks, he was awarded an honorary doctor of laws degree by Rev. Joseph I. Dirvin, vice president for university relations. Earlier, the President attended a reception with members of the university's board of trustees. Following his remarks, the President returned to Washington, DC.

Nearly 2 years have passed since the Scowcroft commission forged a bipartisan consensus that united us in our common search for ways to protect our country, reduce the risk of war, and ultimately and dramatically reduce the level of nuclear arms. And the American political process has tested that consensus ever since.

The latest test ended today. Thankfully, today's positive vote by the House of Representatives -- the fourth congressional vote on the MX Peacekeeper during the past 2 weeks -- sustained a key element of the Scowcroft commission recommendations, and production of the Peacekeeper missile will continue.

American resolve and unity will surely follow. But if we ensure American strength and determination and if we and the Soviet Union negotiate wisely and in good faith, we can reach agreements that will deeply reduce the level of nuclear arms and pass on a safer and more hopeful world to all of God's children. And I will do everything in my power to achieve that goal.

But seriously, though, I'm proud to have been selected as the recipient of this coveted award. I accept it with thanks and on behalf of those tens of thousands of individuals across our great country who, with their hard work, creativity, and faith in the future, have built the American space program and laid the foundation for a better tomorrow.

Robert Goddard, our American rocket pioneer for whom this award is named, exemplified the ingenuity, the perseverance of individuals who make lasting contributions to their fellow countrymen and to mankind. Dr. Goddard persevered for decades of intense research and development. And as so often happens, his genius was not apparent to many until after his success.

In Dr. Goddard's case, the New York Times claiming rockets would never work in the vacuum of space ridiculed his effort. ``He only seems to lack the knowledge ladled out daily in high schools,'' the Times editorialized.

But due to the efforts of Dr. Goddard and other individuals of vision and tenacity, America is now on the edge of a new era. By standing on the shoulders of giants like Robert Goddard, this generation is moving forward to harness the enormity of space in the preservation of peace, in increasing our economic well-being, and in expanding the horizons of human freedom beyond the greatest dreams of our Founding Fathers.

American freedom was once protected by musket and ball. Today scientific advancements are changing the way we think about our security. Two years ago, I challenged our scientific community to use their talents and energies to find a way that we might eventually rid ourselves of the need for nuclear weapons -- starting with ICBM's. We seek to render obsolete the balance of terror -- or mutual assured destruction, as it's called -- and replace it with a system incapable of initiating armed conflict or causing mass destruction, yet effective in preventing war. Now, this is not and should never be misconstrued as just another method of protecting missile silos.

Technology is with us as well. Twenty years ago, we simply could not build systems which would prevent ballistic missiles from reaching their targets; because of new advances in technology, that may no longer be true. That's why we've embarked on a vigorous research program, a program that does not violate treaties or threaten world stability.

The means to intercept ballistic missiles during their early-on boost phase of trajectory would enable us to fundamentally change our strategic assumptions, permitting us to shift our emphasis from offense to defense. What could be more moral than a system designed to save lives rather than to avenge them? What could be more peaceful than moving away from reliance on our ability to threaten global annihilation and toward reliance on systems which are incapable of threatening anyone?

We're not discussing a concept just to enhance deterrence, but rather a new kind of deterrence; not just an addition to our offensive forces, but research to determine the feasibility of a comprehensive nonnuclear defensive system -- a shield that could prevent nuclear weapons from reaching their targets.

And SDI research is not aimed only at protecting the United States. Our security is inextricably linked with other free peoples. An essential element of SDI research is the eventual ability to defend the United States and our allies from both long- and short-range ballistic missiles. Thus, we will not be consulting with our allies on SDI research, but working actively with them. In fact, we have extended formal invitations to those allied nations which want to join us in making SDI a fully cooperative research effort. The Secretary of Defense will be coordinating these bilateral programs of cooperation with our allies.

Our activities in space are already helping keep the peace, providing us early warning and enabling us to verify arms agreements. And far from being a violation of existing arms agreements, once our adversaries fully understand the goal of our research program, it will add new incentives to both sides in Geneva to actually reduce the number of nuclear weapons threatening mankind. By making missiles less effective, we make these weapons more negotiable. If we're successful, the arms spiral will be a downward spiral, hopefully, to the elimination of them.

We must, as SDI research would permit, expand the opportunities, the options, for peace and arms reduction. At the same time, through our strategic modernization program, we must ensure that our current weapons remain capable of performing their essential task, until we reach that day that they may be replaced by a defensive system.

Let history record that in our day America's best scientific minds sought to develop technology that helped mankind ease away from the nuclear parapet. Let us move on to a happier chapter in the history of man. And I would think any scientist would be proud to help turn that page.

We have used and will continue to use space to make ours a safer world. Space is also making this a more prosperous world; and in this endeavor, we've only scratched the surface. Space technology has already revolutionized communications and is assisting everyone from farmers to navigators. Industries that seem far removed from any direct tie with the space program have benefited beyond expectation.

Recently, the Presidential Commission on Industrial Competitiveness -- composed of leaders from business, labor, government, and academia -- reported that America's leadership in science and technology is the key to future U.S. competitiveness. Space can give America the edge. And this is true not only for high-tech industries like computers and biotechnology but for mature ones as well. Innovation -- often spurred on, if not inspired, by the space program -- is vital to the modernization of our steel, automobile, and textile industries.

The grandeur of the space shuttle taking off and then landing after a successful mission has been a source of inspiration to America. We can't put a price tag on this. And we cannot take our achievements in space for granted.

Just 15 years ago, the first two Americans landed on the Moon and captured the imagination of the world. In 1969 the space program had momentum, and we seemed on the verge of moving permanently into space. Instead, in the 1970's America hesitated.

Luckily, however, we did invest in the shuttle program, and today we have an operating fleet of three -- soon to be four -- space shuttles. And I have asked NASA and the Department of Defense to study the next generation of space transportation systems for use in the 1990's.

As you are aware, last year we took the next step toward future achievements in space: a permanently manned space station. The space station will serve as an orbiting laboratory for scientific and industrial research. It will give us vital new capabilities to work and learn in space and provide us a gateway to future space goals.

Our friends and allies have been invited to join us as partners in the space station effort. The response has been very exciting. We can fully expect that in less than a decade, space will shine as an outstanding area of cooperation between the free peoples of this planet.

But we expect more than inspiration from our commitment to space. Space should and will become an increasing sphere of investment and commercial activity, a center of attention for entrepreneurs and businessmen. Already, many companies see great potential in using space as a new environment for industrial research and product development. As free enterprise expands into space, not only will innovative ways be discovered to produce the goods and services we now enjoy but new opportunities, inconceivable in the confines of Earth, will come to light. Before the end of the century, many billions of dollars of commercial activity will be taking place in and because of space.

American wilderness into an economic dynamo that provided the American people with a standard of living that is still the envy of the world. We must make certain the same incentives that worked so well in developing America's first frontier are brought to play in taming the frontier of space. Let us always remember that our space program, first and foremost, belongs to and should address the needs of the American people. Last year, I approved a national space strategy which identifies areas of high priority necessary to accomplish this.

Seriously, though, to maximize our benefits, we must look beyond short-term steps to develop long-term goals for our national civilian space enterprise. I am, accordingly, happy to introduce today our appointees to the National Commission on Space, which will devise an aggressive civilian space agenda to carry America into the 21st century. The Commission, with the participation of the brightest minds in and out of the space community, will bring into focus a vision of America's future civilian opportunities and develop a set of civilian space goals to ensure America is ready for tomorrow. The members will talk with a broad sampling of Americans to keep our space efforts on target with the hopes, dreams, and aspirations of the people.

And it gives me great pleasure to announce to you that the Chairman of the National Commission on Space will be Dr. Thomas Paine, who has a long history of leadership within the space program. Would you stand up, Dr. Paine?

But while we're recognizing the people -- four people -- I'd just like to thank many of you in this room who are helping out with a private sector initiative dear to my heart, the Young Astronauts Program. Our space efforts are, by nature, future oriented. And I can't think of a better idea than giving young people a chance to get involved.

The challenge of pushing back frontiers is part of our national character. And as we face the vast expanses of space, let us recapture those stirrings in our soul that make us Americans. Space, like freedom, is a limitless, never-ending frontier on which our citizens can prove that they are indeed Americans.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Robert Dean Blackwill, of Maryland, a career member of the Senior Foreign Service, Class of Minister-Counselor, to be the Representative of the United States of America for Mutual and Balanced Force Reductions Negotiations and his intention to nominate Mr. Blackwill for the rank of Ambassador while so serving. He would succeed Maynard W. Glitman.

During the past three years, you have performed a large number of important and significant jobs with great success. Well, I'm glad to have this opportunity to say thanks for all your efforts and contributions. Your role in coordinating the Williamsburg Summit and the 1984 GOP convention -- to cite just two examples -- demonstrated beyond a doubt that you are a superb manager and organizer. But your role in the White House has required more than just a knowledge of organizing events. You have also displayed a deep understanding of the goals you and I share for America and how to explain those goals to the people. That understanding has shone through in every project you have directed. I'm going to miss your wise counsel and advice, and I want to thank you personally for a job well done.

I guess I brought this on myself, though, by mentioning the natural desire of talented people to return to the private sector after a period of government service. You certainly are the kind of valuable public servant I had in mind. As you leave the government, Nancy joins me in sending you our best wishes for every future success and happiness.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 29th day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

The suspension and modification of these fees will continue in effect pending receipt of the report and recommendations of the United States International Trade Commission and action that I may take thereon.

Q. During your first term, administration officials emphasized in congressional hearings time after time that military aid to Turkey is insufficient to modernize her ancient armed forces. Two questions: Do you think Turkey is fit to fulfill her NATO duties under these circumstances? Since administration requests have always been cut by Congress, do you intend to increase aid to Turkey?

The President. As we said in January, the United States regrets the failure of the summit meeting between the leaders of the two Cypriot communities. We believe, however, that the pursuit of a negotiated political solution in Cyprus must continue and that the Cypriot parties themselves hold the key to their own future. We continue to support the Secretary-General's role under his Security Council mandate and for our part have encouraged all parties to this dispute to be flexible and forthcoming.

The President. As I said, we are still hopeful the Cypriot parties can find the will to move forward, under the guidance of the Secretary-General, to find a peaceful and lasting solution to the Cyprus question.

The President. The United States maintains its longstanding security relationship with Greece within the NATO partnership. We believe that U.S. bases in Greece are of value to Greece, the U.S., and NATO. That is why we negotiated a bilateral defense and economic cooperation agreement, and we continue to maintain this view.

Q. Turkey, like the U.S., faces constant international terrorist attacks. Armenian terrorist groups claim responsibility for Turkish victims. However, Congress is about to vote on an Armenian resolution -- referring to the so-called genocide in 1915. Do you approve congressional action on such a sensitive issue?

The President. I know this is a deeply emotional issue, and I sympathize with all those who suffered during the tragic events of 1915. I also profoundly regret that Turks and Armenians have so far not been able to resolve their differences. Nevertheless, there is no question regarding my opposition to terrorism. On those grounds alone, my administration opposes congressional action on the kind of resolution to which you refer. We are concerned such resolutions might inadvertently encourage or reward terrorist attacks on Turks and Turkish-Americans. We also oppose them because they could harm relations with an important ally.

I hope the Turkish people understand that in our form of government the Executive can only seek to persuade the Congress and does not control congressional actions. Therefore, these resolutions, if adopted, would only express an opinion of the Congress. They would not and could not change my policy toward Turkey or my commitment to the fight against international terrorism.

Q. Turkey is following in the footsteps of U.S. economic policy. Liberal trade and conservative monetary policy are the basics of Turkish economic policy. Do you believe such measures should be used in developing countries? Do you think the measures are productive?

The President. Private capital working in an open market is the most effective engine of development. The success that Mr. Ozal [Prime Minister Turgut Ozal of Turkey]has had, so far, in reinstituting an enviable economic growth rate through his liberalization policies demonstrates that fact. The United States strongly supports Turkey's economic program and applauds the responsible and successful manner in which Turkey has addressed its international financial obligations.

United States, and we are encouraging the development of a strong, competitive Turkish economy. In the world of trade, countries are at the same time partners and competitors. We look forward to competing with Turkish goods and services in the world marketplace and anticipate expanding our markets in Turkey as well.

The President. The achievement of a just and lasting peace between Israel and all its neighbors is a major goal of the United States. We are working with the parties to achieve, as a next step, a broadening of negotiations through direct talks between Israel and Jordan with Palestinian representatives. The United States firmly believes that the only practical path to peace in the Middle East lies in direct negotiations based upon United Nations Security Council Resolutions 242 and 338.

In my September 1, 1982, Middle East peace initiative, which is firmly based on Resolutions 242 and 338 and the Camp David framework, I outlined positions which the United States would support in negotiations. These positions are aimed at the achievement of an equitable settlement that would reconcile Israel's legitimate security interests and the legitimate rights of the Palestinian people. Acceptance of our proposals by other parties is not a precondition for negotiations. We would expect other parties to put forward their positions.

The President. It is regrettable that U.S. relations with the U.S.S.R. have been difficult in recent years, but we must face the fact that events such as the brutal Soviet war against the Afghan people, the continuing Soviet military buildup far beyond legitimate defense needs, and the deteriorating human rights situation in the U.S.S.R. complicate the task of developing more satisfactory relations.

Although issues are complex, I am hopeful that we are at a point where we and the Soviets can make progress on the major issues. My administration will take every opportunity to broaden our dialog with the U.S.S.R. and work for mutually beneficial solutions to our problems. No one can predict what the future might hold, but I can assure you that Mr. Gorbachev and his colleagues in the Soviet leadership will find America to be a willing partner in the search for true peace. We hope that the Soviet Union is equally committed.

I have no higher priority than negotiating the reduction and, eventually, the complete elimination of nuclear weapons, and I am pleased that new arms control negotiations are underway in Geneva. The issues are many and complex, and it would be unrealistic to expect quick or easy progress. Nevertheless, I am optimistic that agreement can be reached if the Soviets join us in a serious and constructive approach to the talks.

The President. The Strategic Defense Initiative is not an arms development program. SDI is a research effort and, as such, cannot be a bargaining tool. Its purpose is to explore the potential of newly emerging technologies to see whether we can find an effective defense against ballistic missiles, thereby strengthening deterrence and reducing the risk of war. The focus of the research is on nonnuclear technologies.

The 1972 antiballistic missile treaty permits research into ballistic missile defensive technologies, and both we and the Soviets recognize the impossibility of limiting research. Indeed, the Soviet Union has for many years conducted a vigorous research program in this area. In fact, over the last 20 years the Soviet Union has spent approximately as much on strategic defense as on its massive offensive programs and has engaged in activities, such as the construction of the Krasnoyarsk radar, that violate the ABM treaty.

We believe it is essential that we examine the feasibility of defensive technologies which, if the research bears out, will increase the incentives for future radical reductions in offensive nuclear arms. In any case, it would be imprudent for us not to continue our research as a hedge against a possible Soviet breakthrough in defense technologies or a complete Soviet breakout from the ABM treaty.

Q. Mr. President, you are as famous in Turkey as in the U.S. regarding popularity and your programs and your economic success story. You are very much liked by the Turkish public. What are your thoughts on the Turkish people? Is there any message you would like to convey to them before the historic visit of the Turkish Prime Minister?

The President. I have always thought of the Turkish people as particularly brave and steadfast -- brave certainly in the military sense, as all the world knows, but brave also in terms of the determination they have shown in stabilizing and rebuilding their economy. In this, too, they are an outstanding example to the rest of the world. It is important that Turks explain to the American people and the world their significant progress toward greater democracy, freedom, and economic growth and the additional goals they have set for themselves.

The relationship between Turkey and the United States has grown during my administration, and I look forward to seeing that relationship further broadened and strengthened in the coming years. I particularly look forward to meeting your Prime Minister, about whom I have heard so much and with whom I share so many goals and opinions.

Secretary, Jim Brady. Nancy and I ask for your continued prayers and support for Jim and his family and also for the family of Al Antonucci, the man who helped wrestle my assailant to the ground. Mr. Antonucci died last May. He was a proud American who never asked a thing of others, but who willingly risked his own life to save another.

MX Peacekeeper missile and sent an important signal: America will maintain deterrence by modernizing our strategic forces, and we will stand united behind our negotiating team at the arms talks in Geneva. And by strengthening deterrence, we can ensure those weapons are never used and meet a crucial challenge to our shared bipartisan responsibility for preserving peace.

But another crucial challenge must be squarely faced. It's a challenge that I and members of my administration will be presenting to you with the utmost seriousness in the days ahead, for it goes to the heart of American security. I'm talking about the Soviet-Cuban-Nicaraguan plan to destroy the fragile flower of democracy and force communism on our small Central American neighbors -- a plan that could, for the first time, bring tyranny to our own borders, carrying the same specter of economic chaos, the same threat of political terrorism, the same floodtides of refugees we've seen follow every Communist takeover from Eastern Europe to Afghanistan, Laos, Vietnam, Cambodia, Ethiopia, and, now, Central America.

A key Soviet objective has long been to turn Central America into a beachhead for subversion. By tying us down in this hemisphere, by penetrating our vital sealanes and crippling our ability to meet our commitments worldwide, the Soviets will find it much easier to intimidate other nations and to expand their empire.

Soviet Foreign Minister Gromyko described the region on our doorstep as ``boiling like a cauldron'' and urged revolution. We know that the Soviets turned Grenada into a warehouse of violence. They did this in the last 5 years, and they provided more military assistance to Cuba and Nicaragua than we did to all of Latin America. And we know that the support Nicaragua gets from Cuba, Bulgaria, East Germany, North Korea, Libya, the PLO, and Iran is a threat to our security, because the dictators of Cuba and Nicaragua have not only pledged to spread communism, they've been caught -- forgive me -- redhanded trying to do just that.

Right now Havana and Managua are waging a campaign of disinformation to cover up their deeds and reassure the American people with soft words of peace. A secret Nicaraguan memo leaked to the Wall Street Journal and reported yesterday revealed how the Communists have used propaganda to smear their opponents, tighten censorship, and confuse the outside world.

The freedom fighters in Nicaragua would agree to a cease-fire if the Communist regime will negotiate, permit free elections and genuine democracy. The answer came back quick, loud, and clear: Forget it.

U.S. support for the freedom fighters is morally right and intimately linked to our own security. If we refuse to help their just cause, if we pull the plug and allow the freedom fighters to be wiped out by the same helicopter gunships the Soviets are using to murder thousands of Afghans, then our ultimate price to protect peace, freedom, and our way of life will be dear indeed.

Well, for my part, I want it clearly understood today that if we fail to meet this obligation, then history will hold us fully accountable to the consequences, for we will send an unmistakable signal that the greatest power in the world is unwilling and incapable of stopping Communist aggression in our own backyard.

Last Wednesday I addressed the Nation on the state of our national defense. I spoke of our commitment to an historic rebuilding program that has lifted America up out of weakness and given us the strength and confidence to reassume our role as leader of the free world. In a world too often prey to the forces of violence and tyranny, America is once again a bulwark for peace and freedom. We've come far, I said, in building the solid foundations of a strong and secure national defense, but we have not finished the job. We must not let all that we've accomplished in the last 5 years be undermined by careless slashing at the defense budget. America must never again slide back into helpless insecurity. America must never become, as it looked like it was becoming in the late seventies, a paper tiger.

Defense Secretary Weinberger has already made great strides. Before we came into office, defense costs had been out of control, escalating at an annual rate of 14 percent. We got them under control. For the last 2 years, cost increases have fallen to less than 1 percent, significantly lower than the rate of inflation. We have saved billions, and in the process we've built the most effective fighting force in the world. But there's still more we can do. As we continue rebuilding our defenses, we must constantly look for new savings. We must, if necessary, restructure the less efficient parts of our defense program so that waste is designed out and cost-effectiveness is designed in.

Last summer I appointed a bipartisan commission to study ways that we can redesign defense appropriations and management to make every defense dollar go as far as it possibly can. To head the Commission, I chose Dave Packard, an entrepreneur and self-made man who started Hewlett-Packard in a garage in the 1930's and built it into one of our country's leading high-tech computer and electronics companies. Dave is world famous for his management skill, and his company is renowned for its efficiency and modern management techniques. The initial recommendations came in this week. They are a tremendous example of American know-how applied to an extremely complex and difficult problem. Their application, I'm convinced, would make every defense dollar more effective and make America stronger. I won't go into all the details here -- just give you some of the highlights.

First is reform of the budgeting process, to give us firm, 5-year projections and 2-year budget cycles. We're the only major country in the world that rewrites its defense budget every year -- sometimes making detailed revisions two or three times a year, and the waste that results is immense. No company in the private sector would survive if it couldn't plan for the future but had to hastily and repeatedly alter its plans to accommodate shifting budgets. The effect of funding programs this way is less defense and more cost. Furthermore, much of the waste in defense is directly attributable to the appropriations process. The vote delays on the MX missile and the suspension of the B - 1 bomber cost this country billions of dollars, dollars that were lost forever as those systems that were set back had to be reprogrammed at higher cost.

The report also calls for less micromanagement. Instead of scrutinizing every paper clip, bolt, and bullet, Congress should give more thought to our overall defense needs and strategy. Further changes include involving the Joint Chiefs of Staff in drawing up the budget -- efficiencies for more multiyear contracting, increased use of commercial products, streamlined management, and focusing accountability within the procurement process. Also the Commission suggests changes in the organization of our military that will improve their role in national security decisionmaking. We will be announcing our implementation plans in the near future. Wherever the report points the way to greater executive effectiveness, I will implement its recommendations even if they run counter to the will of the entrenched bureaucracies and special interests. I will also urge Congress to remove those obstacles to good management that Congress itself has created over the years. This is an historic opportunity for the Congress and the executive branch to work together to give the American people what they deserve -- the best, most efficient, proudest Armed Forces of the world.

The President. Well, welcome all of you, and I know that four of us who just came in here are deeply grateful to you for the cause that brings you all together. I have just met with these leaders of the united Nicaraguan opposition who represent the hope for democracy in Nicaragua: Arturo Cruz, Adolpho Calero, and Alfonso Robelo.

Haiti and the Philippines have demonstrated the desire of people worldwide for democratic rule. In Central America great strides toward democracy have been taken in every country except Nicaragua, where the Sandinista dictatorship is consolidating Communist control. I think the world is watching to see if Congress is as committed to democracy in Nicaragua, in our own hemisphere, as it was in the Philippines.

The Nicaraguan democratic resistance, 40 percent former Sandinistas, now confronts new Soviet weapons, including the same helicopters used to massacre the resistance in Afghanistan. And democratic reconciliation remains possible if we support those who share our ideals. However, if we don't provide our friends with the means to stop these Soviet gunships, Nicaragua's freedom fighters will suffer the same fate as the Hungarian freedom fighters did 30 years ago, who had nothing to defend themselves against Soviet tanks.

The second question that'll be answered with this vote is whether Congress is as determined to keep Central America free as Ortega and Castro are to make it Communist. I've asked for $100 million in assistance, and we'll fight for it. Simple humanitarian aid is not enough. As these gentlemen definitely agree, you can't stop tanks and gunships with bandages and bed rolls. Congressional defeat of this aid proposal could well deliver Nicaragua permanently to the Communist bloc. Procrastination risks a military victory for the Sandinistas, who hope to finish off the freedom fighters before American help can arrive. We implore Congress not to delay and to provide that help. For 2 years, the freedom fighters have gotten no military assistance from the United States, except that that some of you know has been provided; and Moscow has provided a half a billion dollars in arms. Defeat for the contras would mean a second Cuba on the mainland of North America. It'd be a major defeat in the quest for democracy in our hemisphere, and it would mean consolidation of a privileged sanctuary for terrorists and subversives just 2 days' driving time from Harlingen, Texas.

Now, I don't think any of us are going to try and sell the idea that just a little Nicaragua could represent a threat to the United States, but that isn't what they have in mind either. They have in mind being a launching pad for revolution up and down, first of all, Latin America. We have the definite proof that the Sandinista government continues to send arms to the guerrillas in El Salvador that are trying still to get rid of that democratic government that is now installed there. And can anyone imagine how much more help they would be able to give if once they were totally victorious and had no opposition within their own country anymore, and what they could do to unseat the neighboring democracies? I think it would place in jeopardy the survival of each of those small and fragile democracies now in Central America, open up the possibility of Soviet military bases on America's doorstep, could threaten the security of the Panama Canal, inaugurate a vast migration northward to the United States of hundreds of thousands of refugees. And those who would invite this strategic disaster by abandoning yet another fighting ally of this country in the field will be held fully accountable by history.

Well, Paul, Senator, I hope you'll forgive me for having a little fun here tonight. The truth is, ladies and gentlemen, this isn't the easiest set of remarks that I've ever been asked to give. And that comes from someone who's had to give a fair number of speeches. Come to think of it, Paul, you've probably had to sit through more of them than either one of us wants to admit. And I know that finding the right word or expression can oftentimes mean the difference between hurting or helping, between doing this job well or not so well. But sometimes the words just aren't there. The task is really impossible. I guess that was what Lincoln felt at Gettysburg. He knew there are occasions when words must be brief because the feelings are so deep, and this evening is one such occasion.

In the first place, I'm not sure I know what I could say to add to the understanding of Paul Laxalt by those of you who know and love him so well. In Paul Weyrich's article in the current issue of the Conservative Digest, the title, fittingly enough, is ``The Character of Paul Laxalt.'' There's a story about the time that Barry Goldwater was scheduled to campaign in Nevada in 1964. Everyone told Paul -- well, not everyone, but there was that certain group of people that told Paul he could probably win his race for the Senate, but only if he didn't identify himself too closely with the Senator. Paul's reply, ``Listen, Barry Goldwater is my friend. If I snubbed him now, I could never look him in the face again. I would rather lose.'' And Paul did lose, by 84 votes. But that kind of courage and sense of values would later make him part of the Nation's history, one of the guiding stars for a political revolution that has shaken America and the world.

All of you know, too, the story of Paul's family. Perhaps some of you have seen the book written about his father by one of his brothers, ``Sweet Promised Land.'' There's a wonderful picture of the elder Laxalt on the cover. He's looking out across the Sierra Nevada. ``Seeing him in a moment's pause on some high ridge,'' Robert Laxalt wrote, ``with the wind tearing at his wild thickness of iron grey hair and flattening his clothes to his lean frame, you could understand why this was what he was meant to be.'' Well, seeing Paul as I have -- calm in crisis, resolute in duty, warm in friendship -- I also knew why this was what he was meant to be; that he, too, had a destiny, a destiny to be a great leader of our nation and one of the foremost Americans of our time or of any time.

Well, you bet it was, and again tonight those tears aren't very far away. The friend who understands you creates you, a wise man once said. Paul created because he always understood. And for that, I am and shall always be grateful. But I'm humbled, too, knowing that so often he chose to give of himself, for Nancy and for me, always for America, his sweet promised land. So, yes, I owe a great deal to Paul Laxalt. But how really does that make me any different from anyone else in this room? And every other man, woman, and child who enjoys the blessing of freedom in this wonderful country tonight.

There's another story Paul tells in his little book. Now, like anyone, he was nervous appearing in 1984 before the packed arena and a huge nationwide television audience. But he says, ``That feeling quickly disappeared when I looked down from the podium and saw the Nevada State flag with the words `Battle borne' inscribed upon it.'' Well, that's his story, his State's story, but our story, too, and especially our century's story. Had the times been more tranquil, many of us would have preferred some other career, perhaps, or at least a little more leisure time. I know Paul would have made a lot more trips to a place called Marletta in the Sierra Nevada. But history did hit us with a freight train, and we were battle borne. The events of our century -- world wars and totalitarian governments so momentous, so rife with human suffering -- so gravely threatened our shining city on a hill, our sweet promised land, so we could not shirk nor deny the duty that we saw before us. And tonight we thank God that we saw our duty and did it and that our efforts have been rewarded with not just a glimmer but a glow of light as this dark century comes to its close.

And to the scholars who someday will seek the origin of that sudden brilliance, that sudden outburst of freedom's light in the closing decades of the 20th century -- one we pray God will continue to grow brighter -- I say to them, look to the son of the high mountains and the peasant herders, the son of the Sierra and the immigrant Basque family. Look to a man, to a friend, to an American who gave of himself so that others might live in freedom, so that his country and his father's country might always be a light unto the nations, a shining city on a hill and that sweet promised land.

Paul Laxalt is more than deserving of the honor we do him tonight. We bring honor on ourselves for recognizing that fact. He is truly a man for all seasons. And he's our friend, our good friend. God bless him.

Today in Cape Town, the Government of South Africa proposed that August 1, 1986, be set as the date for the beginning of implementation of United Nations Security Council Resolution 435. That resolution outlines the procedures leading to the independence of Namibia. The South Africans have made implementation of this date contingent on reaching prior agreement on a timetable for Cuban troop withdrawal from Angola.

The United States Government welcomes South Africa's announcement as a significant and positive step in the negotiations to achieve Namibia's independence, the withdrawal of Cuban forces from Angola and, more broadly, peace in the region. The opportunity now exists for rapid movement toward a settlement which will bring Namibia to independence. This opportunity should be seized. It is now incumbent upon all the parties to the negotiations to intensify their diplomatic efforts. The United States is prepared to move rapidly to encourage the parties in this effort. With this in mind, the Secretary [of State] has asked Deputy Assistant Secretary for African Affairs Frank G. Wisner to travel immediately to southern Africa for consultations with governments in the region.

We welcome the South African Government's announcement that it would lift the state of emergency within the next few days. We have long urged that the state of emergency be lifted as one of the steps the South African Government must take to create conditions in which it will be possible to begin negotiations with credible black leaders leading to meaningful reform and a reduction in violence.

I'm pleased to be here today to help Secretary Bennett present this book that is called ``What Works.'' And you all know, I'm sure by now, that before you leave here today you will be receiving this particular report. This little book is only 65 pages long, and that's pretty short by Washington standards. But there's more practical, useful information packed into these 65 pages than in a whole mountain of most government documents. This book is for the American people, parents, teachers, principals, school board members, State legislators, and any adult who is responsible for the education of a child. And it tells you exactly what the title says: what works when it comes to teaching and learning.

The Department of Education has gathered the best available research. We know from experience that certain tools work and work well when it comes to teaching and learning, and this is a practical guide to those tools. ``What Works'' makes its appearance at just the right time, because we've had some encouraging news about our schools lately. Just 2 weeks ago we learned that since 1982 senior high school students in 35 States have improved their academic performance. We learned that graduation rates are up and dropout rates are down. And last year, as many of you know, SAT scores rose 9 points, and that was the largest annual gain since 1963.

Yes, we are making progress, and this book can keep us going in the right direction. When you look inside ``What Works'' you'll discover that some of the research findings aren't really very surprising. That's because sound educational practice is based on something Americans know a lot about: plain, old-fashioned common sense. On discipline, for example, ``What Works'' says this: ``Schools contribute to their students' academic achievement by establishing, communicating, and enforcing fair and consistent education policies.'' That's good to know because for 16 out of the last 17 years Americans have said that lack of discipline is their number-one concern about schools. Here in Washington we've been addressing this concern. Our Department of Justice has supported efforts to make sure that teachers, principals, and school administrators have the authority they need to run orderly schools. And at my request the Departments of Justice and Education are examining initiatives that would enhance the ability of State and local officials in maintaining school discipline.

So there we have it. ``What Works'' confirms the common sense of the American people. Teachers in the old days may have worn granny glasses and taught in one-room schoolhouses, while today's teachers jog to work and use computers in the classroom. But teachers still know what they're doing when they must tell Johnny to behave, ask questions in class, and do his homework every night. And good teachers still know what good teachers have always known: We don't need a lot of government interference and fancy gimmicks to produce good schools. What we need is to concentrate hard on basic academic subjects and fundamental moral values.

Nearly 3 years ago, our administration issued a report called ``A Nation At Risk'' that made headlines. That report concluded: ``If an unfriendly foreign power had attempted to impose on America the mediocre educational performance that exists today, we might well have viewed it as an act of war.'' Well, ``A Nation At Risk'' spoke to the American people as a whole about the crisis in our schools.

Women have contributed mightily to the growth of the United States and the success of the American experiment with democracy. Today, women of every race and ethnic background, whether single or married, with children or other dependents, continue to play leading roles in the enrichment of our Nation. They are contributing substantially to the growth of the economy and the development of our educational, political, commercial, judicial, and social systems. And they continue to sustain those family values so essential to the health of the Nation.

Women are making significant achievements in government and the private sector that will enhance employment opportunities for all Americans. As obstacles to full equality of opportunity are overcome, more and more women are successfully occupying an ever greater variety of demanding and rewarding careers. At the same time, women make an incomparable contribution as mothers and homemakers, whose vision, love, and example will shape the destiny of our country in the years to come.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 4th day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

This legislative proposal calls for a five-year program of $250,000,000 that would be taken from a number of existing economic programs including Housing Guarantees and the Private Sector Revolving Fund, which are administered by the Agency for International Development, the investment insurance program of the Overseas Private Investment Corporation, and the Trade and Development Program.

In addition, the authorization of $20 million for the Economic Support Fund for 1987 is proposed, which will be within the total amount for that fund currently requested in the 1987 Budget. This would provide a cash contribution to an international economic development fund for Northern Ireland and the Republic of Ireland under the auspices of the Anglo-Irish Intergovernmental Council. A supplemental appropriation request for 1986 for an initial contribution to this Anglo-Irish fund is concurrently being transmitted to the Congress.

I urge the Congress to act without delay on this important legislation. I am confident our efforts, together with those of the Governments of the United Kingdom and Ireland, will help to promote economic and social development in Ireland, thereby constructing a durable framework that would provide a promise of peace for the people of Northern Ireland.

The President today announced the appointment of Thomas Patrick Melady to be Private Sector Coordinator of International Training. This is a new position at the Agency for International Development, United States International Development Cooperation Agency.

President Duarte's proposal to Daniel Ortega yesterday has created a new opportunity for peace in Central America. We applaud President Duarte's willingness to renew a dialog with the Nicaraguan-backed guerrillas in El Salvador if the Nicaraguan Communists are also willing to begin a dialog with the democratic resistance in Nicaragua.

President Duarte's offer creates an opportunity to begin simultaneously three parallel sets of talks aimed at peace and national reconciliation throughout Central America. If the Nicaraguan Government responds favorably, we could soon see: 1) a dialog leading to internal reconciliation and democracy in Nicaragua; 2) talks for bringing an end to the conflict in El Salvador; and 3) the simultaneous resumption of talks between the United States and the Nicaraguan Government.

These three sets of talks offer the best hope of ending the strife and the bloodshed in Central America and creating new possibilities for peace and democratic progress throughout the region. We call upon Mr. Ortega to accept President Duarte's proposal and agree to negotiate with the democratic resistance now. We hope that the eight Contadora and support group nations will enthusiastically support President Duarte's proposal. These three sets of simultaneous talks would provide a great impetus to the Contadora group's efforts to mediate a comprehensive, negotiated settlement of the conflict in Central America.

Well, that statement has become even more urgently true today. There's a vote coming up in Congress of utmost importance, and I have to tell you I need your understanding and support. I'm talking about our request for $100 million in aid to the democratic resistance forces in Nicaragua. Nicaragua may seem a small country, faraway. And why, some wonder, should we care what's happening there? Why should we spend $100 million on someone else's fight? Well, I want to talk about why we must care and why the United States has not only a moral but a strategic interest in supporting freedom in Central America.

There are many things at stake in this vote: the hopes of the Nicaraguan people to live in freedom and democracy; the hopes of the people of Central and South America to live in peace, free from Communist subversion. But there's another issue that overrides all others: the national security of the United States. Let there be no mistake: If we fail to provide timely assistance now, if we abandon our allies in freedom and allow the Communists to establish a permanent beachhead on the American mainland, we will be living with the consequences for decades to come.

Managua has also rolled out the welcome mat for terrorists from around the world, not just Cubans, Bulgarians, Libyans, PLO, and Iranians, but members of the Baader-Meinhof gang, the Basque ETA [Basque Fatherland and Freedom], and the Italian Red Brigade. These criminals and lunatics now camp out on the doorstep of the United States. Let's not kid ourselves; the Sandinistas are avowed, dedicated Communists. And Communists since the days of Lenin have advocated terrorism as a legitimate means to attain political ends. Incidentally, Mr. Lenin's picture is quite prominent on new issues of postage stamps in Nicaragua. If the Sandinistas are allowed to consolidate their hold on Nicaragua, we'll have a permanent staging ground for terrorism. A home away from home for Qadhafi, Arafat, and the Ayatollah -- just 3 hours by air from the U.S. border. The recent terrorist attack in the Palace of Justice in Colombia in which the Sandinista Communists were implicated is just the beginning, the first rumblings of a Communist earthquake that could overrun Latin America.

The Prime Ministers of nine of the Caribbean island nations, when I was in Grenada just a week or two ago, told me that Nicaragua represented the greatest threat to their freedom and democracy -- and they brought up the subject to me. They begged us to continue aiding the freedom fighters. Some still insist that the Sandinistas are only nationalists. The Sandinistas themselves laugh at the idea. They are true international Communists who talk of a revolution without borders and who have eagerly put their country at the disposal of Fidel Castro and the Soviet Union.

Everyone who's thinking about this aid package should ask themselves one question: If the Sandinistas succeed in throwing the whole of Central America into turmoil, if the United States must contend with a growing number of hostile, aggressive Communist states close to its borders, how willing or able will we be able to meet our commitments to other allies? Our supply lines to Israel and our NATO allies run through the Caribbean. The Soviets are already banking on this fact. Even some in Congress would rather ignore it. Today Nicaragua is the focus of Soviet efforts at destabilization in the Western Hemisphere.

If we show ourselves willing to abandon our friends so close to home, how soon before the Soviets turn their full attention to Israel, that lonely outpost of democracy in the Middle East? Freedom is indivisible. The moral foundation of our support for Israel is our support for freedom and democracy, and that support must always remain rock-solid wherever freedom and democracy are endangered. I want to assure you that I would not consider any measure, including arms sales to moderate Arab nations, if I thought it might endanger the security of Israel. A small, faraway country, some say, but all people that struggle for freedom are close to America's heart.

Recently there's been an intensive effort to discredit the democratic opposition in Nicaragua. Well, let me say a few words about disinformation. Some of us have been around long enough to know that disinformation has a long history. I remember the reports of Walter Duranty from Stalin's Russia, who denied the existence of the forced famine, even though he had witnessed firsthand Stalin's genocide. I remember Lincoln Steffens' famous remark when he returned from that land of slaughter and declared: ``I have been over into the future, and it works.'' I remember Herbert Matthews' reports on Castro before he came to power, calling him a democrat and the hope of Cuba. And to some of you who are really too young to remember this, even people around our country were calling him the George Washington of Cuba, and George rolled over in his grave.

Those reports helped shape the climate in Washington in which we cut off aid to Batista and facilitated Castro's march into Havana. And then, you remember, once in power, Castro declared voluntarily: ``Yes, I'm a Communist. I've always been a Communist.'' He didn't say that till after he was there and in power. Likewise, we were told that Ho Chi Minh and Pol Pot were nationalists, and this was before the mass exodus of boat people and the murder of a third of the population of Cambodia. History moves on. The smoke-screen of lies and disinformation vanishes, and the brutal reality of communism is laid bare -- but then, it's too late.

So, today we see an orchestrated campaign to slander the freedom fighters. But who shall we believe -- dedicated Communists who call American supporters useful fools or democrats like Adolpho Calero, Arturo Cruz, Alfonso Robelo, who oppose the Somoza dictatorship as they fight the Communist tyranny today? Shall we believe Communists, whose definition of morality is what furthers their political ends, who have systematically attacked religious denominations, extinguished civil liberties, and waged an inhuman war against Miskito Indians, or believe the people putting their lives on the line for the values that we hold sacred: democracy, freedom, and human rights?

On national television the other night, [House Majority Leader] Jim Wright said that at one time the revolutionaries in Latin America, men such as Bolivar and San Martin, emulated our democratic revolution. Well, some still do. The freedom fighters in Nicaragua fight for democracy, too. They, too, are the moral descendants of men at Morristown and Valley Forge, though the tyranny they fight against is more brutal than anything our forefathers could have imagined.

Soon Congress will be making the historic decision whether or not to help these brave men and women. The ranks of the freedom fighters continue to swell. If we give them the aid they need, the Nicaraguan people can win this battle for freedom on their own. American troops have not been asked for and are not needed. We must make sure they never are needed. We send money and material now so we'll never have to send our own American boys. But if the Members of Congress hide their heads in the sand and pretend the strategic threat in Nicaragua will go away, they are courting disaster, and history will hold them accountable. If we don't want to see the map of Central America covered in a sea of red, eventually lapping at our own borders, we must act now.

With your help and the help of other freedom-loving Americans, we can succeed in turning the tide to democracy in Nicaragua. We must succeed; nothing less than the security of the United States is at stake. Thank you all, and God bless you for letting me talk to you.

Mr. Bialkin. Mr. President, you have in this room representatives of the entire organized American Jewish community. We asked for this meeting and for the opportunity to meet with you because we wanted to come here and express to you our admiration and our appreciation to you for being what it is you are.

We have so many things to express our thanks to you for. Most recently, as the leader of this country, in so skillfully managing the transition in the government of the Philippines, we think that we, as all Americans, join with you and the leadership of this country in managing to maintain a friend and preserve freedom and democracy. And we want to express that to you as openly and as firmly as we can. I have a list which I hope you don't think is too long, Mr. President, but we like you an awful lot. So, I'm going to say one or two things. I want to say that we know that the freedom of Anatoly Shcharanskiy, which you advocated for years and which you urged with Mr. Gorbachev, is due primarily, if not exclusively, to the continued efforts of the United States in support of Avital Shcharanskiy and her movement and the movement of all freedom-loving people. Anatoly Shcharanskiy is free. We thank you for that.

We want to assure you, however, that we are not summer soldiers, and we know that you're not a summer soldier. The fight for human rights, for freedom in the Soviet Union, indeed, for freedom the world over will go on. We'll be there, and we know that you will be there leading us and helping us. I do want to say that we admire your defense of freedom and your condemnation of terrorism. Your eloquent plea for the contras, to support freedom and democracy in Central America, to preserve the ability to maintain a decent and balanced society, to keep Central America in freedom's camp, has touched many of us and will find residence in our community.

As the chairman of the Conference of Presidents, I would lose my job if I said the whole Conference of Presidents speaks as one in supporting you. But I do know from my own experience and my own expression that, while there may not be unanimity -- there never is in a democracy, and I assure you we're a democracy -- I believe that the overwhelming sympathy and support of the American Jewish community rides with freedom, rides with the defense of those who wish to fight for their freedom, and would support you in your interested and objective and principled effort in that end.

We appreciate and support your strong condemnation of terrorism, and your support for the right to react to terrorist outrage is appreciated by all of us, as is your principled and moral and sentimental support for the State of Israel. We know that the fight to repel terror, to defend Israel, and to promote peace leads to concern -- and you know that we have a concern -- about further arming Arab countries, even those who call themselves moderate, who do not support the peace process. We recognize it's a complicated issue. We do urge that if arms are to be sold, they should be sold only under circumstances where you have reasonable assurances and are fairly confident that the recipients of those arms will move in the direction of peace.

The time has come for the abandonment of the rejection of Israel -- that is, the Arab countries, including the moderates, stand on a rejectionist platform. We hope that with your effort and with the pressure and enticement that arms may involve, Mr. President, that you can get them to move toward abandoning their rejection of Israel's right to exist and move toward negotiation. The principal barrier to peace is that rejection. The threat of assassination and terrorism is something we can't stand. Respectfully, we urge that the time has come in the Middle East for emphasis on economic development and on positive measures to live together. If Egypt and Jordan and Israel can develop a joint economic plan, that may bring peace faster than the sale of arms.

Mr. President, I want you to know that you have here in the entire Jewish community the admiration, to a man and a woman, extensively in every aspect, of your quest for freedom. You have our love, our appreciation, and our support for all that you do. And we're grateful.

The President. Thank you. Thank you very much for those very generous words, and thank all of you for this warm welcome. And let me just say that with regard to your one subpoint there with regard to arms and to Arabs that are, in that regard, always in our mind -- that is predicated upon our belief that it can further the cause of peace, which we're trying to bring about in the Middle East, and that we are pledged to the fact that we will never allow Israel to lose its qualitative or quantitative edge by anything we do in that regard.

The President. Well, if the issue we are facing and the stakes are properly understood, we should be able to muster bipartisan support. We've seen some evidence of this emerging already in some of the committee votes, but we've got a long way to go. And what the Congress is about to decide goes right to the heart, I think, of our national security; and I intend to bring this issue directly to the people in a television address. And I know that you will work with us right up to the day of the vote to see to it that your colleagues and the American people understand how great the stakes are.

Even as we meet, Nicaragua's dictator is back in Havana meeting with Castro. And I think it's significant that Bayardo Arce, one of Nicaragua's nine commandantes, was the first foreigner asked to address the recent Soviet Party Congress. It's up to us to persuade the Members of Congress of what the consequences will be for Nicaragua, for Central America, and for the safety of our own country, if we fail to act. And that's what we propose to do, is act all-out for the next 2 weeks.

The President. Well, it's what the choice comes down to, whether it is knowingly or not. And I've had enough experience with Communist subversion back in my former profession to know that a great many people are deceived and not aware of what they're doing is inimical to the interests of the United States.

The President. Well, good morning. Ladies and gentlemen, I am pleased to announce this morning the appointment of Philip Habib as a Special Envoy for Central America, succeeding Ambassador Harry Shlaudeman. And I want to make it clear that in this change of assignments we're trading strength for strength. Ambassador Shlaudeman has combined his knowledge of Latin America with his extraordinary skills as a diplomat and has performed outstanding service for this nation. And Harry Shlaudeman has worked closely with Secretary [of State] Shultz and Assistant Secretary [of State] Abrams in this mission, and so will Phil Habib. I'm personally grateful for Harry's efforts and look forward to announcing very soon a new and important position for him.

Ambassador Habib has just returned to Washington this morning after his successful mission to the Philippines. He is still in a different time zone, I'm sure. He played a key role in maintaining effective communications between the United States and the Philippines at a critical turning point in Philippine history. Phil, as many of you know, is wise and patient and shrewd.

Now there's another difficult job before us. We believe that the Nicaraguan people, just like the Filipino people, have the right to self-determination through democracy. And we in this administration and in Congress must now decide whether Nicaragua is to be the next staging ground for subversion, terrorism, and Soviet Communist expansion on our doorstep. And I want to emphasize today that there can be a diplomatic solution for Central America. It is the solution that will come when the Nicaraguan Communists finally agree to sit down and talk with their opposition, both armed and unarmed, to bring an end to the strife and the repression in their country.

Three days ago, President Duarte of El Salvador came forward with a bold and promising new proposal. In a letter to Daniel Ortega, President Duarte offered to resume talks with the guerrillas in El Salvador if the Nicaraguan Communist regime will begin simultaneous talks with the democratic resistance in that country. Yesterday, the three leaders of the united Nicaraguan opposition gave their full endorsement to this proposal. They are ready and willing to seek a political solution; so is the United States. On February 10th I sent a letter to the eight heads of state of the Contadora support group nations. In that letter I said that the United States is prepared to begin simultaneous talks with the regime in Nicaragua when that regime sits down with the democratic resistance.

I'm asking Ambassador Habib to meet next week with President Duarte to discuss his peace initiative. And our task is to ensure that democracy can succeed. We will continue to make every effort, as we have in the past, to pursue change through diplomatic means. But let there be no misunderstanding; Ambassador Habib's efforts to achieve a diplomatic solution must be accompanied by an increasing level of pressure on the Nicaraguan Communists.

The President. I have never believed that, if you're meaning that I was assigning any motive to them. I was only talking facts as to what would be the inevitable result. Either we do what I've just talked about doing or we have a Communist state here on the mainland.

The President. No. Once again, you ask a question that I'm sure the answer could be taken any way the questioners want to take it. But the simple answer is, as I say, we're faced with a choice. We're either going to keep on bringing along the wave of democracy that has been sweeping over Latin America, or we're going to sit back and allow a Communist base to be established here on the mainland.

I'm honored that the President has asked me to take this new assignment. I have no substantial statement on Central America at this time except to note that the President and the Secretary of State have emphasized to me their commitment to seeking a negotiated settlement in Nicaragua and elsewhere in Central America. They've asked me to meet with President Duarte to discuss his peace initiative. I have no illusions about the complexity of the issues in Central America and the difficulties in reaching a negotiated solution. Nevertheless, I pledge my efforts to work with our democratic friends and neighbors in the region toward a peaceful and democratic outcome. Thank you, Mr. President. Thank you very much.

Q. Mr. President, there's a proposal to put some of the money in escrow rather than put it out directly. Mr. President, would you go along with a plan to put the contra aid money into escrow for 6 months, and then if they didn't come to the negotiating table, release it?

The President. No, I think the analysis that was given is true -- that the great part of this is due to the weather that we've had. You notice that two-thirds of this has occurred in just Texas, Illinois, and California. The flood damage and all this has temporarily put people out of work and businesses out of operation.

Ambassador Habib. I don't know whether the people were aware of what was there or wasn't there. There was a lot of baggage, came in two different pieces -- one of them up at Clark Field, one of them down on the dock -- and then they sorted them out, and they didn't sort them out. Some of them were opened; some of them were not.

Ambassador Habib. That's a question that's going to have to be decided. Because, as you know, there are claims and counterclaims. And I think the position we have taken, which the President has taken and we've taken, is that these are matters to be settled in accordance with the law. And when we say ``law,'' we mean U.S. law, Philippine law, and international law. And that's the way it's going to be approached. I don't see it as a very complicated matter, and that's what I told the appropriate officials of the Philippine Government when I was there and they questioned me about this.

Ambassador Habib. I discussed that with him. And as you may or may not know, there's a small team going out from here headed by Peter McPherson of AID, including people from some of the relevant departments, to go out there and discuss that in some detail with the new officials in the Philippine Government. I, obviously, am not going to tell you what I recommended to the President. I don't think that'd be appropriate. But I can assure you that, generally speaking, we're following the President's earlier dictums of wanting to be useful and helpful to the Philippine Government.

Ambassador Habib. For example, I don't think there's any question that you can draw a difference, say, from the shift from Somoza to the Sandinistas as compared to the shift from Marcos to what is obviously not only a widely popular and probably successful in an electoral-process administration, and also I think -- I wouldn't say center or center left -- but in the middle of the body politic of the Philippines, with wide enthusiastic support generated both during the campaign and after the campaign. Whereas in the other place, you know, it just didn't work that way. You went from Somoza right to -- almost quickly to the Sandinista junta.

Ambassador Habib. And, will, beyond that, I would say that in both cases I think it's fair to say that one can pursue a different course. That is to say, you can pursue a course which could and should bring about a democratic solution, one in which whatever compromises are made between the contending forces are done peacefully and are done through negotiation and discussion. That hasn't been possible as of this stage, as I understand it.

Ambassador Habib. No, let's just wait a while, and let's see what comes out. Right now we're working on this proposal that President Duarte has made. I'm going to go down there, and I'm going to discuss it with him. And we'll look at that; we'll see where it leads us and then from there, well, you know, we'll see. There's no point in going after me too hard on Central America. You want to really get on Central America, you got to get Harry -- or the Secretary, not me.

Ambassador Habib. That was Mrs. Aquino and her advisers' decision. Let me say that I think that her purpose is quite clear. She wanted to sweep that board clear and start all over from the question of people that had been put in prison by the previous regime. Now, she has made it very clear, however, where she stands on her view of these people resorting, once again, to the kind of activities they were engaged in before. And her people have made it clear that, if they do, then they'll be dealt with in accordance with their law and be dealt with severely, I take it.

Ambassador Habib. As I understand it, what President Duarte has proposed, and which we agree with at the moment, is that there would be talks between himself and the guerrillas in El Salvador and that he would hope that at the same time there could be discussions between the opposition and the Sandinista government in Nicaragua. And we have stated all along, it is my understanding -- and this is the last thing I'm going to say about my understanding of Central America -- we've said all along that talks between the opposition and the Sandinistas are necessary if there are to be any discussions between ourselves and the Sandinistas. That's the position as I understand it, and that's as far as I can go at the moment. There's no point in trying to pursue me, Andrea. There is no point in pursuing me further on that at this time; maybe sometime in the future.

Ambassador Habib. I told the Philippine Government that as far as the United States was concerned, we would be cooperative and that the matter would be dealt with in accordance with law -- U.S. law, Philippine law, and international law. That is the exact phrase that I used in talking to the commissioner who has been charged -- there's a commission that's been charged with looking into these matters.

Nancy and I were saddened this evening to learn of the death of former Senator Jacob Javits of New York. Throughout his many years in the Senate, Jacob Javits was known for his intellect, for his integrity, for his dedication to the people of New York and the Nation, and for the sheer joy he took in every day of his work. Especially in foreign relations, his chief abiding interest, Senator Javits served our country with tremendous insight and skill, proving a staunch advocate of freedom around the world and a particular friend of the brave State of Israel. In recent years Senator Javits battled Lou Gehrig's disease with remarkable courage, continuing to write and lecture. Jacob Javits remained to the end a man in love with life, and from the streets of the great city he so cherished to the distant shores of California, he will be deeply missed. Nancy and I join the Senator's family in mourning this great loss.

Any limitations on nuclear testing must be compatible with our security interests and must be effectively verifiable. Because of the continuing threat that we face now and for the foreseeable future, the security of the United States, its friends and its Allies must rely upon a credible and effective nuclear deterrent. A limited level of testing assures that our weapons are safe, effective, reliable and survivable and assures our capability to respond to the continued Soviet nuclear arms buildup. Such testing, which is conducted underground, is permitted under the existing agreements on nuclear test limitations, all of which the United States fully complies with -- the TTBT, the PNET, and the Limited Test Ban Treaty (LTBT).

A CTB remains a long-term goal of the U.S. However, it must be viewed in the context of achieving broad, deep and verifiable nuclear arms reductions, substantially improved verification capabilities, a greater balance in conventional forces and at a time when a nuclear deterrent is no longer as essential an element as currently for international security and stability.

A first, priority step toward this goal is the pursuit of equitable and verifiable arms reductions in the current negotiations in Geneva on nuclear and space arms. We are, at the same time, seeking Soviet agreement to enhanced verification measures for the TTBT and PNET and are discussing verification problems of a CTB at the Conference on Disarmament in Geneva. Our concerns are heightened by the pattern of Soviet noncompliance with its arms control obligations, including current agreements on limiting nuclear testing.

Our efforts to achieve essential verification improvements include three approaches to the Soviets in 1983 to engage in discussion. In 1984 I proposed an exchange of Soviet and U.S. experts to measure directly the yields of tests of nuclear weapons at each other's test sites. In mid-1985, I unconditionally invited Soviet experts to measure such a test at the Nevada Test Site, bringing with them any instrumentation devices they deemed necessary. In December, 1985, I proposed to Secretary General Gorbachev that U.S. and Soviet experts on nuclear testing limitations meet in February, 1986, to discuss our respective verification approaches and to address initial tangible steps to resolve this issue.

The actions called for by H.J. Res. 3 do not serve the interests of the United States, our Allies and our friends. They would undercut the initiatives I have proposed to make progress on nuclear test limitations issues, and they would set back prospects on a broad range of arms control efforts, including the achievement of deep, stabilizing, and verifiable arms reductions.

I want to speak to you today about our request to help the Nicaraguan freedom fighters, which Congress should be voting on within the next 2 weeks. Let me say at the outset, this will be a vote of supreme importance. History will soon record whether the United States Congress, faced with a powerful Soviet-bloc challenge to capture Nicaragua and spread communism throughout Central America, stood by and watched or had the courage to stand up for freedom and America's security.

The facts are clear, and the facts are compelling. The days of pretending Nicaragua is some aggrieved, misunderstood country, an innocent lamb of peace wishing only to live in harmony with its people and neighbors, have long passed. Nicaragua is a country held captive by a cruel clique of deeply committed Communists at war with God and man from their very first days. Between 1979 and 1981, when a trusting America was still providing more economic aid to Nicaragua than was any other nation, the Nicaraguan regime was already saying Marxist-Leninism is the scientific doctrine that guides our revolution; and this revolution goes beyond our borders. These men are deadly serious. Of all the nations in Central America, only Nicaragua suspends all civil rights; only Nicaragua suppresses political parties and refuses any dialog with its opponents; only Nicaragua murders political dissenters and indoctrinates children with class hatred; only Nicaragua persecutes the Catholic Church, humiliates its Cardinal and the Pope, and tortures believers of other religions, from Mormons to Evangelicals to Miskito Indians.

Above all, only Nicaragua has become a wedge of aggression that intimidates and undermines its neighbors. Nicaragua's policy to foment violence was laid out at a secret meeting back in 1979 involving all military, intelligence, and security organizations, including the defense and secret police ministries headed by key Communists Humberto Ortega and Tomas Borge. Now this dictatorship becomes more dangerous as a flood of weapons and manpower pour in from the Soviet bloc and their coldblooded allies, the PLO and Libya. One thing alone unites these enemies of democracy: hatred for America and America's values. These men did not come to Central America to spread good will; these men came to do us harm, and they mean to succeed. As Qadhafi gloated: Supporting Nicaragua means a great thing; it means fighting America near its own borders.

How can Congress ignore this storm gathering so close to our homeland? From amassing a military force larger than all other countries in the region to building the longest military airstrip in Central America -- long enough to handle Soviet Backfire bombers -- to being chief conduit of weapons to El Salvador's guerrillas, the radicals of Honduras, Costa Rica, Guatemala, and the terrorists who recently attacked the Palace of Justice in Colombia, Nicaragua today rivals Cuba as principal Communist warehouse and exporter of violence in our Western Hemisphere.

Soviet Chairman Andrey Gromyko was once quoted as saying: ``America's greatest weakness is its inability to understand the Soviet Union's final goals.'' He was right. Today some still question our honorable commitment to peace. Well, forgive me, but those questions should be directed to the Communists, not to the United States Government, to Nicaragua's dictator, who's been back in Havana again after the Cuban Third Party Congress vowed to defeat the United States and make communism victorious worldwide. It is the Nicaraguan Communists who dismissed all our efforts to promote internal dialog and who suspended talks with their neighbors, but we're still trying.

Next week I'm sending Ambassador Habib to meet with President Duarte of El Salvador, who has offered to resume talks with the guerrillas in El Salvador if the Nicaraguan Communists begin simultaneous talks with the prodemocracy forces in that country. Yet if the freedom fighters get only Band-Aids from the United States, while Nicaraguans get helicopter gunships from the Soviets -- the same death machines they're using to massacre the Afghan people -- the Communists will feel no need to negotiate. Without power, diplomacy will be without leverage.

My fellow Americans, the question is not whether we want peace in Central America. The question is: Will we meet a growing danger from the Soviets, East Germans, Bulgarians, North Koreans, Cubans, and PLO camped on our doorstep -- a danger which already is disrupting peace in Central America and will soon imperil our own security? That is the question which must be answered within the next 2 weeks. Our policy can keep Central America free without committing American troops.

Thank you very much. [Applause] Why do I wish you were all in the Congress? [Laughter] Well, the matter that brings us here today is, of course, a very grave one. I know how hard many of you've worked on this issue and how strongly you agree with me about its importance. As a matter of fact, here I am preaching to the choir.

Well, looking around this room today, I see a lot of Noahs when I'm talking about the Communist menace in Central America, so I don't think any of you need a long lecture on the realities at hand. This is an uphill battle in which we're engaged, but we're making progress. You can sense that the tide is turning in favor of the democratic resistance. Farsighted Democrats and Republicans are coming together in a realization of the common danger, and this is not some narrow partisan issue. It's a national security issue of paramount importance: whether the Soviet Union will be permitted to establish a subversive base camp and military beachhead on the mainland of North America. On this issue we must act not as Republicans -- or not as Democrats, but as Americans. As Scoop Jackson, who led the charge on Capitol Hill to save Central America, reminded us: ``In matters of national security, the best politics is no politics.'' So, I think it's very important to put this current struggle in clear perspective, to realize that there is an exciting, hopeful dimension to it all.

The events of the last 3 or 4 years have seen the slow reconstruction of that anti-Communist coalition, that bipartisan consensus on foreign policy that once existed on Capitol Hill. I don't have to tell any of you about far left ideology and the power that it once wielded here -- an ideology that automatically identified anyone wearing fatigues, carrying a rifle, and spouting Marxist slogans as a liberator of his nation; an ideology that permitted many liberals to practice selective indignation, to hold to a double standard for certain dictators to judge these dictators, no matter how repressive or cruel, less harshly because they called themselves Socialists, Marxists, or Communists. But as I say, I think all this is fading now and realism is returning.

We've managed to work with the Congress to maintain a steady increase in the defense budget, to rebuild our strategic forces, to achieve a bipartisan consensus on the Kissinger commission. We managed to get aid to places like El Salvador and other nations in Central America and last year to not only get the approval of humanitarian aid to the freedom fighters but accomplish the near spontaneous repeal of the Clark amendment. You remember that that was the thing that prevented us from giving some support when we could have prevented there being a Communist government in Angola. Only a few years ago, to hope for all of this would have seemed to be asking for far too much. Yet all of this has happened, and I think it will continue to happen. What we're seeing is the end of the post-Vietnam syndrome, the return of realism about the Communist danger. And now we're ready for one of the final acts. The importance of this moment cannot be underestimated. Think what signal we'll be sending to the rest of the world when and if this aid to the freedom fighters in Nicaragua is passed.

And wouldn't it be wonderful to someday see in Nicaragua the restoration of the democratic dream, to see in downtown Managua celebrations similar to those that we've seen recently in Queen's Park, Manila, and Port-au-Prince, Haiti. And I think it's there for the asking, and so, too, is the moral obligation. At a critical early stage, the United States gave hope and help to the freedom fighters in Nicaragua. We have a moral obligation now, after a couple of years' gap, to continue that support.

I don't think there's anyone in this room who can forget the freedom fighters of 30 years ago. Who among us doesn't remember November 1956 and that last radio message from Budapest: ``Civilized people of the world, in the name of liberty and solidarity, we are asking you to help. Our ship is sinking; the light vanishes. The shadows grow darker from hour to hour. Listen to our cry. Start moving. Extend to us brotherly hands. People of the world, save us. SOS. Help, help, help. God be with you and with us.'' That tragic plea could not be answered. That was when the tanks rolled down the streets -- the Soviet tanks -- in Hungary and crushed that revolution.

Now we have the chance to answer to a similar plea. So, I asked you to come here today for a simple reason. I know how much many of you are doing. I know how hard you're fighting. I'm grateful, but not so grateful that I won't ask you to do even more, to redouble your efforts, and to step up the fight.

In my first Inaugural I mentioned some words that Dr. Joseph Warren, not long before he was killed at Bunker Hill, said to his fellow Americans. They remind us of the importance of the fight for freedom -- our own and that of others. And I would leave you with them now. He said: ``Our country is in danger, but not to be despaired of. On you depend the fortunes of America. You are to decide the important questions upon which rest the happiness and the liberty of millions yet unborn. Act worthy of yourselves.'' Well, I know you have been acting worthy of yourselves, and I know you'll continue. But there are still some here in the Capital City who need to hear from you and to hear how important it is to let those people we are calling the freedom fighters -- I know they're technically called the contras; well, I like freedom fighters better, because that's what they really are.

And they don't ask for that all-out sacrifice from us. To the contrary, they don't want our troops. They just want the means and the tools they need to get the job done. And for those people who would like to call them some kind of terrorists, let me just tell you one thing. One of our own people down there sometime ago, not too long ago, speaking to them, asked them why they weren't doing what the Communist guerrillas in El Salvador were doing. Why didn't they hit targets like powerplants and so forth to cause more distress to the Sandinista government? And those contras, those freedom fighters, said: ``No, that would hurt the people of Nicaragua, and we don't want to hurt the people, our people, in Nicaragua.'' I think they've earned our respect and our support.

It's a pleasure to be with you this evening. Bob Dole and Bob Michel have been true champions of freedom and opportunity in the United States Congress. And I just hope we can bring to Congress more men and women just like them. We're preparing ourselves for a historic election. In November the American people will determine the membership of the 100th Congress of the United States. And I want to thank each of you for what you're doing to ensure that the 100th Congress is filled with the kind of dedicated and right-thinking individuals who will keep our country strong, prosperous, and at peace.

The battle we face is particularly vital, as you've been told, in regard to the United States Senate. I have no hesitation in stating that little of what we've accomplished in these last 5 years could have been done without Republican control of the United States Senate. And if you want to try -- and one day maybe we can get to it -- you might also figure that Bob Michel should be the Speaker, not just the Minority Leader of the House. It can't be forgotten that after 4 years of total Democrat control of the Federal Government, both Houses of Congress, the executive branch, and all the departments and agencies, our people were suffering. Inflation, murderous interest rates, economic decline, and national uncertainty were the order of the day.

The people who created the mess still cannot bring themselves to admit that the culprit that wreaked such havoc and hardship on our people was their very own policies. I think America's spectacular rebound underscores that our country wasn't suffering from tired blood in the late 1970's. It was suffering from tired ideas -- wrong ideas. The liberals attribute all the success we've had in the last 5 years to luck, global trends, and the celestial effects of Halley's Comet -- [laughter] -- anything and everything except the real source of our progress. The reason things have turned around is that we have come at the problems facing America with a fundamentally different philosophy than what preceded us. Liberals called on government to play an ever-increasing role in the lives of our people. They relied on central planning, regulations, and bureaucracy. Is there any doubt about why our country in the late 1970's seemed to be humming along with all the efficiency of a Bulgarian shoe factory? [Laughter] If central planning were the way to a better world, we'd be importing our grain from the Soviet Union and not the other way around.

Well, by trusting in the people rather than government planners, by leaving resources in their hands instead of taking them away, we unleashed the most powerful and creative force on this planet: the American free enterprise system. Instead of giving government more power, we asked the people to accept more responsibility. Our reforms and tax rate reductions kicked off what is now 39 straight months of economic growth. The glitch in last month's unemployment figures notwithstanding, more jobs have been created than in any industrialized nation or than all of our trading partners in Europe put together -- more than 9 million, as a matter of fact, almost 10 million new jobs since the recovery began. And today there are more Americans employed than ever before -- I should say a higher percentage of Americans of the total population employed than in the entire history of this nation. And more progress can be expected on this front as the economy picks up in the months ahead. The vitality of our small business, spurred on by the proliferation of computer technology, is giving a new dimension to the words ``innovation'' and ``enterprise.'' Confounding the so-called experts, at the same time, growth has been high, inflation has remained at its lowest level in 25 years. And with interest rates edging down and the stock market shooting up, there is every reason for unbridled optimism about the future.

And tonight I want to express my deep appreciation to Senator Dole for the indispensable role that he has played in all of this. His leadership in the Senate, his strong hand and his responsible voice, have made a difference. He's forged a tough working alliance between the Senate and the executive branch. And, Bob, from the heart, I thank you.

With Gramm-Rudman-Hollings before us, there's much to be done in the weeks ahead. Now, I know that the gloom and doomers have been claiming that meeting the deficit reduction targets will require us to do everything but close down the Federal Government. Bob, you know, I'll bet if we left it up to the people in Kansas, they might just go for that. [Laughter] Seriously, though, I'm confident that with responsible trimming and Bob's leadership we can reach the deficit-reduction targets. Gramm-Rudman-Hollings gives us the opportunity to cut through politics. It opens the way for some much needed structural change -- fundamental reform that will prevent future generations from being put behind the same deficit-spending eight ball as we are today.

As we work together to meet the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings targets, let's complement our effort with the passage of Senate Joint Resolution 225, the balanced budget amendment to the Constitution. The American people know what it means to live within a family budget. They don't spend their hard-earned salaries on things that aren't absolutely necessary. And a balanced budget amendment would force Congress to be no less diligent with the people's money.

And in protecting the people, Thomas Jefferson once suggested that one thing left out of the Constitution was a provision to limit the Federal Government's power to borrow. Well, it's about time we got around to following Jefferson's suggestion. I look forward to the day when I can run down there to that monument and see if that statue is smiling. [Laughter] The power to spend and the power to tax, of course, go hand in hand. Senator Hatch is proposing an amendment to Senate Joint Resolution 225 which would require a full constitutional majority from the Senate and the House, not just those present, from the total number, for the passage of any tax increase. And I'm certain Thomas Jefferson would like that one as well.

What we're doing is laying the foundation for the country that our children will inherit. One crucial decision we must make in the days ahead concerns what we're willing to do to counter a real and growing threat to our south. As President of the United States, the security of our country is, by law, my paramount responsibility. Congress, however, is no less duty bound to America's safety. All of us in the debate over how to counter the Communist drive in Central America will be held accountable if, because of an inability to act, our country is put into jeopardy.

During his many years in the Senate, Bob Dole has supported those commitments necessary for the security of our country. He's been a stalwart supporter of the freedom fighters because he knows that helping them is not only the right thing to do, it is critical to the safety of our country. We never want to ask who lost Central America. We must work together, all of us in both parties, to see that it never happens.

Ladies and gentlemen, we live in exciting times. As you know, that's a Chinese curse. Well, we need not look at it that way. For free men and women, for Americans, there will always be exciting times because the future is in our hands. People all over the world look to us; the future generations of Americans depend on us. This is not a burden; this is a challenge. And I think we have every reason to be confident. In these last few years, we've recaptured that spirit of enterprise and love of liberty at the heart of what it means to be an American and against which no tyranny will ever prevail. So you just make sure that in the days ahead, the gentleman here on the platform tonight remains the majority leader of the Senate, Bob Michel -- [inaudible].

This afternoon I'd like to discuss a matter of overriding national importance -- been talking about it here all through lunch. But it's the debate, the importance of the debate on Nicaragua. Nearly 7 years ago, the Sandinistas and all those others who'd rebelled against Somoza brought months of fighting to an end when they marched down the avenues of Managua and took control of the government. Thousands of Nicaraguans banked the streets. The new leaders claimed to embrace the highest ideals of democracy and individual liberty, and in the course of some 18 months, the United States provided them with $118 million in economic aid. Nicaraguan businessmen began to hope for new prosperity. Nicaraguan journalists began to hope for freedom of the press. And throughout the country, millions of Nicaraguans dared to hope for democracy. And soon these hopes were crushed. Just months after taking power, the Communists began doing what they'd planned all along -- they ousted their critics and fellow revolutionaries, they tightened their military grip on the nation, and then they censored the media in Nicaragua and suppressed free speech.

Today Radio Catolica, the voice of the Catholic Church, has been silenced; and Cardinal Obando y Bravo, primate of Nicaragua, has said: ``We want to state clearly that this government is totalitarian. We are dealing with an enemy of the Church.'' La Prensa, the last independent newspaper, is subject to constant censorship and often violent threats. The Communists have driven the Jewish community from the country and persecuted the Miskito Indians, killing and imprisoning thousands of these gentle people. Soviet, East German, Libyan, PLO, Cuban troops and advisers swarm over the country in the thousands. Corruption in the regime has become blatant. Last October Commandante Ortega pulled up to a Manhattan optician's shop in a 17-car motorcade to spend $3,500 on designer glasses for himself, his wife, and his daughter. The Sandinistas, faced with internal unrest and disaffection, have responded to the cries of repression by the Nicaraguan people by building nine new prisons; Somoza had only one.

In a century that has witnessed monstrous crimes, Nicaragua has become the site of one of the most harrowing: the murder of liberty in a nation that had the chance to become free. Some predicted that Nicaragua would become like Cuba: a staging post for Communist subversion throughout Central and South America. Well, the prediction has already come true. The Nicaraguan Communists have built their lightly armed, 1979 force of 5,000 into a heavily armed army and militia of about 120,000. They are the principal suppliers of the Communist guerrillas in El Salvador. They provided the weapons to those who carried out the recent assassination of Colombia's Supreme Court justices.

This is awful. I've never had to do this in 25 years in show business. [Laughter] [At this point, the President had difficulty speaking and took a sip of water.] It's that cookie that didn't go all the way down. I was eating it fast because I knew they'd turned the lights on.

Well, they are the principal suppliers, I've said, of the Communist guerrillas in El Salvador, and what they did in Colombia -- we have seen that and the great tragedy there. Hundreds of terrorists with clear ties to Nicaragua are now located in countries throughout Central and South America. Sandinista military units regularly cross the Nicaraguan border, intimidating their neighbors in hopes of promoting unrest. Have the people in so many of these countries struggled to reemerge into the light of democracy only to be confronted with Soviet-backed efforts to subvert their new governments and snuff out their resurgent liberty?

Now Nicaragua, this Soviet satellite on our own continent, threatens the national interests of the United States. In purely military terms, Nicaragua's military bases could be used for strikes against our Caribbean sealanes, avenues that bear roughly half our foreign trade and half our oil imports; but the graver risk arises from the threat that the Communists will continue to spread violence and unrest among their neighbors. Refugees -- millions of them -- would stream toward our borders, and for States like Florida and Texas, this flood would make the Mariel boatlift look like a trickle. In time, the United States could be forced to surrender Central America to the Soviet sphere.

Some say to our administration, why not negotiate? Well, that's a good question, but it's directed to the wrong party. Nine times we have sought to bring about direct negotiations between the resistance and the Sandinistas. Nine times the Sandinistas have refused to negotiate. So the truth is clear: The Sandinistas will come to the table only when they see the carrot of peaceful settlement backed up by the stick of well-equipped armed opposition.

Today the opposition, the brave Nicaraguan freedom fighters, numbers over 20,000 and has the growing support of the Nicaraguan people. To give the freedom fighters the help they need in countering their Soviet-equipped opponents, I've asked the Congress to vote them $100 million in aid of already appointed funds, a modest amount when compared to what the Soviets are providing the Sandinistas. And make that point clear there: This is not new money that's going to add to the deficit. This is money already appropriated that is going to be redirected to this effort. Just how effective this aid to the freedom fighters would be becomes clear in considering their past support. The Soviet bloc gave the Nicaraguan Communists over $500 million in aid. But last year we provided the freedom fighters with less than $27 million in boots and Band-Aids. What happened? The freedom fighters have been battered. You can't defend yourself against Soviet helicopter gunships with bedrolls. But even at that, the freedom fighters were able to use mobility and surprise to keep the Sandinista forces largely on the defensive.

Now, we need to provide the aid we've requested, this time military as well as humanitarian, to see the ranks of the freedom fighters swell and their victories mount, forcing the Sandinistas to come to the table at last. In the last few days there's been talk here in Washington of compromise on this issue: smaller amounts of aid, delay in providing it, restrictions on the uses to which it could be put -- all the usual temporizing and quibbles. Well, let me set the record straight. The Soviets continue to fund the Nicaraguan Communists with massive infusions of arms, cash, and so-called advisers. To delay or reduce the aid we've requested for the freedom fighters could be to send too little, too late. Those who would compromise must not compromise the freedom fighters' lives nor their immediate defensive needs. They must not compromise Latin America's democracies or our own southern borders. They must not compromise freedom.

So we call upon the Congress to vote the aid we've requested and to do so without delay. And we ask you, the members of the press, to help -- you who can be so persuasive by way of your editorial pages and whose opinions are so valued in the communities you serve. And that we stand for freedom -- just as we stand for freedom in the rugged land of Haiti, just as we believe in human rights for the green islands of the Philippines, let us take a stand for democracy in the mountains and the plains of Nicaragua.

Q. One of the plans mentioned in the press this morning was the possibility of your accepting the full $100 million on condition that it would not be used until you had tried diplomatic efforts for a specified period of time. Is this the kind of compromise that you find unacceptable? Or would you agree to something like that?

The President. Well, I'll listen to any proposal that anyone wants to make that is tied to the idea of letting us come to the aid of these contras. But the only proposal of that kind that I had heard was one that involved a long period of time and, then, was not a sure thing. But they would then vote again to see whether we could have the money and use it. So I think that would be counterproductive. I think it would destroy the morale of the contras, and they would be asked to live through a great period of time with no assurance that they're ever going to get the funds. And I don't think that would be a compromise that I could listen to at all.

Q. Mr. President, this sounds like the domino theory hitting us again. It did this in the sixties with regard to Vietnam, Cambodia, Thailand, etcetera. Is this the Latin American version of the domino? Aren't you a little wary about using the term ``domino'' because of its negative connotation?

The President. Well, I hadn't used it. But let me just suggest where there is one difference. The domino theory was expressed as a theory of what could happen with regard to the Vietnam situation. But here, we have firm evidence. We have the documents that were seized in Grenada, documents from the Soviet Union; documents from the Cuban Government to their counterparts there in Grenada and outlining the future plans and naming the future targets. And many of those documents began with the gloating sentences: ``We now have Cuba and Nicaragua and Grenada . . . '' and then went on to where the other targets are. So, the dominoes have already been named by the people who are going to tip them over. But I would like to also say -- and with all respect -- before we start sneering at those who threatened dominoes, the North Vietnamese are now at the border of Thailand, and the dominoes did begin to fall.

The President. Yes. I believe that the image of the great colossus of the North is too fresh in the peoples' minds in Latin America for us to even think about sending troops of that kind. But where -- I have said there could come a day, and it wouldn't be going in to intervene there -- but where we were under hostile attack ourselves, because that cancer that is Nicaragua would have been allowed to spread until it became a force that could target things of interest to us and of interest to our national security in the Caribbean, to say nothing of -- well, one of their officials early on made a statement about that we could expect to see them at the borders of Arizona and New Mexico, meaning that they did have ambitions. This is the threat to the possibility of American forces -- that there would come a day when we, ourselves, would be faced with hostile actions against our best interests.

Q. Mr. President, in addition to Nicaragua, among the topics of concern to those of us in New England is organized crime. The Federal Government recently won a major conviction there for organized crime people in New England. I wonder if you would expound for just a moment on a statement you made earlier that this administration has organized crime on the run.

The President. Well, I think there has -- yes, there's been a great increase in the arrest and conviction of figures in organized crime throughout the country. And we do have a program, and we have had a commission that has just brought in a report which reveals how much more embedded in our legitimate society and the economy organized crime is, and so we've got more information to go on. But we're determined that that is a major target of our Justice Department.

The President. No. I think this is, here again, we can look back and second-guess all that was done at that particular time and wish we had done other things than we did do. But, no, and I feel this way about most of the world that is under those totalitarian governments. I think that this last great island of freedom in -- the world has to look down the years and see if our destiny does not involve restoring to freedom someday and that could be simply by means of our example and whatever it took to -- you know, every year we still recognize a Captive Nations Day.

The President. No, they haven't. And our own polls indicate that there is a great feeling and many people saying what are we doing in that little country, and where is it and so forth. I think that a great many people -- there's a lack of understanding, and that's why I'm going on the air Sunday night. But also there is a great disinformation network that is at work throughout our country, and it's a custom that was established by the Soviet Union. And a great many people are confused. They think, for example, the message has been that -- what are we doing backing revolutionaries who are trying to overthrow a legitimate government? Well, there's nothing legitimate about the Sandinista government at all. After a revolution against Somoza, they took over at the point of a gun, they ousted the revolutionaries who didn't agree with them. They have had one so-called election, if you could call it that. They wouldn't let anyone run against them, and they wouldn't allow campaigning. And then they said they'd done their democratic duty and came to New York to buy those designer glasses. So it isn't an established or a legitimate government. But the American people -- Thomas Jefferson said if the American people know all the facts, they will never make a mistake. And I think we haven't completed the job of letting the American people know all the facts. And we're sure going to try to do that.

Q. Mr. President, I would like for you to elaborate a little bit on what you said a moment ago about a disinformation network throughout the country that has undermined your efforts to enlighten the public about Nicaragua.

The President. Well, a number of people that go down there, and that are sympathetic to the other, and then come back and tell the stories of what they've seen -- no repression and the people are happy with the government and so forth. There's quite a network of those covering lots of lines of activities, probably well-intentioned; I don't know. I'm not going to fault their motives.

But also the other day I had handed to me a slick paper publication, a magazine -- $3.75 an issue -- and this magazine is published by the Nicaraguan Information Foundation. And it is filled with propaganda. It is a propaganda thing against the contras and against us and in favor of them. And one prominent university professor had written a lead article in this particular issue, and if that's what he tells his students, God help them, because it was pure propaganda. And they've hired lobbyists in this country, professional lobbyists who make their case before the Congress. And it's false stories that can be refuted by others that go down there.

I remember one story having to do with a Catholic bishop who was hailed in the press as having rescued some refugees that he was trying to get across the Honduran border. On foot they were making their way through the jungles. And the story said that they were attacked by contras before they got to the Honduran border. Well, this bishop came back to the United States, and I phoned him and asked him about his story and all about this. And he said, yes, he had led this band of refugees out of Nicaragua into Honduras. ``But,'' he said, ``before we got to the border we were attacked by Sandinista armed forces, and we were rescued by the contras. Now, the story somehow went off on a different tack when it was published.

But it is a program of -- constantly aimed at -- that big imperialist United States is off again doing the wrong thing. But I don't think we are, and I think that the Nicaraguan people -- you'd be surprised at the proportion of the contras who are former Sandinista soldiers drafted into that army, but who deserted. You'd be surprised at what we've heard from nearby governments about the flood of young men whose families smuggle them out of the country before they can be drafted into that army. And the -- much of the leadership, this charge that they are Somozistas -- the contras. Well, the leaders -- two of the three that were here in the United States recently were both imprisoned by Somoza, and they are former revolutionaries, most of these people.

Well, I know that I've taken too long here, and I'm sorry I can't take the rest of the hands. This is as bad as a press conference. [Laughter] Someday I'll convince them I shouldn't make that speech, I should just stand up here and take the questions instead, and then we'll do it. But thank you all for being here. I appreciate this very much, and it's been a pleasure to be with all of you here.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Frank W. Naylor, Jr., to be a member of the Farm Credit Administration Board, Farm Credit Administration, for a term of 6 years. Upon confirmation the President will designate him Chairman. This is a new position.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Marvin Duncan to be a member of the Farm Credit Administration Board, Farm Credit Administration, for a term of 4 years. This is a new position.

Mr. Wood currently serves as president and chief executive officer of Eli Lilly and Co. He serves as director of the boards of various banks and financial organizations, including Dow Jones & Co., New York Chemical Corp., and Chemical Bank.

The President has authorized the Secretary of Agriculture to transfer $700 million from the Emergency Farm Loan Program to the Direct Operating Loan Program in order to assure that American farmers will have adequate financing to plant new crops this spring. The President made his decision yesterday afternoon after his meeting with the Economic Policy Council.

The demand for Farmers Home Administration direct operating loans will exceed the $1.5 billion that is available for this fiscal year so, thereby, the transfer of emergency loans. Fourteen states have already exhausted their FmHA direct operating loan allocations and cannot offer additional direct loans with the present funding.

The President also authorized an additional $50 million to be transferred from the Guaranteed Business and Industry Loan Program to the Guaranteed Operating Loan. The President also intends to sign the Food Security Improvements Act of 1986. These are technical corrections that are being made to the farm bill that was passed at the end of last year. We've had some serious questions about it, and we worked with Congress on it. And we're now satisfied that the bill has been modified to the point where we can accept it.

The most troublesome point to us was the advance loan provision, and we wanted it clarified. It was introduced by Senator Harkin, and we wanted to clarify it so that the provision would be discretionary, not mandatory. Mandatory would have been extremely costly. In fact, if it had been held as mandatory, it could have run anywhere from $500 million to $1 billion over the next 3 years. We are still concerned about the cost of the Harkin amendment. We will exercise discretion in this funding provision.

The President. Ladies and gentlemen, this is kind of a farewell to Ambassador Habib, who has served us so nobly elsewhere and more recently in the Philippines, and is now on his way to Central America. He will be meeting with President Duarte and then also going on to Costa Rica, Honduras, Guatemala -- in regard to the problem down there.

The President. If there was any benefit and that presented an opportunity, I'm sure that he would. But because we are still seeking some openings, some negotiations with the Sandinistas, which, well, nine times now, they have refused.

I remember just a little over 5 years ago when all the headlines were of shortages. Every morning it seemed we read some new scare story telling us that the Earth's resources were about to run out for good, leaving our world poorer and shrinking our hopes for the future. But at the same time, scientists, inventors, and entrepreneurs were mining the most abundant resource in the world: the human mind and imagination. Men and women such as you, with the spirit of discovery, enterprise, and achievement, have been opening up new worlds of possibility and transforming all our lives for the better.

Whole industries have sprung up around what were only, years ago, merely ideas in the minds of scientists and inventors. New grains and agriculture techniques have alleviated hunger. New vaccines have conquered some of mankind's most dreaded diseases. Quantum leaps in technology are making possible greater prosperity and personal fulfillment than mankind has ever known. In the computer industry, for instance, miraculous advances in productivity are now almost commonplace. Let me give you an example, although I'm sure you could provide many more. In one semiconductor plant in Pennsylvania in 1957, each worker produced five transistors a day for $7.50 apiece. Today each worker produces over a million semiconductors every day, each one costing a fraction of a penny.

Some say that about 90 percent of all scientific knowledge has been generated in the last 30 years alone, and we'll likely double it by the end of the century. Such an explosion of knowledge creates an unprecedented opportunity to expand the global economy, to bring prosperity and hope to those corners of the world that for too long have known only deprivation and want. The United States must take the lead in making this happen. And you who are on the cutting edge of human achievement understand that freedom is not a luxury but a necessity. Freedom to think, freedom to imagine and create, these are not privileges, but the very source of our life's bread and the hope of mankind's future. How can government aid the cause of human progress? Well, in 1985 alone we invested over $49 billion in research and development. Now, this is an important role, but it's even more important to knock down the barriers to progress that government itself has created. And that's why we've rolled back needless government regulations, cut tax rates -- and we plan to cut them again.

I can't help but remember an incident back when I was an adjutant on an airbase in World War II and learned of a letter that bucked all the way up to the top of the military command asking for permission to destroy some records that were just filling the file cases and that were no longer of any use. And when the mail came back down with permission from the person in the top command, it was permission granted to destroy those records, providing that copies were made of each one. [Laughter] But our tax cuts, I believe, revitalized the entrepreneurial economy, creating over $20 billion in new venture capital, over $25 billion in new public stock offerings, and an explosion of new business creation with over 600,000 new companies forming every year for the last 3 years in a row. Now, this represents the application of knowledge to human needs on a massive scale, much of it made possible by the breakthroughs of you and your colleagues.

Back in 1842 the royal astronomer in Great Britain studied Charles Babbage's new analytical engine, the forerunner of the modern computer, and pronounced it worthless. His foresight was almost equal to a half-century later when the head of the U.S. Patent Office advised President McKinley to abolish the Patent Office because he said, ``Everything that can be invented has already been invented.'' [Laughter] Well, if science has taught us anything, it's taught us not to be modest in our aspirations. The fact, I have to confess, is that fact is my secret agenda for bringing you all here today. I'm going to ask all of you to turn your attention to the budget problem.

Q. We're grateful -- the bureau chief has deferred to me to let me ask the first question. And first of all, I'd like to say we're grateful that you've taken the time to meet with us today. And if -- since I know your time is very limited, we'd like to just get started right now. Mr. President, some Members of Congress are proposing a delay in military aid to the contras to allow time for another attempt to draw the Sandinistas into negotiations with the contras. Would you accept some delay -- if not 6 months, which I know you don't want -- but some delay in providing military aid if that meant Congress would approve your request?

The President. Yes, there would be a second vote and so forth, I think this would be most counterproductive because the Sandinistas would feel they could hang on longer with the hope that we still wouldn't get what we're asking for.

Q. It sounds like the trigger is the problem. If, for example, a delay of, say, 60 to 75 days, after which the aid would go whether -- without a second congressional vote, does that seem like the basis for a compromise to you?

The President. Well, I'd be willing to talk to them about something of this kind. I wouldn't want to commit to this because, as I say, the important thing is that the Sandinista government must not be left any loopholes in which they believe there still might be a denial of this help.

Q. Mr. President, some administration officials have said that 18 months of military aid to the contras is all that will be needed to bring the Sandinistas to the negotiating table and that you will not be back for more. Alfonso Robelo, one of the contra leaders who you met with here last week, has said he doesn't feel that anything more than 18 months would be needed, and he didn't feel that they would want to prolong the bloodshed there beyond that. What happens after 18 months and the contras have still not forced the Sandinistas to the negotiating table?

The President. Well, I think this is something that you have to look at if such a time should come. But I'm pleased that those men who are most familiar with the resources of the contras have that feeling. They are acquainted with their ability. There is no question that when we were able to give them some help, the contras were giving the Sandinista forces great problems. But you've got to remember that for the last couple of years, other than the humanitarian aid, they were shut off. And that's why they're so limited in the numbers. They've got a potential force of around 25,000. There are about 6,000 now fighting in Nicaragua. But this is a matter of the lack of arms and munitions.

The President. I would -- yes, I think it would be foolish to commit yourself to anything of that kind because this, too, then could stiffen the Sandinistas' resistance and say all we have to do is hold out for 18 months.

Q. Mr. President, you have said that the overriding issue in Central America is America's national security. You've also said, if I may quote: ``We send money and material now so we'll never have to send our own American boys.'' Is it possible that someday American troops will have to be sent?

The President. Well, here's the thing everyone is overlooking. Here is this third Communist -- well, let -- I can't call it an attempt. Here would be the third of the bases that they had established, the Communist bloc, and the first one on our mainland. And they, themselves, have made it plain that they're part of the expansionist philosophy, that Marxian philosophy and belief of a one-world Communist state. Now, what you have to say is, if we do nothing and this is allowed to grow and expand and carry its revolution across other borders, then the threat would remain that there would come a day when their hostilities would be directed at our own interests. And that is the time in which you could say that, yes, then American forces would be involved because the hostilities were directed at us. I don't see it, as some interpret it, that, well, we're leaving the door open; that we may still use troops down there. I don't think we'd have a friend left in Latin America if we used American forces. The image of the great colossus of the North is still too much in their minds. The contras don't want us. They want our help, they want the tools. They've made it plain; they will furnish the manpower. So when I said three, I noticed you kind of paused and looked at each other there.

Let me point out something that everyone is neglecting up there on the Hill to pay attention to. When we, in the Grenada operation, got possession of all those documents, as well as the arms and the weapons that were already installed in Grenada by the Soviet bloc, we got documents from the Soviet Government, from the Cuban Government addressed to the Communists there in Grenada. And over and over again they referred to that they had Cuba, they had Nicaragua, they had Grenada, and then they went on to discuss what the future goals were and the other targets there in Central America and the Caribbean. So that there was no question about this being a target for Soviet expansionism, using proxies the way they have now with Cuba and all. So the goal is made very plain. Now, this last -- again, this threat that a Nicaragua could pose, when I was in Grenada the nine Prime Ministers of the tiny Caribbean island nations unanimously -- and they brought it up, I wasn't even discussing this subject. They brought it up to me. They said, ``You must continue helping the rebels in Nicaragua because this Nicaragua, under this government, is the greatest threat to our existence, to those nine nations.'' So, we're not the only ones that see this as a cancer that must be excised.

Q. Now, as part of the request to Congress for aid to the contras, there is a provision that would allow the use of CIA contingency funds, and I was wondering, on top of the $100 million that you're asking, I was wondering, well, why is the use of these funds considered necessary, and what would they be used for?

The President. Well, because under restrictions that have already been put on us by Congress, we can't give advice, we can't offer training, we can't exchange intelligence information with the contras. And we feel that if we're going to help them with weapons and arms that we ought to be freed of those restrictions and allowed to provide this other assistance to them.

The President. I think we'd have to. This would -- then we'd be back to a case similar to the Philippines in which the whole goal of the revolution and of the negotiations would be a government that would be chosen by the people of Nicaragua. Remember that the contras are supporting a guarantee that was given to the Organization of American States of what the revolution against Somoza was supposed to gain. They provided that information to the Organization of American States when they asked the Organization to try and persuade Somoza to step down to end the killing. And he did. But before they asked him to, the Organization asked the revolutionaries to give them what were their revolutionary goals. And they were provided, and the goals were a pluralistic, democratic society, free speech, freedom of religion -- all the things that go with democracy. And it was the Sandinistas, as one faction of the revolution, that ousted their fellow revolutionaries when they got control -- took over and installed a totalitarian, Communist regime. Now, the contras say what they want is to get back to the original goal which requires letting the people of that country make the decisions to how they want to be governed.

Q. Mr. President, in your current campaign to try to raise votes for the contra aid next week, you and some of your aides have been emphasizing that the people who don't support you on this are going to be held accountable by history, or by whomever, for their failure to back you up on it. And my question is since this includes a lot of Republicans, as well as Democrats, whether you're going to be unwilling to support in the coming congressional election those people who don't support you on this vote?

The President. No, and I think -- let me -- no, I think the thing has been -- that whole question has kind of been exaggerated into assailing the motives of the people that would vote against us. Well, we're not doing anything of the kind. What we're pointing out is what I said earlier -- that the choice here is either negotiations leading to a political settlement or this cancer continuing to grow. What we're trying to point out is that this isn't an argument about two methods of dealing with the problem -- if one wanted to do one thing and wanted another, but the goals were the same. What we're trying to make them realize is that it's an either/or situation. Either we are able to press them into negotiating and coming to a political settlement or they remain a Communist base, another Cuba.

Q. Mr. President, in reaction to your order that the Soviets have to reduce their mission at the United Nations, the Soviets have sent up a formal protest note and said that such actions as that ``do not create the climate for a summit.'' Do you have any comment on that?

The President. Yes, and I think that we have enough knowledge of their actions to know that they're there for that purpose -- for other purposes and for espionage, not for the doings of the United Nations.

Q. Mr. President, it does seem, though, that the promise of Geneva just 6 months ago is largely unfulfilled right now -- arms control talks have bogged down, there is inability to set the date for a new summit, and now the staff reductions. Has a new chill entered U.S.-Soviet relations?

The President. No, this project has been on our minds for quite some time. The arms talks -- I still continue to be hopeful because the General Secretary in his proposals -- this is the first time I can recall any Soviet leader actually being willing to eliminate weapons they already have. And we in turn accepted a great many of their figures and their proposals, but there were -- it's a complicated thing because we don't both have the same numbers of the same kinds of weapons, and so we then put in some -- taking their proposal in which, as I say, in overall terms: 50-percent reduction, ultimate elimination, and so forth -- we accepted. We put in some other things that we thought were essential to such a program, and there were no further negotiations.

In other words, they have, at the moment, seem to be in a position in which we accept their offer entirely or else. And we think that negotiations mean that you try to find a common meeting ground on some differences that you may have in there on figures. And we have not had a response. We put before our people there in Geneva the framework for meeting their proposal and with some changes that we felt should be made because of fairness and expediting the program, and we've had no response.

Q. Well, I mean, is it your sense, though, that this 6 months' post-summit period has been as hopeful as you had thought it might be, or has it, in fact, been something of a downer for you, a disappointment?

The President. Well, we didn't come home with any euphoria or anything from that meeting. We did come home pleased with the fact that they had agreed and shown an agreement to have future meetings. We don't think that's been done away with. But also, we've had people over there -- Charlie Wick has had people with him over there on the matter of exchange, cultural exchange and youth exchange, and all of this. And apparently they were better meetings than we've ever had in the past with them. He met with officials at extremely high levels. They were most enthusiastic about wanting to go forward with these exchanges, so -- and the fact that I have a communications channel to the General Secretary. No, I think that the conditions are better than they had been before.

Q. Mr. President, the General Secretary links a summit and progress on arms control and, on the other hand, does not seem to have loosened the strings on his negotiators in Geneva. Do you think that Mr. Gorbachev really wants an arms control agreement, and do you think he really wants a summit meeting this year?

The President. I have to say his willingness and his eagerness to have us come there in the following year leads me to believe that nothing has changed on that. With regard to arms control, yes, because I think he is very much aware of the economic situation in his country and the part that their massive military buildup has played in that economic problem. And I think that he would much prefer to have practical arms agreements, arms reduction agreements, rather than to face a continued arms race.

The President. No, I haven't asked for that kind of a deadline. We've made it plain to them that it would be very difficult, inconvenient for us to -- the one hint that was put out by them of possibly September or later -- well, we have an election in our country. Now, I know they don't understand our elections as much as they should, not having free elections of their own. But we've explained that it must be earlier, before we actually get into the full extent of that election campaign.

Q. Mr. President, may I ask you a question about the Strategic Defense Initiative? If some parts of it prove feasible earlier than others, would you be in favor of deploying those parts when they are feasible, such as the ground-based protection of our Minuteman and MX missiles?

The President. I'd have to seriously think about that, because I have already said, and I told General Secretary Gorbachev, that we viewed this as a defense for all of mankind and as something that could really make it possible and practical for the elimination of nuclear weapons every place. To go forward with a deployment without a lot of further meetings and exchanges would then appear that we might be seeking to get a first-strike advantage. And I think that would be the most dangerous thing in the world, for either one of us to be seen as having the capacity for a first strike.

The President. Or if whatever, as you say, in part, became feasible, okay, then go earlier to both our allies and to the others and say, ``Look, here is the potential now for this weapon and we want it to be used for all mankind,'' and see what we could work out.

Q. Mr. President, one other thing, you have spoken of a proportional response to the Soviets' treaty violations as you see them. And yet you haven't announced that response yet. Are we about to have it sprung on us soon?

The President. The other thing, the nuclear test ban, this one, we're willing to meet them on that except that we can't get a satisfactory answer yet on real verification. Now, we have offered to let them come here with whatever equipment they wanted to bring and be witness to one of our underground tests. This is a treaty where we think they have been in violation. It's rather difficult to determine from the great distance whether they've exceeded the agreement on the size of the explosion. And we would want better verification before we go forward with some of these.

The President. No, I think the greatest -- here's where again that their proposal is unfair to us. It's in the time that they set. They are ahead of us in modernizing and expanding their weapon systems, developing new ones. We're still playing catchup. They have tested and are now deploying their modernized and their newer weapons. For us to stop where we're still playing catchup, leaves us in a position of increased inferiority to them. And it wouldn't be fair for us until we've made the same tests comparatively with our -- that they have made with their new and improved, modernized weapons. Then we could talk, but with better verification than we now have -- we could talk such a test ban.

Q. Mr. President, on the space shuttle disaster, our paper had a story last week that the White House had issued a national security decision directive in 1984 which targeted 24 shuttle missions a year and operating in the black for the shuttle program. Do you believe that the kind of pressure that that put on the shuttle program could have been, in any way, responsible for what happened down there?

The President. No, and we have never done anything except to approve their schedule. They have told us what they were capable of doing, and I have put out a thing like -- that we want it by a certain time down the years here, if possible to have a manned space station. And this is a program that I've announced, and they were to go after it, but we have never, ever -- and I -- some of those rumors that came out that we had insisted on this particular launching. We have never from here suggested or pushed them for a launch of the shuttle. I would -- good Lord, I would feel that I was way out of my depth in trying to do that. I am not a scientist and they are. They're the judge of that.

Q. Immediately after this happened, you responded to your conversations with the families of some of the victims and said that you were determined that the program would go forward. In view of things that have been discovered by your commission since then, and in view of some of the statements by the astronauts themselves that they had serious reservations about the safety of the program based on what they'd learned -- two things: Do you think that the public relations aspect of it in which teachers, journalists, and others would go along should be continued or curtailed under those circumstances?

The President. Well, we want the program. When I responded to the -- I responded to the families. Every family, those people that I talked to, in their conversation, they made it plain to me that they felt this program had to continue; that this was what their loved ones, now departed, would have wanted. And they wanted me to tell them, and I told them, yes, it will. Yes, we have no intention of canceling the program because of this tragedy. You know, when you look at it, you have 24 times right and 1 accident, 1 wrong -- you can't cancel out the program. But I have also said since, and we have all agreed here, that now that these things are coming out, that the program must rectify all these shortcomings that had never before been mentioned so that we know that the safety factor that should be there is there.

The President. Oh, yes, you asked about that. Yes. You know, from the very beginning -- almost the very beginning, once we established that it was practical -- there have been people up there conducting experiments -- scientists, for example, who are not astronauts, but who are there to carry on the great advances that have come to us by way of those shuttle experiments -- in medicine and other things -- are so great that I don't see any reason why this policy should not continue.

The President. I think that all of them -- you have to look at each one to see, does it have some value or is it just publicity? Everything that's been done so far, there seemed to be a logical value in this. You know, here we have a privately supported junior astronaut program in our country that's become quite a feature of our educational system and all. And so, I think you could -- I think the teacher thing had a value. But I think that every case should be looked at as to what was the possible value of having a civilian along. But I don't think we should just blanket it that only astronauts are going up there to loose satellites and do things of that kind. The experiments that can be conducted and the things that we've learned from that program, things that have to do with heart ailments, the possibility that we now have of a medicine for the first time to cure diabetes that can only be produced in outer space.

The President. I haven't had a chance to talk with the people involved there about three and what the difference would be between three and four myself. And I would be more or less inclined to go by the information that they might have as to what would be the setback in having 25 percent of the flying force eliminated.

The President. I think I'm going to -- all I know are the things that we keep hearing about. I'm going to have to wait until I actually hear from the Commission and their evaluation of what they've learned and the fact that astronauts have said there were other potential liabilities that they had become aware of. Let's read out on all of those. We do know now that, while we're still waiting to have it actually declared what was the cause of this tragedy, we still know that the rings on those two particular rockets are affected by cold. Experiments have revealed that. So, whether that turns out to be the ultimate cause or not, it ought to be something that we find an answer to.

The President. Yeah. I would -- I think what -- or as far as anyone can know, you know. There's a limit beyond which you can't go. Anyone who gets in an airplane knows that, that there are things that can happen.

In congressional testimony yesterday, Chet Crocker agreed to an assertion by Congressman Wolpe that, in a general sense, the ANC [African National Congress] is one of many organizations engaged in a struggle for freedom in South Africa. They are using a variety of means. Crocker also noted our longstanding opposition to the policy of violence of the ANC and our concerns about that organization's ties to the Soviet Union.

On majority rule: We have consistently called for a system of government that recognizes the rights of all South Africans, including political rights. The South African Government itself has recently acknowledged the need to provide for universal suffrage. It's up to South Africans to negotiate a constitution. A truly democratic constitution by definition provides for majority rule with protection for minority rights.

Vice President Bush, Secretary Shultz, Secretary Weinberger, Assistant Secretary Abrams, and you three gentlemen, thank you for this eye-opening presentation. Thomas Jefferson understood that if the people know all the facts, the people will never make a mistake. Well, it's frustrating at times that information like what we have just heard today does not seem to be percolating through to the public. Even some well-intentioned elected officials seem to be operating under outrageously false assumptions.

These captured weapons, the vivid description of subversive activity, and the portrayal of repression that was provided here -- all of these are proof of Sandinista crimes against their neighbors and against the people of Nicaragua. These weapons and the testimony that we've seen and heard demonstrate the magnitude of a sophisticated Communist effort to undermine democracy in this hemisphere and to deceive us in the process. These rifles, landmines, grenade launchers, and other weapons did not just miraculously appear in the hands of Communists in El Salvador or the M - 19 terrorists in Colombia. They were placed in the hands of those who would eliminate liberty, wreak economic havoc, and destroy democracy by forces opposed to our very way of life.

The regime which has built -- now, I was going to say 9, but now I've been corrected, it is 10 -- new prisons in Nicaragua and runs drugs to poison our children is backed by an extraordinary support network of international Communists. One doesn't need to be of a particular party or even privy to secret information to see what's happening in Central America. It's clear: Nicaraguan Communists are using their country as a staging area for aggression against their neighbors, while totally subjugating their own people. Their campaign of internal repression and external aggression is being aided and abetted by the Soviet Union, Cuba, East Germany, Bulgaria, Iran, Vietnam, Libya, and other radical states, movements, and organizations.

The fledgling democracies of Central America cannot be expected to stand alone against this kind of concerted, international Communist effort. And let's make no mistake -- this nation, too, is threatened. If we do not act now to counter this subversive aggression by helping the brave men and women of the Nicaraguan democratic resistance, Americans will, in the not too distant future, look to the south and see a string of anti-American Communist dictatorships. And if that happens, it'll do no good to ask who's to blame. It will be an irreparable disaster. And that's why I'm asking the Congress to set aside partisan politics and act now to protect our national security by helping those who want a democratic outcome in Nicaragua.

America needs to hear the testimony of individuals like the ones we have with us today -- men who were on the inside on the other side. Senor Romero was a former rebel commandante in El Salvador. He offers firsthand knowledge of the vicious crime the Communist regime in Managua is perpetrating on the people of El Salvador. Alvaro Baldizon, a former member of Nicaragua's state security forces, was sickened and disillusioned by the brutality, repression, and the shroud of lies in which the Communists draped themselves. And Senor Archibald who was tortured and jailed -- these three are only a few of the many who deserve to be heard by decisionmakers. I would hope that all Members of Congress who have not had a chance to hear their message or have not seen this display will take the time to do so. And the display will be on Capitol Hill next week.

What we heard from these brave men also confirms that the Communists have surrounded their aggression and internal repression with a well-managed campaign of lies, distortion, and -- just as we've been told here -- disinformation. The masters of deceit have outdone themselves, but Americans can and will see through this smokescreen. The Communist goal is to paralyze us, to prevent us from doing what is necessary to save Central America; but they will not succeed. Ultimately, in a free society the truth will be heard. And today I think we've got before us some facts that the American people need very much to hear. And I hope that all of you will make it a point to spread the word. The stakes are too high to sit this one out.

The Convention is the first income tax treaty to be negotiated between the United States and Tunisia. It is based on model income tax treaties developed by the Department of the Treasury, the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development, and the United Nations. It deviates in some respects from the models to reflect Tunisia's status as a developing country and an importer of capital.

The Convention provides rules with respect to the taxation of various types of income, such as business profits, personal service income, and investment income. It also contains standard provisions guaranteeing a foreign tax credit, ensuring nondiscriminatory tax treatment, and providing for exchanges of information and administrative cooperation to avoid double taxation and prevent tax evasion.

Mr. Conable was, at the time of his retirement from the U.S. House of Representatives, Chairman of the House Republican Research and Policy Committee. As a member of the House Ways and Means Committee for 18 years and as a member of the Joint Economic Committee, the House Budget Committee, and the Joint Committee on Taxation, Mr. Conable has demonstrated extensive knowledge of economic and financial matters, both domestic and international. Mr. Conable presently serves on the Presidential Blue Ribbon Commission on Defense Management. He previously served on three other Presidential commissions: the Commission on Private Sector Initiatives, the Commission on Social Security Reform, and the Commission on Chemical Warfare Review.

Since Mr. Clausen assumed the Presidency of the World Bank on July 1, 1981, the Bank has conducted the most searching reform of its activities in its 40-year history. To cope with international financial difficulties, the Bank has expanded lending in support of fundamental economic policy changes in major borrowing countries by expanding its policy-based loans from 8 percent of total lending before Mr. Clausen's arrival to an estimated 20 percent this year.

The Bank's President is elected by its Board of Executive Directors, who are selected by the member governments and cast weighted votes in proportion to their capital contributions to the Bank. The United States Director casts about 21 percent of the total vote. It has been customary since the organization of the Bank and the International Monetary Fund in 1946 for the Bank's President to be an American and for the Managing Director of the IMF to be a citizen of another member country. The present Managing Director of the IMF is J. de Larosiere of France.

The President announced today his intention to nominate Ronald Frank Lehman II for the rank of Ambassador during his tenure of service as United States Negotiator on Strategic Nuclear Arms. Dr. Lehman will succeed Ambassador John G. Tower in that position.

Nancy and I wish everyone a very happy St. Patrick's Day. This is the feast day of the Apostle of Ireland and a time to celebrate the heritage of Irish Americans, their part in building America and preserving our freedom, and the long friendship and close ties between the peoples of the United States and Ireland.

We're told that one in six Americans can claim Irish ancestry. The Reagan family certainly does. We're separated from Erin by several generations and by an ocean -- but those of Irish descent know that such small matters are no barriers at all in affairs of the heart like ours with the Emerald Isle.

That's especially so on St. Patrick's Day, when we remember with pride the accomplishments of the Irish around the globe and here in America. The affinity of the Irish and American peoples is natural and rewarding. Our shared commitment to democratic values, liberty and freedom binds us closely as we work together to build a world in which these values will flourish.

I can't start my brief remarks here without remarking about the herculean job that has been done by [United Nations] Ambassador Kirkpatrick and the schedule that she's on. And I'm deeply grateful for what she has been doing on behalf of this particular cause. And I hope I won't be plowing plowed ground with my remarks here. But welcome to all of you -- Republicans and Democrats. I know that this is a bipartisan group, and that's good because I want to continue discussing a question that needs a bipartisan solution.

One of the reasons that we've asked you here is that we know you're influential back home. You're community leaders, and your words and views are respected. We're hoping to win your support on the question of Central America, because we know that'll help us in the support of Congress. I know you came here knowing a lot about what's going on in Nicaragua, and our previous speakers here have never been known for being shy about presenting the facts. There's probably no one in this country who knows more about the realities of what's happening in Central America than Ambassador Jeane Kirkpatrick and Elliott Abrams.

But they're fighting for freedom, and all of this has to do with my first point. I'll call it slander number one: the charge that the contras are former members of Somoza's national guard, who were fighting to restore a dictatorship. Well, the truth is all three leaders of the contras -- Adolpho Calero, Alfonso Robelo, and Arturo Cruz -- fought against Somoza. Calero and Cruz were imprisoned by Somoza. These men aren't fighting the Sandinistas because they're Somozistas. They're fighting the Sandinistas because they're patriots; they're fighting for the only true revolutionary idea of the latter part of the 20th century, and that is democracy. As for the contra troops, well, the average age of the freedom fighters is about 20. So, a lot of these soldiers were 13 years old when Somoza fell. And they're supposed to have been in the national guard -- his troops; I don't think they were.

Slander number two: The U.S. is only picking on the Sandinistas because, well, because we're cultural imperialists. And who are we, anyway, to judge their form of government? Well, you mostly hear this sort of thing from the ``Blame America Firsters.'' Now, it happens to be famously true that our feelings towards democracy are much like Churchill's when he pointed out that democracy is the worst form of government except for all those other forms that have been tried before from time to time. But we're not supporting democracy for, well, should I call it merely idealistic reasons. We're trying to build and strengthen democracy in Central America because democracy brings peace and communism brings war. So, you see, we're motivated by some very practical considerations. Democracies bring peace because democratic governments serve at the will of the people. And it's very hard to convince people -- mothers and fathers -- to send their sons off to war.

Communist governments, on the other hand, exert almost total control over the people of their society, from the state-run media that gives them nothing but propaganda to the secret police that drag their sons away in the night. It's not hard for them to wage war. And their whole reason for being is to spread the revolution, to strike ultimately at the very heart of the West. And that's what the Sandinistas mean to do. They're players in a drama whose aim is to spread communism throughout this hemisphere. They can't do it peacefully because almost nobody wants the product they're pushing, so they have to do it violently. Overt, covert, guerrilla warfare, terrorist campaigns, disinformation -- they'll do what they have to. But they're not operating independently. They're just part of the new mob, part of the 20th century's answer to Murder Incorporated.

Slander number three: This is the one that the contras will never stop the Sandinistas. Well, talk about self-fulfilling prophecies. Yes, if we give the contras no help, if we send them out there to fight with carbines that last saw action in the Korean war, if we give them nothing but a pat on the back and a roll of bandages, yes, they'll probably lose. And the people who refused to help them will sit back and say, ``See, we always said they were losers.'' Well, the truth is there are over 20,000 freedom fighters who are desperately waiting for everything from shoes to ammunition. And when they get them, they'll move. And when they move, they'll win.

I think we should ask ourselves one question: Why is it that the Communists have had to engage in the forcible relocation of at least 80,000 Nicaraguans -- a campaign that has included the burning of the peasants' homes, the destruction of farms, and the placing of the Miskito Indians in detention camps? Why have they done this? To discourage the general population from giving aid and assistance to the freedom fighters. These freedom fighters are popular with the people because the people, like the revolution they once supported, have been betrayed by the Sandinistas. I think what we're starting to realize is that the Sandinistas are increasingly aware of their -- or afraid of their own people.

Slander number four: The U.S. never gave the Sandinistas a chance, and that is why they turned out so bad. Well, there is some truth in this. We didn't give them a chance -- we gave them about a million chances. I won't repeat the whole sad history here, but I do want to address the issue of talking to the Sandinistas at the peace table. We've tried to do it. We've encouraged the Contadora process. We've tried to resolve this question through negotiations, and we're still trying. And the Sandinistas have not been interested in talking seriously and sincerely. All of a sudden, now their apologists come out and say, ``Oh, it's time to give new talks a chance.'' Well, that sounds just fine and peaceful and nonharmful; but what some people don't seem to understand is that if we delay aid for a few months while we're talking, the Sandinistas will take that time and use it to finish off the contras. That's the Communist strategy -- to kill them off. And when the execution is complete, they'll end the talks.

But I believe the truth is obvious. The Sandinistas will come to the negotiating table only when they see the carrot of peaceful settlement backed up by the stick of a well-equipped armed opposition. And nothing is as urgent as the question of Nicaragua. There is no question that faces this administration, there's no question, I think, that faces our times, that is more crucial to our future than what happens in Central America. And this is the time to help. You've heard the saying over and over again, the cliche, ``Time is everything.'' Well, in this case, it's true. If we help now, we can literally turn the situation around and change the future. If we fail now, I think we guarantee untold problems for the people of Central America and for our own children.

When I was a young man back in the 1930's, a war was simmering in Europe. England was imperiled, and its great leader looked across the sea to us for hope. Churchill asked for military assistance. He said, ``If you give us the tools, then we'll do the job.'' And we gave them the tools, to our everlasting credit. I think all of us -- or some of us -- can still remember Lend Lease and the destroyers and so forth on their way across the ocean.

Today Adolpho Calero, Alfonso Robelo, and Arturo Cruz look to us for hope, and we must help them. History will know what we did, and it will know what we didn't do. And history will judge. I've made my position clear. I need your help as much as the contras need our help. I need for the Congress to know that you want to help the freedom fighters. I am talking to them constantly, and they're telling me more and more of the people that they're hearing from back home who don't want us to do this. But there's been a great and very sophisticated disinformation program abroad, including high-priced lobbyists here in Washington, all working for the Sandinista cause, and all portraying them as the good guys in this particular fight.

Well, yesterday, over at the State Department, I stood with three men, all of them veterans from the south. One had been a Communist guerrilla against the El Salvador democracy and couldn't stomach what was going on and what he saw and switched. He was there, and he spoke to the group that was assembled. And another one was there who had been in the Sandinista government, and he spoke. And he told about this disinformation program and the things of that kind. And the third, he was what they called a Creole there -- they're blacks and Indians. And they were just simply attacked for being what they are when the Sandinistas came in. And he held up his hands. When they jailed him, they pulled all his fingernails out. And he told of the things that he had seen.

And then there was a display of the weapons that have been furnished by Nicaragua's Sandinista government to countries all over Latin America -- not to the nations or governments, to the Communist guerrillas in each one of those countries that are there trying to overthrow those democracies. If you care -- I know -- if you care, we'll win. And if we don't care, we'll lose. It's that simple. It's up to us. So, please help us get this across to the Congress. We're not asking for American boys to go down there. There's been no appeal for them. They've told us to the contrary. They don't want them; they don't need them. They just need the tools that we can provide for them as once Churchill asked for tools for their people. And that's what we're asking the Congress to do, to enable us to give those tools to those freedom fighters. So, help us. And thank you, and God bless you.

Forgive me, I just had a question on the way out: Why don't we go to the people? Sunday night, I think it's 8 o'clock, I'm going to the people by way of television to try and tell them this story and get their help. Thank you.

For more than two generations the United States has pursued a global foreign policy. Both the causes and consequences of World War II made clear to all Americans that our participation in world affairs, for the rest of the century and beyond, would have to go beyond just the protection of our national territory against direct invasion. We had learned the painful lessons of the 1930's, that there could be no safety in isolation from the rest of the world. Our Nation has responsibilities and security interests beyond our borders -- in the rest of this hemisphere, in Europe, in the Pacific, in the Middle East and in other regions -- that require strong, confident, and consistent American leadership.

In the past several weeks, we have met these responsibilities -- in difficult circumstances -- in Haiti and in the Philippines. We have made important proposals for peace in Central America and southern Africa. There and elsewhere, we have acted in the belief that our peaceful and prosperous future can best be assured in a world in which other peoples too can determine their own destiny, free of coercion or tyranny from either at home or abroad.

The prospects for such a future -- to which America has contributed in innumerable ways -- seem brighter than they have been in many years. Yet we cannot ignore the obstacles that stand in its path. We cannot meet our responsibilities and protect our interests without an active diplomacy backed by American economic and military power. We should not expect to solve problems that are insoluble, but we must not be half-hearted when there is a prospect of success. Wishful thinking and stop-and-go commitments will not protect America's interests.

Sustained by a strong bipartisan consensus, these basic principles have weathered contentious domestic debates through eight administrations, both Democratic and Republican. They have survived the great and rapid changes of an ever-evolving world.

There are good reasons for this continuity. These broad goals are linked together, and they in turn match both our ideals and our interests. No other policy could command the broad support of the American people.

A foreign policy that ignored the fate of millions around the world who seek freedom would be a betrayal of our national heritage. Our own freedom, and that of our allies, could never be secure in a world where freedom was threatened everywhere else. Our stake in the global economy gives us a stake in the well-being of others.

A foreign policy that overlooked the dangers posed by international conflicts, that did not work to bring them to a peaceful resolution, would be irresponsible -- especially in an age of nuclear weapons. These conflicts, and the tensions that they generate, are in fact a major spur to the continued build-up of nuclear arsenals. For this reason, my Administration has made plain that continuing Soviet adventurism in the developing world is inimical to global security and an obstacle to fundamental improvement of Soviet-American relations.

Our stake in resolving regional conflicts can be simply stated: greater freedom for others means greater peace and security for ourselves. These goals threaten no one, but none of them can be achieved without a strong, active, and engaged America.

Our efforts to promote freedom, prosperity, and security must take account of the diversity of regional conflicts and of the conditions in which they arise. Most of the world's turbulence has indigenous causes, and not every regional conflict should be viewed as part of the East-West conflict. And we should be alert to historic changes in the international environment, for these create both new problems and new opportunities. Three such realities must define American policies in the 80's.

Soviet Exploitation of Regional Conflicts. The first involves the nature of the threat we face. The fact is, in the 1970's the challenge to regional security became -- to a greater degree than before -- the challenge of Soviet expansionism. Around the world we saw a new thrust by our adversaries to spread Communist dictatorships and to put our own security (and that of friends and allies) at risk. The Soviet Union -- and clients like Cuba, Vietnam, and Libya -- supplied enormous quantities of money, arms, and training in efforts to destabilize and overthrow vulnerable governments on nearly every continent. By the 1970's the long-proclaimed Soviet doctrine of ``wars of national liberation'' was for the first time backed by a global capability to project military power. The Soviets appeared to conclude that the global ``correlation of forces'' was shifting inexorably in their favor.

The world now knows the results, above all the staggering human toll. Murderous policies in Vietnam and Cambodia produced victims on a scale unknown since the genocides of Hitler and Stalin. In Afghanistan, the Soviet invasion led to the terrified flight of millions from their homes. In Ethiopia, we have witnessed death by famine and more recently by forced resettlement; and in South Yemen this year, factional killing that consumed thousands of lives in a span of a few days.

These have been only the most horrifying consequences. Other outgrowths of Soviet policies have been the colonial presence of tens of thousands of Cuban troops in Africa; the activities of terrorists trained in facilities in the Soviet bloc; and the effort to use Communist Nicaragua as a base from which to extinguish democracy in El Salvador and beyond.

These are not isolated events. They make up the disturbing pattern of Soviet conduct in the past fifteen years. The problems it creates are no less acute because the Soviet Union has had its share of disagreements with some of its clients, or because many of these involvements have proved very costly. That the Soviet leadership persists in such policies despite the growing burden they impose only testifies to the strength of Soviet commitment. Unless we build barriers to Soviet ambitions, and create incentives for Soviet restraint, Soviet policies will remain a source of danger -- and the most important obstacle to the future spread of freedom.

In my meetings and other communications with Soviet General Secretary Gorbachev, and in my address before the UN General Assembly last October, I have made clear the importance the United States attaches to the resolution of regional conflicts that threaten world peace and the yearning of millions for freedom and independence -- whether in Afghanistan or in southern Africa.

For the United States, these conflicts cannot be regarded as peripheral to other issues on the global agenda. They raise fundamental issues and are a fundamental part of the overall U.S.-Soviet relationship. Their resolution would represent a crucial step toward the kind of world that all Americans seek and have been seeking for over forty years.

Joining Others' Strength to Ours. The second reality that shapes America's approach to regional security is the need to join our own strength to the efforts of others in working toward our common goals.

Throughout the postwar period, our country has played an enormous role in helping other nations, in many parts of the world, to protect their freedom. Through NATO we committed ourselves to the defense of Europe against Soviet attack. Through the Marshall Plan we helped Western Europe to rebuild its economy and strengthen democratic institutions. We sent American troops to Korea to repel a Communist invasion. America was an ardent champion of decolonization. We provided security assistance to help friends and allies around the world defend themselves. We extended our hand to those governments that sought to free themselves from dependence on the Soviet Union; success in such efforts -- whether by Yugoslavia, Egypt, China or others -- has contributed significantly to international security.

Despite our economic and military strength and our leading political role, the pursuit of American goals has always required cooperation with like-minded partners. The problems we face today, however, make cooperation with others even more important. This is in part a result of the limits on our resources, of the steady growth in the power of our adversaries, and of the American people's understandable reluctance to shoulder alone burdens that are properly shared with others. But most important, we want to cooperate with others because of the nature of our goals. Stable regional solutions depend over the long term on what those most directly affected can contribute. If interference by outsiders can be ended, regional security is best protected by the free and independent countries of each region.

The Democratic Revolution. If American policy can succeed only in cooperation with others, then the third critical development of the past decade offers special hope: it is the democratic revolution, a trend that has significantly increased the ranks of those around the world who share America's commitment to national independence and popular rule.

In other parts of the world, we see friends and allies moving in the same direction. Earlier in this decade, the people of Turkey fought back a violent assault on democracy from both left and right. Similarly, since the fall of Vietnam, the non-Communist nations of Southeast Asia have rallied together; with prosperous economies, and effective, increasingly democratic national governments, they play an increasingly important role on the world stage.

These trends are far from accidental. Ours is a time of enormous social and technological change everywhere, and one country after another is discovering that only free peoples can make the most of this change. Countries that want progress without pluralism, without freedom, are finding that it cannot be done.

In this global revolution, there can be no doubt where America stands. The American people believe in human rights and oppose tyranny in whatever form, whether of the left or the right. We use our influence to encourage democratic change, in careful ways that respect other countries' traditions and political realities as well as the security threats that many of them face from external or internal forces of totalitarianism.

The people of the Philippines are now revitalizing their democratic traditions. The people of Haiti have their first chance in three decades to direct their own affairs. Advocates of peaceful political change in South Africa are seeking an alternative to violence as well as to apartheid. All these efforts evoke the deepest American sympathy. American support will be ready, in these countries and elsewhere, to help democracy succeed.

But the democratic revolution does not stop here. There is another, newer phenomenon as well. In recent years, Soviet ambitions in the developing world have run head-on into a new form of resistance. Peoples on every continent are insisting on their right to national independence and their right to choose their government free of coercion. The Soviets overreached in the 1970's, at a time when America weakened itself by its internal divisions. In the 1980's the Soviets and their clients are finding it difficult to consolidate these gains -- in part because of the revival of American and Western self-confidence, but mainly because of the courageous forces of indigenous resistance. Growing resistance movements now challenge Communist regimes installed or maintained by the military power of the Soviet Union and its colonial agents -- in Afghanistan, Angola, Cambodia, Ethiopia, and Nicaragua.

In Afghanistan, Moscow's invasion to preserve the puppet government it installed has met stiff and growing resistance by Afghans who are fighting and dying for their country's independence. Democratic forces in Cambodia, once all but annihilated by the Khmer Rouge, are now waging a similar battle against occupation and a puppet regime imposed by Communist Vietnam.

In Nicaragua, the democratic resistance forces fighting against another Soviet- and Cuban-backed regime have been holding their own -- despite their lack of significant outside help, and despite the massive influx of the most sophisticated Soviet weaponry and thousands of Soviet, Cuban, and Soviet-bloc advisers.

The failure of these Soviet client regimes to consolidate themselves only confirms the moral and political bankruptcy of the Leninist model. No one can be surprised by this. But it also reflects the dangerous and destabilizing international impact that even unpopular Leninist regimes can have. None of these struggles is a purely internal one. As I told the United Nations General Assembly last year, the assault of such regimes on their own people inevitably becomes a menace to their neighbors. Hence the threats to Pakistan and Thailand by the powerful occupying armies in Afghanistan and Cambodia. Hence the insecurity of El Salvador, Costa Rica, and Honduras in the face of the Nicaraguan military build-up.

Soviet-style dictatorships, in short, are an almost unique threat to peace, both before and after they consolidate their rule. Before, because the war they wage against their own people does not always stay within their own borders. And after, because the elimination of opposition at home frees their hand for subversion abroad. Cuba's foreign adventures of the past decade are a warning to the neighbors of Communist regimes everywhere.

The drive for national freedom and popular rule takes different forms in different countries, for each nation is the authentic product of a unique history and culture. In one case, a people's resistance may spring from deep religious belief; in another, from the bonds of ethnic or tribal solidarity; in yet another, from the grievances of colonial rule, or from the failure of an alien ideology to contribute to national progress. Our traditions and the traditions of those whom we help can hardly be identical. And their programs will not always match our own experience and preferences. This is to be expected. The real question is: can our policy -- of active American support -- increase the likelihood of democratic outcomes? I believe it can.

These three realities of the 80's -- the new thrust of Soviet interventionism, the need for free nations to join together, the democratic revolution -- are inseparable. Soviet power and policy cannot be checked without the active commitment of the United States. And we cannot achieve lasting results without giving support to -- and receiving support from -- those whose goals coincide with ours.

These realities call for new ways of thinking about how to cope with the challenge of Soviet power. Since Harry Truman's day, through administrations of both parties, American policy toward the Soviet Union has consistently set itself the goal of containing Soviet expansionism. Today that goal is more relevant and more important than ever. But how do we achieve it in today's new conditions?

First of all, we must face up to the arrogant Soviet pretension known as the Brezhnev Doctrine: the claim that Soviet gains are irreversible; that once a Soviet client begins to oppress its people and threaten its neighbors it must be allowed to oppress and threaten them forever. This claim has no moral or political validity whatsoever. Regimes that cannot live in peace with either their own people or their neighbors forfeit their legitimacy in world affairs.

Second, we must take full account of the striking trend that I have mentioned: the growing ranks of those who share our interests and values. In 1945 so much of the burden of defending freedom rested on our shoulders alone. In the 1970's some Americans were pessimistic about whether our values of democracy and freedom were relevant to the new developing nations. Now we know the answer. The growing appeal of democracy, the desire of all nations for true independence, are the hopeful basis for a new world of peace and security into the next century. A world of diversity, a world in which other nations choose their own course freely, is fully consistent with our values -- because we know free peoples never choose tyranny.

To promote these goals, America has a range of foreign policy tools. Our involvement should always be prudent and realistic, but we should remember that our tools work best when joined together in a coherent strategy consistently applied. Diplomacy unsupported by power is mere talk. Power that is not guided by our political purposes can create nothing of permanent value.

The two tools of U.S. policy without which few American interests will be secure are our own military strength and the vitality of our economy. The defense forces of the United States are crucial to maintaining the stable environment in which diplomacy can be effective, in which our friends and allies can be confident of our protection, and in which our adversaries can be deterred. And our economic dynamism not only provides the resources essential to sustain our policies, but conveys a deeper message that is being better understood all the time, even by our adversaries: free, pluralist societies work.

The failure to maintain our military capabilities and our economic strength in the 1970's was as important as any other single factor in encouraging Soviet expansionism. By reviving both of them in the 1980's we deny our adversaries opportunities and deter aggression. We make it easier for other countries to launch sustained economic growth, to build popular institutions, and to contribute on their own to the cause of peace.

Security Assistance and Arms Transfers. When Soviet policy succeeds in establishing a regional foothold -- whether through invasion as in Afghanistan or Cambodia, or sponsorship of local Leninists as in Nicaragua -- our first priority must be to bolster the security of friends most directly threatened. This has been the reason for increasing our security assistance for Pakistan, Thailand, and the friendly democratic states of Central America. U.S. aid to Pakistan has been indispensable in demonstrating that we will not permit the Soviet Union to gain hegemony over all within reach of its growing power. By raising and sustaining aid to El Salvador after the Communist guerrillas' failed ``final offensive'' of 1981, we showed that controversy here at home could not stop us from backing a friendly and democratic government under threat.

Similarly, by providing needed equipment to friends in the Middle East -- whether to democratic Israel, or to longstanding friends in the Arab world who face clear and present radical threats -- we contribute to stability and peace in a vital region of the world.

By supporting the efforts of others to strengthen their own defense, we frequently do as much for our own security as through our own defense budget. Security assistance to others is a security bargain for us. We must, however, remember that states hostile to us seek the same sort of bargains at our expense. For this reason, we must be sure that the resources we commit are adequate to the job. In the first half of this decade, Libyan and Iranian aid to Communist Nicaragua, for example, totaled more than three times as much as U.S. aid to the democratic opposition. Soviet assistance to Vietnam, at nearly $2 billion annually, far outstrips U.S. support for any country save those that signed the Camp David peace accords. Soviet support for Cuba is larger still.

Economic Assistance. In speaking of Central America in 1982, I said that ``economic disaster [had] provided a fresh opening to the enemies of freedom, national independence, and peaceful development.'' We cannot indulge the hope that economic responses alone are enough to prevent this political exploitation, but an effective American policy must address both the short-term and long-term dimensions of economic distress. In the short term our goal is stabilization; in the long term, sustained growth and progress by encouraging market-oriented reform.

Over the long term, America's most effective contribution to self-sustaining growth is not through direct aid but through helping these economies to earn their own way. The vigorous expansion of our own economy has already spurred growth throughout the Western Hemisphere, as well as elsewhere. But this healthy expansion of the global economy -- which benefits us as well as others -- depends crucially on maintaining a fair and open trading system. Protectionism is both dangerous and expensive. Its costs include not only the waste of resources and higher prices in our own economy, but also the blow to poorer nations around the world that are struggling for democracy but vulnerable to anti-democratic subversion.

Diplomatic Initiatives. Some have argued that the regional wars in which the Soviet Union is embroiled provide an opportunity to ``bleed'' the Soviets. This is not our policy. We consider these wars dangerous to U.S.-Soviet relations and tragic for the suffering peoples directly involved.

For those reasons, military solutions are not the goal of American policy. International peace and security require both sides in these struggles to be prepared to lay down their arms and negotiate political solutions. The forms of such negotiations may vary, but in all of these conflicts political efforts (and the improvement of internal political conditions) are essential to ending the violence, promoting freedom and national self-determination, and bringing real hope for regional security.

With these goals in mind, in my address to the UN General Assembly last fall, I put forward a plan for beginning to resolve a series of regional conflicts in which Leninist regimes have made war against their own peoples. My initiative was meant to complement diplomatic efforts already underway. To all of these efforts the United States has given the strongest possible support. We have done so despite the fact that the Soviet Union and its clients have usually resisted negotiations, or have approached the table primarily for tactical purposes. We intend, in fact, to redouble our effort through a series of bilateral discussions with the Soviets.

In Afghanistan, we strongly support the diplomatic efforts conducted under UN auspices. We see no clear sign that the Soviet Union has faced up to the necessity of withdrawing its troops, which remains the central issue of the negotiations. But we will persist.

In southern Africa, the recent announcement by the South African government of a date for the creation of an independent Namibia provides a new test of its own and of the Angolan regime's interest in a settlement that truly begins to reduce the threats to security in this region.

In Central America, President Duarte of El Salvador has offered a bold initiative that would produce three sets of simultaneous peace talks -- his own with Salvador's Communist guerrillas; U.S.-Nicaragua bilateral discussions; and an internal dialogue between the Communist regime in Nicaragua and the democratic opposition -- if the Sandinistas will agree to the latter. My new envoy for Central America, Ambassador Philip Habib, will pursue the Duarte initiative as his first responsibility.

Support for Freedom Fighters. In all these regions, the Soviet Union and its clients would of course prefer victory to compromise. That is why in Afghanistan, in Southeast Asia, in southern Africa, and in Central America, diplomatic hopes depend on whether the Soviets see that victory is excluded. In each case, resistance forces fighting against Communist tyranny deserve our support.

The form and extent of support we provide must be carefully weighed in each case. Because a popularly supported insurgency enjoys some natural military advantages, our help need not always be massive to make a difference. But it must be more than simply symbolic: our help should give freedom fighters the chance to rally the people to their side. As John Kennedy observed of another nation striving to protect its freedom, it is ultimately their struggle; winning inevitably depends more on them than on any outsiders. America cannot fight everyone's battle for freedom. But we must not deny others the chance to fight their battle themselves.

In some instances, American interests will be served best if we can keep the details of our help -- in particular, how it is provided -- out of view. The Soviets will bring enormous pressure to bear to stop outside help to resistance forces; while we can well withstand the pressure, small friends and allies may be much more vulnerable. That is why publicity for such details sometimes only exposes those whom we are trying to help, or those who are helping us, to greater danger. When this is the case, a President must be able to work with the Congress to extend needed support without publicity. Those who make it hard to extend support in this way when necessary are taking from our hands an important tool to protect American interests. Other governments that find they cannot work with us on a confidential basis will often be forced not to work with us at all. To hobble ourselves in this way makes it harder to shape events while problems are still manageable. It means we are certain to face starker choices down the road.

Nowhere is this clearer than in Central America. The Nicaraguan Communists have actively sought to subvert their neighbors since the very moment they took power. There can be no regional peace in Central America -- or wherever Soviet client regimes have taken power -- so long as such aggressive policies face no resistance. Support for resistance forces shows those who threaten the peace that they have no military option, and that negotiations represent the only realistic course.

Communist rulers do not voluntarily or in a single step relinquish control and open their nations to popular rule. But there is no historical basis for thinking that Leninist regimes are the only ones that can indefinitely ignore armed insurgencies and the disintegration of their own political base. The conditions that a growing insurgency can create -- high military desertion rates, general strikes, economic shortages, infrastructural breakdowns, to name just a few -- can in turn create policy fissures even within a leadership that has had no change of heart.

This is the opportunity that the freedom fighters of the 80's hope to seize, but it will not exist forever, either in Central America or elsewhere. When the mechanisms of repression are fully in place and consolidated, the task of countering such a regime's policies -- both internal and external -- becomes incomparably harder. That is why the Nicaraguan regime is so bent on extinguishing the vestiges of pluralism in Nicaraguan society. It is why our own decisions can no longer be deferred.

We have heard it said, however, that while talking about these issues is a good idea, the United States should not be involved in other ways. Some people see risks of confrontation with the Soviet Union; others, no chance that the Soviets would ever reduce their commitment to their clients.

A policy whose only goal was to pour fuel on existing fires would obviously be irresponsible but America's approach is completely different. Our policy is designed to keep regional conflicts from spreading, and thereby to reduce the risk of superpower confrontations. Our aim is not to increase the dangers to which regional states friendly to us are exposed, but to reduce them. We do so by making clear to the Soviet Union and its clients that we will stand behind our friends. Talk alone will not accomplish this. That is why our security assistance package for Pakistan -- and for Thailand and Zaire -- is so important, and why we have increased our help to democratic states of Central America. We have made clear that there would be no gain from widening these conflicts. We have done so without embroiling American forces in struggles that others are ready to fight on their own.

Our goal, in short -- indeed our necessity -- is to convince the Soviet Union that the policies on which it embarked in the 70's cannot work. We cannot be completely sure how the Soviet leadership calculates the benefits of relationships with clients. No one should underestimate the tenacity of such a powerful and resilient opponent.

Yet there are reasons to think that the present time is especially propitious for raising doubts on the Soviet side about the wisdom of its client ties. The same facts about the democratic revolution that we can see are visible in Moscow. The harmful impact that Moscow's conduct in the developing world had on Western readings of its intentions in the last decade is also well known. There is no time in which Soviet policy reviews and reassessments are more likely than in a succession period, especially when many problems have been accumulating for some time. General Secretary Gorbachev himself made this point last year when he asked American interviewers whether it wasn't clear that the Soviet Union required international calm to deal with its internal problems.

Our answer to this question can be very simple. We desire calm too, and -- even more to the point -- so do the nations now embroiled in conflict with regimes enjoying massive Soviet support. Let the Soviet Union begin to contribute to the peaceful resolution of these conflicts.

The American people remain committed to a world of peace and freedom. They want an effective foreign policy, which shapes events in accordance with our ideals and does not just react, passively and timidly, to the actions of others. Backing away from this challenge will not bring peace. It will only mean that others who are hostile to everything we believe in will have a freer hand to work their will in the world.

Important choices now rest with the Congress: whether to undercut the President at a moment when regional negotiations are underway and U.S.-Soviet diplomacy is entering a new phase; to betray those struggling against tyranny in different regions of the world, including our own neighborhood; or to join in a bipartisan national endeavor to strengthen both freedom and peace.

I want to make an announcement today concerning the question of limitations on nuclear testing, an important arms control area which has been the subject of special correspondence which I have had recently with Soviet General Secretary Gorbachev, the leaders of six nations known as the New Delhi Group, and Senate Majority Leader Dole. I have conveyed to General Secretary Gorbachev today a new, very specific, and far-reaching proposal concerning nuclear testing limitations, a proposal which could be implemented immediately. In this new initiative, I urged the Soviet Union to join us without delay in bilateral discussions on finding ways to reach agreement on essential verification improvements of the Threshold Test Ban Treaty (TTBT) and Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty (PNET).

In the field of nuclear testing, as in arms control generally, effective verification is a central element. It has also long been one of the most difficult problems to resolve. We are seriously concerned about the past pattern of Soviet testing, as well as current verification uncertainties, and have determined that a number of Soviet tests constitute likely violations of obligations under the Threshold Test Ban Treaty of 1974. The inadequacy of the monitoring regime provided for in that agreement is underscored by the Soviet Union's own questions concerning the yields of particular U.S. tests, all of which in fact have been below the 150 kiloton threshold. The United States places the highest priority in the nuclear testing area on finding ways of ensuring effective verification of the TTBT and PNET. I have already made several specific suggestions to the Soviet Union in this regard. My new initiative is a further attempt to build the necessary basis for confidence and cooperation between our nations regarding such limitations.

As a reflection of our resolve to make tangible progress, in my new proposal I identified to Mr. Gorbachev a specific new technical method -- known as CORRTEX -- which we believe will enable both the U.S. and U.S.S.R. to improve verification and ensure compliance with these two treaties. This is a hydrodynamic yield measurement technique that measures the propagation of the underground shock wave from a nuclear explosion. I provided to Mr. Gorbachev a technical description of CORRTEX designed to demonstrate how this method will enhance verification procedures. To allow the Soviet Union to examine the CORRTEX system more fully, I further proposed that Mr. Gorbachev send his scientists to our Nevada test site during the third week of April 1986. At that time they could also monitor a planned U.S. nuclear weapons test. I would hope this would provide an opportunity for our experts to discuss verification methods and thus pave the way for resolving the serious concerns which have arisen in this area. In making this offer, I made clear to General Secretary Gorbachev that if we could reach agreement on the use of an effective verification system incorporating such a method to verify the TTBT, I would be prepared to move forward on ratification of both the TTBT and PNET.

What is unique about this new initiative is its specificity and concreteness and the detailed, new technical information we have provided to the Soviet Union in trying to solve these verification uncertainties. It is important that the Soviet Union engage with us now in this first practical step to improve the confidence we each must have in treaty compliance with the 150 kiloton threshold on underground tests. If this can be achieved, we believe we will have significantly improved the prospects for verifying other arms control agreements as well through improved verification regimes.

A fundamental principle of our Government is that a well-informed citizenry can take part in the important decisions that set the present and future course of the Nation. Our Founding Fathers provided in the Constitution and in the Bill of Rights freedoms for all Americans, many of which are promoted by open access to information. Numerous Acts of Congress, including the Freedom of Information Act, are intended to further this principle. Most Americans, having never known any other way of life, take for granted open access to information about their Federal, State, and local governments. They also understand that some secrecy is necessary to protect both national security and the right to privacy.

March 16 is the anniversary of the birth of James Madison, our fourth President and one of the principal figures in the Constitutional Convention. Madison eloquently expressed the guarantees in the Bill of Rights, in particular in the freedoms of religion, speech, and of the press protected by the First Amendment. He understood the value of information in a democratic society, as well as the importance of its free and open dissemination. He believed that through the interaction of the Government and its citizens, facilitated by a free press and open access to information, the Government could be most responsive to the people it serves. Surely the American experience has proved him right.

This year marks the twentieth anniversary of the enactment by the Federal government of the Freedom of Information Act. On President Madison's birthday, it is particularly fitting that we recognize the value of reasonable access to information in our political process.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourteenth day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

I'd like to speak to you this afternoon about a grave threat to our country and continent: the Communist regime in Nicaragua, a nation closer to our own southern border than Washington is to Kansas City. When the pro-Soviet regime took power in Nicaragua in 1979, it claimed to embrace the highest ideals of individual liberty and promised to hold free elections. What happened? Well, not democracy, but internal repression, imprisonment, and torture, the buildup of an army and militia of more than 120,000, and subversion throughout Central America.

Today Communist Nicaragua endangers our national security, it threatens our Caribbean sealanes, and still worse, it is intent on bringing the nations of Central America under Communist domination one by one -- a grim achievement that would send millions of refugees flooding into our Southern States. Yet grave as it is, this threat can be averted. The Congress now has before it legislation that would send help to the Nicaraguan freedom fighters, the more than 20,000 brave men and women struggling against the Communists who now control their country. This aid could enable the freedom fighters to reclaim Nicaragua for liberty and the West.

Tomorrow evening I'll discuss in full our proposal to aid the freedom fighters in a televised address from the Oval Office. For now, however, permit me to consider a single but central question: Why, many have asked, must we send the freedom fighters weapons? Why not try to achieve our objectives by negotiating with the Nicaraguan Communists instead? Well, the answer is simple: We've tried again and again. Since 1983 I have appointed three Special Envoys to Central America. These envoys have made 48 trips to the region, eager to engage in a serious dialog. Since June 1984 we have held not 1 but 10 high-level meetings with representatives of the Nicaraguan Communists. Each time we left emptyhanded. Just yesterday my Special Envoy, Philip Habib, returned from a 49th trip to Central America.

Other free nations, too, have attempted to engage the Sandinistas in good-faith negotiations. We have yet to see any concrete results. Nicaragua has indeed participated in the Contadora talks -- talks sponsored by Mexico, Panama, Colombia, and Venezuela -- only to balk any time agreements seem near. Last November, President Ortega said of a document his own representatives had helped to shape, and I quote, ``The peace document that the Contadora group submitted in September 1985 is unacceptable to Nicaragua.'' Well, recently the democratically elected President of El Salvador, Jose Napoleon Duarte, made a new and dramatic offer. If the Communists in Nicaragua agree to church-negotiated talks with their democratic opponents, President Duarte said then he would simultaneously agree to negotiate with the Soviet- and Nicaraguan-backed guerrillas in his country. Both the Nicaraguan Communists and the Salvadoran guerrillas whom they support rejected this offer.

Failed attempts by El Salvador and the Contadora group, rebuffed attempts on our part. By now the truth about negotiating with the Nicaragua Communists must be abundantly clear. Yes, the Communists might meet their opponents at the table, but only when they fear meeting them in the field. In the meantime, as recent revelations make clear, the Communists are only tightening their grip on Nicaragua. Somoza, the dictator the Sandinistas overthrew, had 1 prison; the Sandinistas have at least 10 new gulags. And new intelligence shows that Tomas Borge, the Communist Interior Minister, is engaging in a brutal campaign to bring the freedom fighters into discredit. You see, Borge's Communist operatives dress in freedom fighters' uniforms, go into the countryside, then murder and mutilate ordinary Nicaraguans.

This, then, is why I'm asking the Congress to provide the Nicaraguan freedom fighters not only with much needed humanitarian aid but with military supplies. They must be given the means to fight back. The freedom fighters seek not to destroy their Communist opponents but to liberate their country. Democracy -- this is all the freedom fighters ask. And all we're asking for is a democratic outcome, because a democratic Central America is vital to the security of our continent and nation. Now that negotiations with the Nicaraguan Communists have failed again and again, the time has come for Congress to give the freedom fighters what they need for their struggle for democracy to succeed.

Ambassador Habib. Not true. I think you ought to look at that poll that just came out if you want to talk about public support. That's public. Pardon me, Mr. President, the question was to you. I shouldn't have answered it.

Ambassador Habib. But that just isn't true. I mean, there's a recent poll that was run, a perfectly authentic one, which shows the majority of Central Americans, first of all, condemn the situation inside of Nicaragua, and secondly, the majority supports the aid to the contras. Now, I just don't understand where you guys get this public opinion down there.

Ambassador Habib. I wouldn't say that's necessarily so. They have their reasons as to how they express their position. And I suggest that you look at a speech that Mr. Duarte, for example, made on Saturday, or ask the Congressmen who visited him the other day what they think, or look at a statement made by the President of Costa Rica, I believe yesterday, and see how he puts it. You've got to, you know, these fellows have code words the way we do.

Ambassador Habib. I'm saying that they are concerned about the situation in Nicaragua, that they are stating their positions quite clearly, that they understand the significance of putting pressure on the Sandinistas in order to bring them to a different approach, a political approach. I would suggest you also look at the statement that Mr. Duarte made which has now been supported by all four of the democratically elected Presidents in Central America.

St. Patrick's Day is a time for joy and celebration, a day we recognize the many achievements, sung and unsung, of the Irish men and women who have made this a better and happier world. Today we remember especially the immigrants who came to these shores to make a new beginning. Some of them were so poor they left their homeland with little more than the clothes on their backs. But they brought with them something more valuable -- their hopes and dreams, their love of liberty, and their unconquerable spirit.

St. Patrick's Day is also a time for reflecting on life today on the Emerald Isle, the ancestral home of over 40 million Americans. In the last two decades, the northern part of the island has been wracked by senseless violence. Political and religious differences, exacerbated by unfavorable economic conditions, have resulted in the wanton murder of hundreds of men, women, and children and the terrorizing of an entire population. But on this St. Patrick's Day we can all be grateful that a ray of hope has begun to shine. In a courageous move, the Prime Ministers of Ireland and the United Kingdom decided the time had come to give new impetus to the search for peace in Northern Ireland. Out of their discussions emerged a new approach in which the British and Irish Governments jointly committed themselves to reconciliation between Northern Ireland's two communities.

This Anglo-Irish accord, signed by Prime Ministers Thatcher and FitzGerald on November 15th last year and quickly ratified by their parliaments, has received an enthusiastic bipartisan reception in the U.S. Congress. We are now working with Congress to find ways in which the United States can help. In determining the nature of any U.S. Government aid, we must bear in mind that the agenda and timetable for progress in that troubled area are not for us to set. Those directly concerned, the people of both Irish traditions, will chart the course which will, we pray, lead to reconciliation in that troubled land.

Concerned Americans can do two important things to help make reconciliation a reality. First, the key to progress in Northern Ireland and in the Republic is a strong, growing economy -- and if Americans remember Ireland as we plan our travel and consider investments, we can make a contribution to Irish economic growth. Second, Americans should not give either financial or moral support to Irish terrorists, any Irish terrorists. Such support is misguided. We cannot permit individuals, for their own evil ends, to snuff out hope by the use of violence. On this St. Patrick's Day let all Americans and people of good will everywhere honor the Irish by helping them build a peaceful and prosperous future.

The people of America and Ireland have long held each other in high esteem. We hold a special place in each other's hearts. And on this very special St. Patrick's Day we extend to all our greetings and good will.

We are, indeed, in Ireland grateful to the President for the support that he has given to the preparation of the agreement between Ireland and Britain and the support that he has offered in the aid program now before Congress. This agreement is one which brings together two countries which together have made, I think, a great contribution and perhaps, together, the major contribution to the United States, if I may say that without offense to any Italians or Germans present. It's an agreement which we hope will bring peace and stability to Northern Ireland. Our gratitude goes out to the President, to the Congress, and the people of the United States for the support they have given to us in what we're trying to do with the British Government in this respect.

I'd like to take this opportunity, offering to the President this gift on behalf of the people of Ireland. It is the centenary year of the Statue of Liberty. I think you've been having some repairs done to her at present, and this replica, carried out by a craftsman in Waterford, is something which we want to give from the people of Ireland to the people of the United States, because there were millions of Irish people who passed that statue and to whom it meant freedom -- and to whom it gave freedom to them and their descendants. And it seemed to us an appropriate gift to make to you. I also want to offer you a gift of a bowl of shamrock, which is genuine shamrock and which I think should be enough for you, your Cabinet, or your family -- anybody else around. [Laughter] So, I hope you will accept that on behalf of the Irish people; also, a renewed thanks, Mr. President.

The President. Well, Mr. Prime Minister, this is magnificent, and of course that is most appropriate and most welcome. And I'm delighted to be joined here by the Prime Minister of Ireland on St. Patrick's Day. When you mentioned those who came past that statue, my great-grandfather was one of them.

We've just had a most useful discussion -- brief but important. And it's a distinct honor to receive the traditional shamrock and to wear it as an expression of shared hope for peace and good will in the year ahead. Our friendship for Ireland and the Irish people is deep and enduring. As I've said, I'm also honored to receive this Waterford crystal replica of the Statue of Liberty. Nothing stirs the heart like liberty, which is very much on our minds these days.

Pursuant to that Order, I prohibited certain transactions, including the following: (1) the making or approval of bank loans to the South African Government, with certain narrow exceptions; (2) the export of computers and related goods and technology to certain government agencies and any apartheid enforcing entity of the South African Government; (3) nuclear exports to South Africa and related transactions, with certain narrow exceptions; (4) the import into the United States of arms, ammunition, or military vehicles produced in South Africa; and (5) the extension of export marketing support to U.S. firms employing at least twenty-five persons in South Africa which do not adhere to certain fair labor standards.

In addition, I directed (6) the Secretary of State and the United States Trade Representative to consult with other parties to the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade with a view toward adopting a prohibition on the import of Krugerrands; (7) the Secretary of the Treasury to complete a study within 60 days regarding the feasibility of minting U.S. gold coins; (8) the Secretary of State to take the steps necessary to increase the amounts provided for scholarships in South Africa for those disadvantaged by the system of apartheid and to increase the amounts allocated for South Africa in the Human Rights Fund; and (9) the Secretary of State to establish an Advisory Committee to provide recommendations on measures to encourage peaceful change in South Africa.

The policies and actions of the Government of South Africa continue to pose an unusual and extraordinary threat to the foreign policy and economy of the United States. I shall continue to exercise the powers at my disposal to apply the measures contained in Executive Order 12532 as long as these measures are appropriate, and will continue to report periodically to the Congress on significant developments pursuant to 50 U.S.C. 1703(c).

The President today announced his intention to nominate William L. Roper to be Administrator of the Health Care Financing Administration, Department of Health and Human Services. This is a new position.

Dr. Korn is vice president and dean of Stanford University Medical School. He has served as professor and chairman of the department of pathology at the school; physician in chief of pathology at Stanford University Hospital; and consultant in pathology at the Palo Alto Veterans Administration Hospital. He is on the board of directors of the California Society of Pathologists and of the council of the Association of Pathology Chairmen. He has served as a member of the editorial board of the American Journal of Pathology.

Ladies and gentlemen, I think you know Tip and I've been kidding each other for some time now. And I hope you also know how much I hope this continues for many years to come. A little kidding is, after all, a sign of affection, the sort of things that friends do to each other. And, Mr. Speaker, I'm grateful you have permitted me in the past, and I hope in the future, that singular honor, the honor of calling you my friend. I think the fact of our friendship is testimony to the political system that we're part of and the country we live in, a country which permits two not-so-shy and not-so-retiring Irishmen to have it out on the issues rather than on each other or their countrymen.

But in addition to celebrating a country and a personal friendship, I wanted to come here tonight to join you in saluting Tip O'Neill, to salute him for the years of dedication and devotion to country. Tip's recollections of politics go back, of course, far beyond my own. [Laughter] He's seen some who play the game well and others who do not. He's seen some who love politics and some who came to it only out of a sense of duty. But through it all, Tip has been a vital and forceful part of America's political tradition, a tradition that he has truly enriched.

Yet Tip O'Neill represents far more than just this political tradition. Deep within, too, is the memory of places like Back Bay and South Boston, the docks, the piers, those who came off the ships in Boston Harbor seeking a better land, a better way for their children. And they found that something better. They rose above the prejudice and the hardship. Tip would see one of his contemporaries become President. John F. Kennedy would be 68 today had he lived. And Tip can remember those golden hours better than most in this room. And, then, not too many years later, there was another of immigrant stock who would become Speaker of the House. In so short a time, so much leadership from one city, one place, one people. How fitting that Boston College, a place that became to so many of those new arrivals a symbol of moving upward and onward; how fitting that Boston College, whose towers on the heights have reached to heaven's own blue for so many, should sponsor this salute to Tip O'Neill.

Tip, you are a true son of Boston College and our friend, and we salute you. You are also a leader of the Nation, and for that we honor you. But you also embody so much of what this Nation is all about, the hope that is America. So, you make us proud as well, my friend; you make us proud.

It's always an honor for any President of the United States to sit down with the leader of the people of Canada and, in a spirit of good will, talk over our mutual concerns. The Right Honorable John Diefenbaker, a great conservative, the chief, whose memory I know Brian Mulroney holds dear, once said that President Eisenhower and he spoke to one another with the candor of free men in friendship. Well, today the traditionally close ties between our countries are being bolstered by the personal bonds that have developed between our peoples -- and, yes, between the elected officials of our countries.

So, today I offer you a special welcome as well as an official one. Nancy and I are delighted to see you and Mila again. Our citizens have grown to expect positive relations between Canada and the United States; however, I would suggest that we must never take our friendship for granted. It must be fostered and nurtured to keep it strong, vibrant, and relative to those areas which most interest our peoples.

Your visit, Mr. Prime Minister, comes at an opportune time. Progress has been made in a number of areas, and our discussions should move the agenda along even further. The United States and Canada are poised to negotiate an historic new trade agreement. Our goal is an accord that could well be heralded on both sides of the border as a landmark accomplishment, a cornerstone for future prosperity. A new economic arrangement between Canada and the United States could, to our mutual benefit, encourage vigorous, new economic activity and put an end to the many of the irritants that have bedeviled us.

Mr. Prime Minister, the two of us share a commitment to economic growth as a means of improving the well-being of our citizens. Canada and the United States, as nations built by immigrants, both enjoy many ties with the Old World. We both have growing links with the nations of the Pacific rim. But here again, let us not lose perspective on the importance of our relationship. We are still each other's largest trading partner. The commercial interaction of our people, generally free from rancor and distrust, has been an unmatched blessing to our citizens. While recognizing that we are separate and independent countries, each with our own national pride, traditions, and institutions, there are few things we can do which will be more of a boon to our people than protecting and expanding upon our many bonds of enterprise and commerce.

Protecting the environment, as one would expect when two countries share a 5,000-mile common border, is also a matter of great significance. Environmental issues, especially those dealing with air pollution, are serious challenges. Today we must build on what has already been accomplished and bring these issues closer to resolution.

Canada and the United States have been cooperating to make this a more prosperous world and also to make this a safer and peaceful world. Who can forget that we stood shoulder to shoulder in two world wars and in Korea to protect democracy and to save a besieged mankind from tyranny? And in the years since, Canada and the United States have shared the defense of the continent. But even more important, we've played a key role in the North Atlantic Treaty Organization, history's most successful alliance -- a pact which has given us 40 years of European peace. Today, Mr. Prime Minister, NATO is rebuilding to ensure that it remains fully capable of accomplishing its mission into the next century. And if all its members carry their fair share, NATO will be able to preserve the peace, which is, after all, its primary mission and which is, after all, the responsibility of all free people. If there is any lesson in history, it is that free people must be strong if they are to live at peace.

I want to salute Prime Minister Mulroney for the tough measures that Canada is taking to combat the ugly threat of terrorism. The free and democratic nations of the world are just now mobilizing to rid mankind of this plague. There's every reason for optimism that this fight will be won and that international terrorism will be relegated to the garbage heap of history where it belongs.

I'm looking forward, Mr. Prime Minister, to discussing these areas vital to our national securities and the peace of the world. The people of our two countries are setting an example to the rest of the world. We're proving that two proud and independent nations can live side by side, each respecting the sovereignty and the rights of the other. Our cooperation and the mutual profit we enjoy is the envy of so many nations. Well, we're showing them how to do it. President Harry Truman put it best: ``We Canadians and Americans,'' he said, ``are proud of our joint record. But we claim no monopoly on that formula.'' What we're trying to do, Canadians and Americans together, is to build a better world. And in this noble endeavor, let us pray that the citizens of our two countries will always be on the same team -- freedom's team.

The Prime Minister. Thank you, Mr. President. It's good to be with you again. As you'll recall, you were the first head of government I met with, and this was the first capital I visited only days after the installation of our government 18 months ago yesterday. Some days in the House of Commons, Mr. President, seem a lot longer. [Laughter] I wanted to make clear then and I want to repeat now that harmonious and fruitful relations between Canada and the United States are a top priority with us. With that in mind, we agreed from the beginning that it would be useful, indeed indispensable, for us to meet annually; and so, we met 1 year ago in Quebec City. You remember, Mr. President, it was a cold day; you wore a green tie -- and Tip wasn't there -- [laughter] -- and we launched a new era in our relations.

Canadians and Americans, though different in many ways, share many of the same values. These meetings will provide us with an occasion to review our relations but also with an opportunity to renew our friendship. How far have we come in the last year? Where do we hope to go in the next year or two? There are a number of questions on the bilateral agenda, not all of them near resolution by any means.

But let me say first, Mr. President and Nancy, that I come here today with Mila to celebrate the common heritage, the community of interest and the commonality of purpose between our two great countries. We are more than one another's best friends; we are far and away one another's largest trading partner. But we don't take one for granted any more than the other. Friends stay in touch, and partners have to work at it. President Reagan and I stay very much in touch, and we're working very hard to assure that our trading partnership continues to grow on the basis of mutual interest and mutual trust. And that doesn't mean that there won't be straight talk even among the best of friends. It is precisely because we are friends that we speak so frankly and so clearly to each other. Such candor, I think, cements our friendship and sustains our relationship.

And so, Mr. President, Mila and I are delighted to be here with you today, with you and Nancy. We very much look forward to our meetings and just getting together again in the course of our visit. Thank you, sir, and thank all of you.

Note: The President spoke at 10:11 a.m. at the South Portico of the White House, where the Prime Minister was accorded a formal welcome with full military honors. Following the ceremony, the President and the Prime Minister met privately in the Oval Office and then held an expanded meeting.

The Prime Minister. Canada provides foreign aid to dozens and dozens and dozens of countries around the world. One of our noblest traditions is the, as is yours, is the providing of aid to countries less well off than ourselves. And we've been doing it ever since Canada was founded, pretty well. And it's a noble tradition that we plan to maintain.

I enjoyed our discussions today. I worked with Canadians long before I ran for public office. The contributions Canadians have been making on our way of life and every profession is incalculable. The bond of affection between us is truly a treasure. We drew upon those historic bonds, Mr. Prime Minister, when last year at Quebec we laid the foundation for what I call the new partnership. We've continued today, fully recognizing that the long-term stakes are high. We can work together to resolve the issue of acid rain, as we've worked together to resolve so many environmental issues before. We can ensure that our joint defense remains so strong that no aggressor will ever attack us. And we can reach a new agreement on trade that would help us achieve unparalleled prosperity for our citizens.

I strongly endorse a prompt start to formal negotiations in the fullest possible scope to those talks. Before I leave the White House, Mr. Prime Minister, I hope that we can bring these negotiations to a successful conclusion. We can lead our people into the light of prosperity, freedom, and good will. Nothing less, of course, should be expected of two free peoples who live so close. Freedom is the fountainhead from which mutual respect and amicability flow. And freedom is what America -- Canada and the United States -- is all about.

So, ladies and gentlemen, please join me in a threefold toast to Her Majesty the Queen of Canada, to my good friend Prime Minister Brian Mulroney, to his lovely wife, and to the enduring bond between our two North American peoples.

I suppose, Mr. President, that Canadians most admire, of all things, your uncanny ability to forecast the future. When you became aware what television was going to do to the movies, you decided to try something easy -- [laughter] -- you chose politics, and we're glad that you did. Nearly two centuries ago, when John Adams took up residence in what was then known as the ``President's House,'' he composed a prayer that is today carved in the mantle of this residence: ``May none but honest and wise men,'' he concluded, ``ever rule under this roof.'' We feel not only among friends but, in a very real sense, among family.

In 1939 Winston Churchill said of our two countries: ``That long frontier from the Atlantic to the Pacific Oceans, guarded only by neighborly respect and honorable obligations, is an example to every country and a pattern for the future of the world.'' For just as we share a continent, just as we have jointly inherited our precious environment, we are bound up inevitably in one another's economic interests. I speak, of course, Mr. President, in response to your observation of the trading relationship between our two countries, a relationship already uniquely important in the affairs of the world.

I speak also of a new challenge -- further trade liberalization between us. On October 1 last, I advised the President of the Canadian desire to pursue a new trade agreement with the United States. On the following day, Mr. President, you welcomed the Canadian initiative. In these first days of October I think that we issued to our respective countries an historic challenge, one of historic proportions, by expressing the wish to enter into negotiations. I, for my part, was responding to some questions that are asked at home. Are we in Canada confident enough in our ability to maintain our political sovereignty in a process that will lead to closer relations? And the answer is yes. Have we in Canada a cultural identity strong enough to live and grow in this process? And the answer is yes. And have we in Canada developed the economic and commercial enterprises necessary to prosper under greater competition? And the answer, again, is emphatically yes.

I think, Mr. President, the challenge for your country may well be to show understanding of our concerns as we shall for yours. With you as our only immediate neighbor, we have developed as a distinct nation. Let's continue to grow stronger, each in our own ways. Let's continue to reinforce one another by exchanging what we produce that is best. This was the key to our success in the past and this, I think, is the promise of our future. Because if we have the wisdom and forbearance to succeed, then the whole world will be the beneficiary, just as Churchill foresaw.

A half-century ago Canada and the United States blazed a new trail towards lower tariffs and quotas -- the world was very different then. But the imperatives of liberalization are more compelling than ever in our increasingly interdependent economies. Neither of our countries was built by the fainthearted. We've already achieved much together, from commerce to communications, from sea to space, in joint ventures based on mutual interest and mutual respect. Earlier today I had the pleasure of informing the President that Canada has accepted his invitation to join in the manned space station project. This venture symbolizes our joint confidence in the future, our commitment to shared technology, and Canada's pride in joining you in the exploration of space.

I know Ronald Reagan to be a man of warmth and wisdom, of grace and good will. We, in Canada, know we have a true and valued friend in President Reagan. Friends may sometimes disagree, friends may diverge in opinion, friends speak frankly, but they give each other the benefit of the doubt. There can be no doubt, however, about our common commitment to freedom, Mr. President, and our common commitment to peace. We concur wholeheartedly with your view that not only is nuclear war unwinnable, it must never be fought.

Canadians, no less than Americans, were deeply relieved when the President of the United States met last fall with a leader of the Soviet Union. In honest dialog there is a beginning of understanding. You, Mr. President, have broken new ground in your offer to the Soviet Union last week to exchange information and technologies with the Soviets for verifying limits on nuclear testing. We remain confident that the spirit of Geneva will carry over into your next meeting with Mr. Gorbachev and your visit to the Soviet Union. The hopes of the world ride on the outcome of your discussions with Secretary Gorbachev. Our prayers and our support go with you. Mr. President, your entire career has been a testament to courage and conviction, to your desire to do the right thing for America and for the world. That determination will prevail in your pursuit of world peace.

At this time, colleagues and friends, I am privileged, honored, to propose a toast to a friend -- and a very distinguished friend of Canada. Ladies and gentlemen, for Nancy and for the President of the United States of America.

The President met today with the leadership of Sister Cities International to mark their 30th anniversary and receive their award for his contribution to international understanding. The President is the Honorary Chairman of Sister Cities International.

Sister Cities programs have worked to eliminate barriers of culture and language and have enhanced the opportunities for mutual understanding. Because of Sister Cities programs, thousands of young people have the opportunity each year to expand their horizons, American know-how is made available to help people in dozens of developing countries, and thousands of people around the world can see the American volunteer spirit at work.

Sister Cities International is also an important part of our effort to expand and broaden contacts and communications between the people of the United States and the Soviet Union. The President and General Secretary Gorbachev agreed in Geneva on the utility of broadening exchanges and contacts and finding new ways to increase cooperation. People-to-people programs can help build better understanding and genuine constituencies for peace.

The Sister Cities programs are an outstanding example of citizen and private sector participation at their best in the field of international exchange, understanding, and cooperation. We wish them well on their anniversary.

The President. I'm delighted to join with my good friend, the Prime Minister, in putting our signatures on an agreement to extend the unique Canada-U.S. partnership in the North American Aerospace Defense Command, known as NORAD. The last time this agreement was renewed was during my visit to Ottawa in March of 1981, which was my first trip abroad as President. I'm sure that the Prime Minister would agree that NORAD has served our mutual interests and has been a significant factor in enhancing deterrence, promoting global stability in the nearly 30 years of its existence. It's therefore entirely appropriate that we extend this joint command for an additional 5 years.

Another topic of particular interest to the Prime Minister and me was the report of our Special Envoys on acid rain, Drew Lewis and Bill Davis. Drew, unfortunately, couldn't be here today; Bill Davis is. And we undertook this effort because we recognized that acid rain was a serious concern affecting both our countries and our relations with each other. The study we commissioned was in keeping with the long history of U.S.-Canada cooperation in dealing with environmental issues. And today I would like to commend Bill and Drew, even though he's absent, for their thorough and conscientious work. Their joint report attests to the serious and practical manner in which they discharged their duties, and I know that Prime Minister Mulroney shares my appreciation and admiration for their balanced and well-drafted joint report. I'm pleased to say that I fully endorse the report and will shortly issue a press statement to this effect.

I wish I could say that our action today takes the acid rain issue off our bilateral agenda; unfortunately, this cannot be. Serious scientific and economic problems remain to be solved. But in the spirit of cooperation and good will, which has come to characterize the way Canadians and Americans approach their common problems, I am confident that we have begun a process which will benefit future generations in both our great countries.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, I'm very encouraged by your statement and appreciate your personal commitment to resolve our common problem in acid rain. And your undertaking that you have made, sir, in regard to your personal commitment, that of your administration, as well as your undertaking to secure appropriate funding is very welcome.

Acid rain imperils the environment in both countries. At Quebec we commissioned two personal envoys, Drew Lewis and Bill Davis, to take charge of this issue and to break new ground. They didn't let us down. I salute Bill Davis, who's here today. And I was honored to meet with Drew Lewis yesterday at a meeting with Secretary [of State] Shultz. I think they've produced a balanced and a realistic document. We now have an agreed foundation on which to build. Your full endorsement of this report, Mr. President, represents a significant step, in my judgment, in the right direction.

We have a proud tradition of resolving transboundary environmental problems. We intend to carry on that tradition and to carry it forward. As neighbors and custodians of our common heritage, we must do no less, and much remains to be done. By agreeing to keep acid rain on our agenda, Mr. President, we signal our joint determination to solve this problem. Your Secretary of State, our Secretary of State for External Affairs, and other Cabinet officials will report on this vital effort regularly to us. I am confident that we can move to early and substantial reductions of damage to our environment. This remains our urgent goal, and I'm very grateful to you, Mr. President, for your personal support in meeting this challenge.

Mr. President, on behalf of the Government of Canada and on behalf of my colleagues and friends in regard to this issue and so many others, we have had a very productive and constructive meeting with you, as we've had in the past. And I want to thank you on behalf of Canadians for your attention and your sensitivity to Canada's problems and to the great obligation of solving these problems constructively together. Canada will always work with the United States to build new opportunities and new prosperity for our people. And we thank you for the warmth of your welcome and the courtesies extended to all members of our delegation. Thank you, Mr. President.

The President and Prime Minister Mulroney commissioned Drew Lewis and William Davis last year in Quebec City to conduct a thorough study of the acid rain problem and to submit their findings and recommendations within 1 year. This report was presented to the President and the Prime Minister on January 8, 1986. After careful review, the President endorses fully the joint report of the Special Envoys.

As stated in the report, acid rain is a serious environmental problem in both the United States and Canada with transboundary implications for both countries. The United States pioneered air pollution controls and as a nation has spent approximately $75 billion since the 1970 passage of the Clean Air Act to limit emissions of pollutants identified as precursors of acid rain. By 1990 approximately $100 billion will have been spent for this purpose. As a result of these actions, from 1973 to 1983 emissions of major precursors have declined significantly. However, as the joint report notes, more needs to be done. This administration has already provided substantial support for clean coal technologies. For fiscal year 1981 through FY 1985, a total of almost $2.2 billion in total research funds has been allocated in the United States to develop technologies for cleaner utilization of coal.

In order to expand the control options available to industry, as recommended in the joint report, the administration will pursue a program to develop and demonstrate innovative control technologies. In this year's budget $700 million has been earmarked for clean coal research between FY 1986 and FY 1991. In addition an $800 million joint industry/government program designed to develop and demonstrate clean ways to burn coal will be implemented. Although it does not now have all of the funds, the administration will seek to provide in the future the funding recommended in the joint report. We will also encourage States to undertake similar efforts, as several have already done.

Since I transmitted my message to the Congress on February 25 requesting additional assistance for the Nicaraguan democratic resistance, I have heard from many thoughtful Members of Congress, as well as from Latin American leaders and the leaders of the Nicaraguan democratic resistance. Many have raised the question of how the additional authority I have requested could be implemented so as to help persuade the Government of Nicaragua to engage in a serious effort to resolve the conflict in Central America through peaceful means.

I am determined to make every effort to protect our vital interests and achieve peace without further loss of life. That is why on February 10 I proposed simultaneous talks by the Government of Nicaragua -- with their opposition and with the United States. That is why on February 25 I affirmed my commitment to direct the additional assistance I have requested toward a comprehensive and verifiable agreement among the countries of Central America, based on the Contadora Document of Objectives. And that is why on March 7 I appointed Ambassador Philip Habib as my special envoy for Central America.

On Sunday night, I described to the American people the threat to our security that confronts us in Central America. As I said then, we are still willing to pursue vigorously a diplomatic effort to achieve a lasting peace. Approval of my request for additional assistance to the Nicaraguan democratic resistance does not mean that a military solution is inevitable. It is, however, essential that the Congress act now to approve this assistance if diplomacy is to have a chance. Accordingly, I am providing in this message a further explanation of how I will implement the authority I have requested.

If the Congress approves my request I will send my special envoy on an urgent mission to the capitals of the Contadora and Support Group nations. He will ask them to join with us in urging the Government of Nicaragua to initiate a national dialogue with representatives of all elements of the democratic opposition, designed to achieve the goals set out in the widely heralded proposal announced by six opposition Nicaraguan political parties on February 7, 1986. Their proposal, which has been endorsed by the Nicaraguan democratic resistance, calls for an immediate cease-fire, an effective general amnesty, abolition of the state of emergency, agreement on a new electoral process and general elections, effective fulfillment of international commitments for democratization, and observance of implementation by relevant international groups and bodies.

President Duarte's additional proposal for simultaneous dialogue with the Salvadoran guerrillas, a proposal endorsed by the democratic Presidents of Costa Rica, Honduras, and Guatemala, reinforces the importance of an internal dialogue in Nicaragua to address the objectives of the six-party proposal of February 7.

Should the conditions described in subparagraph (a) or (b) of paragraph (1) later be achieved, assistance to the Nicaraguan democratic resistance will again be limited to the categories, described above, available during the initial 90 days following approval of my request, for so long as the Government of Nicaragua acts in good faith to maintain those conditions.

In order to keep the Congress fully and currently informed of developments relating to diplomatic efforts to achieve a peaceful resolution of the conflict during the 90 days following approval of my request, I will appoint a special bipartisan commission to report on negotiations, whose reports will be made available to the Congress. This commission shall be composed of individuals, none of whom shall be a Member or employee of the Congress or an officer or employee of the United States, recommended by the Speaker and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives and the Majority and Minority Leaders of the Senate, with a fifth member of the commission to be recommended by the four other commissioners.

This approach represents a sincere effort to achieve peace through negotiations. In order to further this effort, I will make $2,000,000 of the funds I have requested for assistance to the Nicaraguan democratic resistance available to the Central American democracies (Costa Rica, El Salvador, Guatemala, and Honduras) to facilitate their participation in regional meetings and negotiations. In addition, I will encourage those countries and the Contadora and Support Group nations to make regular and public reports on the status of negotiations, the likelihood of achieving a comprehensive agreement, progress toward national reconciliation, and the obstacles thereto.

Moreover, the United States will assist all indigenous groups which are committed to work together for democratic national reconciliation in Nicaragua based on the six-party proposal. We will require only that they respect international standards of conduct, refraining from violations of human rights or other criminal acts, and they they work together toward this common goal.

In this regard, the democratic resistance has been broadening its representative base. The United Nicaraguan Opposition (UNO) now includes the largest of the Indian/Creole resistance groups (KISAN), and has forged cooperative relationships with other democratic resistance elements. The UNO has also engaged in constructive discussions with the Southern Opposition Bloc (BOS). And UNO has further strengthened unity by ensuring that all its military forces are responsive to its civilian leadership. We wholeheartedly support these developments and will encourage the democratic opposition to take further steps that will increase its unity and its appeal to the Nicaraguan people. Toward this end, I will reserve not less than $10,000,000 of the funds I have requested for assistance to resistance forces otherwise eligible and not currently included within UNO, one-half of which shall be for BOS and one-half shall be for the Indian resistance force Misurasata.

First, there has been inaccurate public speculation about what additional funds for assistance to the Nicaraguan democratic resistance might be available beyond the $100 million for fiscal years 1986 and 1987 that I have requested be transferred from amounts already appropriated to the Department of Defense. I want to state unequivocally that I will not augment this $100 million through the use of CIA or any other funds that have not been approved by the Congress for this purpose.

Second, when I proposed to the Congress a Central America Democracy, Peace, and Development Initiative to implement the recommendations of the National Bipartisan Commission on Central America, I included Nicaragua among the countries that could benefit from this initiative. The Congress accepted my recommendation in enacting a new chapter of the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961. The Congress also authorized in that Act, as the Bipartisan Commission recommended and I requested, the appropriation of the full $1,200,000,000 in nonmilitary assistance for Central America for fiscal years 1988 and 1989. However, the current authorization for fiscal year 1987 falls short of this goal. This, combined with appropriations shortfalls from previous years, is an obstacle to timely progress. I will ask the Secretary of State, the Administrator of the Agency for International Development, and the Director of the Office of Management and Budget to develop a plan to overcome the funding shortfalls that have occurred. In addition, I urge the Congress to provide the full amounts of economic assistance I have requested in my budget for fiscal year 1987 so that the necessary long-term commitment urged by the Bipartisan Commission will be fulfilled, and so that the promises of peace and freedom will be realized throughout Central America.

Upon the enactment of a joint resolution approving my request, I shall issue an Executive order to provide for the implementation of the undertakings I have expressed in this message and in my message of February 25. The Secretary of State, or his designee, will be responsible, under my direction, for policy guidance and coordination of United States Government activities under that Executive order.

In conclusion, I must stress that our diplomacy cannot succeed without the demonstrated resolve of the United States to protect its own interests and those of the brave men and women who are fighting for democracy in Central America. The time for decision is now. Your vote on my request will be a fateful one. I need and urge your support on this vital issue.

Today marked the close of the 38th round of the Mutual and Balanced Force Reductions [MBFR] negotiations in Vienna, where the United States and its NATO allies continued efforts to find common ground with the Warsaw Pact on the reduction of conventional forces in Central Europe. Unfortunately, the Soviet Union and its allies have not responded constructively to recent Western initiatives that had sought to make substantial progress in these negotiations.

Last December 5, NATO introduced a major new MBFR initiative designed to bring East and West closer together on a number of issues. Most significantly, while reaffirming the importance of effective verification, the NATO participants set aside their longstanding insistence that the sides come to an understanding on troop-level data in the area of reductions before an agreement is signed. This was a major concession to the East, which had often declared its readiness to move forward swiftly in the talks if only the so-called data barrier could be removed. Not only did the West decide to remove this barrier, it also adopted the East's own general approach -- to negotiate a first-phase, time-limited agreement in which initial U.S. and U.S.S.R. reductions would be followed by a no-increase commitment in the area of reductions by all participating states. On these and a number of other points, the U.S. and its allies made every effort to come to an early accord in Vienna.

At the beginning of the round, there was reason to be optimistic. General Secretary Gorbachev had noted that, following the December 5 West initiative, an outline for agreement in Vienna was emerging. At the same time, Mr. Gorbachev and many Soviet and East European spokesmen indicated that they shared with NATO an appreciation of the vital role of verification, including on-site inspection, in arms control. However, the Eastern participants have not reciprocated the West's move or given substance to the declarations of their leaders. Indeed, on February 20, the Warsaw Pact tabled a draft agreement which recycled old and unacceptable Eastern positions and which included an utterly inadequate verification regime.

NATO has made it clear to the Warsaw Pact that the East's actions during this negotiating round did not meet Western security requirements and that we await a response from the East as important as the step the West took in December. If the Soviet Union and its allies show the political will to match that of the West, then there is hope that the MBFR negotiations can result in an effective and fair agreement. The President has instructed the U.S. delegation to continue to work for such an outcome.

In signing the Food Security Act of 1985 into law, I indicated my administration's strong objections to several features contained in that legislation. One provision was the mandatory 3-year payment-in-kind export promotion program that requires the United States to give away $2 billion worth of commodities to encourage American exports. I stated that ``a program of this size and nature threatens to precipitate an agricultural commodity trade war with our allies; moreover, it may well be impossible to fulfill the $2 billion goal over the next 3 years without subsidizing exports in a manner which will be contrary to the national security interests of the United States.'' I am pleased to note that H.R. 1614 reduces this program from $2 billion over the next 3 years to $1 billion. This reduction will allow the United States to encourage export promotion without threatening our trade policy or our national security. I am also pleased to note that the Congress has revised language that had been adopted earlier relating to so-called advance recourse loans to make clear that this program is completely discretionary. The program is ill-advised and unnecessary, and my administration will not use its discretion to implement it.

Although this legislation does not correct all of the deficiencies contained in the Food Security Act of 1985, it nonetheless represents some improvement, and for that reason I have signed it into law.

For more than a century, American agriculture has led the world in the development and use of technological advances that raise our standard of living. In fact, the production of food and fiber is our largest and most basic industry.

Our farms, ranches, orchards, vineyards, and nurseries; the businesses that supply them; and those who transform and transport their raw commodities or sell the final products, provide us with the world's most abundant and varied supply of food and clothing. American agriculture also helps feed tens of millions of people in other countries. Moreover, the activities of the 23 million Americans employed in agriculture generate one-fifth of our gross national product and one-fifth of our Nation's jobs.

Maintaining such production -- nearly one-twelfth of the world's output of major agriculture commodities -- requires careful stewardship of natural resources and capital, flexibility in responding to the vagaries of weather and the vicissitudes of the international marketplace, unparalleled mastery of many skills, and the continuous support of research institutions.

Today's vote in the House of Representatives was a dark day for freedom. This vote must be reversed. The Soviet Union cannot be permitted to enjoy the luxury of knowing that, once captured, a country will be relegated forever to the Communist camp. We declare our unwavering support for freedom and for peace-loving people struggling to overcome Communist tyranny.

Those Democrats and Republicans who stood with the forces of freedom have the Nation's profound gratitude and my own. But you have more. You have my solemn determination to come back, again and again, until this battle is won, until freedom is given the chance it deserves in Nicaragua. Tomorrow, I will begin to press in the Senate, and then back again in the House, for the real and effective assistance for Nicaragua's freedom fighters, which was denied them today and which those brave men and women deserve. The American people have begun to awaken to the danger emerging on their doorstep. And one day, in the not too distant future, that awareness will come home to the House of Representatives. We are gaining ground; we are winning converts. The next battle will bring us the victory this just and good cause rightly deserves.

Finally, I have some special words today for the freedom fighters. The events of today and those that will take place over the next week are preparation for the day when democracy returns to Nicaragua. A chance to realize that, while democratic peoples are sometimes slow to wake to imminent danger, when they do awaken their commitment to freedom and their resolve for victory is unshakable. So, to the freedom fighters of Nicaragua I say: Have faith; have hope. The American people are just now awakening to the justice of your cause, just now realizing that your struggle is their struggle. Soon, with our support, your courage will ensure the triumph of your cause, our cause, and all of humanity's cause -- the cause of freedom.

Well, thank you, and welcome you to the White House. And I want to express my personal thanks and the gratitude of the American people for the hard work and dedication that you are all giving this freedom struggle. Perhaps never before on a foreign policy issue have we seen such a broad-based coalition. In the audience today, we have Christians and Jews, veterans and businessmen, ethnic and minority groups. You've all come together in a noble cause. Unfortunately for America, that cause, the cause of freedom and hope and democracy, suffered a temporary setback yesterday in the House of Representatives. I underline ``temporary.'' History will record yesterday's vote as wrong, tragically wrong. But let me assure these brave men here today  -- [contra leaders] Adolpho Calero, Alfonso Robelo, Arturo Cruz -- America will not desert you and your courageous struggle to expel Communist tyranny from the American mainland.

Well, the Senate will be voting on our age package -- or aid package -- [laughter] -- in a few days. That first word kind of sticks with me. [Laughter] And we intend to bring this back to the House as many times as it takes to win. And we will win. But time is of the essence. Every day that passes, the freedom fighters of Nicaragua are left to face Soviet helicopter gunships with hand-held rifles. How can we allow that to continue? If this vote is not quickly reversed, we will be sending a message to the world that the United States of America won't lift a finger for freedom, that we care less about defending democracy than the Soviet Union cares about destroying it. We'll be giving a green light to Soviet expansionism on the American mainland and inviting the worldwide terrorist network to set up shop on our own continent.

Well, Qadhafi has boasted of his intention to fight America, quote, ``at its doorstep.'' Well, the Nicaraguan Communists have threatened to carry their revolution into the United States itself. The Soviet Union is pouring billions of dollars into Latin America with one purpose: to subvert the democracies of Central America and ring the United States with a noose of hostile, Communist states. Soon, it will be too late for excuses.

The question now is: Will we reverse this tragic course before it is too late? Will we support freedom while the price is still not too high and the risks are still not too great? And the answer will be, and the answer must be, yes. There's simply no more important foreign policy question before the United States Congress today. We cannot give up. We will never give up. The Communists are pressing their offensive against the freedom fighters along the Honduran border. No doubt they'll be emboldened by yesterday's vote in the House and will try to seriously damage the freedom fighters before aid can arrive. And we can't let that happen. We can't let the final hope of freedom in Nicaragua be extinguished while Congress slowly makes up its mind to do the right thing.

Alfonso, Adolpho, and Arturo, would you kind of come up here and stand by my side? I want to tell you something: We're in this together. The future of Central America is not with communism; the future of Central America is with democracy and all those who are fighting for freedom. You are the future of Central America. Today I give you my solemn pledge: I will not rest until freedom is given a fighting chance in Nicaragua. We'll spare no effort and give no ground in supporting the democratic resistance in Nicaragua. Until these men are successful in their freedom struggle, there'll be no peace in Central America, and there will be no peace in our souls.

The people of Afghanistan celebrate March 21 as the beginning of their new year. In ordinary times, it is an occasion of joy, renewal, and hope for a better future. March 21, 1986, however, does not mark the passage of an ordinary year, nor does it bring cause to celebrate. For the heroic Afghan people it marks the beginning of yet another year in their struggle for national liberation against the ruthless Soviet military force that seeks to conquer them.

Over six years ago, on December 27, 1979, the Soviet army invaded Afghanistan, a small, friendly, nonaligned, and deeply religious neighbor. For six long years, the Soviets have sought to obliterate Afghan culture and remold that ancient nation into a replica of their own system, causing millions of Afghan refugees to flee the country. To achieve their goals, the Soviets installed the quisling regime of Babrak Karmal, in which Soviet advisors now man the key positions. They have transported thousands of young Afghans to the Soviet Union for reeducation in summer camps, universities, and specialized institutions, and they have set up a secret police apparatus matched in brutality only by their own KGB.

These tactics hardly begin to describe the continuing horror of the Soviet attempt to subjugate Afghanistan, a violation of international law repeatedly condemned by the United Nations. Despite calculated destruction of crops, irrigation systems, and livestock, indiscriminate air and artillery bombardments of civilian areas, brutal reprisals against noncombatants, and other unspeakable atrocities, the Afghan people remain determined to defend their liberty. The resistance has in fact become more effective than ever.

The Soviet failure to quell the Afghan people is not surprising. The Afghans have a long history of resisting invasion and of defending their homes, their faith, and their culture. Since December 1979, resistance fighters have acquitted themselves well in many engagements against larger and better armed Soviet forces. The Afghan freedom fighters have shown they can render all of their country unsafe for the invader. After six years of hard, bloody fighting, the Soviets are far from achieving their military goals.

Recently the Afghan resistance has taken major steps toward achieving unity and making its presence felt on the international scene, strengthening its ability to publicize the Afghan cause. We welcome these developments. With the support of the community of civilized nations, the Afghan resistance has also increased its efforts to aid civilians remaining inside Afghanistan. This will improve the Afghan people's ability to carry on the fight and counter the deliberate Soviet attempt to drive the civilian population away from resistance-controlled areas.

Throughout the period of their brutal occupation, the Soviets have tried -- but failed -- to divide the international supporters of the cause of Afghan freedom. They cannot be divided. The overwhelming votes in the United Nations General Assembly, year after year, are but one expression of the ongoing commitment of the world community to this cause. For our part we reaffirm our commitment to support this just struggle until the Soviets withdraw; until the people of Afghanistan regain their liberties, their independence, and the right to self-determination; and until the refugees can return in safety to their native land. Only such a settlement can command the support of the Afghan people; a settlement that does not command their support will not end this war.

Abundant, readily available, reliable supplies of energy at reasonable prices have fueled industrial growth in the United States since our country began. A continued supply of such energy is essential to the Nation's future security and to the well-being of our citizens. But the apparent abundance that we enjoy today should not tempt us to a dangerous complacency.

The nature of current energy supplies and the need to provide energy to meet the needs of an expanding economy require us to pursue an enlightened energy policy supported by an informed electorate. Energy education programs in our Nation's schools help to equip future generations of Americans to make wise choices that will shape our economic destiny for years to come.

National Energy Education Day helps bring into focus the energy needs of our Nation and our local communities. It prompts teachers, students, school officials, and private citizens to work together to alert the next generation of Americans to their opportunities and responsibilities. It is appropriate that all Americans, and particularly our educators, take steps to recognize the importance of maintaining and developing adequate sources of energy far into the future.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 21st day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Q. Thanks very much for seeing us. We appreciate that. We're going to ask several foreign policy questions, and domestic also. I thought we would, possibly, start with the Philippines and that whole area. Sir, several administration officials were quoted as saying that they were disgusted at what they found in Mr. Marcos' luggage when he came to Hawaii. Do you share their surprise about the scale of his overall corruption when he was leader of the Philippines?

The President. Well, I'll tell you, I'm not going to comment on that. I think here, now, we're talking about something that is -- there are legalities involved. And I think, rather than comment on that, our interest is in continuing our historic friendship with the Philippines. And I'm going to let the law and justice take its course, and we'll abide by the laws. But also, that will involve not just hearsay and gossip and so forth but a determination of what's actually happened. I'll wait for that.

Q. One more question on the Philippines, sir. You said that you wanted to give Mrs. Aquino time to form a new government and create a cabinet and get things rolling. Why have you waited so long and not personally called her?

The President. I don't think there's been any occasion to, and I don't think that we can say that she's through with the process or the business of getting her government underway and going. And we've maintained contact with her through our Ambassador and others. She's still organizing a government. No need to.

The President. No, because there we're going to Indonesia, and I'm going to meet with the ASEAN leaders. It's a meeting that was once scheduled and put off. There will be a representative of the Philippine Government as a part of that meeting.

Q. Sir, on U.S.-Soviet relations, Mr. Gorbachev pledged to you in Geneva last November that he wanted to have a summit, and now he's been seemingly sounding like he really is not interested in it. Do you feel personally deceived?

The President. I did, the other day, say to someone that we'll possibly, if it went beyond, then, the election and before the end of the year, I don't think that -- I'd prefer not to wait that long. That, then, makes it a long time since the previous summit. And I'm still hopeful that it will wind up June or July.

Q. I've got a little broader, sort of more philosophical question, Mr. President. You have a little bit more than 2 years left in your Presidency now, and I know you had wanted to leave a legacy of peace. Are you concerned, in some form, that the time is running out to reach a major breakthrough with the Soviet Union in the peace area?

The President. No, I don't think time is running out to that extent of it being a -- you might say a kind of do-or-die moment here. And I guess I'm not surprised that the negotiations haven't been faster than they've been, because if you look back at the pattern of such negotiations with the Soviets, there never has been any speed in those negotiations.

The President. No, that's right, because of one fundamental difference. The other discussions and the other agreements that have been made and proposed have all had to do with the rate of increase in weaponry. And I said back when I was campaigning that I'd stay at a table as long as it took to see if we couldn't get a reduction in the numbers of weapons. And this has never before been discussed with them. And the very fact that they have made proposals themselves calling for reductions is something new and, I think, something that gives us cause for optimism. Under those other agreements, the effect of some of them -- granted that they may have held down the rate of increase -- but take from the time of the agreement of SALT II, they've added about 6,000 warheads in that time. Maybe you can call it arms control in one way, but it certainly isn't arms reduction. And arms reduction is what we need.

Q. Mr. President, I wonder whether I might turn you temporarily toward domestic politics; this is an election year. First, may I ask about realignment, which has been a theme you've followed for a long time, partisan realignment. Do you think that Republican victory in the Senate this year is an essential to getting the kind of partisan realignment that you want? In other words, would Republican loss of the Senate set the cause back a great deal?

The President. Well, it would be a setback. Then there'd be another election for other Senators in 2 more years. I have to say that I would hate to see the loss of the Senate, because I don't believe that we could have achieved the things economically and in other fields that we have achieved if we did not have one House of the Legislature.

The President. Oh, that would be hard to speculate on. It would depend on who was gone and who was still here. We've had, if you've noticed, in the very beginning -- even though we have a majority control of the Senate, most of the major issues have found a bipartisan vote in there, with us losing some of our own Republicans to the other side, but with them, in turn, losing some to us. And that, I think, is a part of the democratic process. The main thing with having the majority, however, is that that gives you the majority and the chairmanship of the committees.

The President. Yes. I remember back in California I only had for one brief period -- a year or so -- a bare majority in both houses of the legislature. But to show you what that difference meant, in that single year, after we attained that bare majority, we passed 41 anticrime bills. All of them had been buried in a committee operated and controlled by the majority until that change where we became the majority; they weren't new bills at all. And strangely enough, those 41 bills that had been lying buried in those committees, once they were brought out in the open on the floor, there weren't very many people that dared to vote against them.

Q. Sir, could I change the subject to the issue of gun control? You, yourself, were seriously wounded, tragically, in that event as well as your Press Secretary, Jim Brady. In light of your own experience, in light of the opposition of various police groups as well as Mrs. Brady to this legislation that's now up on the Hill on gun control, why do you support virtually no limits on gun control at this point?

The President. Well, I don't think that it is a no-limit thing, but I'd like to point something out. Yes, I was shot here in the District of Columbia, where the gun control laws are probably as strict as they are anyplace in the United States, where everything about the possession of that gun and having it on his person was against the law. If you will check those States, such as New York, with all the great gun control laws that they have -- check the use of guns in crime in those States against States like some Western States like in Arizona, where there is very little of what we would think is control.

The President. The point that I think is made is that as long as there are guns, the individual that wants a gun for a crime is going to have one and going to get it. The only person who's going to be penalized and have difficulty is the law-abiding citizen, who then cannot have -- if he wants the protection of a weapon in his home -- for home protection. What I think is -- rather than gun control of this kind, when I was Governor we passed a law in California that I think is the most effective kind. It controlled -- or made more costly -- wrong people having guns, criminals in using them. We passed a law there that said that if an individual is convicted of a crime, such as burglary or anything, and had in his or her possession a gun at the time the crime was committed, whether that gun was used or not, add 5 to 15 years to the prison sentence if found guilty.

Now, if you remember back in England some years ago -- lately there's been some talk that now we see the English bobbies having guns and all. What has changed? Well, back in another day when they didn't carry guns in England, in the old times, the carrying of a gun in the commission of a crime, you were tried not for the crime that you'd committed; you were tried for murder. It was considered that you had shown the intent to use that weapon by carrying it in the commission of the crime. And therefore, a fellow that was only a burglar said, ``Wait a minute. I don't want to get threatened with hanging if I'm caught with a gun in my pocket.'' So the criminals didn't carry guns, and the police didn't have to carry guns.

Q. Mr. President, on another matter, on the shuttle. The shuttle disaster really shocked all of us. But the Soviet Union and some other countries have been moving forward with their space programs. The United States is essentially grounded right now. What do you plan to do to get us back into the space business?

The President. I don't think the period involved here is going to -- they were going ahead anyway. And what's wrong with the exploration of space by others? There's been a great cooperation, you know. We've had their people come and go up with ours so that they would have some experience in this field.

Q. Time to talk about the contras, I guess. You lost yesterday. You said you were going to keep fighting. My first question is: How do you intend to keep fighting beyond the Senate, and what are the prospects in the Senate? What are you going to do after it passes the Senate, if it does, in other words?

The President. Well, first of all, my loss was only the loss of a vote. The people who really lost were the people of Nicaragua, who I think have a sacred right to struggle for freedom. And, yes, I feel badly about this, and I think the outcome was a mistake. But I do know that they have admitted -- the House, itself -- in fact, the leadership told their own people that there would be another chance to vote on this after the Easter vacation when they came back, that there would be another vote. The Senate is dealing with it now. We've been discussing with the Senate leadership here what they're going to do. And this coming week, they're going to have their vote. Now the Senate votes this. When the House comes back, that Senate bill that has been voted will go to the House. And once again, we'll make an all-out effort to get this passed.

The President. Well, just by contact that I had with some individuals and knowing that they voted against this, but things that they'd said in our discussion leads me to believe that some of them will change.

Q. Well, let me ask you just one quick question on the old strategy. Some people speaking with the usual anonymity on your own staff, some people -- Republicans included in Congress speaking without anonymity -- said after the vote yesterday that the rhetoric had been too hot from the White House -- mentioned Mr. Buchanan in particular -- and criticized it and said that hurt. Do you agree with that?

Q. I think what some of these people whom I was quoting meant was that a lot of Members of Congress, a significant number of Members of Congress, given the closeness of the vote, felt that their patriotism had been impugned.

The President. And it hadn't. It hadn't. No one's motive was impugned at all. There were efforts to point out that the clear issue here was one of attempting to halt the establishment of a Communist-bloc base in the Americas, with all that that portended, and, on the other hand, to permit the going forward of such a Communist, expansionist move. In other words, this wasn't, as some tried to portray it, this wasn't the usual legislative battle of both having a same goal but differing on the way to reach it. Here were the two goals, and they were separate. And we were trying to call attention to this fact.

The President. I think the -- I'll have to tell you, if you talk about shrill rhetoric. I listened on C-SPAN [Cable Satellite Public Affairs Network] to a portion of the debate on the floor and some, not all -- I'm not impugning motives at all -- but some of the opponents of our program engaged in some of the most scurrilous, personal attacks against me, for example, the most dishonest use of distortions and outright falsehoods that I have heard in a legislative debate.

The President. No -- but results, two different results. To vote one way was to continue to fight against the creation or the continuation of this Communist government. To vote against that was, in effect, to simply say that there it was and we weren't going to do anything about it except sit back and keep asking them to change.

Q. Well, what's the motivation for that, as you see it? Why would somebody say it's all right to have a Communist government in Central America and we can't do anything about it anyway? Why would somebody do that?

The President. I think all of the specious arguments that were used against us -- that this was only a forerunner to my desire to put troops in there. You're looking at an individual that is the last one in the world that would ever want to put American troops into Latin America, because the memory of the Great Colossus of the North is so widespread in Latin America, we'd lose all our friends if we did anything of that kind. And we haven't been asked. What we've been asked for -- for people down there who want to try for democracy, who need the tools with which to do the job.

The President. Well, they feel so strongly, maybe they will when it comes up again -- they'll do the same thing. All right. But, again, the flat declaration that I was going to open a war involving the United States, their flat declaration that the things that I had said about the situation in Nicaragua were lies -- they weren't true.

Well, there is one thing about this job -- and even with all regard to the information available to a legislature -- the President does have access to all the information there is. Now, unfortunately, some of that information cannot be -- or the proof of it cannot be used because it would compromise sources; it would endanger other individuals; and it would render impossible further use of intelligence sources.

Q. Mr. President, another area. Iran has been having recently some successes on the battlefield in its war against Iraq. Are you concerned that Kuwait or Saudi Arabia might now be in jeopardy by Iran?

The President. Oh, I think we have to be concerned about that. You know that earlier on it's been fairly quiet for a time now. And because of actions taken by the Saudis and others to show that they were willing to defend themselves -- but, yes, the potential for throwing a match in the powder box is there in the Middle East, and I believe Saudi Arabia has been largely responsible for helping continued stability there in the gulf.

The President. Well, as you recall, earlier there were some attacks on some ships in their waters and so forth and there were forays into their airspace that made them then establish a patrol and to chase other planes out of their airspace.

Q. Mr. President, can I ask you a New York question? New York City, after considerable debate and controversy, has just approved a bill banning discrimination in housing and jobs for homosexuals. What is your position on that?

The President. Well, I know that this is a very touchy question, and I am one who believes in the rights of the individual -- individual freedom. But I do have to question sometimes whether individual rights are being defended in this particular field, freedom of the individual, or whether they are demanding an acceptance of their particular lifestyle that others of us don't demand. For example, should a teacher in a classroom be invoking their personal habits and advocating them to their students as a way of life?

Q. But this bill, I don't think really covers that. It basically guarantees to homosexuals equal treatment in hiring policies and gaining housing, these sorts of things. Essentially applies the same antidiscriminatory measures as are applied to blacks, as to women, to other people. Do you think that's all right?

Q. This is the last question, so I'll make it a double question. Tax increases -- you've got Senate Republicans coming out for a tax increase. Do you have problems with that? And we would like to give you a chance to respond to Jimmy Carter who said some not too favorable things about you in a recent interview with the New York Times. He said you distort things; you exaggerate.

The President. Well, the first thing about the tax thing, I've made it plain. I not only do not believe that a tax increase is needed, I believe it is counterproductive, and it could threaten our economic recovery. And therefore, I am going to oppose a tax increase. Now, we have some revenue increases in our own budget plan, but they are increases not in the amount of revenue we're going to get -- that stays revenue neutral. But they are increases in fees, for example, that will be paid in return for certain services that presently are being paid for by all the taxpayers. We think it is only fair to do this. We also have in there some sales of assets that we believe the Government would do well to get out of certain ownerships and businesses it's in. But the total revenue remains neutral because those increases are offset by loopholes and so forth -- things that we close.

The President. Well, maybe he's just been too much victimized by that tendency of the media for a time to accuse me of gaffes and that I am guilty of saying things that aren't true. Do you want to know something about that?

The President. Anyone, of course, if you're talking figures or something, you're apt to misspeak, say something. And I'm, I suppose, as guilty as anyone of that. But most of the things they've called gaffes -- a great majority of them -- I have been able to document that I am right and they are wrong.

And one day there was a press conference in which, after it -- I didn't know that you fellows all talked to each other so much -- but every story of the press conference came out with six, all the same and six in order, grievous errors that I had made. I can document -- but everybody told me I'd be sounding defensive if I made it public -- I can document that I was correct in five of the six; and in the sixth, it was kind of a tossup because I had made a reference to the marriage tax penalty and that in our tax program, I used the word ``eliminate.'' Well, ``eliminate'' -- yes, when the tax program was fully implemented -- was correct. But at that point, I should have said ``reduced'' because it was phased in -- what we had done, as so many elements of that tax program were.

Last Thursday the House of Representatives voted on a proposal to send aid to the freedom fighters of Nicaragua, the men and women struggling against the Communists who control their country. This proposal was designed to protect our own southern borders and give the freedom fighters the chance to reclaim their nation for liberty. It would've required no new money whatsoever, but would simply have used funds already approved by Congress for defense. By a margin of 12, the House voted no.

Every day that this vote is permitted to stand, every day that freedom fighters are left defenseless against Soviet helicopter gunships, more lives will be lost, and the dangers will grow from this Soviet beachhead on our continent. Already the Soviets have armed Nicaragua with tanks, antiaircraft missiles, and helicopter gunships. So-called advisers from the Soviet Union, East Germany, and Cuba swarm Nicaragua in the thousands and have helped the Nicaraguan Communists to build an army and militia of 120,000 -- by far the biggest armed force that Central America has ever seen.

But that is not all. The Sandinistas have openly admitted that they intend to spread their Communist revolution throughout Latin America. But the Nicaraguan freedom fighters have handed the Communists a setback. Although outnumbered and underequipped, the freedom fighters have pinned down thousands of Sandinista troops and countless military assets. With their blood and courage, they have bought the people of other Central American nations the precious time they need to strengthen their democracies. And, in helping to thwart the aggressive designs of the Nicaraguan Communists and their Soviet-bloc accomplices, they have directly contributed to the safety of the United States and the American people. We owe the freedom fighters a vote of thanks, not a vote of no confidence. I cannot accept the House action as final, for I cannot believe that it reflects the informed and considered will of the American people.

Next week the effort to provide aid to the freedom fighters will move to the Senate. Our proposal, as it now stands, including its provision to give the freedom fighters defensive weapons immediately, represents the absolute minimum of assistance to which I can agree. Any less would be too little, any further delay would be too late. We speak not of a game in which one side can call ``time out'' to consider its options; we speak of a life and death struggle for liberty. The Soviet gunships will not halt their operations while we debate. The House vote must be reversed, and soon. I urge the Senate to vote on the aid program promptly and the House to take the matter up once again as its next item of business.

Some of our critics insist that even the minimal assistance we're requesting is too much, and negotiations alone are the answer. Well, I must remind them that the Sandinista Communists have already concluded negotiations -- in 1979 with the Organization of American States. In that agreement, the Communists promised to conduct a peaceful, nonaligned foreign policy and to hold free elections. They have done neither.

I must remind our critics that our administration has pursued active diplomacy, holding 10 high-level meetings with the Sandinista regime. Always, the Communists have refused serious negotiations. I must further remind our critics that promising diplomatic proposals were on the table when Thursday's damaging House vote took place. President Duarte of El Salvador and his Central American colleagues had proposed that a dialog take place simultaneously between the freedom fighters and the Nicaraguan Communists, between the Salvadoran Government and its Communist opponents, and between the Nicaraguan Communists and the United States. We support this initiative, but the Nicaraguan Communists have refused to take part.

So, I would say to our critics: Join me in providing all the resources necessary -- and that means military aid to the freedom fighters -- to bring the Nicaraguan Communists to the table and to make them honor the international promise they have already made to the Organization of American States. The Communists, themselves, have shown again and again that diplomacy alone is not enough. As your President, I cannot leave my successor, I cannot leave our children, to face grave dangers and agonizing decisions that with a minimum of foresight and courage could've been averted. The freedom fighters have done much; they ask little. Let us act to help them together, Democrats and Republicans, and let us act now. Then we can get on with the business of lending a hand to our neighbors as they attack poverty and create economic opportunity for their people.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Lynne Vincent Cheney to be Chairperson of the National Endowment for the Humanities, National Foundation on the Arts and the Humanities, for a term of 4 years. She would succeed William J. Bennett.

U.S. naval aircraft and ships carrying out a peaceful freedom of navigation and overflight exercise in international waters and airspace in the Gulf of Sidra were fired on Monday by missile forces of Libya. This morning at 7:52 a.m. e.s.t. Libyan forces without provocation fired two long-range SA - 5 surface-to-air missiles from Sirte on the northern coast of Libya at U.S. aircraft operating in international waters in the Gulf of Sidra. U.S. forces had been operating in that area since Sunday afternoon. Two additional SA - 5's and an SA - 2 were launched from Sirte at 12:45 p.m. An additional SA - 5 was fired at 1:14 p.m. At this point Libyan forces had fired a total of six surface-to-air missiles at U.S. forces.

At approximately 2 p.m., a U.S. aircraft fired two Harpoon antiship missiles at a Libyan missile patrol boat which was located near the 32o30'N line and was a threat to U.S. naval forces. The Libyan fast-attack craft was hit. The ship is dead in the water, burning, and appears to be sinking. There are no apparent survivors. At approximately 3 p.m., U.S. forces operating south of the 32o30'N line responded to the missile attacks by launching two HARM's (high-speed antiradiation missiles) at the SA - 5 site at Sirte. At that time the SA - 5 complex was attempting to engage our aircraft. We are assessing the damage now. We have no reports of any U.S. casualties and no loss of U.S. aircraft or ships.

This attack was entirely unprovoked and beyond the bounds of normal international conduct. U.S. forces were intent only upon making the legal point that, beyond the internationally recognized 12-mile limit, the Gulf of Sidra belongs to no one and that all nations are free to move through international waters and airspace. We deny Libya's claim, as do almost all other nations, and we condemn Libya's actions. They point out again for all to see the aggressive and unlawful nature of Colonel Qadhafi's regime.

It should be noted that because of these numerous Libyan missile launches and indications that they intended to continue air and missile attacks on U.S. forces, we now consider all approaching Libyan forces to have hostile intent. We have taken appropriate measures to defend ourselves in this instance. We did not, of course, proceed into this area with our eyes closed. We reserve the right to take additional measures as events warrant.

The President of Honduras [Jose Simon Azcona Hoyo] has requested that the United States provide urgent military assistance. We're considering this request. It would include trooplift capacity as well as other types of material and services that would be furnished. The President is considering this request. If the President does make an affirmative decision, which we would anticipate that he would do later today, he would exercise his authority under section 506A of the Foreign Assistance Act that would provide Honduras with $20 million in emergency assistance. This is under consideration, and we would expect the President to make the proper notification for Congress if he decides to in favor of this.

There is no War Powers consideration in this area. Whatever trooplift that would be considered would probably be well outside of the zone which the fighting is taking place in southern Honduras. There is no plan to keep Congress into session for any reason. This is a notification and does not require approval.

So, the totals are three patrol boats sunk, one damaged. Three of these four that we were involved with were outside of the 32 - 30 line, north of the line. Well, two were north of it, one on it, and one south of it near Benghazi. So, they're operating considerably north of 32 - 30 approaching the fleet. There were no U.S. casualties and no damage to aircraft or ships on the U.S. side.

This treaty is among the first six treaties to be transmitted to the Senate under the Bilateral Investment Treaty (BIT) program that I initiated in 1981. The BIT program is designed to encourage and protect U.S. investment in developing countries. The treaty is an integral part of U.S. efforts to encourage Haiti and other governments to adopt macroeconomic and structural policies that will promote economic growth. It is also fully consistent with U.S. policy toward international investment. That policy holds that an open international investment system in which participants respond to market forces provides the best and most efficient mechanism to promote global economic development. A specific tenet, reflected in this treaty, is that U.S. direct investment abroad and foreign investment in the United States should receive fair, equitable, and nondiscriminatory treatment. Under this treaty, the parties also agree to international law standards for expropriation and compensation; free financial transfers; and procedures, including international arbitration, for the settlement of investment disputes.

Well, last night, in response to the armed attack into sovereign Honduran territory, President Azcona formally requested urgent U.S. military assistance to include assisting and lifting Honduran troops as necessary and other material assistance in order to repel this and future Sandinista attacks. In response to this request, President Reagan has notified pertinent Members of Congress that he intends to exercise his authority under section 506A of the Foreign Assistance Act in order to provide Honduras with up to $20 million in emergency assistance.

The use of the President's authority responds to the unforeseen emergency which exists in Honduras and will be provided from DoD [Department of Defense] sources since these emergency requirements cannot be promptly met through other means. At 11:30 this morning, the President, having notified Congress in accordance with the law, signed and transmitted to the Secretary of State a Presidential determination authorizing release of the emergency assistance.

In the Mediterranean, the U.S. naval forces are continuing their exercises in the Mediterranean Sea as scheduled. No additional incidents with Libyan forces have been reported. Sixth Fleet surface vessels and aircraft continue to operate in the Gulf of Sidra in the same general area they have been for the past 2 days. The fleet remains clear of Libyan territorial waters.

The U.S. military forces in the region are conducting an airlift and trooplift operations of Honduran forces this morning. Helicopters are flying now. There are reports of Sandinista troop reinforcement on the Nicaraguan side of the border with Honduras, and there is a question as to what their intent is. It is hoped that the Honduran troop deployments in the south will deter the Sandinista troops from moving into Honduran territory once again.

One of the goals that Honduras has is to head off any further Sandinista troop incursions into Honduras. The Sandinista incursion resulted in significant casualties in the first day of fighting. In short, the situation has not stabilized. It is premature to draw any conclusion that the military situation in the region is over. We have reports this morning that there is a sizable contingent of Nicaraguan forces that remain inside Honduras. We had reports earlier that they had targeted a number of installations inside the Honduran border. Their intentions are not clear. There has been a considerable firefight there over the last 24 to 36 hours and the situation continues much as it was yesterday.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Sonia Landau to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Corporation for Public Broadcasting for a term expiring March 26, 1991. This is a reappointment.

The failure of Congress to respond to the manifest desire of the American people for a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution leaves the matter in the hands of the States. It remains the President's hope that Congress will act responsibly to pass a balanced budget amendment, avoiding the need for a constitutional convention. If Congress does not act soon, the States will have no choice.

The President urges Congress to set aside its free-spending habits and to promptly act to propose a balanced budget amendment before the supporters of such an amendment have no other course than to pursue petitioning the remaining State legislatures.

We have information to confirm that, in addition to 1,500 Sandinista troops that attacked the central part of the Honduran salient, additional Sandinista forces have occupied the vicinity of San Andres de Bocay, further to the east. We have also received further confirmation that Soviet-made MI - 8 helicopters have been providing fire support for Sandinista operations in Honduras.

Reports from the field indicate that some Sandinista units, which attacked in Honduras over the weekend, appear to be attempting to disengage and withdraw back into Nicaragua. There are, currently, reports of units that are breaking down into smaller units, throwing down their arms, and trying to ``exfiltrate'' back into Nicaragua. Contrary to statements made by Nicaraguan emissaries in several locations, it now appears that as many as 300 Sandinista troops are blocked in Honduras and unable to extricate themselves from the engagement.

We have information that a number of prisoners have been taken, and they have confirmed earlier information regarding the attempt to make a quick strike into Honduras and withdraw before there could be any reaction. Two prisoners in the custody of the Honduran Armed Forces have identified their units as the Francesca Estrada Special Counterinsurgency Battalion and the German Pomanes Special Counterinsurgency Battalion. There continues to be significant movement of Sandinista units closer to the border, and artillery and BM - 21 multiple rocket launchers continue to fire into Honduras in support of the Sandinista units.

Honduran Government and U.S. Army helicopters have begun movement of Honduran military units to the border region. This support activity on the part of the United States is being conducted under the present authorities under section 506A of the Foreign Assistance Act. Our helicopters are not in any way being exposed to the imminent conflict. We are transferring Honduran troops from central Honduras to the region of the Las Vegas salient in south-central Honduras. Throughout the day there will be approximately 50 - 60 sorties of U.S. Chinook and Huey helicopters, which carry Honduran troops and their associated equipment.

Our energy climate has undergone a remarkable transformation in just five years. Crude oil prices have declined, with savings passed on to consumers. The United States is using energy more productively, and our energy supply is more diversified than ever. Total U.S. energy production is at an unprecedented level, and we are far less vulnerable to disruption of our energy supplies.

Our renewed energy health is a testament to the ingenuity of the American people and the strength of American businesses, large and small. We have rightly placed our trust in our people and the belief that we were not running out of energy, only imagination. We have reduced regulation, wherever and whenever possible. We have placed our confidence in the marketplace, rather than government, to make key economic decisions about energy.

The result is a foundation of energy stability and energy security. We stand at the beginning of a new era of energy strength in which the United States has the resources and capabilities to sustain vigorous economic growth, as well as our important role in the free world.

With this new opportunity, of course, come new challenges. Unless these challenges are met, we may not achieve the energy exploration, technological advance, and conservation improvements this Nation needs. We have more work to do in cutting regulatory barriers, especially natural gas controls, diversifying our resources, and increasing alternate energy sources, which should further reduce our dependence on insecure energy imports. I am submitting the Fifth National Energy Policy Plan, which addresses the job ahead.

We are fortunate we can look forward to the coming era with confidence that we have learned from the lessons of the past and that with new tools and justified belief in the American people, our technology, and free markets, we will meet the energy challenges and opportunities ahead.

I will miss your wise counsel and good judgement. Your service as the President's lawyer has exemplified the highest traditions both of the legal profession and of American public service. As your ``only client,'' I appreciate as no one else can the enormity and variety of your contribution to the historic accomplishments we have been able to achieve for the American people.

We live in an era in which law pervades virtually every aspect of public policy, and public scrutiny of government is more intense than at any time in our Nation's history. Countless problems of every size and scope and substantive dimension were entrusted to you -- and handled properly and effectively. Your foresight and timely guidance prevented countless other challenges from ever becoming problems at all.

At times of crisis, yours was a voice of calm and reason. Your intellect, skill, and tact mixed with warm personal qualities of compassion and good humor enabled you to discharge your duties with uncompromising integrity and a deep and unviolated respect for the innumerable confidences with which you were entrusted.

Under your guidance, the lawyers on your staff became a reflection of the man they served, establishing a standard and reputation for excellence and professionalism throughout the government. In many ways, your term of service has not only brought distinction to the office you held, but has actually helped define it and provide a model for any who would take on its manifold responsibilities in the future.

As you return to the private practice of law, you can look back with well earned pride and satisfaction on the service you have rendered, not simply to me, and to our Nation, but to the very institution of the Presidency.

I know that I will be able to seek your counsel and call upon you in the future. But for now, you leave the White House with the abiding affection and respect of Nancy and me, and with our very best wishes for you, Maria, and your children Adam and Alexandra.

On March 23, United States forces in the Eastern Mediterranean began a peaceful exercise as part of a global Freedom of Navigation program by which the United States preserves its rights to use international waters and air space. This exercise is being conducted entirely in and over areas of the high seas, in accordance with international law and following aviation safety notification procedures.

On March 24, our forces were attacked by Libya. In response, U.S. forces took limited measures of self-defense necessary to protect themselves from continued attack. In accordance with my desire that the Congress be informed on this matter, I am providing this report on the actions taken by United States Armed Forces during this incident.

U.S. forces will continue with their current exercises. We will not be deterred by Libyan attacks or threats from exercising our rights on and over the high seas under international law. If Libyan attacks do not cease, we will continue to take the measures necessary in the exercise of our right of self-defense to protect our forces.

The deployment of these United States Armed Forces and the measures taken by them in self-defense during this incident were undertaken pursuant to my authority under the Constitution, including my authority as Commander-in-Chief of U.S. Armed Forces.

During the past 5 days, the 6th Fleet has once again served as the spear and shield of American policy in a troubled and volatile region. The fundamental principle of freedom of the seas -- so important to the economy and security of the free world -- has been upheld in the face of a reckless and illegal Libyan attack. Your quick response and the bravery and professionalism displayed throughout this operation were an inspiration for all of us. I am particularly pleased that you did not suffer any losses. You have sent a message to the whole world that the United States has the will and, through you, the ability to defend the free world's interests. Your determination and tireless response to Libyan threats make this world a safer place.

I am extremely proud to be the Commander in Chief of such professionals. Your courage, sacrifice, and dedication on the frontlines of freedom are recognized and appreciated by all your countrymen. On behalf of all Americans, I say: Well done. Thank you, and we're proud of you. Good luck and Godspeed.

I met with Michael Novak, a distinguished scholar and writer, who will head the United States delegation to the Experts' Meeting next month of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe (CSCE) in Bern, Switzerland. That meeting, part of the Helsinki process of lowering the barriers dividing East from West, will discuss expanding contacts across borders. Mr. Novak reported to me on his recent consultations with our NATO allies, the Swiss hosts, and the Soviet Union. In Moscow he also met with a number of individuals divided from their spouses.

Since 1 out of every 10 Americans has roots in Eastern Europe and the Soviet Union, the issues to be discussed at Bern -- family reunification, family contacts, binational marriages, travel for personal and professional reasons, and emigration -- are not abstract political questions. They are subjects touching the heart of our society: the family. Progress between the CSCE countries in this area would do much to carry forward my discussion last November with General Secretary Gorbachev in which we agreed on the importance of resolving humanitarian cases in a spirit of cooperation.

Today, in the Soviet Union and other East European States, there are too many individuals and families who are separated from relatives in the West or prevented from traveling abroad. The Berlin Wall is a physical embodiment of the cruel and unnecessary policies that separate peoples from one another. At Bern we have a chance to pursue the process of bringing down the barriers to human contacts that separate East from West.

I have instructed Mr. Novak to speak forthrightly at Bern about the continuing problems in the field of human contacts and the need for the Soviet Union and Eastern Europe to work harder to resolve them. We would like to see practical results that will bring benefits to the citizens of East and West.

The President. All that I can understand is that we knew there were two battalions. Now, you're talking of rough numbers of a battalion. Maybe those battalions were under strength or over strength, which we don't know on that as to the exact numbers. But there were two battalions which could number around 1,500.

The President. I thank you all very much. The warmth of your welcome makes me think that maybe you believe that I'm a member of the LSU Tigers. [Laughter] And thank you, Henson, for those very warm words and very kind words.

But between now and election day, I hope you'll do your utmost to make sure that the people of this State give Henson Moore the job that he's looking for. He's effective. He's hard-working. And he'll be a Senator that you can be proud of. Believe me, I know how effective he is. Just recently he led the way to a settlement between the House and Senate on the issue of offshore oil revenue. He was in the Oval Office presenting Louisiana's case, and let's just say Henson knows how to get your attention. At that meeting I told Henson that the resolution of the ``8 - 6'' issue, contained in the reconciliation bill, which deals with the division of offshore oil revenue between the State and Federal Governments, had my support. Since then, Henson Moore has been -- the rest of the reconciliation bill remained acceptable. I expect to sign it into law when it reaches my desk. And I believe that this will mean over $600 million for Louisiana yet this year.

The citizens of our country have been enjoying one of the longest and strongest peacetime economic expansions in our history. The glitch in last month's unemployment figures notwithstanding, more jobs have been created since the recovery began than in all other industrialized nations combined -- almost 10 million. At the same time, inflation, which was public enemy number one when I spoke on that riverboat back in 1980, is now lower than we've seen in two decades. And with interest rates continuing to edge down -- and they came down further yesterday -- and the stock market reaching an all-time high -- and if it continues what it's done in the first half of today, it will be another all-time high by the end of the day, although with Wall Street you never know. They can make a turn before the day's over, but it's pretty solidly growing up there.

I'm aware of the economic troubles that persist here in Louisiana. Your difficulties make it absolutely essential that you have a Senator who can command the respect of the public and of other elected officials, an individual who can lead Louisiana into the sunshine of growth and prosperity so apparent throughout so much of our country. Sending Henson Moore to the United States Senate will be your way of declaring for all to hear that Louisiana is getting down to business. The decision the people of Louisiana will make September 27th is important to this State and our country. The big taxers and spenders are waiting in the wings. Mark my words, if they regain control of the Senate, they're going to force upon us the same economic failures and hardships that brought America to the edge of a national economic calamity only 6 years ago.

The President. We can't leave the bad old days behind if the advocates of the failed policies of the past are put in charge of the United States Senate. We all know, for example, that there are those who believe the answer to high deficit spending is to increase your taxes -- and then increase them again. Well, that's their answer to just about every problem -- rob Peter to pay Paul. They don't realize Peter went bankrupt a long time ago. [Laughter] There's an old saying that in raising taxes, as in shearing sheep, it is best to stop when one gets to the skin. The big taxers on Capitol Hill don't know when to stop, and we can't afford to let them regain control of the Senate.

If we raise taxes, we risk knocking the legs out from under the national economic growth. And that would leave us even bigger deficits. So, what's the answer? Well, first and foremost, we must encourage growth and investment. Improving economic conditions are already making it easier to meet deficit reduction targets. The experts are beginning to take note of this. But these good tidings do not exempt Members of Congress from their own duty to overcome their addiction to deficit spending, which with only one or two single-year exceptions has gone on for 50 years now. Even with an expanding economy, we're still talking about one of the preeminent challenges of our day. And here again, I am more confident than ever that we can meet this challenge, not by clobbering our people with higher taxes and less take-home pay, but through a combination of realistic budget reductions and economic growth.

To solve this and other problems, America needs the talent and hard work of confident, people-oriented leaders like Henson Moore, elected officials who would rather ask the Federal Government to tighten its belt than to ask American families to tighten theirs, leaders who understand that the right answer to helping the less fortunate is not handouts and welfare, but jobs and opportunity. What we're doing is recapturing that same spirit of enterprise and ingenuity that turned a vast American wilderness into a dynamo of freedom and prosperity.

We must remember, however, that unless our country is secure, none of the other hotly debated issues have relevance. President Andrew Jackson, who early in our country's history fought and won a great victory in this city, once said, ``The first duty of a soldier or good citizen is to attend to the safety and interest of his country. . . .'' Old Hickory's words ring true this day. All Americans must remember that, as a free people, the future is in our hands. And if we don't see to do our duty, our beloved country can remain neither free nor secure, as Henson just told you. During the last decade, our government, paralyzed by uncertainty, permitted our defenses to erode and ignored a growing totalitarian threat. But the failures of the last decade should have taught us something. Crossing our fingers and hoping for the best is not the way to ensure a more peaceful world.

Militaristic states perceive unilateral concessions as a sign of weakness, not good faith. Serious negotiations flow not from proving sincerity but from resolve and leverage. In short, peace through strength is a fact of life, and it's about time for America to leave uncertainty and indecision behind. It's time to grow up and face reality. Since coming to Washington, time and again we have struggled on Capitol Hill just to prevent our negotiators from being stripped of their leverage prior to getting to the negotiating table. Time and time again we won, with only a tiny margin, votes essential to our security. For example, there are those who, while loudly proclaiming a belief in arms control agreements with the Soviet Union, at the same time have voted against systems that persuade the Soviets to negotiate. The Strategic Defense Initiative was opposed by many who claimed the Soviets would cancel arms talks if we proceeded with that defensive system. Well, the opposite, of course, was true. I have little doubt if it were not for the installation of the Pershing and cruise missiles in Europe and our commitment to developing an antimissile defense shield that the Soviets would not now be negotiating with us.

In Central America we won military support for the besieged democracy of El Salvador by only a few votes. Had we lost, the tragedy that would have followed would have been a disaster for the people of that country and would have set off a chain of events beyond our control. Many of those who opposed that military aid suggested that Communist victory in El Salvador was inevitable, that our military support was only prolonging the agony. And, again, the opposite was true. Today the Communists are on the run in El Salvador, and even critics believe President Duarte can make democracy in his troubled country. And they have had two fine, fair elections there as a democracy. One of the important factors that has given the people of El Salvador a chance has been the courage of the Nicaraguan democratic resistance. These brave men and women have bogged down the Communist drive in Central America.

One week ago the House of Representatives voted against assisting these Nicaraguan freedom fighters, and again we see reality turned on its head. At the same time that our opponents claim to support negotiations, they move to eliminate any incentive for the Communists to negotiate. They are not going to come to the table because they have had a change of heart. They are going to come because the heat is on and they get tired of the heat that the contras can impose upon them. Does anyone really believe that the ruling clique that runs Nicaragua will enter into a serious dialog simply to prove they're good guys? One opponent of aid to the freedom fighters was quoted after the vote as saying, ``I hope the Sandinistas take it as a sign of peace and friendship.'' Well, the Nicaraguan Communists took the House vote as a sign all right; they invaded the territory of Honduras with about 1,500 heavily armed troops, and then they lied about it. This military drive demonstrates the nature of the Nicaragua regime. The Communists in Nicaragua are not seeking dialog and persuasion or pluralism. They want total power in their hands, and they have no respect for the borders of their neighbors. This Sandinista offensive is a slap in the face to everyone who voted against aid to the freedom fighters thinking it to be a vote for reconciliation.

We live in a dangerous world. If peace is to be maintained and if our country is to be secure, we must have the courage to face facts and act. The lives of the Nicaraguan freedom fighters, the fate of Central America, is to a large degree in the hands of the United States Congress. Louisiana's House delegation, demonstrating a bipartisan commitment to our national security, voted 6 to 2 for the freedom fighters that last time around. Louisiana can be proud of that. But last Thursday's House vote will not be the final word on this issue. I hope the Senate will vote today and send the measure back to the House for another vote as quickly as possible, because that's what the Senate is debating as we sit here today.

As you know, this past week the United States -- this is another subject, same philosophy -- the United States 6th Fleet exercised its right of international passage in the Mediterranean. You're well aware they did it by operating with ships and aircraft, some of them in the Gulf of Sidra. They came under attack by the forces of the Libyan Government, such as it is -- [laughter] -- and they performed superbly. And now I can tell you, as of today, the exercise is complete. And this morning, I telephoned the Commander of the 6th Fleet and told him, on behalf of all of you, of the American people, congratulations one and all for a job well done.

I think we can all be proud that we have such fine and outstanding servicemen protecting and defending our country. Wherever they are in the world, Korea and other places and there in that Navy, I have to tell you nothing in this job I have has made me more proud than the young Americans in uniform today. They aren't draftees. They volunteered. They're all there by choice. And would you be pleased to know that the highest percentage of high school graduates ever in the history of our military is in our military today? And there are three intelligence brackets upon which various assignments are based. The highest percentage ever in our history is in the top bracket of intelligence, in those servicemen and women that we have.

But let me make some broader points. First, freedom of navigation is a vital interest to all free nations, the lifeblood of our prosperity and our security. In many parts of the world we regularly make clear that we do not recognize territorial claims contrary to international law. Some of those who often ``Blame America First'' have suggested that the presence of our fleet was a deliberate act of provocation. The truth is, this was the seventh time our fleet has operated and had those exercises crossing the border sometimes into the Gulf of Sidra. Out of our 45 ships in the maneuvers, only three were on the other side of that so-called Line of Death. It was Qadhafi's establishment of an illegitimate line in the Gulf of Sidra that violated international law, just as Qadhafi has routinely violated the peace of his region, the borders of his neighbors, and the safety of innocent citizens around the world.

Therefore, the United States will continue to defend the basic principles of law, free navigation, and international security. And I've had one rule from the very first day in office: We will never send our young service people anyplace in the world where there is danger without them understanding that if somebody shoots at them, they can shoot back. In addition, the United States will not be intimidated by new threats of terrorism against us. We're aware of intensive Libyan preparations that were already underway for terrorist operations against Americans. Mr. Qadhafi must know that we will hold him fully accountable for any such actions.

America and our allies in the cause of freedom have never been perfect, but we have nothing to apologize for. In these last 6 years we've witnessed one of the greatest expansions of democracy in the history of our hemisphere. If we have the integrity to do what is right, freedom will not only survive, it will triumph. And to do that, we need leaders like Henson Moore. So, I ask you to do what you can to see to it that America is given the benefit of his leadership in the United States Senate.

I am deeply pleased by today's vote in the Senate, and I want to express my thanks to those who voted for aid to the freedom fighters. The Senate's action is sure to send a profoundly reassuring signal to those fighting for freedom in Nicaragua and to Nicaragua's threatened neighbors. It helps to demonstrate that it is indeed possible to forge democracy and stability in our hemisphere.

Now the issue returns to the House, where I hope we can garner the few additional votes necessary to achieve a positive outcome. I urge those Members of the House who were not with us last week to cast a positive vote for freedom and for the national security interests of the United States.

The President has expressed deep concern that Congressmen Aspin and Brown have decided to oppose the continuation of the only antisatellite (ASAT) program the United States now has nearing deployment that can offset the Soviet monopoly on ASAT capability that has existed for several years.

While the President is also concerned about program costs and technical problems, he has determined that the U.S. ASAT program should go forward as a key, effective element of our deterrence. Many of the problems in the program, as Congress knows, are due to Congress' own prohibition against testing and other congressional program adjustments. A prompt lifting of the congressional prohibition on testing would enable us to bring our ASAT program to operational readiness at the least possible cost.

Unilateral actions such as this undermine the position of our negotiators in Geneva and make it substantially more difficult, if not impossible, to reach verifiable and equitable agreements with the Soviets. The protection of our satellites throughout the world depends on a clear understanding by our adversaries that they cannot destroy our space systems with impunity in times of crisis.

These U.S. systems that are threatened are the systems that protect the lives of our men and women deployed throughout the world. Should deterrence fail, our ASAT program would be critical to deny any adversary the use of space-based systems used to target our land and sea forces. The President will be working closely with the Congress in the days ahead to assure that systems that protect our vital interests such as the U.S. ASAT programs are not canceled.

As most of you know, this week is one of the holiest and most solemn in the Christian calendar and will be followed soon by one of the holiest Jewish holidays. How sad it is, then, that this season has been marred by crisis and violence.

United States ships and aircraft operating in international waters in the Mediterranean were fired on by the forces of the north African nation, Libya. This was a direct military confrontation provoked by Libya's dictator, Colonel Qadhafi, who usually prefers to arm, train, and direct terrorists who gun down helpless civilians -- for example, those terrorists who killed 19 civilians last December at the Rome and Vienna airports. The Libyan Government called the attacks -- which left five Americans dead, including an 11-year-old girl -- heroic acts. But last week Colonel Qadhafi tried his luck with some people who could actually defend themselves -- United States Armed Forces, our 6th Fleet. I think it's enough to say the fleet suppressed the attacks with no loss of life.

But as if violence in the Mediterranean wasn't enough, we also had word from Central America that forces of the Communist government of Nicaragua, the Sandinistas, invaded the nearby nation of Honduras in an attempt to destroy Nicaraguan freedom fighters, who have taken up refuge there. Once again, the news for the forces of freedom was good. The freedom fighters gave the invading Communists a resounding defeat. Still, it's sad to have to begin this report with such accounts.

Eastertide for Christians and Passover for Jews are meant to be times of spiritual awareness and a deepening encounter with the Lord and with the Lord's injunction that all nations and peoples of the Earth live in peace and harmony with each other. So, perhaps a word or two is in order on the source of the violence that we've see this week. You see, dictators like those in Libya or in Nicaragua know how unpopular they are with their people. They know how shaky their rule is. They can never really feel secure. And that's why they're afraid of free elections. It's also why they need a secret police and so much armed might to intimidate those they fear most, their own people, to prevent them from even entertaining the hope that democracy will some day come to their own country. And that's why so many dictators have a special fear and hatred for the United States. American power, as long as it is used wisely and justly, is an undying symbol of hope for oppressed peoples around the world.

Recently, in nations like El Salvador, Grenada, the Philippines, and Haiti, we've seen how quickly that hope can blossom into democratic movements. We have a right to be proud that in all those instances the United States was able to help. So, let us be thankful this week that America has been permitted to further the cause of peace and freedom. And in particular let us give thanks for one of our most cherished freedoms: freedom of choice and religious belief, the freedom to worship, each in our own way. You know, a few years ago, when I spoke to some evangelical ministers, I noted that there was sin and evil in the world and that all of us had a spiritual obligation to fight it.

This was interpreted by a few to mean opposition to totalitarian and Communist dictators. Well, of course, that's true. But the real context of that quote is rarely given. I was talking specifically then about America's own spiritual problems. I reminded those ministers that America, too, like any other people or nation, had what I called ``a legacy of evil'' to contend with, things like racism or anti-Semitism or other forms of intolerance. And I urged those ministers to help fight the battle against hate groups in their communities, who promote intolerance. And it really struck a note with them. Well, that's what America is all about: freedom, tolerance, each different religious and racial group looking out for the rights of the other. And I think this is a good theme for all of us to reflect upon as we worship and give thanks to the Lord. Let us pray that America will always use her power wisely, justly, and humbly to defend our legitimate interests, to help those who are struggling for freedom. But let us pray, too, that God will give our country the humility to see our own faults and the strength to preserve our hard-won tradition of freedom to worship and religious tolerance.

As Lincoln said more than a century ago -- in the midst of the struggle to eradicate another great evil, slavery -- he was not so much concerned that God was on our side as he was that he was on God's side. In this season of Easter, in this coming season of Passover, and in every season, may this always be America's prayer.

The President has taken note of General Secretary Gorbachev's speech on Soviet television today. The United States has repeatedly made it clear that the practical step now needed in the area of nuclear testing limitations is to enhance mutual confidence in the ability of the two sides to verify existing agreements, in particular the unratified Threshold Test Ban Treaty and the Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty. The President has made a series of concrete proposals to the Soviet Union in this regard, most recently on March 14. In this initiative the President invited Mr. Gorbachev to send Soviet experts to the United States to examine our new CORRTEX verification system and to observe a U.S. nuclear test in mid-April at our Nevada test site. The President made it clear that if this meeting leads to an agreement on verification -- incorporating CORRTEX -- which meets our concerns, he is prepared to move forward toward ratification of these two treaties. This proposal is still valid, and we expect the Soviet Union to respond to it seriously, as we have responded to all Soviet proposals.

As far as a nuclear testing moratorium is concerned, the U.S. position has not changed. From the time that the Soviets announced their moratorium last year, we made clear why a moratorium is not in the security interests of the United States, our friends, and allies. The United States has learned through experience that moratoria cannot be counted on to lead to the enhanced security desired. While the total elimination of nuclear weapons remains an ultimate goal, nuclear weapons remain needed to deter aggression and secure the peace. As long as this is the case, a moderate level of nuclear testing is needed to ensure the continued reliability, safety, and effectiveness of our nuclear deterrent.

Regarding a meeting between the President and General Secretary Gorbachev, the two agreed at Geneva ``to meet again in the nearest future,'' and the General Secretary accepted the President's invitation to come to the United States in 1986. In December the President indicated to the General Secretary which dates would be most convenient for this meeting. No reply has yet been received regarding this suggestion. Nevertheless, the President is confident that the General Secretary takes his agreement seriously and that he will respond in due course.

In the President's view, meetings at the highest level should deal with the entire range of important issues between our two countries. Nuclear testing is one of them, but only one; and it is an issue which is directly related to others such as the need -- which we see as the highest priority -- to reduce the levels of existing nuclear arms and to establish effective verification procedures. If the Soviet Union desires to make serious progress on the question of nuclear testing limitation, it should accept the President's longstanding proposal that we have our experts meet, and should respond positively to the President's most recent offer.

Nancy and I have lost a dear friend of many years today, and America has lost one of her finest artists. We offer our heartfelt condolences to Jimmy Cagney's wife, Bill, and to the other members of his family.

Jimmy burst upon our movie screen with an energy and a talent we have never seen before and we will never see again. He was the best at whatever he did -- a hero, a villain, a comic, or a dancer. But the versatile actor who showed us so many faces on the screen in a multitude of roles was, in private life, a gentle man, a gentleman, and a loving husband and father. Jimmy Cagney was the classic American success story, lifting himself by determination and hard work out of poverty to national acclaim. I believe the entire Nation loved Jimmy Cagney, and I think he must have loved us, too, because he always gave us his very best.

Consistent with his announcement last fall of his belief in a ``free but fair'' trade policy, the President today announced three new trade policy actions aimed at eliminating foreign unfair trade practices and securing open markets for American exports.

In the most significant case, the President has decided that the United States will take action against new European Community (EC) agricultural restrictions, which could affect as much as $1 billion in U.S. farm exports. The new restrictions were recently imposed by the EC following Spain and Portugal's accession to the EC. Unless the Community rescinds its illegal quotas and promptly provides compensation for its increased tariffs, the United States will offset the new restrictions by establishing quotas and increasing tariffs on EC products entering our market.

In the first use of new authorities granted in the Trade and Tariff Act of 1984 to address restrictive investment practices, the President has also directed U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter to initiate an investigation of Taiwan's automotive export performance requirements, which distort trade by forcing manufacturers to move a certain percentage of their production into export markets. The President has further directed Ambassador Yeutter to make fact-finding inquiries to determine whether the European Community's Third Country Meat Directive may unfairly penalize American exports of as much as $125 million worth of meat.

The United States has been fully supportive of the enlargement of the European Community to include Spain and Portugal. We do not, however, believe that the EC should use this occasion to impose new trade barriers. Americans should not have to pay for the benefits which EC member States will enjoy.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 31st day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

It is apparent that there is strong sentiment in the Senate to await completion, at minimum, of the work of the Senate Select Committee on Iran before acting on my nomination. I believe a prolonged period of uncertainty would be harmful to the Central Intelligence Agency, the Intelligence Community and potentially to our national security. Accordingly, I respectfully request that you withdraw my nomination to be Director of Central Intelligence. I am deeply honored that you chose me for this high position and I pledge my full support and assistance to whomever you select, and the Senate confirms, as the next Director.

With great regret I have agreed to Robert Gates' request that his name be withdrawn as the nominee to be Director of Central Intelligence. I met with Bob this afternoon. He asked me to withdraw his nomination rather than proceed with extended consideration by the Senate.

I have asked Bob to continue serving as Deputy Director of Central Intelligence under the new Director, and I look forward to working with him during the next 2 years. He is a remarkably talented and dedicated man, who has served five Presidents with great professional skill and integrity. I have been impressed with the class he has shown under the enormous pressures of recent weeks. At any other time, I am certain that he would easily have been confirmed without delay. It is clear that at this point confirmation proceedings would not be in the interest of the CIA or the Nation. Mr. Gates has done an outstanding job as Acting Director and will continue to serve in this capacity until a new Director is confirmed.

A central objective of my Administration has been the prevention of the spread of nuclear explosives to additional countries. I intend to continue my pursuit of this goal with unflagging determination and a deep sense of personal commitment.

For a century, we Americans and people around the world have benefitted tremendously from the agricultural research and training provided by our national system of agricultural experiment stations at our State land-grant colleges. This system was initiated by the Hatch Act, which President Grover Cleveland signed into law on March 2, 1887. In celebrating the Centennial of this legislation, we pay much-deserved tribute to our agricultural researchers of the present and to the generations of dedicated scientists who preceded them in this essential work.

Americans promoted agricultural education from the start. Private societies achieved much progress, and farmers, stimulated by nearly limitless opportunity, eagerly took advantage of new scientific knowledge. Public support for agricultural research grew because the results were so obviously beneficial. In the early and mid-19th century, specialized schools of agriculture appeared. The United States Department of Agriculture was founded in 1862; one of its missions was to acquire and diffuse agricultural information. The Morrill Act, which President Abraham Lincoln signed into law in 1862, provided for the creation of land-grant agricultural colleges in most States.

Despite these welcome developments, a generation later much remained to be done. It was then that William Henry Hatch, a Congressman from Missouri, proposed agricultural experiment stations for research and training. Today we know that the adoption of the Hatch Act of 1887 was one of the most significant steps ever taken in American agriculture.

It is no exaggeration to say that the wealth of technical knowledge developed at these stations has enabled America's farmers to revolutionize the practice of agriculture and bettered life for millions of people the world over. The existence of these institutions and the abilities of the scientists trained there ensure that future generations will continue to enjoy the benefits of agricultural research.

In recognition of the vital role of State agricultural experiment stations in American agriculture, the Congress, by House Joint Resolution 3, has designated March 2, 1987, as the Centennial of the signing of the Hatch Act of 1887 and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this event.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this second day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

A comedian, actor, singer, and conductor, Danny Kaye delighted millions the world over with his special talent for making us laugh. His numerous credits on Broadway, on the screen, and on television were all characterized by his devotion to his craft. Even though he was just acting, his genuine love for people came through. Children, especially, felt his warmth and humanity, and he enjoyed a special bond with his young audiences. Danny Kaye could light up a room just by smiling. He shared his talent with the world, and by so doing, made it a better place. He will be missed, and Nancy joins me in extending our deep sympathy to his family.

Working closely with our friends and allies in Europe and Asia, the United States has pursued -- ever since my initial proposal of November 1981 -- deep, equitable, and verifiable reductions of land-based U.S. and Soviet longer range INF missiles, with the objective of their complete global elimination. Most recently we've been preparing a detailed treaty text to implement these agreed objectives and to follow the specific formula on which Mr. Gorbachev and I agreed at our meeting in Iceland last October. This calls for reductions to an interim global ceiling of 100 warheads on U.S. and Soviet longer range INF missiles, with none in Europe, along with constraints on shorter range INF missiles and provisions for effective verification. I remain firmly committed to these objectives.

Having long sought progress in this area, therefore, I welcome the statement by Soviet General Secretary Gorbachev on Saturday that the Soviet Union will no longer insist on linking agreement on reductions in INF to agreements in other negotiations. This removes a serious obstacle to progress toward INF reductions and is consistent with the understanding which Mr. Gorbachev and I reached at our 1985 Geneva summit meeting: that we would indeed seek a separate agreement in this important area. I want to congratulate our allies for their firmness on this issue. Obviously, our strength of purpose has led to progress. To seize this new opportunity, I have instructed our negotiators to begin the presentation of our draft INF treaty text in Geneva tomorrow. I hope that the Soviet Union will then proceed with us to serious discussion of the details which are essential to translate areas of agreement in principle into a concrete agreement. And I want to stress that of the important issues which remain to be resolved none is more important than verification. Because we're committed to genuine and lasting arms reductions and to ensuring full compliance, we will continue to insist that any agreement must be effectively verifiable.

To explore further the implications of these latest developments, I have also asked our senior negotiators in Geneva -- Ambassadors Max Kampelman, Mike Glitman, and Ron Lehman -- to return to Washington to meet with me later this week. Following these discussions in Washington, I will send a team back to Geneva to take up once again the detailed negotiations for an INF reductions agreement. We'll continue, at the same time, our very close consultations on INF issues with our friends and allies in Europe and Asia. It was, after all, allied firmness and unity in carrying out NATO's 1979 decision which helped to bring the Soviet Union back to the negotiating table and led to this opportunity to achieve a reductions agreement to the mutual benefit of both East and West. And as we proceed, it is well to remember that nothing is more important to the cause of peace than the credibility of our commitment to NATO and our other allies and to the vitality of these alliances of free nations.

The countries of the Western Hemisphere enjoy a special relationship, influenced by the accidents of geography and our common heritage as nations of the New World. The vast majority of our lands represent a mix of native groups of ancient lineage and a much larger population of immigrants from other shores. Today virtually every nationality is represented in our Hemisphere. Our diversity is truly astonishing, but there exists in us a common thread of restiveness and exploration, a longing to build lives of freedom and quiet dignity and to share the fruits of our discoveries with one another and the entire world.

As the 20th century nears its close, we have an opportunity to reflect on the direction in which relations among the peoples of the Americas have evolved. In a century marked by sporadic regional conflicts and two world wars, we have nonetheless seen ample evidence for the conclusion that the bonds of friendship and aspiration among us are stronger than ever. The sometimes rugged terrain we have crossed and the horizons we still must reach should not daunt our spirit or dim our optimism -- what remains to be achieved for the Americas can be the source of both our hopes and the energy to achieve them.

The National Year of the Americas celebration will focus on the links that bind the nations of the Western Hemisphere into ``The Americas.'' It will emphasize the enhancement of our citizens' understanding of their neighbors to the north and south, and it will underscore just how much there is to celebrate in this era of hemispheric change and opportunity.

The most important cause for joy is the new chapter that our decade is writing in the story of liberty. Since 1979, the process of democratization has strengthened the community of purpose among American peoples. During that period, the people of ten Latin American nations have expressed their determination, through the ballot box, to turn from oligarchy to democracy. The time is right for our countries to defend and work to extend democracy and respect for human rights throughout the hemisphere.

The tenth Pan American Games, which will be held in Indianapolis in 1987, provide an opportunity to bring together the peoples of Latin America, the West Indies, Canada, and the United States. The Games will celebrate our diversity and our unity, our interdependence and our shared future. They will foster mutual respect and understanding.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this third day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The one hundred million dollars in assistance for the Nicaraguan democratic resistance approved by the Congress in October of last year was intended as only one aspect of an integrated, comprehensive approach for United States efforts to promote economic and political development, peace, stability, and democracy in Central America and to encourage a negotiated resolution of the conflict in the region. In that law (Title II of the Act making appropriations for military construction for the fiscal year ending September 30, 1987, as contained in Public Laws 99 - 500 and 99 - 591, hereinafter ``the Act''), the Congress recognized, as does the Executive branch, that the Central American crisis has its roots in a long history of social injustice, extreme poverty, and political oppression. These conditions create discontent, which is often exploited by communist guerrillas in their war against democracy. The focus of United States policy in Central America goes beyond the military aspects of the problem. To help address the underlying social and economic causes of conflict in the region, the Congress directed that additional economic assistance be made available for four Central American democracies: Costa Rica, El Salvador, Guatemala, and Honduras.

Democracy is making great strides in these four countries. Their progress in building societies in which their citizens enjoy freedom of choice and equal justice under law stands in marked contrast to the totalitarian subjugation suffered by the Nicaraguan people. This progress, however, cannot be sustained without concurrent economic growth. Political freedom cannot prosper in an environment of hunger and despair. Nor, as found by the National Bipartisan Commission on Central America (NBCCA), can we expect the Central American democracies to recover from a severe economic recession without significant outside assistance. The Central American democracies cannot attract adequate private investment to achieve sustainable economic growth in the current environment of violence and subversion. The four democratic nations of Central America will have little appeal for investors as long as there is an aggressive communist regime nearby -- a militant regime bent on ideological expansion and already in command of the largest army in the history of Central America.

To help the Central American democracies preserve their hard-earned progress in making democracy work, the Congress in October 1986 approved in section 205 of the Act the transfer of three hundred million dollars in unobligated funds for economic assistance to the Central American democracies. Title III of the Act also appropriated an additional three hundred million dollars for this purpose, to be available through fiscal year 1987. Unfortunately, despite the best intentions of those in the Congress who supported the additional assistance for Central America and despite this Administration's strong support for that assistance, the Foreign Assistance Appropriations Act mandated that the three hundred million dollars be regarded as part of the specified (and very limited) FY 1987 worldwide total for economic support fund assistance, thus precluding us from considering this sum as additional assistance. As a practical result there could be no increased aid for Central America. When this became apparent, we shared the great disappointment of bipartisan supporters in the Congress, not to mention the Central Americans who were counting on this assistance after it had been approved in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.

Clearly, there is the desire in the Congress to make good on this commitment. Toward that end, there is a provision in the law that the Executive branch should develop a plan for fully funding the assistance to the Central American democracies proposed in the January 1984 report of the National Bipartisan Commission on Central America. I am transmitting that plan to the Congress with this message.

The Bipartisan Commission determined that the Central American crisis was the result of a long history of interrelated political, security, and socio-economic conditions and recommended a greatly expanded financial assistance program for the years 1984 - 89. The Central American Democracy, Peace and Development Initiative (CAI), transmitted to the Congress in February 1984, was designed to accomplish most of the NBCCA's recommendations. This program concentrated on strengthening democratic institutions, arresting economic decline while promoting stabilization and recovery, and increasing the benefits of growth. Results in the political sector have been more rapid than anticipated. In the economic and social areas much also has been achieved. Nevertheless, this progress remains fragile and much remains to be done. The plan herewith transmitted to the Congress proposes a 3-year extension of the program's execution until 1992. The extension would increase the total amount of funds originally recommended in the CAI for the period FY 1984 to FY 1989 from $6.4 billion to $6.9 billion in appropriated funds for the period FY 1984 to FY 1992. As economic recovery in the region proceeds, the benefits of growth, economic, and political stabilization will be enjoyed by an ever-increasing percentage of the region's population.

After reviewing the findings of this study, I have concluded that additional assistance is required immediately in order to help meet the economic goals of the Bipartisan Commission and to keep faith with the millions of men and women who through hard work and sacrifice are making democracy a living reality in Central America.

This assistance is urgently required to help meet the great economic and social needs of the struggling democratic governments of the region. By generating conditions of violence in Central America that undermine prospects for economic growth, the communist government of Nicaragua works to discredit the democratic system as a viable alternative for development. To offset this effort, it is the responsibility of the friends of democracy to help Central America's democrats prove that even in adversity democracy offers their people a better way of life. The Soviet Union and its allies have provided the Sandinista regime military hardware and sufficient economic aid to keep Nicaragua's failed economy afloat. The United States must help those small nations in Central America that have chosen freedom.

I am pleased to announce my intention to nominate William H. Webster to be Director of Central Intelligence. Bill Webster will bring remarkable breadth and depth of experience as well as an outstanding record of achievement to this position. He has been Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation since 1978, and in fact, just last week he celebrated his ninth anniversary in that post. Under his leadership, the FBI has dramatically increased its counterintelligence and counterterrorism capability. I expect Bill to bring that same kind of leadership and achievement to his new position as Director of Central Intelligence, a position so crucial to the security of our nation.

He served with great distinction as a judge of the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Eighth Circuit and before that as a U.S. district judge for the Eastern District of Missouri. Earlier he had engaged in the private practice of law, capped with a term as U.S. attorney for the Eastern District of Missouri. Bill served his country as a lieutenant in the U.S. Naval Reserve in World War II and in the Korean war.

Bill's distinguished career has exemplified his commitment to serving our nation and to defending and promoting the values of America and the free world. Bill is well known as a man of honor and integrity, as a man who is committed to the rule of law, and as a professional who is dedicated to the pursuit of excellence. I look forward to continuing to work with Bill as he assumes his new responsibilities, and I urge the Congress to act promptly to confirm him as Director of Central Intelligence.

First of all, let me say that using the word ``resignation'' in connection with Pat Buchanan strikes me as something of a contradiction in terms. When you joined our White House team two years ago, you brought with you communications skills refined over many years of experience as a writer and author, political adviser, columnist, and television commentator. You also brought with you a well-established reputation for consistency, toughness, versatility and integrity. From your very first days as an editorial writer at the St. Louis Globe-Democrat, you have shown an instinctive grasp of America's heartland values and guiding principles. Those values and principles have been your fixed stars, and I take great comfort in knowing that your leaving the White House only means that you'll be navigating the same course in a different ship.

Emerson said, ``Nothing astonishes men so much as common sense and plain dealing.'' I have you to thank for investing your great abundance of both these qualities in the effort to communicate our policies and goals to the public. A proud record speaks for itself, but, as you know, it helps to have a microphone every now and then. Through plain talk and forceful prose, you have gotten the truth about our record out to the American people, fulfilling our responsibility to the Nation to set forth how we've responded to the mandates we were given in 1980 and 1984.

I am the third President you have served with distinction. It's fair to say that you have accomplished so much not because of your loyalty to any individual, but because of your fidelity to the core of ideals that define what it is to be an American. And because you put your trust in the virtues of faith and family, the centers that can and do hold against the disintegrating forces at work in the modern world.

Our second American Revolution is not over, but I have no doubt that we could not have come this far without voices like yours crying against the vanity and veneer that so often pass for insight. You will be sorely missed by your friends and colleagues here at the White House, but I have a hunch that there are quite a few people around the country anxiously awaiting publication of the next chapter in the Pat Buchanan story.

During the past two years, it has been an honor, a privilege and a pleasure to have served you in the White House. I shall recall with particular pride your indispensable leadership in winning Congressional support for the Nicaraguan resistance; your courageous refusal to be stampeded by the self-righteous into endorsing vindictive and destructive sanctions upon the nation and people of South Africa who have done us no harm; your relentless effort to restore constitutionality to the Third Branch of Government, especially with the nominations of Justice Scalia and Chief Justice Rehnquist; finally, your refusal at Geneva and, again, at Reykjavik, to compromise America's national defense in the coming decade, SDI.

No political leader in the West has been more eloquent or outspoken in compassionate defense of the rights of the ``least of these,'' the innocent unborn. Nor have any spoken out with greater consistency and clarity against the over-arching evil of the 20th Century: Marxism-Leninism. If, in the 21st century, that great prison house of nations, the Soviet Empire, is finally cracked open, and the captive peoples within are set free, historians will trace the origins of their deliverance to your decisions to send the Rangers and Marines to rescue Grenada for the Free World and to provide the patriots of Afghanistan, Angola and Nicaragua with the arms to recapture their countries from the quislings who betrayed them to the Soviet Empire.

In recent days, from the vantage point of that ``windowless office'' down the hall, I have reflected often upon the history of our movement. Today, things that were commonly alleged against us and our cause a quarter century ago, or even a decade ago, can no longer be credibly said -- because you were one of us.

I regret that I depart at a time when you are beset by the little men and tiny minds that yet predominate in this capital city. But what you have done for your country and the cause of human dignity and freedom will be remembered and recalled long after such as these have achieved their last full measure of obscurity. God bless you, Mr. President. Non illegitimis carborundum.

The President. No. And as I stated in my statement, he had spoken to me months before about his desire to leave. And then when all of this came up, decided that he would see it out and wait until after the Tower commission report came in.

Kenneth Cribb, Counselor to Attorney General Edwin Meese, has joined the Chief of Staff's transition team. Mr. Cribb will join Tom Griscom and James Cannon for the period of the transition, concentrating on domestic programs, policies, and personnel matters.

This is the second opportunity I've had to thank you for your work in this Administration. When you joined our White House team in 1986, you brought with you the benefit of your experience as General Counsel for the Department of the Treasury during my first term. Twice we successfully lured you away from the private sector to public service, and on both occasions you responded with the blend of personal integrity and professional skill that has been the hallmark of your entire career. Your over 20 years as a lawyer have been split nearly equally between private practice and the government, a sign of your lifelong devotion to the common good.

Working with you closely this past year I have only come to appreciate more fully your talents, character, and judgment. As Counsel to the President, you had but a single client, but in a truer sense you served the institution of the Presidency and through it the people of this great Nation. You took on with enthusiasm and sensitivity one of the most demanding jobs in Washington. These are my own words of thanks for your many contributions, but I know that they convey as well the gratitude of the American people for all you've accomplished.

The profound respect and good wishes of your many friends and colleagues go with you as you leave the White House. May you, Frieda, and your family find the future filled with every blessing and happiness.

On March 20, 1987, I will resign as Counsel to the President, having served almost a year in your White House. To say it has been an honor to serve as your Counsel would not do justice to my feelings at this moment.

In your openness, warmth, and good sense you embody everything that is admired about our country. In your modesty and strong sense of trusteeship you have lent dignity to the Presidency. In your many personal kindnesses to me, you have demonstrated your sensitivity to the small as well as the large dimensions of your Office.

I came here to help you complete a journey that history will record as one of the most successful Presidencies of the century. There have been rough spots along the way; there always are. But your qualities as a person and as a leader will never never fail you. I will always look back on this time as one of the proudest of my life, and I will always be available to you in the future.

We've spent enough time the last few months on inside-Washington politics -- who's up and who's down, who's in and out. The investigations will continue, and they should. And the committees will continue to meet, and they should. I've said the administration will give them every cooperation, and it will. But so far as I'm concerned, the American people sent me here to do a job, and there are just 2 years left to get it done.

And part of that job is to strengthen the foundations of world peace. I've never felt more optimistic about the prospects for success in this area than I do today. And that's because this past week we've had a major breakthrough on the path toward an agreement for mutual and verifiable reductions in arms between ourselves and the Soviet Union. As I announced earlier this week, the Soviets have at last agreed to negotiate a global reduction in the number of U.S. and Soviet longer range intermediate nuclear force, or as we call them, INF missiles. The arms reductions agreement that, as a result of the Soviet statement, is now within reach derives from my ``zero option'' proposal of 1981. And that proposal calls for eliminating all INF missiles. This negotiation will be conducted without strings attached. The Soviets have dropped their demand that we abandon our Strategic Defense Initiative as a precondition to an agreement on INF, and I welcome these developments. This change in the Soviet position is a great breakthrough and shows that, in working for the cause of peace, preparedness pays, patience pays, and firmness pays. Now, that should be three truisms: that preparedness, patience, and firmness -- each pays. But again and again over the last few years, I've had to defend those truisms to protect the policy that has brought us to this moment of hope.

First, we were told that if we rebuilt America's defenses, that if we hoped to make our alliances more prepared, we would make an arms reduction agreement less likely. The Soviets said that they would walk out of arms talks in Geneva if we deployed our INF missiles. But we and our allies knew that while the West had stood by the Soviets had been deploying their own INF missiles at a rate of about one a week for several years, bringing a new and unprovoked threat against our friends and allies in Europe and in Asia. We knew that this would make peace not more secure, but less secure. And we knew that if we were ever to bargain for an agreement for reducing the Soviet INF missiles we would have to have something worthwhile to give up in return. So, we and our allies decided on a reasoned INF deployment as a balance against the new threat posed by this Soviet buildup. Then after the Soviets refused to respond constructively at the negotiating table, we began our deployments.

We were prepared, and then the patience came in. Yes, the Soviets did walk out of the arms reduction talks. It was part of a sophisticated play to public opinion both here and in Europe. But despite some dissent on both sides of the Atlantic, the American people and the people of Europe stayed with us. Together the Western alliance waited the Soviets out. And then, when it was clear that not just the leaders but the people of the alliance could and would wait and that neither the people nor their leaders would buckle under, the Soviets returned to the bargaining table -- patience. You know the story after that: 2 years of meetings, hopes, successes, as well as disappointments. After saying they would not, the Soviets tied INF to agreements in other areas, including their effort to kill our SDI program. But again we and our allies remained firm. We stood firm, because SDI has a vital role to play in the journey to a more secure world for all. SDI supports our goal of deep, equitable, and verifiable arms reductions. It reduces the risks of war and the threat of ballistic missiles. I for one have no intention of bargaining away mankind's dream of a safer world.

And we remained firm in another way, as well. We said that our objective should be to ban all longer range INF missiles from the face of the Earth. When I announced it as our goal 6 years ago, the ``zero option'' was greeted with a great deal of skepticism. Some said that I couldn't be serious, that I must be proposing the ``zero option'' because I knew the Soviets would never agree to it or because I was so innocent that I didn't know any better. Well, after several decades in Hollywood, that was kind of a new thrill for me to be called innocent. [Laughter] I was and am determined that this decade's legacy to world peace will be better than just another step in regulating the arms race. The American people and the people of the world don't want arsenals that are growing only a fraction as fast as before. They want shrinking arsenals. And now we may be on the threshold in one critical category of weapons of getting just that -- because we stayed firm.

Yes, preparedness, patience, and firmness are paying off. It's come time to plan the next step. And that's why you've come at the right time. Tomorrow I'm going to meet with Ambassadors Max Kampelman, Ron Lehman, and Mike Glitman, whom I recalled from Geneva. I will discuss with them America's response to the Soviet statement. I've already instructed our team to begin putting our draft treaty on the negotiating table. This is a great moment of hope for all mankind -- hope, yes, for this agreement, hope for other agreements as well: agreements that increase our security and strengthen the foundation of peace. The flame of that hope burns today because we didn't give in at the first signs of a Soviet public relations campaign. This is the lesson of the last several years: We and our allies did not and will not let ourselves be pressured into an agreement. I will not let the hope for real peace slip by. Sometimes we get so caught up in day-to-day events that we forget the great promise that is our nation and our future. We live in an age of hope, a time when the dreams of mankind for the end of great wars and the extension of freedom to every nation and peoples may at last be realized, a time when we're looking to a new epoch of opportunity.

But finally, there remain large imbalances in short-range nuclear weapons, chemical weapons, and conventional forces in Europe. We and our allies are addressing all of these issues. And as we address them, we today can begin to dream, as only a few years ago humanity scarcely dared to dream, of the final end to nuclear terror. We can dream of a world of lasting peace. We can dream of hope and opportunity and of freedom for all mankind.

No one should think that our aspirations for a safer world will materialize in a moment or for just a wish. We've come this far by being strong, patient, and firm. And we'll need those qualities on the rest of our journey for real peace. But we know now that it's a journey for which there is an end. We're not at the beginning of that end. But, as Churchill said in another moment, we may be at the end of the beginning. We've come this far. We've traveled a long and weary road. But there is a great strength within us as a people. There's a great strength of purpose in relations between America and her allies. So, let's go forward to our common dream and go forward together.

I cannot believe in continuing to base the safety of the world and of mankind on a policy called MAD, for mutual assured destruction -- the idea that we, if we had enough missiles to blow them out of the Earth and they had enough to blow us out of the Earth, we could sit here comfortably with the knowledge that sometime somebody could push a button and world destruction would start. That's not my idea of a guarantee of peace, looking back on the history of the world in the past. And I think the answer that we have come up with is leading toward the elimination of those horrible weapons, and then, at the same time, maintaining a defense against them. Because now that we know we can make them someplace, sometime, there could come along a madman that would, again, start to make them. When we promised to give up gas as a weapon after World War I, everybody kept their gas masks. And that's all we're suggesting. And we believe that there's some possibility of getting that kind of an agreement.

It is with pleasure and pride that I commend this report to your attention. Nineteen hundred and eighty-six was an encouraging year for democracy. The Endowment played an important role in this democratic resurgence, supporting significant efforts in the Philippines, Haiti, and many other key countries. Although the Endowment has been in operation for only 3 years, the enthusiasm and support with which the world's democrats have greeted this initiative have already been overwhelming. The program that the Endowment has undertaken, as you will see in this report, is further proof that democracy is an idea whose time has come.

This year, as we commemorate the Bicentennial of our Constitution, it is especially fitting that we honor our Nation's more than three million Federal employees. Their dedication to public service and their devotion to their country, sometimes under trying circumstances, have helped ensure the success of the greatest experiment in liberty the world has ever known -- the United States of America.

Our Federal employees are skilled public servants who work diligently every day to build a better America. Many of them are our friends, neighbors, and community leaders. In their spare time, they can be found doing volunteer work in our churches, schools, clubs, and other organizations. We can be grateful for the deep commitment of the men and women of our Federal work force.

That commitment is reflected on the job in Federal employees' myriad of activities in serving the American people. Federal workers protect the public in hundreds of ways, from weather monitoring to transportation safety. They conduct research in virtually every facet of human endeavor, from fighting cancer to improving agricultural techniques to exploring space. They assist the men and women of our Armed Forces in carrying out the mission of national defense. Federal employees make sure that programs vital to every American function effectively, from Social Security to natural resource management to assistance for the veterans whose service and sacrifices have kept us a free Nation.

The dedication of Federal employees is typified by the many handicapped Federal workers who have courageously risen above personal hardships to give of themselves to their country. That dedication is also personified by the men and women of the Senior Executive Service who through effort, leadership, and imagination distinguish themselves in service to the American people.

I have just met with Ambassadors Kampelman, Glitman, and Lehman to hear their report on the nuclear and space talks in Geneva. The level, intensity, and seriousness of the effort in Geneva have brought us closer to significant reductions in nuclear arms. As you know, the Soviet Union has recently offered to move ahead with an agreement to cut longer range INF missiles. This is something the United States and our allies have long urged. This week, at my direction, the American delegation in Geneva proposed a draft treaty incorporating the understandings which General Secretary Gorbachev and I reached on this subject at Reykjavik. Because of the opportunities for progress that are opening up, I have asked Ambassador Glitman to return to Geneva immediately. He and his team will continue working hard to remove the remaining obstacles to an INF agreement. I hope this will in turn spur progress in other aspects of the Geneva negotiations, particularly agreement on deep reductions in strategic nuclear arms.

I am determined to maintain the momentum we have generated. For that reason, Secretary of State Shultz will go to Moscow to meet with Foreign Minister Shevardnadze. The Soviet Government has agreed that this visit will take place from April 13 - 16. These talks will provide a good opportunity to review the entirety of our relationship -- including regional conflicts, human rights, and bilateral issues -- and to consolidate the progress we have made. Most important, I hope these discussions will result in recommendations to General Secretary Gorbachev and me on further steps we might take to move forward in all aspects of our relations, including the Geneva negotiations.

I'd like to talk with you today about a matter that means a great deal to all of us and to people all over the world, one of the keys to world peace: relations between the United States and the Soviet Union. You may remember that before I first met with Mr. Gorbachev in Geneva almost a year and a half ago I said that better relations between our two countries depended on four things -- arms reduction agreements, yes, but also progress on human rights in the Soviet Union, regional conflicts, and people-to-people exchanges. Secretary of State Shultz will be traveling to Moscow next month to pursue these issues and others with Foreign Minister Shevardnadze.

In the last few months we've seen movement in some of these areas. In one area, however, we're particularly disappointed. I mean the area of regional conflicts. The Soviets continue to occupy Afghanistan. They continue to supply billions of dollars of weapons to regimes like Libya, Syria, Cuba, Nicaragua, Vietnam, Ethiopia, South Yemen, and Angola, and to supply weapons to groups like the PLO. As long as the Soviets keep this up, East-West tensions will continue. And that's why it is in the interest of world peace to convince the Soviets to stop it. The free world today has an opportunity to do just that. And around the world, in many of the countries I've just mentioned, there are people fighting for freedom against Soviet-sponsored oppressors. We can help them.

Take Afghanistan. Soviet policy there is clearly headed for failure. The freedom fighters are gaining in strength and unity. The world community is giving them more and more support. The puppet regime that the Soviets installed 7 years ago seems to be coming apart. In the face of these mounting problems, the Soviets now claim they want to get out but refuse to give a short timetable for withdrawing. And they've escalated military actions against Pakistan, which is unacceptable. They say they want a political settlement and ``national reconciliation,'' but they've made no more than cosmetic changes in their puppet regime. It's up to us to make these points to them as strongly as possible. Peace will come only when there is a government in Kabul that enjoys the authentic support and confidence of the Afghan people. Once the Soviets agree to genuine self-determination and an immediate withdrawal, the war could end quickly. The longer the Soviets refuse such a solution, the harder it will be for them to find a way out.

And now, take Nicaragua -- much closer to home. The whole world wants to see a peaceful solution there, too. But the heart of the problem in Nicaragua is that, with vast Soviet and Cuban help, the regime there stifles democracy, has crushed the free press, persecutes religious believers, and is consolidating totalitarian control. In the face of this, a democratic resistance is growing. It has inspired the largest, fastest growing, volunteer peasant force in Latin America in almost a century. Its fighters and leaders are largely from poor families. They fight because they've seen Communist oppression firsthand. They are struggling for democracy. To abandon them would betray our own principles. A democratic solution will require real negotiations between the Sandinista regime and its opposition, including the armed resistance. Any diplomacy that excludes the resistance can't solve the problem.

The trend in Central America -- indeed, in all of Latin America -- is towards democracy. Today four of Central America's five countries are democracies. Nicaraguans want democracy, too. Their current rulers broke their promise to the Organization of American States that they would lead Nicaragua to democracy. And now the Nicaraguan people want them to deliver on that promise. Democracy, progress, and security -- those are our goals in Central America, and they're goals the American people support. Last year Congress took a stand for democracy in Central America. This week I asked Congress to renew that commitment. I sent Congress an economic aid package to strengthen Central America's four democracies. I am also asking Congress to let go forward the remaining money they approved last year to support the freedom fighters in Nicaragua. We must continue to stand by these brave young men and women.

Though Afghanistan and Nicaragua are thousands of miles apart, solving their problems depends on the very same thing: a chance for them and their neighbors to live without fear of aggression, a chance for their people to choose their own destiny. How much safer the world will be when the Soviet leaders see Americans standing behind such a firm policy for peace. Perhaps the Soviets will even start to spend less on adventures overseas and more on improving life at home.

Edward Zorinsky was a true public servant. A man of courage and principle, he served the people of Nebraska and of this nation with integrity and a deep sense of patriotism. As mayor of Omaha and later as a United States Senator, Edward Zorinsky was a man of the people. As a Senator he had not only an open door but an open mind, taking stands on issues because they were right, not just because they were popular. I will always remember and be grateful for his support of our 1985 budget and for his support of many other key programs. But even when we may have disagreed on a particular issue, Ed Zorinsky was fair and honest and earned the respect of his colleagues on both sides of the aisle and here at the other end of Pennsylvania Avenue.

A champion of the needs of farmers, Ed Zorinsky loved the people of Nebraska and felt genuinely honored to serve them. Indeed, they were extraordinarily well served by Ed Zorinsky. The people of Nebraska and all of America mourn the loss of this special man, a true leader. Nancy and I have lost a friend, who we will miss, and extend our deep sympathy to Cece and their children.

I appreciate your coming aboard March 1 to help me pull things together. I admired the enthusiasm with which you plunged into the job, and your loyalty to me. Your selflessness was demonstrated again by your gracious recognition that Howard Baker must have every opportunity.

In the decade or more that we have known each other I always enjoyed our correspondence. You certainly were one of my earliest supporters and I valued the advice you have given me from time to time over the years. I know I can count on you in the future.

I recognize and endorse the importance that Senator Baker must have his own team with whom he will feel comfortable to carry out your program so vital for the American people. I therefore ask you please to accept my resignation effective March 13.

I have known you for many years and have believed totally in your goals for the United States and for the world from the first day we met in the early 70s. Thus, I welcomed the privilege to serve you albeit briefly. Of course, I was pleased and inspired by our conversation when I accepted your appointment of me. I shall always treasure this memory.

Dorothy and I wish you and The First Lady good health, good fortune and happiness. We will continue to pray that God may grant you the strength to carry out your awesome duties for the benefit of our country and for the world.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Verne L. Speirs to be Administrator of the Office of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, Department of Justice. He would succeed Alfred S. Regnery.

In response to congressional requests as set forth in Public Law 99 - 145, I am forwarding herewith classified and unclassified versions of the Administration's report to the Congress on Soviet Noncompliance with Arms Control Agreements.

I believe the additional information provided, and issues addressed, especially in the more detailed classified report, will significantly increase understanding of Soviet violations and probable violations. Such understanding, and strong congressional consensus on the importance of compliance to achieving effective arms control, will do much to strengthen our efforts both in seeking corrective actions and in negotiations with the Soviet Union.

At the request of the Congress, I have, in the past three years, provided four reports to the Congress on Soviet noncompliance with arms control agreements. These reports include the Administration's reports of January 1984, and February and December 1985, as well as the report on Soviet noncompliance prepared for me by the independent General Advisory Committee on Arms Control and Disarmament. Each of these reports has enumerated and documented, in detail, issues of Soviet noncompliance, their adverse effects to our national security, and our attempts to resolve the issues. When taken as a whole, this series of reports also provides a clear picture of the continuing pattern of Soviet violations and a basis for our continuing concerns.

At the same time as the Administration has reported its concerns and findings to the Congress, the United States has had extensive exchanges with the Soviet Union on Soviet noncompliance in the Standing Consultative Commission (SCC), where SALT-related issues (including ABM issues) are discussed, and through other appropriate diplomatic channels.

Another year has passed and, despite these intensive efforts, the Soviet Union has failed to correct its noncompliant activities; neither have they provided explanations sufficient to alleviate our concerns on other compliance issues.

In order for arms control to have meaning and credibly contribute to national security and to global or regional stability, it is essential that all parties to agreements fully comply with them. Strict compliance with all provisions of arms control agreements is fundamental, and this Administration will not accept anything less.

Today I must report that we have deep, continuing concerns about Soviet noncompliance with the ABM Treaty. For several reasons, we are concerned with the Krasnoyarsk radar, which appeared to be completed externally in 1986. The radar demonstrates that the Soviets were designing and programming a prospective violation of the ABM Treaty even while they were negotiating a new agreement on strategic offensive weapons with the United States.

The only permitted functions for a large, phased-array radar (LPAR) with a location and orientation such as that of the Krasnoyarsk radar would be space-tracking and National Technical Means (NTM) of verification. Based on conclusive evidence, however, we judge that this radar is primarily designed for ballistic missile detection and tracking, not for space-tracking and NTM as the Soviets claim. Moreover, the coverage of the Krasnoyarsk radar closes the remaining gap in the Soviet ballistic missile detection and tracking screen; its location allows it to acquire attack characterization data that could aid in planning the battle for Soviet defensive forces and deciding timely offensive responses -- a standard role for such radars.

All LPARs, such as the Krasnoyarsk radar, have the inherent capability to track large numbers of objects accurately. Thus, they not only could perform as ballistic missile detection and tracking radars, but also have the inherent capability depending on location and orientation, of contributing to ABM battle management.

Soviet activities during the past year have contributed to our concerns. The Soviets have begun construction of three additional LPARs similar to the Krasnoyarsk radar. These new radars are located and oriented consistent with the ABM Treaty's provision on ballistic missile early warning radars, but they would increase the number of Soviet LPARs by 50 percent. The redundancy in coverage provided by these new radars suggests that their primary mission is ballistic missile acquisition and tracking.

This would have profound implications for the vital East-West balance. A unilateral Soviet territorial ABM capability acquired in violation of the ABM Treaty could erode our deterrent and leave doubts about its credibility.

The integrity of the arms control process is also hurt by Soviet violations of the 1925 Geneva Protocol on Chemical Weapons and the 1972 Biological and Toxin Weapons Convention. Information obtained during the last year reinforces our concern about Soviet noncompliance with these important agreements. Progress toward an agreement banning chemical weapons is affected by Soviet noncompliance with the Biological and Toxin Weapons Convention. Because of the record of Soviet noncompliance with past agreements, we believe verification provisions are a matter of unprecedented importance in our efforts to rid the world of these heinous weapons -- weapons of mass destruction under international law.

The Soviets have continued to maintain a prohibited offensive biological warfare capability. We are particularly concerned because it may include advanced biological agents about which we have little knowledge and against which we have no defense. The Soviets continue to expand their chemical and toxin warfare capabilities. Neither NATO retaliatory nor defensive programs can begin to match the Soviet effort. Even though there have been no confirmed reports of lethal attacks since the beginning of 1984, previous activities have provided the Soviets with valuable testing, development, and operational experience.

The record of Soviet noncompliance with the treaties on nuclear testing is of legal and military concern. Since the Limited Test Ban Treaty (LTBT) came into force over twenty years ago, the Soviet Union has conducted its nuclear weapons test program in a manner incompatible with the aims of the Treaty by regularly permitting the release of nuclear debris into the atmosphere beyond the borders of the USSR. Even though the debris from these Soviet tests does not pose calculable health, safety or environmental risks, and these infractions have no apparent military significance, our repeated attempts to discuss these occurrences with Soviet authorities have been continually rebuffed. Soviet refusal to discuss this matter calls into question their sincerity on the whole range of arms control agreements.

During their test moratorium, the Soviets undoubtedly maintained their sites because they quickly conducted a test soon after announcing intent to do so. Furthermore, there were numerous ambiguous events during this period that can neither be associated with, nor disassociated from, observed Soviet nuclear test-related activities.

The United States and the Soviet Union have met on four occasions during the past year for expert-level discussions on the broad range of issues related to nuclear testing. Our objective during these discussions consistently has been to achieve agreement on an effective verification regime for the TTBT and PNET. I remain hopeful that we can accomplish this goal.

In 1981 the Soviet Union conducted a major military exercise without providing prior notification of the maneuver's designation and the number of troops taking part, contrary to its political commitment to observe provisions of Basket I of the Helsinki Final Act.

During the past year, we have reached an accord at the Stockholm Conference on Confidence- and Security-Building Measures that contains new standards for notification, observation, and verification of military activities, including on-site inspection. We will be carefully assessing Soviet compliance with these new standards, which went into effect January 1, 1987.

At the end of 1986 and during the early weeks of 1987, new information pertaining to some of the issues in this report became available, but it was judged that the data did not necessitate a change in any of the findings. This was partially due to the developing nature of the information at the time and certain ambiguities associated with it. Furthermore, the Soviet Union resumed underground nuclear testing on February 26, 1987.

The Soviet Union repeatedly violated the SALT II Treaty and took other actions that were inconsistent with the Treaty's provisions. In no case where we determined that the Soviet Union was in violation did they take corrective action. We have raised these issues for the past three years in the SCC and in other diplomatic channels.

On June 10, 1985, I expressed concern that continued Soviet noncompliance increasingly affected our national security. I offered to give the Soviet Union additional time in order to take corrective actions to return to full compliance, and I asked them to join us in a policy of truly mutual restraint. At the same time, I stated that future U.S. decisions would be determined on a case-by-case basis in light of Soviet behavior in exercising restraint comparable to our own, correcting their noncompliance, reversing their military buildup, and seriously pursuing equitable and verifiable arms reduction agreements.

The third yardstick I had established for judging Soviet actions was their seriousness at negotiating deep arms reductions. In May 1986 I concluded that, since the November 1985 summit, the Soviets had not followed up constructively on the commitment undertaken by General Secretary Gorbachev and me to build upon areas of common ground in the Geneva negotiations, including accelerating work toward an interim agreement on INF.

In Reykjavik, General Secretary Gorbachev and I narrowed substantially the differences between our two countries on nuclear arms control issues. However, the Soviets took a major step backward by insisting that progress in every area of nuclear arms control must be linked together in a single package that has as its focus killing the U.S. Strategic Defense Initiative (SDI). Furthermore, it became clear that the Soviets intended to make the ABM Treaty more restrictive than it is on its own terms by limiting our SDI research strictly to the laboratory.

In the future, the United States must base decisions regarding its strategic force structure on the nature and magnitude of the threat posed by the Soviet strategic forces and not on standards contained in the SALT structure which has been undermined by Soviet noncompliance and especially in a flawed SALT II Treaty which was never ratified, would have expired if it had been ratified, and has been violated by the Soviet Union.

Responding to a Soviet request, the U.S. agreed to hold a special session of the SCC in July 1986 to discuss my decision. During that session, the U.S. made it clear that we would continue to demonstrate the utmost restraint. At this session we stated that, assuming there is no significant change in the threat we face, the United States would not deploy more strategic nuclear delivery vehicles or more strategic ballistic missile warheads than does the Soviet Union. We also repeated my May 27 invitation to the Soviet Union to join the U.S. in establishing an interim framework of truly mutual restraint pending conclusion of a verifiable agreement on deep and equitable reductions in offensive nuclear arms. The Soviet response was negative.

Now that we have put the Interim Agreement and the SALT II Treaty behind us, Soviet activities with respect to those agreements, which have been studied and reported to the Congress in detail in the past, are not treated in the body of this report. This is not to suggest that the significance of the Soviet violations has in any way diminished. We are still concerned about the increasing Soviet military threat.

A number of activities involving SALT II constituted violations of the core or central provisions of the Treaty frequently cited by the proponents of SALT II as the primary reason for supporting the agreement. These violations involve both the substantive provisions and the vital verification provisions of the Treaty. Through violation of the SALT II limit of the one ``new type'' of ICBM, the Soviets are in the process of deploying illegal additions to their force that provide even more strategic capability.

Soviet encryption and concealment activities have, in the past, presented special obstacles to verifying compliance with arms control agreements. The Soviets' extensive encryption of ballistic missile telemetry impeded U.S. ability to verify key provisions of the SALT II Treaty. Of equal importance, these Soviet activities undermine the political confidence necessary for concluding new treaties and underscore the necessity that any new agreement be effectively verifiable.

Soviet noncompliance, as documented in this and previous Administration reports, has made verification and compliance pacing elements of arms control today. From the beginning of my Administration, I have sought deep and equitable reductions in the nuclear offensive arsenals of the United States and the Soviet Union and have personally proposed ways to achieve the objectives in my meetings with General Secretary Gorbachev. If we are to enter agreements of this magnitude and significance, effective verification is indispensable and cheating is simply not acceptable.

Obligation: To preclude the development of a territorial defense or providing the base for a territorial ABM defense, the ABM Treaty provides that radars for early warning of ballistic missile attack may be deployed only at locations along the periphery of the national territory of each Party and that they be oriented outward. The Treaty permits deployment (without regard to location or orientation) of large phased-array radars for purposes of tracking objects in outer space or for use as national technical means of verification of compliance with arms control agreements.

Finding: The U.S. Government reaffirms the conclusion in the December 1985 report that the new large phased-array radar under construction at Krasnoyarsk constitutes a violation of legal obligations under the Anti-Ballistic Missile Treaty of 1972 in that in its associated siting, orientation, and capability, it is prohibited by this Treaty. Continuing construction and the absence of credible alternative explanations have reinforced our assessment of its purpose. Despite U.S. requests, no corrective action has been taken. This and other ABM-related Soviet activities suggest that the USSR may be preparing an ABM defense of its national territory.

Finding: The U.S. Government reaffirms the judgment of the December 1985 report that the evidence on Soviet actions with respect to ABM component mobility is ambiguous, but that the USSR's development and testing of components of an ABM system, which apparently are designed to be deployable at sites requiring relatively limited special-purpose site preparation, represent a potential violation of its legal obligation under the ABM Treaty. This and other ABM-related Soviet activities suggest that the USSR may be preparing an ABM defense of its national territory.

Obligation: The ABM Treaty and its Protocol limit the Parties to one ABM deployment area. In addition to the ABM systems and components at that one deployment area, the Parties may have ABM systems and components for development and testing purposes so long as they are located at agreed test ranges. The Treaty also prohibits giving components, other than ABM system components, the capability ``to counter strategic ballistic missiles or their elements in flight trajectory'' and prohibits the parties from testing them in ``an ABM mode.'' The Parties agreed that the concurrent testing of SAM and ABM system components is prohibited.

Issue: The December 1985 compliance report examined whether the Soviet Union has concurrently tested SAM and ABM system components in violation of its legal obligation since 1978 not to do so. It was the purpose of that obligation to further constrain testing of air defense systems in an ABM mode. We have reexamined this issue.

Finding: The U.S. Government reaffirms the judgment made in the December 1985 report that the evidence of Soviet actions with respect to concurrent operations is insufficient fully to assess compliance with Soviet obligations under the ABM Treaty. However, the Soviet Union has conducted tests that have involved air defense radars in ABM-related activities. The large number, and consistency over time, of incidents of concurrent operation of ABM and SAM components, plus Soviet failure to accommodate fully U.S. concerns, indicate the USSR probably has violated the prohibition on testing SAM components in an ABM mode. In several cases this may be highly probable. This and other ABM-related activities suggest the USSR may be preparing an ABM defense of its national territory.

Issue: The December 1985 report examined whether the Soviet Union has tested a SAM system or component in an ABM mode or given it the capability to counter strategic ballistic missiles or their elements in flight trajectory in violation of their legal obligation under the ABM Treaty. We have reexamined this issue.

Obligation: The ABM Treaty limits to 100 the number of deployed ABM interceptor launchers and deployed interceptor missiles. It does not limit the number of interceptor missiles that can be built and stockpiled. Paragraph 2, Article V, of the Treaty prohibits the development, testing or deployment of ``automatic or semi-automatic or other similar systems for rapid reload'' of the permitted launchers.

Issue: The December 1985 report examined whether the Soviet Union has developed, tested, or deployed automatic, semi-automatic, or other similar systems for rapid reload of ABM launchers in violation of its legal obligation under the ABM Treaty. We have reexamined this issue.

Obligation: The ABM Treaty and Protocol allow each party a single operational site, explicitly permit modernization and replacement of ABM systems or their components, and explicitly recognize the existence of ABM test ranges for the development and testing of ABM components. The ABM Treaty prohibits, however, the deployment of an ABM system for defense of the national territory of the parties and prohibits the parties from providing a base for such a defense.

Obligations: The BWC bans the development, production, stockpiling or possession, and transfer of microbial or other biological agents or toxins except for a small quantity for prophylactic, protective or other peaceful purposes. It imposes the same obligation in relation to weapons, equipment and means of delivery of agents or toxins. The 1925 Geneva Protocol and related rules of customary international law prohibit the first use in war of asphyxiating, poisonous or other gases and of all analogous liquids, materials, or devices and prohibits use of bacteriological methods of warfare.

Issues: The December 1985 report examined whether the Soviets are in violation of provisions that ban the development, production, transfer, possession, and use of biological and toxin weapons and whether they have been responsible for the use of lethal chemicals. We have reexamined this issue.

Finding: The U.S. Government judges that continued activity during 1986 at suspect biological and toxin weapon facilities in the Soviet Union, and reports that a Soviet BW program may now include investigation of new classes of BW agents, confirm the conclusion of the December 1985 report that the Soviet Union has maintained an offensive biological warfare program and capability in violation of its legal obligation under the Biological and Toxin Weapons Convention of 1972.

There have been no confirmed attacks with lethal chemicals or toxins in Kampuchea, Laos, or Afghanistan in 1986 according to our strict standards of evidence. Although several analytical efforts have been undertaken in the past year to investigate continuing reports of attacks, these studies have so far had no positive results. Therefore, there is no basis for amending the December, 1985, conclusion that, prior to this time, the Soviet Union has been involved in the production, transfer, and use of trichothecene mycotoxins for hostile purposes in Laos, Kampuchea, and Afghanistan in violation of its legal obligation under international law as codified in the Geneva Protocol of 1925 and the Biological and Toxin Weapons Convention of 1972.

Treaty Status: The Threshold Test Ban Treaty (TTBT) was signed in 1974. The Treaty has not been ratified by either Party but neither Party has indicated an intention not to ratify. Therefore, both Parties are subject to the obligation under customary international law to refrain from acts that would defeat the object and purpose of the TTBT. Actions that would defeat the object and purpose of the TTBT are therefore violations of legal obligations. The United States is seeking to negotiate improved verification measures for the Treaty. Both Parties have separately stated they would observe the 150-kiloton threshold of the TTBT.

Obligation: The Treaty prohibits beginning March 31, 1976, any underground nuclear weapon tests having a yield exceeding 150 kilotons at any place under the jurisdiction or control of the Parties. In view of the technical uncertainties associated with estimating the precise yield of nuclear weapon tests, the sides agreed that one or two slight, unintended breaches per year would not be considered a violation.

Finding: During the past year, the U.S. Government has been reviewing Soviet nuclear weapons test activity that occurred prior to the self-imposed moratorium of August 6, 1985, and has been reviewing related U.S. Government methodologies for estimating Soviet nuclear test yields. The work is continuing. In December 1985, the U.S. Government found that: ``Soviet nuclear testing activities for a number of tests constitute a likely violation of legal obligations under the Threshold Test Ban Treaty.'' At present, with our existing knowledge of this complex topic, that finding stands. It will be updated when studies now under way are completed. Such studies should provide a somewhat improved basis for assessing past Soviet compliance. Ambiguities in the nature and features of past Soviet testing and significant verification difficulties will continue, and much work remains to be done on this technically difficult issue. Such ambiguities demonstrate the need for effective verification measures to correct the verification inadequacies of the Threshold Test Ban Treaty and its companion accord, the Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty.

Legal Status: The Final Act of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe was signed in Helsinki in 1975. This document represents a political commitment and was signed by the United States and the Soviet Union, along with 33 other States. Soviet actions not in accord with that document are violations of their political commitment.

Obligation: All signatory States of the Helsinki Final Act are committed to give prior notification of, and other details concerning, major military maneuvers, defined as those involving more than 25,000 troops.

Finding: The U.S. Government previously judged and continues to find that the Soviet Union in 1981 violated its political commitment to observe provisions of Basket I of the Helsinki Final Act by not providing all the information required in its notification of exercise ``Zapad - 81.'' Since 1981, the Soviets have observed provisions of the Helsinki Final Act in letter, but rarely in spirit. The Soviet Union has a very restrictive interpretation of its obligations under the Helsinki Final Act, and Soviet implementation of voluntary confidence-building measures has been the exception rather than the rule. The Soviets have notified all exercises requiring notification (i.e., those of 25,000 troops or over), but have failed to make voluntary notifications (i.e., those numbering fewer than 25,000 troops). In their notifications, they have provided only the bare minimum of information. They have also observed only minimally the voluntary provision providing that observers be invited to exercises, having invited observers to only fifty percent of notified activities.

Mr. Chief Justice and distinguished guests, let me start by thanking Louis Gerstner and American Express for putting together the exhibit that I'm about to see. The documents gathered here are the springs from which the great river of human freedom rises. Assembling this exhibit at any time would be a great service to our nation. Doing it this year is, of course, especially appropriate, because this year we mark the 200th anniversary of the start of the greatest experiment in self-government in the history of man.

Just 200 years ago this May, a small group of men from 12 of the 13 American States gathered in a hall in Philadelphia to debate the form of a new order for the ages. They came from as far north as New Hampshire and as far south as Georgia. Barriers of distance and special interest might have divided them and the people of their States from one another, but something even greater held them together. That something was a common dedication to the rights of man. It was their common devotion to the proposition that governments derive their just powers from the consent of the governed. And it was their mutual conviction that here on these American shores they would raise a light unto the nations -- a light of self-government, of liberty, and of hope. Yes, many of the Founding Fathers traveled great distances to get to Philadelphia 200 years ago, but in a larger sense, mankind has traveled a great distance to that hall, as well. And today we have a glimpse of how long that journey was. And in the months ahead there in the ``Roads to Liberty'' exhibit, millions of Americans will also be able to see the landmarks of that trail.

The greatest landmark was, perhaps, the first, as the Chief told us. The year was 1215. The place was Runnymede. King John signed a great charter that declared that all free men had rights and that there were limits to the powers of the King. Yes, it was a great and enduring charter. Its letter remains in part in the statute books of Britain to this day, more than seven-and-a-half centuries later. Its spirit remains entirely in the hearts of free people everywhere and will forever. And now let me say here to Dean Oliver Fiennes how deeply all Americans appreciate the generosity of the Lincoln Cathedral for the loan of the Cathedral's copy of the Magna Carta for this exhibit.

Many of the other landmarks on this road are small: the Mayflower Compact -- the statement of a small group of settlers as they were about to set foot in the New World; the Fundamental Orders of Connecticut -- the first constitution agreed upon on American shores; it set out the government of just three towns. And even the Declaration of Independence, the Articles of the Confederation, the Constitution, and the Bill of Rights were written for a small country. Sometimes I can't help thinking there must have been monarchs and nobility around the world who smiled at our pretensions in that long, hot summer of 1787. We Americans were so small and weak. And yet each of these documents speak with a force far greater than all the armies that have ever marched: the force of the love of freedom that is born with the birth of every living soul. That force has guided us and given us strength in our journey for two centuries, our journey across a continent and to the stars and into the heart of every man and woman on Earth who dreams of a life of liberty.

Today and in the months ahead we celebrate this 200th anniversary. Let us, as we remember from where we have come, also think of the journey ahead. Let us rededicate ourselves to America's mission of freedom; and let us resolve that we will stand, as did those before us, with all who love freedom and yearn for democracy, wherever they might be. And let us remember our heritage and, with it, our destiny -- the destiny of this shining city on a hill, this beacon of freedom for all the peoples of the Earth.

Today the President is announcing an initiative to help end hunger in sub-Saharan Africa by establishing a common, long-term goal for all U.S. economic programs and policies in sub-Saharan Africa: to end hunger in the region through economic growth, policy reform, and private sector development. The United States will also seek to promote donor coordination on comprehensive structural adjustment as well as on assistance programs, and will continue its efforts to encourage the constructive involvement of the U.S. private sector in promoting African economic growth.

The preliminary work of this task force is reflected in proposals already presented in the President's FY 1988 budget submission, as noted in the legislative message he submitted to accompany the State of the Union Address. In an era of scarce aid resources, we have no responsible alternative but to maximize the effectiveness and efficiency of our assistance programs and to encourage recipient countries own efforts to promote productivity and growth. To do otherwise would be to risk perpetuating dependency.

The African countries have made a commitment to economic reform and structural adjustment. The world community committed itself to help Africa achieve these objectives. The President intends to work closely with the 100th Congress in a bipartisan spirit to pursue a goal which he knows is shared by all Americans.

The Federal government is the Nation's largest financial intermediary. At the end of 1986, it had $252 billion of direct loans and $450 billion of guaranteed loans outstanding. The government provides credit to many different types of borrowers: homeowners, farmers, students, small businesses, exporters, utilities, shipbuilders, and State, local, and foreign governments. Over the past 20 years, Federal direct loans and guaranteed loans outstanding have grown at a 9 percent annual rate.

Despite the vast size of Federal credit, and its obvious importance to the economy, the present budgetary treatment of Federal credit programs does not show the real cost of these programs. The result is the misallocation of resources and ineffective budgetary control.

Federal credit is provided on more favorable terms and conditions than those available in the private sector. The present value of this difference is a subsidy to the borrower. This subsidy to federally assisted borrowers comes at the expense of taxpayers and of all other borrowers, who pay higher interest rates or fees than they otherwise would have paid, or who are not able to borrow at all.

For direct loans, the present budget measures new loans to borrowers and any associated interest or other costs minus repayments (or sales) of previous loans and interest and fees received. This is misleading in four ways. Disbursement of new loans overstates the cost to the government because the government now owns a financial asset with market value. However, the fact that loans are expected to be repaid leaves the impression that, over time, they are costless; this is not so because Federal credit programs provide subsidies to the borrowers. The subtraction from disbursements related to new loans of repayments and interest on previous loans obscures the effect of current decisions. The budget accounts do not sort through this confusion to show how much of a new loan is a financial asset and how much is a subsidy or expenditure.

For loan guarantees, the present budget does not record any cost unless and until defaults occur. At the time the commitment to guarantee a loan is made, the guarantee is treated as a free good compared with a purchase, a grant, or a direct loan.

The appropriation of budget authority does not provide meaningful control of either direct loans or loan guarantees. Most direct loans are made from revolving funds. Defaults on guaranteed loans are a legal obligation of the government. In both cases, appropriations are unrelated to decisions to provide credit subsidies.

Because of these inadequacies, a separate credit budget was created to record and to limit the volume of new direct loan obligations and new guaranteed loan commitments. The credit budget has the advantage of focusing attention on the decisions that commit the government to new expenditures. But it does not show the cost of these expenditures -- the subsidies. Instead, it shows the total volume of credit assisted. Thus, it does not distinguish between programs with deep subsidies and those with small ones. Moreover, the credit budget is separate from the unified budget, so trade-offs between credit and other spending cannot be made.

The bill is intended to provide the Congress and the Administration with accurate measures of the benefits of Federal credit programs, to place their cost on a budgetary basis equivalent to other Federal spending, to encourage the delivery of benefits in the form most appropriate to the needs of beneficiaries, to improve the allocation of resources among credit programs and between credit and other spending, and to provide for the efficient financing of obligations issued, sold, or guaranteed by Federal agencies.

To achieve these goals, the bill would change the budgetary treatment of credit transactions by charging Federal agencies for the amount of subsidies inherent in credit programs. These subsidies are the present value of the difference between the terms and conditions on which direct loans or loan guarantees are available to borrowers in the private sector and the easier ones provided by Federal credit programs. If the borrower were given a grant equivalent to this subsidy and then obtained a private loan or loan guarantee, the borrower would be equally well off.

The draft bill would record this grant-equivalent subsidy of credit programs in the budgets of Federal credit agencies. The Congress would be asked to appropriate funds for these subsidies, thereby allocating resources on an equivalent basis among credit programs and between credit programs and other government spending.

The unsubsidized portion of a Federal direct loan is a financial asset. This is the present value of the expected interest and repayments by the borrower. The bill creates a Federal Credit Revolving Fund in the Department of the Treasury to finance the financial asset portion of direct loans.

The most direct way to divide a new loan between its ``grant'' and ``loan'' components is to sell it promptly, competitively, and without any government guarantee of future repayment. The bill proposes that agencies do so as an agent for the Fund, unless exempt because of foreign policy or other program considerations.

The most direct way to identify the subsidy inherent in a federally guaranteed loan is to purchase reinsurance in the private market. The cost of purchasing reinsurance, minus any fees paid by the borrower, is the grant equivalent of providing a Federal guarantee. The bill proposes that agencies arrange for the purchase of reinsurance as an agent of the Fund, in order to measure this subsidy.

The Federal Credit Revolving Fund, in consultation with the Federal agency, would be responsible for estimating the subsidy in Federal loans and loan guarantees, using the information from the sales and reinsurance or using standard methods when loans are not sold or reinsured. The Fund would establish an automated accounting and control system to keep track of the status of the Fund's accounts and to ensure that agency credit activity is limited to the amounts appropriated for subsidy costs. In addition, the Fund would serve as a central financing mechanism -- providing the financial asset portion of new direct loans, assuming the contingent liability for new guaranteed loans, and receiving subsidy payments from the agencies, all fees, interest, repayments, proceeds from the sale of new loans, and collateral acquired through defaults on guaranteed loans.

Nothing in the bill changes the credit programs that the Congress enacted or changes the existing authority of agencies to operate credit programs. Agencies would continue to arrange and approve direct loans and loan guarantees as they do now, would service those that had not been sold or reinsured, and would arrange for sale or reinsurance. The legal rights of borrowers would not be changed.

The proposed budgetary treatment of credit affects the deficit only to the extent that loan assets are sold and guaranteed loans are reinsured. The net effects of our planned sales and reinsurance were estimated in my 1988 Budget. The ``scoring'' of this credit reform proposal, itself, is otherwise deficit neutral.

Because the Congress requested submission of the 1988 Budget nearly a month early -- and we met that goal -- we were not able to include the effect of this credit reform proposal, account by account, in our January 5th and January 28th documents. I am now sending the necessary budget amendments and appropriations language to the Congress. I hope that you will be able to include them in your consideration of the 1988 Budget.

Credit reform is one of numerous management improvement initiatives that I will be transmitting to you in the FY 1988 Management Report. I look forward to working cooperatively with the Congress to make these reforms in the budgetary treatment of credit and in the management of Federal credit programs.

Woody Hayes was a legend in college football. Colorful and sometimes even controversial, he cared deeply about his players, his team, and his school. Under his coaching, Ohio State University won 12 Big 10 titles and became one of the Nation's most respected college football teams. Coach Hayes' greatest satisfaction came from getting to know his players. He enjoyed a special relationship with them, many of whom stayed in touch with him years after their collegiate days were over. He was an institution at OSU and seemed to have a special knack for knowing just what to do to get an athlete to go the extra mile. Nancy and I extend our deep sympathy to his family and to the Ohio State University community.

President Reagan. It has been my great pleasure to welcome and confer with an old friend and one of Africa's leading statesmen, President Daniel arap Moi of Kenya. Under President Moi's leadership, Kenya has enjoyed economic development and political stability. With an admirable sense of purpose, he has guided his people and country successfully through some very trying times. Probably no other nation in Africa, for example, handled the severe drought of 1984 as well as Kenya under President Moi's guiding hand. It was testimony of his competence and commitment.

I previously met President Moi when he visited the United States in 1981. Vice President Bush visited Kenya in 1982. And just recently, Secretary Shultz spent several days in that country. These top-level exchanges reflect the high value we place on our friendship. Over the years since independence, Kenya has been a success story, an example for all of Africa to follow. Internationally, it has been a moderate, wise, and constructive member of the family of nations. Bilaterally, our two countries have had exemplary relations. Our peoples share a commitment to the principles of representative government, private ownership, and individual freedom.

I personally look to President Moi as a friend and a trusted counselor on international issues, especially those concerning Africa. We've just completed a most productive 2-hour discussion which covered a full range of bilateral issues as well as a number of African and international items of mutual interest. We also discussed budget restraints in the United States and the implications for Kenya of overall reduced aid levels -- how we could best cope with them and still meet our commitments to one of America's staunchest friends in Africa. We agreed on the urgent need to attract more foreign investment to Kenya and discussed ideas on how that could best be accomplished.

President Moi, during the course of the next few days, will be meeting with a host of government and private sector leaders. I'm happy to report that as he embarks on the remainder of this busy and important visit, U.S.-Kenya relations -- building on a long history of mutual friendship and respect -- are healthy and vibrant. We are honored and pleased to have you here, President Moi.

President Moi. Thank you very much. Ladies of the press and gentlemen of the press, in our meeting I explained to President Reagan that Kenya has invested in its future in freedom. We cherish democracy and the rule of law, as enshrined in our Constitution. Kenya has managed to establish a stable economic and political system that has worked well. Today Kenya is among the few African countries which have food surplus. We came to Washington to express our friendship and to strengthen our cooperation for the mutual benefit of our two countries. Kenya's proud of its cooperation with the United States of America. We invite American businessmen and industrialists to invest in Kenya's thriving economy. I assure you all that we have created the necessary infrastructure to absorb American investment.

Our discussions with President Reagan today covered many subjects, including the economic and political situation in eastern and southern Africa. We welcome the major initiative which you, Mr. President, have taken on the economic problems facing the continent of Africa. Kenya, in a modest way, has pursued the policy of giving incentives to farmers. And agriculture is assuming the highest priority it deserves. This is what has enabled us over the years to provide enough food to feed the increasing population.

In the course of our discussion, I reminded President Reagan that in South Africa the values of human dignity our two countries cherish are being abused daily. An end to apartheid is inevitable, and the sooner it comes, the less will be the bloodshed and violence. The world community, in general, and in Africa, in particular, look upon the United States for a deeper commitment to this cause. Thank you.

In 1971, the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) issued standards governing the fiscal and administrative requirements for grants and assistance to State and local governments in Circular A - 102, ``Uniform Requirements for Assistance to State and Local Governments.'' Circular A - 102 was a significant step toward the simplification of grants management at the time. However, after 16 years, some of the provisions are out of date, there are gaps where the standards do not cover important areas, and agencies have interpreted the circular in numerous different ways in their regulations. It is now time for the circular to be revised to reflect developments consistent with our Federalism policies and State and local regulatory relief objectives and the President's Management Improvement Program.

I am today announcing the appointment of Kenneth M. Duberstein to be Deputy Chief of Staff at the White House. Ken will assume his new duties on Monday, March 23. I am pleased that he has agreed to join our new team at the White House.

Ken served me well in the Office of Legislative Affairs of the White House from January 22, 1981, to December 15, 1983, and I welcome him back home. Ken is an outstanding manager, who has worked with the Congress to achieve some of the most important victories of my administration. He will be a valuable asset as we begin the next 2 years. We have a number of issues -- including arms control, SDI, the budget, welfare reform, trade legislation, and catastrophic health -- which will require Ken's expert guidance in the months ahead. I know that he will be a valuable asset to me and to my Chief of Staff, Senator Howard Baker, as we move forward in the next 2 years.

I feel a little bit like the old vaudevillian, the ventriloquist, that said to the audience as an encore, ``I'll sing `Yankee Doodle Dandy' while drinking a glass of water at the same time.'' [Laughter] Well, welcome to the Old Executive Office Building. It's wonderful to see so many friends and supporters. For the last 6 years we've fought the good fight to get government spending under control, and it hasn't been easy. We haven't been able to let down our guard for one moment. But despite the momentum built up by the 50-year-old spending juggernaut, we've made dramatic headway. Sometimes we forget that deficit spending in this country -- with only 1 or 2 rare, exceptional years -- has been going on for more than 50 years. And for most of that time, it was explained as necessary to maintain prosperity. Well, for the first time in more than a decade, the Federal Government is actually spending less this fiscal year, in real terms, than the year before; and that's no small accomplishment. [Applause] Now, I should be applauding you, because you -- all of you -- and the American people, I think, deserve full credit.

As we've begun to rein in Federal spending, we've been able to bring taxes down and subdue the monster of inflation. And the result: what our European allies have called the American miracle, the creation of over 13 million new jobs in an economic expansion that may well become the longest in peacetime history. And the engine of job creation is keeping up its pace. It created 337,000 new jobs last month alone. I've had to learn, I didn't know just how the statisticians worked this out, but do you all understand what is considered the full potential employment pool in America? It is everyone -- male and female -- from age 16 up. Well, right now 61.3 percent of that pool, the highest percentage in our history, is employed. I think that's more meaningful than the unemployment rate that we keep flirting with. But family income is rising. Employment is holding, as I've pointed out, at historic highs. And America's poor are climbing out of poverty.

Well, there's no question about it: Our combined program of tax cuts, deregulation, and spending cuts is working miracles. We've created a revolution of hope and opportunity. But all these achievements and all this progress is imperiled at this very moment -- imperiled by a Congress that won't give up its big spending ways. One of the first actions of the 100th Congress was an $18 billion boondoggle so loaded with unnecessary and politically motivated spending that I was forced to veto it. But now, even before Congress has drawn up their budget, some there are saying that they want to back away from our commitment to Gramm-Rudman-Hollings. Some are even saying that they want to raise taxes again on the American people.

Well, I'm sorry, but that's just not going to happen. The American people worked long and hard to cut tax rates and win tax reform. They put their trust in their elected representatives, and they were promised by those representatives that they would be given the long-overdue tax relief they so truly deserve. Well, we're not going to break faith with the American people. I promise you: Tax reform will go ahead as scheduled.

You know, all this talk about raising taxes reminds me of a story I heard once down in Louisiana about a farmer who took his son out for the first time duck hunting with him. And they sat there in the blind, and a mallard came down, landed right in front of them. The father wasn't too much of a sportsman. He raised up his gun and took a shot at it, and when the smoke cleared, the duck was still sitting there peaceful as could be. Well, he took a second shot, and this time the duck was still there. And tried a third time, and this time the mallard took off and flew away. A little embarrassed in front of his son, the father turned to his son and said, ``Son, you have just witnessed a miracle. You've just seen a dead duck fly.'' [Laughter] Well, all these tax hike schemes have about as much chance of flying as a dead duck. My pledge to veto any tax rate increase remains rock-solid. There will be no tax rate increase in the 100th Congress. It's time Congress cut the Federal budget and left the family budget alone.

And this yearly budget-feeding process must stop. After a long, hard struggle, the American people won a major victory with tax reform. We finally got the special interests out of the tax code, and now it's time to get them out of the budget. And that's why we must not delay. We must act now to pass a constitutional amendment to balance the budget. Most of our States have such a provision in their State constitutions.

And I can tell you, after 8 years as Governor, that most of our States have a budgeting process that is sensible and practical and works; and it makes the Federal Government look like the Mickey Mouse arrangement that it is. And let us act to -- in addition to that constitutional amendment -- swiftly to reform the budget process with the same tool that 43 Governors use to cut waste out of State budgets. Give the President the line-item veto. I haven't had that kind of fun that I would have since I was Governor; because there, in 8 years, I line-itemed 943 times without being overridden.

Well, in the meantime, our elected representatives cannot break their promise to the American people. There can be no backing away from our commitment to the deficit reduction goals of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings. Otherwise, our economic prosperity will never be safe. The pressures for more and more Federal spending will grow until they burst through all remaining constraints. We'll be back where we were 7 years ago with Federal spending running wildly out of control. You remember when, in the '76 election, our opponents coined a thing called the misery index. You added inflation to the unemployment rate. They weren't talking about that along about 1980, because it had grown to more than 20 in total. And now it's down to around a third of that or less. So, we've taken over on the misery index and think it's the proper thing to use. But inflation is going to come back in force, and our economic expansion and the millions of jobs we created -- well, they'll only be a memory.

I've submitted a budget that meets the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit limit for fiscal year 1988. It's a good budget, a sound budget -- the result of hard work by our Cabinet and our agency heads, the ones who have to run the programs. They say that they can run them for the money that we're asking. And up in the Congress, there are people who don't have to run the programs who say it can't be done. It'll keep us on track -- this budget -- toward eliminating deficit spending. It'll help build the foundation for a continued economic expansion with low inflation, high job creation, and a reduced trade deficit. I don't believe them when they say it can't be done. Congress can keep its Gramm-Rudman-Hollings commitment if it wants to; it only has to want to.

This afternoon I thought I'd brief you on important changes that have taken place recently in our administration and on our agenda for the months to come. To begin with, every administration has its own national security team, the group of officials who assist the President in shaping our nation's foreign policy. With the recent addition of Senator Howard Baker as my Chief of Staff, Frank Carlucci as national security adviser, and the nomination of Judge William Webster as the new Director of Central Intelligence, my own national security team is once again complete.

Secretary of State Shultz and Secretary of Defense Weinberger have been members of that team for some time, and let me say now that no President has ever been better served by two such men on his National Security Council. They've given long years of committed service to this Nation in a variety of important positions in government; and the Nation can be grateful, as I, for their intellect, dedication, and integrity. They're also men of strong conviction, men who've never hesitated to give me their unvarnished views on national security issues under consideration. They're men willing to speak up, regardless of the strength of opposition or the natural bureaucratic tendency to compromise or go along. And that's why I consider them so valuable. In the case of the Iranian arms sale matter, both Secretary Shultz and Secretary Weinberger advised me strongly not to pursue the initiative. I weighed their advice but decided in the end that the initiative was worth the risk and went forward. As we now know, it turned out they were right and I was wrong. But they discharged their responsibilities as my advisers and as my subordinates, and I'm enormously grateful that I will continue to be receiving their views in the months ahead, as we move forward with our agenda.

And in these coming months, that word ``agenda'' will be an important one. You see, I've made these important changes here at the White House to see to it that we're back in control and moving ahead with all that you elected me to accomplish. On the domestic side, our agenda will include changes in the Federal budget process and wide-ranging welfare reforms designed to bring to an end the cycle of poverty that has trapped so many needy Americans. And in foreign policy -- well, let me put it this way: America faces great problems in the world but even greater opportunities. We see a chance for significant progress in arms reduction talks with the Soviet Union, provided we maintain a steady course and bargain hard. Yet, at the same time, Soviet adventurism must be dealt with. Central America, in particular, remains of absolutely vital importance to the United States. And here the Congress has crucial decisions to make about whether our nation will truly support democracy and help resist tyranny in a region so close to our own borders. My own commitment remains rock-solid; I will fight any effort to cut off support for the Nicaraguan freedom fighters and consign them to death or defeat. In domestic and foreign policy alike, what it all comes down to is this: We've got a job to do, and for the next 2 years -- with your help and support -- we intend to do it.

Permit me now to turn to two other matters of great importance. First, last year's tax reform meant that early this year millions of Americans found themselves filling out W - 4 forms that were downright confusing. I know; I had to fill one out myself. Well, we heard your complaints and worked with the IRS to come up with a new, much simpler W - 4 form that will be available in about a month. So, the American people took on the tax man and won.

Second, earlier this week, our administration announced reforms at the Food and Drug Administration that will make it easier for victims of AIDS and other life-threatening diseases to obtain new, experimental drugs. This step to roll big government back just a little bit further could very well mean less pain and suffering for thousands of seriously ill Americans. It's a measure, in other words, that's humane in every sense of the word.

And now, if you'll permit me, a final word about a subject that just happens to be close to my Irish heart: St. Patrick's Day. Since the potato famine in the middle of the last century, millions of sons and daughters of Erin have come to America seeking a better life. But of course, whether Irish or not, virtually all of us as Americans trace our ancestry back to immigrants from distant lands, men and women who came to America with a firm willingness to work, asking only freedom. And so, I just have to believe that this coming Tuesday -- well, as Americans, we'll all be entitled to celebrate.

It's a very special pleasure to say Happy St. Patrick's Day to sons and daughters of St. Patrick wherever and whoever they may be. To those of Irish ancestry go my particular greetings on this glorious day.

This is a time when we honor St. Patrick for his missionary achievements some 1,500 springtimes ago, and all the Irish for their accomplishments throughout history. They have done much for civilization throughout the world, and for America. We all recognize the Irish gift for the spoken and written word, for courage, for commitment and for kindness. Irish men and women have written some of our history's most memorable pages in war and in peace.

During the perilous days of our Nation's birth, nine of the signers of our Declaration claimed Irish ancestry and four were Irish-born. No fewer than 20 of our Revolutionary generals were Irish, and John Barry, often called the father of the United States Navy, hailed from County Wexford. Nor were Irishmen lacking among the framers of the Constitution whose bicentennial we celebrate this year. To this day, Irish-Americans continue their contributions to America -- after all, who brought the America's Cup home this year but a lad named Dennis Conner?

From earliest times, women have helped shape our Nation. Historians today stress all that women have meant to our national life, but the rest of us too should remember, with pride and gratitude, the achievements of women throughout American history.

Those achievements span the wide range of human endeavor. They have not been attained without the quiet courage and sacrifice of millions of women, some famed, most not. Women have established themselves in business and the professions, and today women outnumber men as undergraduates at our colleges and universities. Women have fought for moral and social reform and have taken part in and led many great social and political movements of our land. Women have founded many of our philanthropic, cultural, educational, and charitable institutions. Women have served our Nation with valor and distinction during wartime, nursing the wounded, piloting airplanes, performing vital jobs in defense plants. Women have forged a place for themselves in public life, serving on the Supreme Court, in the Congress, and in Cabinet posts; becoming Ambassadors; and holding Federal Executive posts that affect the lives of every citizen.

Most importantly, as women take part in the world of work, they also continue to embrace and nurture the family as they have always done. All Americans can be truly grateful for the role of women as the heart of the family and for their every accomplishment today and throughout our history.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this sixteenth day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

March 16 is the birthday of James Madison, our fourth President. We choose this day to celebrate our freedom of access to information about government because Madison, throughout his life, never ceased to mention the freedoms that help us learn everything we need to know about matters relating to our liberties and all public concerns.

Madison is often called the architect of the Constitution, whose Bicentennial we celebrate this year. He was a leading framer of that charter and was the chief recorder of the Constitutional Convention. He later helped frame the Bill of Rights, the first ten amendments to the Constitution, which spell out guarantees of our rights. He and other Founders knew that only a well-informed and educated citizenry could maintain liberty and that the freedoms of speech, religion, and the press protected by the First Amendment are central to that purpose.

Americans enjoy these freedoms and a free, responsive, and reasonable interaction between members of the public and those in government offices. We have always understood that our freedom of information is compatible with protection of national security and rights of privacy. As we celebrate free access to information as part of our heritage, let us honor the memory of President Madison for the wisdom and the devotion to the liberty of the American people that were his credo and his way of life.

The first distress signal reached the Coast Guard station at Cape May, New Jersey, at 8:20 this past Saturday morning. Just 15 minutes later, the Coast Guard had established radio contact with the stricken vessel -- a Soviet freighter -- and fixed her position at a point some 200 miles east of Cape May. The distress signals were relayed to the Coast Guard Air Station on Cape Cod, and what took place next represents one of the most dramatic rescue missions in the history of the Coast Guard.

Three Coast Guard helicopters left Cape Cod to rendezvous with two C - 130's already flying above the troubled vessel. The first chopper, piloted by Lieutenant Keith Comer, reached the ship at 11:19 a.m. He found her listing 26 degrees to port, in seas that were running 20 feet, with waves that would soon crash over the pilot house, the highest point of the ship. Lieutenant Comer's helicopter was being blasted by rain and sleet and gale force winds that were gusting up to 55 knots. But Lieutenant Comer managed to hover steadily some 75 feet above the ship. And then, with infinite care, he and his crew lowered a wire basket to the pitching deck. A woman was the first to climb into the basket, then others. And in all, Lieutenant Comer and his crew rescued 15 people before heading back to shore. The second helicopter, flown by Captain Richard Hardy, a Canadian Air Force pilot on an exchange program, arrived at 11:40 a.m. and took 16 crewmembers aboard. The third helicopter, piloted by Lieutenant Commander Gary Poll, plucked up the last six crewmembers and carried them to safety. And the only injury in all of this -- a cut finger.

This mission represents just one more example of cooperation between the United States and the Soviet Union in search and rescue missions. Indeed, the Coast Guard and the Soviet merchant marines are scheduled to hold further talks in Moscow early next month. But in the end, the story of this rescue is above all the story of human beings, of men and women in desperate danger and the men and women who saved their lives.

And if I could just interject something here, in the past I've often talked about what would happen if ordinary Americans and people from the Soviet Union could get together -- get together as human beings, as men and women who breathe the same air, share the same concerns about making life better for themselves and their children. And here we have a case where just that happened -- where pilots from Mission Viejo, California, Cincinnati, Ohio, and Prince Edward Island, Canada, reached out to sailors from Leningrad, Novgorod, and Yaroslavl. I hope and pray that, no matter how stormy international affairs, the leaders of the world can look at what happened between these fliers and sailors and be duly inspired. After all, this good planet whirling through space isn't so very different from a ship upon the sea. We must reach out to each other in good will, for we have no other alternative.

And so, to Captain Khurashev and his fine crew rescued from the Soviet vessel: Welcome again to our country, and we thank God for your safety. As you prepare to return home -- I'm going to be very brave here -- Schastlovogo puti [Good journey]. And to all the men and women of the United States Coast Guard who made this rescue possible: As your Commander in Chief, it's my high honor to commend you on a job well done. In your courage, your tenacity, your know-how, you summed up all that is best in the American spirit; in a word, all that is heroic. Congratulations once again! God bless you.

St. Patrick, as we know, was the historic man of God who, with passion and strength of conviction, converted the people of Ireland to Christianity. I have a deep and abiding respect for the accomplishments of St. Patrick, an individual who was able to turn the head of the entire Irish race. Having done my best these last 6 years, even on the minor issues, to convert the likes of Senator Kennedy and Speaker O'Neill -- [laughter] -- I can only stand in awe of such a man. [Laughter] St. Patrick's imprint can be found, even today, on the character of the Irish people and on all of us who trace our roots to Ireland.

One of the most moving moments in my Presidency was my return to Ballyporeen about 3 years ago. I'd like to take this opportunity to thank again the Irish people for giving me such a warm homecoming. I'd also like to take this moment to make two serious points. It was another such visit paid by an American President of Irish descent, John Fitzgerald Kennedy, that resulted in the formation of the American Irish Foundation. For over two decades, the American Irish Foundation has been doing exemplary work on both sides of the Atlantic, underscoring the bonds of affection and blood between our countries. Since 1976 its efforts have been accompanied by those of the Ireland Fund, which is a nonpolitical, nonsectarian organization that raises funds to promote peace, culture, and charity in Ireland. George Bernard Shaw once wrote: ``The worst sin towards our fellow creatures is not to hate them, but to be indifferent to them: That's the essence of inhumanity.'' Well, no one involved in either of these two fine organizations could ever be labeled indifferent. Today it's an honor for me to recognize that the American Irish Foundation and the Ireland Fund are now officially merged into one operation.

This is its first day, and it's called the American Ireland Fund. With us today are William Vincent, Daniel Rooney, and John Brogan. Absent, but who would've been here with them, Tony O'Reilly, chairman of that organization. And good luck to them, and good luck to all of you. And God bless the fine work that is being done. This type of commitment, this individual responsibility, is a part of the American way of life, perhaps a part that can be traced back to Ireland. I know in my own family we were far from affluent, but we were raised -- taught -- to help others.

On this special day, one can't help but think of the suffering that still plagues St. Patrick's island. For nearly two decades, the north has been torn by sectarian violence that has taken the lives of more than 2,500 men, women, and children. This brutal and senseless violence against people and destruction of property is a poison of no possible benefit, an elixir of death and heartbreak that, for humanity's sake and all of Ireland's sake, must be set aside. Out of this tragic situation, the Governments of the United Kingdom and Ireland took a courageous and farsighted step in November of 1985 when they signed the Anglo-Irish Agreement. The United States supports this accord as a realistic framework within which the problems of Northern Ireland can be addressed, an avenue which holds the best hope of political stability and economic regeneration. This agreement was warmly welcomed here, yet we cannot ignore that since its signing, violence has continued in the north. I think the time has long since come when people of good will -- north and south and on both sides of the Atlantic -- should draw the line and let the perpetrators and supporters of this violence and mayhem know that they will no longer be tolerated.

For our part, the United States continues to stand ready to help. Last year Congress authorized and I signed into law a contribution of $120 million to the International Fund for Ireland. And just this morning, I signed the necessary certification that will allow us to begin disbursement. This effort, along with private contributions, has accomplished much, but there is a long way to go. Now is the time for people in and out of government to move forward aggressively. Social harmony and economic progress in Ireland will not come easy, but better, more peaceful times will come. Together, the people of Ireland and the United States can make that happen.

It was over 1,400 years ago when legend tells us that St. Brendan set forth in his leather boat and headed west. He came back with stories of a new world. Today our task is not so easy. If we are to have a new world, we must build it, and we must do it together. So, on this St. Patrick's Day, I express the best wishes of the people of the United States to our cousins and friends, the people of Ireland. O mo chroi amach [From the bottom of my heart], thank you, and God bless you.

Speaker Wright, distinguished Members of the House and Senate, honored guests, it's a pleasure for me to be with you sharing in the spirit of this magnificent day. And talk about the luck of the Irish, I got over that case of the laryngitis that was plaguing me last week just in time for St. Patrick's Day. [Laughter] Looking around this room -- especially when I see my old friend, Tip O'Neill -- I can't help but feel that we're living testimony to the notion that Irishmen love a good scrap. Some of us have been in a few of them in our day, and before we leave Washington, I'm certain we'll be in a few more.

Throughout our history, Americans of Irish descent have played such a role. The first St. Patrick's Day parade in Boston was recorded as far back as 1737. It's interesting to note that during the American Revolution, it was on St. Patrick's Day, 1776, when the British ended their occupation of Boston and evacuated the city. One can only wonder if it was the American cannons on Dorchester Heights or the thought of spending -- enduring -- another St. Patrick's Day celebration that demoralized them so. [Laughter] But seriously though, we Americans of Irish descent can be proud of the part our ancestors played in building this great country, even from its earliest days. Ben Franklin may have been the first to note the Irish influence. In 1784 he wrote, ``It is a fact that the Irish immigrants and their children are now in possession of the government in Pennsylvania, by their majority in the Assembly as well as of a great part of the territory; and I remember well the first ship that brought any of them over.'' Benjamin Franklin said that. One wonders what old Ben would say if he were to be with us at this gathering today. Knowing that he was a man who loved a good time, I'm certain that he'd put on a shamrock and call himself Benjamin O'Franklin just for the occasion.

Well, it's my privilege, if you will allow me -- and please do this in the Philadelphia style, which is that you only rise to toast the dead. I'm still worried about your rising a moment ago. [Laughter] But to our guest, the Prime Minister of Ireland.

I am pleased to announce today several steps being taken to ensure that the United States continues to work closely with the Canadian Government in determining and addressing the environmental effects of acid rain. These actions resulted from a review of this issue I directed my Domestic Policy Council to undertake, and are consistent with the recommendations made by the joint envoys on acid rain, Drew Lewis, of the United States, and William Davis, of Canada. Prime Minister Mulroney and I endorsed their recommendations in March 1986. This past year government-to-government coordination and research cooperation with Canada on acid rain problems have been substantially strengthened, as recommended by the envoys. The administration also has implemented the initial phase of the Department of Energy Clean Coal Technology Program and has completed an inventory of Federal, State, and private clean coal research and demonstration projects, which are expected to expend more than $6 billion by 1992.

The first will be to seek the full amount of the Government's share of funding recommended by the joint envoys -- $2.5 billion -- for demonstration of innovative control technology over a 5-year period. Five hundred million dollars will be requested for fiscal years 1988 and 1989 to fund innovative emissions control projects. I will also encourage industry to invest an equal or greater amount over this period and to stimulate development and deployment of innovative technologies for reduction of air pollution emissions. This builds on activities already underway in the Department of Energy Clean Coal Technology Program.

The second step I am taking is to direct the Secretary of Energy to establish an advisory panel. This panel, which will include participation by State governments and by the Government of Canada, will advise the Secretary of Energy on funding and selection of innovative control technologies projects. Projects will be selected, as fully as practicable, using the criteria recommended by the joint envoys.

Third, I am asking the Vice President to have the Presidential Task Force on Regulatory Relief, which he chairs, review Federal and State economic and regulatory programs to identify opportunities for addressing environmental concerns under existing laws. The task force will examine incentives and disincentives to the deployment of new emissions control technologies and other cost-effective, innovative emission reduction measures now inhibited by various Federal, State, and local regulations. The findings and results of the task force review will be reported in 6 months along with any recommendations for changes to existing regulations.

I have advised Prime Minister Mulroney of these decisions. Next month I will travel to Canada to discuss these and other issues with the Prime Minister. I feel these steps will help both countries to better understand and address this shared environmental problem, so that future specific actions that are taken will be cost-effective and represent appropriate taxpayer expenditures.

Section 1. The acquisition, transfer (including transfer on the books of any issuer, holder, or depositary), payment, disposition, transportation, exportation, or withdrawal of, or the recording of interest in or ownership of, or any deed of title, mortgage, or other evidence of ownership or title regarding or dealing in, any real or personal property, of any kind whatsoever, located in the United States and described in Section 2 of this Order is prohibited unless expressly authorized by the Secretary of the Treasury under such terms and conditions as he may prescribe.

Sec. 3. Upon the entry of final judgment and after exhaustion of any appeals that might be taken, as well as satisfaction of any judgment, in any action in which the property described in Section 2 was sought, the property shall no longer be subject to the prohibition contained in Section 1 of this Order.

Section 1. The Director of the Office of Personnel Management is hereby delegated authority to prepare and submit to the Congress a report concerning the desirability, feasibility, and cost, if any, of permitting Federal employees voluntarily to donate annual and sick leave for the use of other Federal employees who need such leave for medical or family emergency or other hardship situations.

Attached you will find the unclassified version of the report. The classified version, which sets forth recommendations which we believe will assist the U.S. counterintelligence community to curtail espionage against the United States, will be forwarded separately by my Assistant for National Security Affairs.

As you will recall, the Administration, in concert with the Congress, undertook a comprehensive review of our counterintelligence, security and countermeasures plans, programs and capabilities. The results of this review were detailed in my report to Congress on November 14, 1986. That study sets forth, in far more detail than this report, policies and programs which I have directed be established and/or improved to deal with the hostile intelligence threat to the national security of the United States. We are continuing to work very hard to put in place these recommended changes. Clearly, sufficient funding to implement fully counterintelligence, security and countermeasures improvements remains a limiting factor.

While we cannot ensure espionage can be completely curtailed, I am pleased that the Administration and Congress together are making significant progress to deal with this problem, and it remains a matter of high national priority.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Bonnie Guiton to be Assistant Secretary for Vocational and Adult Education, Department of Education. She would succeed Robert Melvin Worthington.

The White House today sent to the Congress a series of proposed steps to streamline the Government's export control procedures for high technology items. These proposals are part of the President's energetic program to enhance America's competitiveness in the world economy. This nation's ability to export its high technology products and services is central to our ability to compete. At the same time, we remain mindful of aggressive Soviet efforts to acquire Western technology. Soviet successes in this area have contributed directly to Soviet military capability and have cost the American taxpayer dearly as the United States seeks to maintain its technological lead.

The proposals submitted today will simplify export procedures and eliminate administrative burdens on U.S. exporters. They include the exemption from license requirements of a number of low technology items, which should reduce the total number of export license applications by almost 10 percent. The proposals will also eliminate the need for reexport authorization to coordinating committee for multilateral export controls (COCOM) countries and will put in place a certified end-user program whereby COCOM country government-related enterprises will not need validated export licenses. Another proposal will allow foreign manufacturers to reexport U.S. parts and components up to a certain level without U.S. Government reexport authorization.

The administration looks forward to working with the Congress in the export control system in a way that meets the needs of American exporters and protects our fundamental national security interests.

The President. I have a little statement here. I know that you have other questions on your mind, but there is an issue that I feel is also important to address this evening. So, I'll just go with this. For the last 6 years we've fought the good fight to get government spending under control, and it hasn't been easy. And as we've begun to rein in Federal spending, we've been able to bring taxes down and subdue the monster of inflation. Our combined program of tax cuts, deregulation, and spending cuts is working -- in fact, is working miracles.

But now, even before Congress has drawn up their budget, some there are saying that they want to back away from our commitment to Gramm-Rudman-Hollings. Some are even saying they want to raise taxes again on the American people. Well, I'm sorry, but that just isn't going to happen. The American people worked long and hard to cut tax rates and win tax reform, and my pledge to veto any tax rate increase remains rock-solid. It's time Congress cut the Federal budget and left the family budget alone. We would not have to fight this battle all year, every year, if the congressional budget process were not so desperately in need of reform. The budget process at the Federal level is unworkable, and this yearly deficit-feeding process must stop. We must act now to pass a constitutional amendment to balance the budget. In the meantime, our elected representatives cannot break their promise to the American people and back away from the commitment to the deficit reduction goals of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings.

Now, before we get started, let me also add that after our last press conference I felt it was important for the Tower commission to complete its work and report its findings. And that has now happened. I have accepted their recommendations, and many are in the process of being implemented.

Q. Sir, Terry Anderson was taken captive in Lebanon 2 years and 4 days ago, and today there are 8 Americans held hostage there. How has the Iran-contra affair complicated your efforts to win the release of the hostages?

The President. Well, that's rather hard to tell right now. Indeed, the affair did get some hostages released, and if it hadn't leaked, I don't know -- whether the word of what we were doing there -- I don't know whether we would have gotten more out. As the day that the information leaked and everything when public, it was my understanding that the other two were due out in the next few days. But we're going to continue to explore, as we always have, every opportunity to try and get them out. I happen to believe that when an American citizen anyplace in the world is unjustly denied their constitutional rights to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness, it is the responsibility of this government to restore those rights.

Q. Mr. President, there have been reports that you were told, directly or indirectly, at least twice, that the contras were benefiting from the Iran arms sales. Is that true, or were you deceived and lied to by Admiral Poindexter and Colonel North? And I'd like to follow up.

The President. Helen, let me just say, no, that is not true at all. When I went on the air right after the news broke and told what we had been doing and what our policy was in getting into this affair, I did not know at that time that there was any money involved. I only knew that we had received our $12 million for the weapons which we had agreed to sell. Then, a little later, when the Attorney General told me that he had come upon something that indicated that there was something to do with money in Swiss bank accounts -- and I couldn't imagine what it could be because, as I say, we got our money -- but I said that I thought we ought to go public with that, again, so that you had all the information that we had and not to wait and have someone uncover this and think we were trying to cover up or something. So, that was late on Monday afternoon. Tuesday morning, the first thing, we went before the joint leadership of the Congress and told them what we'd learned, that all we'd learned was that there was evidently some money having to do with this whole arrangement over there and involving some Swiss bank accounts. And then I came into the press room to all of you and told you.

Q. Mr. President, is it possible that two military officers who are trained to obey orders grabbed power, made major foreign policy moves, didn't tell you when you were briefed every day on intelligence? Or did they think they were doing your bidding?

Q. Sir, Robert McFarlane, who was then your national security adviser, says that in August of 1985, he called you on the telephone and asked if you wanted to give the green light to Israel to send arms to Iran and have them replenished from U.S. stocks, and that you said you did. And he said that he reminded you in that conversation that your Secretaries of State and Defense were against it, and you said you understood that, but you explained to him the reasons why you wanted to authorize it. Do you have no memory of that, whatsoever?

The President. Sam, all I know is that my memory didn't fail me on the fact that I had agreed to this thing. The only thing I could not recall was at what point was I asked. And as a result of that and not being able to recall when I gave this permission, we now have quite a system installed of people taking notes in all our meetings and all our doings.

The President. Oh, no, no, as I say, I can't remember just when, in all the calls and meetings and so forth, this was presented and when I gave the go-ahead. But this was a thing in which the Israelis were willing to sell weaponry -- mainly TOW missiles -- and wanted to know, if they did, if we would agree to sell them replacements when and if they needed it.

Q. Mr. President, you said that in your heart you still believe that it wasn't an arms-for-hostage deal, but that the weight of the evidence presented by the Tower commission convinced you that it was. In your heart, do you now believe that it was an arms-for-hostages deal from the beginning, as the Tower commission said, and that the policy was flawed?

The President. But it could be that the policy was flawed in that it did deteriorate into what I myself, when I went on the air recently, said was arms for hostages. But let me just as briefly as I can take you through the steps which I did from the very beginning. We had, by way of Israel, a report that there were responsible people, some from the Government of Iran, but not necessarily in the inner circle with Khomeini, who wanted to see if they could not open a dialog with representatives from the United States that would lead to a better understanding -- and I'm sure that they had in mind a future Government of Iran -- that we could have the kind of relationship that we'd had once earlier. I thought -- because our policy had always been based on trying to restore a relationship with a country that is very important strategically, and also behind the scenes to try and get an end to that war, an end with no victor, no vanquished, both countries retiring to their own boundaries and so forth. So, I wasn't going to miss that opportunity, and I approved our going ahead.

One of the first things brought up in the meeting with those who were representing us was that these people said that they, for two reasons, needed something like -- and they mentioned the arms sales. It came from them, not us. They said, one, for their own prestige, it would give them a standing with the people that they would have to be dealing with in the future, including the military leaders. And at the same time, it would assure them that the people they were dealing with did have access to our government at the highest levels and they could trust them to deal. And so, our answer to that was that we had a policy of not doing business with a country that supported terrorism and Iran was on that list. Well, they made quite a pitch that they, too, were opposed to terrorism and that they had even done some things counter to terrorism, terrorist activities, and so forth. Well, our reply to them was there is a very practical way in which you can prove that, and that is use your influence to get the hostages out. Now, I have never believed, and I don't believe now, that Iran can give orders to the Hizballah [radical Shi'ite group in Lebanon] but there is a philosophical relationship there that we thought they might be able to be persuasive. And they've indicated that that was true.

Now, with no further information than that until I read the Tower commission report, after appointing the Tower commission to get to the bottom of this thing and see what was going on, then I found that the strategy talks had disappeared completely, and led by the Iranians, the conversation was totally arms-for-hostages. So, I don't see where I could say now that isn't what it degenerated into.

The President. No, I would not go down that same road again. I will keep my eyes open for any opportunity again for improving relations. And we will continue to explore every legitimate means of getting our hostages back for the reason that I explained earlier.

Q. Mr. President, Iran and Nicaragua are important up our way in Buffalo, but more important is Canada. Because we're right there on the border, and the number one irritant in U.S.-Canadian relations is acid rain. Now, you're going up there next month, and yesterday you announced a $2\1/2\ billion, 5-year program. But many Canadians and environmental groups in this country feel you haven't gone far enough. They feel that the U.S. Government should set standards for these emissions that cause acid rain. Is your administration giving any consideration to the establishment of standards?

The President. Yes, let me say that we've not just been sitting here holding back or anything. We have that joint commission with them to get at this problem. We have found out that the further we've gone the more complex the issue of the source of acid rain becomes. And so what we've been trying to do is avoid going down some avenue that would disappoint us. And we wouldn't really solve the problem, but we would've wasted our resources. We've made some progress in learning things that can be done, and we were ready to make this move. There are others probably yet to come. We're still investigating this.

The President. Everybody will be brought into this thing as to find out how we can solve it. But at the moment, too, we're dealing with the private sector, with the industries and so forth that would be involved in this.

Q. Mr. President, thank you. At your last news conference 4 months ago, you said that the U.S. had nothing to do with Israeli arms shipments to Iran when you knew that that was not true. Why did you say that?

The President. Chris, I'm glad you asked that, because I've read at great length references to that and heard them on the air. I'm glad to explain. When I left here after that press conference and went back there, and our people were waiting back there and had been watching on the monitor what was going on, they told me what I had said. And it was evidently just a misstatement on my part. I did not know that I had said it in such a way as to seemingly deny Israel's participation. And when they told me this, and when I finished bumping my head, I said to them, ``Quick, write down a correction of this.'' I didn't realize that in there maybe I'd talked too long. I said: ``I didn't realize that I had said that or given that impression. We've got to get this message to all of you before you went to work on your stories.'' So, it was just a misstatement that I didn't realize that I had made.

Q. But the fact is that you were asked it four times in that news conference, and you made this inadvertent statement four times. You were specifically asked about Israel's role. And during that early period, it now turns out that there were a series of statements you made that were misleading. One of the first statements was you said that the whole story that came out of the Mideast was without foundation.

The President. Well, right. But then, what I was trying to do -- and I think some of you will recall this -- I was trying to plead with all of you, hoping that this leak that came from that weekly paper in Beirut could be corralled, because I wanted to explain that we didn't know but what the lives of the people we'd been dealing with would be endangered, and certainly our hostages could be in danger. And so this was all I was trying to say, and I remember saying, ``Please, stop speculating, and stop asking questions.'' I didn't know how far we could go before we could get someone killed. And when David Jacobsen came here and met with you in the Rose Garden, he repeated that without knowing that I had said it. He said the same thing, and quite passionately: that you could get some people killed if we kept on with that story.

Q. If I may ask my question, sir, do you feel an obligation always to tell the truth to the American people, or sometimes do you feel you may have to mislead, as in that case, saying it's without foundation for a higher diplomatic purpose?

Q. Mr. President, speaking to young people in your reelection campaign in '84, you referred to government as a sacred trust, and you said we're going to keep this trust. The Tower report says that some of your officials in your administration made untruthful statements, and you've acknowledged here that it became a trade of arms for hostages. Do you feel that you've kept your promise that you made in that campaign to the young people and that your government has?

The President. Yes, I do. And from the very first, I told you all everything I know about this situation. I am still waiting to find out the source of extra money, the bank accounts, and where that extra money went. And that's why I appointed the Tower commission to get to the bottom of this and a special prosecutor. You see, I'm old-fashioned; I call these independent counsels -- I still call them special prosecutors.

Q. If I could follow, sir: Are you distressed that even your own polls show that a majority of American people, including many who voted for you, believe that you're not telling the full truth on the Iran-contra affair?

Q. Mr. President, in view of what you told the Tower board and what they concluded -- that you had difficulty recalling the decision and the timing of the decision to send the arms to Iran -- is it at all conceivable that you may also have forgotten being told about the diversion of funds to the contras?

The President. Oh, no. You would have heard me without opening the door to the office if I had been told that at any time. No. And I still do not have the answer to that money. The only thing that I can see is that somebody in the interplay of transporting the weapons must have put an additional price on them. We asked for $12 million, which was the cost -- no profit on those weapons -- and we got our $12 million back. And it was a complete surprise to me to discover that there was any additional money. And this, I think, is the thing -- we're still waiting for that to be explained.

Q. If I could follow in a related element, then, Mr. North is quoted in the Tower report in a memo he wrote as saying: ``The President obviously knows why; he has been meeting with select people to thank them for their support for democracy in Central America.'' Were you aware that such meetings that you attended were being used to solicit funds from private citizens in the U.S. for Central America for the contras?

The President. I knew that there were many people privately giving money to things of that kind, in the country here, but the people I met with -- and I subsequently found out that some of them were doing this. But when I met with them, I met with them to thank them because they had raised money to put spot ads on television in favor of the contras in an effort to try and influence Congress to continue giving aid. And I thought that was worth a thanks. I've gone to the public many times since I've been here to get the public to help put the pressure on the Congress for us to get some worthwhile cause.

The President. Well, you know, I thought somebody might ask about that, and I just brought something in here with me. Marshal Grechko, Soviet Minister of Defense in 1972, proclaimed about the ABM treaty: ``It imposes no limitations on the performance, the research, and experimental work aimed at resolving the problem of defending the country against nuclear missile attack.'' Now, when some time ago we realized that there was this belief that the ABM treaty had an interpretation that could be more liberal than we had been using, it still didn't change anything with SDI because there was no need for us to go beyond what we were doing. But as we progressed and developed SDI, we realized we were coming to a time in which that narrow interpretation of the ABM treaty could interfere with and set us back in what we were trying to accomplish. And this is when we took a look at this broader interpretation. And I know that Mr. Sofaer over in the State Department is looking into this, and he believes that there is legally a more liberal interpretation. Now, we're a nation of laws; we want to stay within the law. But at the same time, we believe that the Soviet Union has been going even beyond a liberal interpretation of the treaty. They've been going beyond the treaty in some of the things they are doing.

The President. Actually, we haven't made a decision, because we're still operating within the narrow limits and have no reason to go outside them as yet, and it'll be some time before we do. But we're all of us studying this, and we haven't arrived at a decision or to -- set a date yet.

Q. Mr. President, to follow up Bill's question, the Tower report said that the arms deal with Iran should never have been made in the first place. You have said that you accept the Tower commission report.

Q. And yet your friends say that in private you still have a deep feeling that you do not feel it was wrong to sell arms in the beginning. I want to know, Mr. President, in your heart do you feel that you were right or were you wrong in selling arms to Iran?

The President. We had quite a debate, and it was true that two of our Cabinet members were very much on the other side. And it turned out they were right, because, as I say, it did deteriorate into that. But what my position was, and still is, you are faced with some kidnapers; they have kidnaped some of our citizens. Now, you cannot do business with them. There's no way that you can discuss ransom or do them any favor which makes taking hostages profitable. But suddenly an opportunity to get into a conversation with a third party, and you find that that third party maybe can do something you can't do, that they can have an influence on these people over here, these kidnapers, and get your people free. I did not see that as trading anything with the kidnapers. They didn't get any advantage out of this; they didn't show any profit on what was going on. And the place where I was wrong was in not realizing that once that pressure was put on from the other side -- and it did stem from the Iranian representatives -- they saw an opportunity, they thought, to start bargaining for more weapons than that more or less token amount that we had agreed to sell, and to put the price at varying numbers of hostages. So, I still believe that if someone in my family was kidnaped and I went out and hired someone that I thought could get that person safely home, that would not be engaging in ransom of the victim.

Q. If I could follow up, Mr. President, you're still arguing that somehow this event deteriorated; it went awry as it went along. I want to know whether you think it was wrong or right in the beginning.

The President. Well, if I hadn't thought it was right in the beginning, we never would have started that. It was an opportunity presented by people evidently of some substance in the Iranian Government to open up a channel to probably better relations between our two countries, maybe even leading to more influence in getting this terrible war ended there in the Middle East. And they, themselves -- when we entered into this, there wasn't any thought of hostages in this particular thing; they'd never been mentioned. It was only when they put in this request, as I've explained, for arms and we had to explain that we didn't do business with people that supported terrorism, that they offered to prove that they weren't supportive of terrorism, either. And this is how we weren't going to overlook an opportunity if we could get those hostages back. And we're not going to overlook an opportunity in the future. But we're not going to try the same thing again, because we see how it worked.

Q. Mr. President, setting aside what the Iran initiative turned into, as you were setting the policy in motion, did you give consideration to how our Arab friends in the region would think about the United States sending arms to their mortal enemy?

The President. I think we have a very good relationship -- better than we've had in many, many decades -- with the countries in the Middle East, and I think that we have proven our friendship for them to the place that they could understand what we are doing. But I also think it ought to be noted that countries in the Middle East, countries in Europe, countries in Asia, and the Communist bloc have been selling arms to both sides in this war for the last few years, and they've been selling about almost four times as much to Iraq as they have to Iran. And the biggest amount of sales is coming from the Communist bloc to both countries. So, what I was sure of was that we were not affecting military balance between the two countries with the small amount that we were going to sell.

Q. If I may follow up, sir: You've said that Defense Secretary Weinberger and Secretary Shultz opposed the policy, that you weighed their views and decided to go ahead anyway. Given all the other concerns that you have to deal with as President, how much thought did you give to this policy? Was it a casual thing, or did you give it quite an extensive going over before you embraced the policy?

The President. This is a problem that we are studying, and I'm expecting some reports momentarily on this. We have to study this. This is why we increased the strategic reserve since we've been here. But we have to do more than that. And I have also asked Congress already for some acts that I think would improve the situation here domestically. It involves elimination of the windfall profits tax; it involves the deregulation of natural gas, some other things that we've already asked Congress for. So far, we haven't gotten them as yet.

The President. Well, it certainly would be if we were ever faced with a crisis. And what has happened to us is that here, in our standard of living and all, they can't find and produce oil for the price that it has gone back down to. It was only the high price that could keep them in business.

Q. Long before the diversion of funds to the contras, the Tower board has documented 2 years of an extensive U.S. military support for the contras at a time when Congress ruled that to be illegal -- air strips, phony corporations, tax-exempt foundations -- all directed by Oliver North and John Poindexter and, before them, Robert McFarlane, out of the White House. And the question is, how could all this be taking place -- millions and millions of dollars -- without you having known about it, especially at a time when you were calling the contras the moral equivalent of our Founding Fathers?

The President. Andrea [Andrea Mitchell, NBC News], I don't believe -- I was aware that there are private groups and private individuals in this country -- I don't believe it was counter to our law that these people were voluntarily offering help, just as we've seen in the past. We had a thing called the Abraham Lincoln Brigade in Spain in the civil war there. And I don't know how much that would amount to. I don't know whether it's enough to keep them in business or not. But I do know that it is absolutely vital that we not back away from this. We've had some experiences in our country where the Congress has turned on a President. Angola was the most recent example, perhaps -- when in Angola, when it ceased being a colony and the civil war broke out there and there was a Communist faction and there was a group that wanted democracy. And an American President asked Congress just for money -- no blood, just money to help the democratic people of Angola have a democratic government. They don't have a democratic government; they have a Communist government now, and there are 37,000 Cuban soldiers fighting their battle.

Q. But, sir, if you were truly unaware of the millions of dollars in government money and government operations that North and Poindexter were directing to the contras, what does this -- respectfully, what does this say about your management style? You have said in your speech that your management style in the contra-Iran affair did not match your previous track record. The Tower board criticized your management style. If you were unaware of these things and forgot when you actually approved the Iranian arms sale, what does it say about the way you've been managing the Presidency?

The President. Andrea, I've been reading a great deal about my management style. I think that most people in business will agree that it is a proper management style. You get the best people you can to do a job; then you don't hang over their shoulder criticizing everything they do or picking at them on how they're doing it. You set the policy -- and I set the policy in this administration -- and they are then to implement it. And the only time you move is if the evidence is incontrovertible that they are not following policy or they have gone down a road in which they're not achieving what we want. And I think that that is a good management policy.

The President. I'm not going to comment now, because all that you've mentioned are involved in investigations. And I, more than anyone, want these investigations to proceed so that I know, and will know, what has been going on that had been kept from me in various covert operations.

As I said last evening at my press conference, our administration will keep its commitment to the American people. We will not raise taxes; we will hold down spending; and we will adhere to the deficit reduction goals imposed by the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings legislation. And it is with this commitment in mind that I have informed congressional leaders of my intention to veto the highway and transit bill that is on its way to my desk.

Let me be very clear: I am in full support of reasonable funding levels for these programs, similar to the legislation passed by the Senate. But I am adamantly opposed to the excessive spending that is in the bill as it emerged from the conference committee. I've said before and repeat today: Congress can't have it both ways. They cannot talk about cutting unnecessary deficit spending and then vote in favor of bills that bust the budget. The American people clearly expect their elected leaders to vote the same way they talk. So, my vote will be to veto bills that spend unnecessary billions on projects the American people cannot afford.

The President. Well, I think I have a duty here. Incidentally, I want you to know how wonderful it is to have all of you here. We're very honored to have you here with us for this particular occasion. You know, sometimes my friends in the Congress and I have differences on certain subjects, but I think here, on this particular one, I assure you, that we will continue our joint efforts in support of the freedom fighters efforts to win back your country's freedom. Free people everywhere agree that there can be no compromise on the goal of Afghan independence, and that means the total withdrawal of all Soviet forces and the full self-determination of the Afghan people. No other settlement will end that war.

The people of Afghanistan traditionally celebrate March 21 as the start of their new year. For the friends of the Afghan people, the date has another meaning: it is an occasion to reaffirm publicly our long-standing support of the Afghan struggle for freedom. That struggle seized the attention of the world in December 1979 when a massive Soviet force invaded, murdered one Marxist ruler, installed another, and attempted to crush a widespread resistance movement.

Despite a 7-year reign of terror by over 115,000 Soviet troops, the Soviet attempt to subjugate the Afghans has failed. The puppet Kabul regime remains weak and illegitimate. The resistance movement has fought the Soviet army to a standstill. And the Afghan people, whose support for the resistance is overwhelming, have continued to show an indomitable will to be free.

During the past year, the Afghan people have advanced their cause in a variety of ways. On the political front, the resistance Alliance has grown more cohesive and more effective. One major step in this direction occurred January 17, when the seven Alliance leaders put forward their own comprehensive plan for a free Afghanistan. The Alliance has also become the focal point for the distribution of social services and humanitarian resources inside the country, thereby helping to stem the outflow of refugees and laying the basis for reestablishing a free Afghanistan.

On the battlefield, the resistance has demonstrated growing strength. Notable achievements include an increased ability to counter communist air power, the renewal of heavy military pressure on Kabul, the resurgence of resistance activity in the north, and the defeat of communist efforts to consolidate control over Kandahar and Herat, Afghanistan's second and third largest cities.

The success of the resistance may well have prompted the Soviets to demonstrate a new interest in the political side of the conflict. While we welcome statements that the Soviets wish to bring about a political settlement and to withdraw their troops, we shall continue to gauge their intentions by the only accurate measurement -- their actions.

Thus far, Soviet proposals have lacked realism and substance. They appear to be aimed at deceiving world opinion rather than at seeking peace and self-determination. A cease-fire without reference to the withdrawal of Soviet troops is meaningless. National reconciliation with a communist-dominated government as its starting point and its foreordained result is a sham that the resistance, the refugees, and the people of Afghanistan will never accept.

Acts of war by the Soviet Union and its Afghan allies totally belie conciliatory intentions. As peace talks began in Geneva last month, communist aircraft swept into Pakistani territory three times in as many days and bombed refugee camps and crowded bazaars, killing over 100 people and wounding 250. Around the same time, terror bombings inside Pakistan -- notably a February 19 blast outside an Afghan refugee office and a nearby school -- also started to increase. These acts represent a crude attempt to dispirit the resistance and to intimidate Pakistan into abandoning its courageous and principled support of the Afghan people. Such attempts have not worked before and will not work now.

Negotiations to bring this war to an end have been taking place in Geneva for over 5 years. We support them. The U.N. negotiator has announced that a timetable for the withdrawal of Soviet troops is the sole remaining obstacle to a settlement. On this matter, we endorse Pakistan's statements that such a timetable must be based solely on logistical criteria and be expressed in terms of months, a very few months, not years.

By presenting unrealistic timetables apparently designed to crush the resistance and achieve a military solution before the Red Army withdraws, the onus for continued fighting falls on the Soviets and their Afghan puppets. The U.N.-sponsored talks are currently suspended. Meanwhile, the Pakistanis have held firm on the key requisites, including Afghan self-determination. As a result there are some faint indications that the Soviets may have begun to understand the need for a realistic political solution.

In these circumstances, it is important to maintain steadily increasing pressure on the Soviets. It is essential that we and others continue to support Pakistan in the face of increasing cross-border attacks and sabotage attempts. Most important, it is essential that we and others continue our support of the brave struggle by the Afghan resistance. We must not let up until all Soviet troops depart and the Afghan people are free to determine their own future. Nothing less will suffice. I am proud of the strong support provided over the past 6 years by my Administration, by the Congress, and by the American people. I am confident we shall continue to stand firm and not falter.

As we approach the 1990's, America must be prepared to formulate energy policy with boldness and vision. Virtually every sector of our highly complex, technological, and interdependent society requires a reliable energy source to keep it functioning smoothly and efficiently.

Community leaders and school officials, both public and private, can help ensure that we meet our energy needs by focusing public attention on the crucial role of education about energy issues. A deeper understanding by teachers, students, and all our leaders of tomorrow about the nature of the energy challenges that lie before us is necessary if we are to continue to meet our energy requirements both at home and abroad.

America is already meeting its energy needs in many important ways. We are continuing to fill the Strategic Petroleum Reserve to reach an eventual goal of 750 million barrels. At the same time, we are also seeking to encourage nuclear power plant construction that is reliable, cost-effective, and environmentally sound. We have made much progress in energy -- and by combining the technology of today with the promise and vision of American know-how tomorrow, America will continue to be in the forefront of energy production into the 21st century.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twentieth day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

This weekend marks the beginning of spring. Already, here at Camp David, the crocuses are pushing up out of the ground. From now on, the days will be longer than the nights, the air will be getting warmer, the grass greener, and soon the countryside will be in full bloom. There are all sorts of positive signs in our economy, too. Job creation hasn't slowed a bit. Last month alone we created 337,000 jobs. Employment has reached record highs. Poverty is declining. Tax rates are falling, and family income is rising.

Yes, indeed, spring is here, but there's one abiding problem that could plunge us right back into economic winter. That problem isn't in our economy. I'm afraid to say that problem is in the United States Congress, and it's called the budget process. The budget process is, indeed, a sorry spectacle: deadlines delayed or missed completely, huge continuing resolutions that camouflage the worst kind of special interest spending. Budget process? It's more like a magic show. It's wink and blink and smoke and mirrors and pulling rabbits out of hats, but almost all that ever comes up are designs to hide increases for the special interests.

Before I get into the need for budget reform, I want to speak to an issue that's frequently misunderstood. Now, we met our deadline and submitted to Congress a fiscal year 1988 budget that meets the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit reduction goal without raising taxes. It's a sound budget, the result of hard work by our Cabinet and agency heads, and they're the people who run the programs.

A priority item in this year's budget is the continuation of our battle against drug abuse. We have tripled spending on drug programs since 1981. Well, last year we added $900 million for the purchase of helicopters, airplanes, and certain facilities. Now we're charged with cutting next year's budget by $900 million, proving that we aren't sincere about our crusade against drug abuse. Well, this was a one-time expenditure we don't have to repeat every year. As a matter of fact, we will still be spending some of that $900 million in the coming years, but it won't show in the '88 budget. In other words, the car is bought; now all we have to do is buy the gas and change the oil. The fact that the drug issue has been so misrepresented demonstrates how politically charged the whole budget issue is. And that all makes reform difficult, but not impossible.

There's a movement afoot in Congress, led by Senator Pete Domenici and other responsible legislators, to introduce some badly needed order into the budget process. One idea that deserves consideration is a 2-year budget cycle. A 2-year cycle for the defense budget has been initiated, and we'll be looking into the use for the total budget. Another real improvement would be individual appropriations bills that Congress delivers on time. Last year Congress missed all -- yes, all -- its deadlines and greeted me with what they call a continuing resolution at the end of the year. Now, that document was over 1,200 pages long and weighed 18\1/4\ pounds. Now, that's what you call heavy reading. It contained the appropriations for practically our entire government, and I either had to veto it and close down the government or approve the whole thing, pork and all. The third reform would give me greater power to veto waste through so-called enhanced rescission authority. Now, this is much like the line-item veto, except that my recommendations for spending cuts could be overturned by a simple majority vote in either House of Congress. In other words, no sneak-by, back-door spending. If Congress wants certain spending, they can have it; but they have to stand up, be counted, and vote for it.

Yet another step in the right direction is credit reform. Last week we sent up to the Congress our Federal Credit Reform Act of 1987. This bill would enable the public, the Congress, and the administration to evaluate accurately the costs and benefits of direct loans and loan guarantees -- costs that are now the subject of guess, speculation, and surmise.

We intend to work with those in Congress who are striving to put us back on the road to budget sanity. And just as we've done with credit reform, the administration will propose additional elements in what will be a comprehensive budget-process reform package. These reforms are important to you because they're a key to continued economic growth and job creation. It's time to put politics aside and do what the Congress knows has to be done sooner or later anyway: give the American people a budget process that controls spending, a budget process we can be proud of.

It was 4 years ago today that America's Strategic Defense Initiative was set in motion. Then, in a television address to the Nation, I called on America's scientific community to determine if it were possible to develop a defense against ballistic missiles, a system based on deterring aggression through protection rather than threatening retaliation, a system that could, perhaps, free the world from the threat of these deadly weapons. And so, in March 1983 America and its allies began on the journey toward finding a defense against ballistic missiles.

Today, 4 years later, we have made remarkable progress towards that great objective. This is to the credit of the many members of our scientific and technical communities who joined this effort and to the Members of the Congress who have supported this plan. They understood that the Soviet Union has been working for more than a decade on its own strategic defense systems, even while it has been deploying hundreds of new offensive nuclear weapons. They understood how dangerous it would be if the Soviet Union had a defense and we did not. They understood, also, that it is possible for us to design and build a strategic defense. And they understood that a system not only had to work but also had to be able to survive attacks itself and be more cost-effective than proliferating offenses. Now, thanks to them and their hard work and vision, and to the vision and perseverance of the American people and of our allies, all humanity can begin to look forward to a new era of security when the burden of nuclear terror is lifted from its shoulders.

One thing is clear: SDI truly serves the purposes of offensive weapons reduction. SDI can help us move toward a safer world. I have repeatedly pledged that SDI capabilities will never be used for offensive purposes. Like an effectively verifiable arms reduction agreement with which all parties comply, SDI can reduce the risk of war and the threat of ballistic missiles to mankind. It can reduce the danger of accidental warfare and give us the kind of insurance policy we need against violations of a future arms reduction treaty. And it has been a singularly effective instrument for bringing the Soviets to the bargaining table. In 4 years we have come far, and together we can continue on this journey toward achieving humanity's ancient dream: a world in which swords are beaten into plowshares and war is preached no more.

I submit herewith, for Senate advice and consent to ratification, the Convention on Early Notification of a Nuclear Accident, with declaration, and the Convention on Assistance in the Case of a Nuclear Accident or Radiological Emergency, with declarations. These conventions were adopted on September 26, 1986, in Vienna at a Special Session of the General Conference of the International Atomic Energy Agency and signed by the United States on that date. I also transmit herewith, for the information of the Senate, the report of the Department of State concerning the conventions.

At the May 1986 Tokyo Economic Summit, in view of the Chernobyl accident, I proposed, and the other heads of government agreed, that a convention providing for prompt notification of nuclear accidents with significant transboundary effects should be urgently drafted. The international community has acted with exceptional speed. Two conventions have been prepared and adopted by consensus. The convention on notification requires state parties to report promptly the occurrence of the accident and to provide information relevant to minimizing radiological consequences. The convention on assistance sets out an international framework to facilitate prompt assistance in the event of a nuclear accident or radiological emergency.

The United States has initiated many steps to deal with nuclear safety in the aftermath of the Chernobyl accident. These conventions fill key gaps that existed in the international structure; they reflect an international consensus. There should be a domestic consensus in support of the conventions as well, and I urge the Senate to act expeditiously in giving its advice and consent to ratification.

But it is an honor to speak to the American Business Conference, an organization made up of America's most dynamic leaders, on our nation's path to economic growth. And I want to take a moment right here at the outset to acknowledge all that you've done to give our administration encouragement and support. I'd be remiss if I didn't mention, in particular, your support of our campaign to help prepare America for the 21st century, including your strong antiprotectionist stand. You've joined us in saying that in the century ahead America's growth, America's jobs, and the standard of living for every American family will depend on having a strong American economy in the strong and -- well, that's just good, plain common sense, I think, and that's why I'm so glad you're here. Since I came to Washington, I've found loads of people who have all the answers, but not too many who remember the questions. [Laughter] That's part of common sense, and a lot of people seem to check theirs at the District line. So, as I say, I'm glad you're here.

Now, in preparing for the 21st century, nothing is more important than getting our house in order. And I'm delighted to be able to report to you that, despite the momentum built up by the 50-year-old spending juggernaut, we've made dramatic headway toward getting government spending under control. For the first time in more than a decade, the Federal Government is actually projected to spend less this fiscal year in real terms than the year before. And I think you'll agree that's no small accomplishment. On getting control of spending, we still have a long way to go though; but in so many areas, we've come a long way, too. In the last 6 years, we've wrestled inflation to the ground, cut the prime interest rate in half, and created more than 13 million new jobs since November of 1982.

But this morning I signed something: a report that I have to sign every year to go up to the Congress. And I think that I really should have thrown this away and brought the report over here -- read it to you -- because it was the report on what we, over these 6 years, have been doing with regard to improved management. And just a couple of the figures in that report, I think, would show what it contains. We've eliminated 30,000 pages of Federal regulations, and we have reduced the estimated time that all of you out in the public there would have to spend on government paperwork by 600 million man-hours a year. It goes on that way all the way through, and with literally billions of dollars that have been reduced simply by putting into practice at the government level the things that you do every day in business. We found we were still paying people with cardboard checks, and we changed that. A lot of many more important things are being done, and we're still at it.

We've known a revolution of hope and opportunity that some of our European allies have come to call the American Miracle. In fact, they've said it to my face in some of the economic summits. But continuation of these achievements and this progress is imperiled at this very moment by some in the Congress. One threat is the danger of so-called protectionist legislation. I say ``so-called'' because in reality it's destructionist. Today the importance of free trade is all but universally accepted as a fundamental of economic thought. So, too, it is all but universally understood that our own nation earns billions of dollars in foreign markets and has millions of jobs tied to exports.

We believe that America must not hide from the future but meet it as we always have met our challenges: with pride and strength. We want to make America number one in the world economy in the next century, and that isn't an easy or simple job. It'll touch many facets of our society. It involves the education of our children, the training of our workers, the management of our businesses, the investment in research and development by our industries, and the economic policies of our government. The steps we've proposed in these areas will guarantee that America will still be number one in the year 2000. We're eager to work with those in Congress who share our goal of preparing America for the century ahead, and we've found a new receptiveness by certain Members of Congress for our approach.

About a month ago, I said it was time for all of us to join together in looking to the new world marketplace, not as a source of fear and uncertainty but in the way that Americans have always looked at challenges: as a great opportunity, another frontier for the American spirit, as America's next great adventure. Well, I plan, beginning this week, to travel around the country meeting America in all walks of life. And we'll be working to find commonsense answers to the challenge. Every once in a while, it's good for Washington not to always be talking about the answers but going out to the people and asking the questions.

To America's business, the challenge will be to make products more efficiently; to embrace new ideas, better methods of management, and new technologies; and to make the proudest, most desirable label on more and more products and services around the world ``Made in America.'' Just think how happy that'll make Bob Hope. [Laughter] To America's workers, the challenge is to be prepared for the new jobs and new skills of the future and to prove in the quality of their work that the pride is, indeed, back. And to us all, the challenge is to show the same spirit of enterprise and adventure, the same can-do spirit that built our country and made it great.

It's very simple: While keeping our own market open, we will not sit idly by when others close theirs to our products, subsidize their exports, or fail to trade fairly. And in these last 6 years I'm proud to say that we've taken the strongest actions in American history against unfair trade practices abroad, and we're going to keep on until we've got a completely fair and level trading area. Recently we've asked Congress to strengthen the guarantees that we give patents, copyrights, and trade secrets, so America's intellectual property will be clearly staked out with a sign that reads ``No Trespassing.'' And I have also asked Congress for authority to negotiate a new round of trade agreements to bring down the barriers to world trade all around the world. We must help those whom a changing economy has displaced, but we must also never forget that what's at stake here is America's future -- for ourselves, our children, their children -- on into the next century.

And this brings me to the second great danger Congress is posing, a danger that has to do with the Federal budget. The budget deficit is a major threat to our national competitiveness. Yet last week Congress passed a budget-busting highway bill. And it is really a lemon, with a sticker price of $88 billion, loaded with every option in the book. And it has just sputtered down Pennsylvania Avenue while you were sitting in here and is parked over at the White House. And before the day is over, I think I will have it towed back and dropped at Congress' door with a note on it that says, ``Stop the spending spree! Get to work!'' And the message can't get there too soon.

Even before Congress has drawn up their budget, some there are saying that they want to back away from our commitment to Gramm-Rudman-Hollings. Some are even saying they want to raise taxes again on the American people. Well, I'm sorry, we're not going to let that happen. The American people worked long and hard to cut tax rates and win tax reform, and they put their trust in their elected representatives and were promised by those representatives that they would be given the long-overdue tax relief they so truly deserve. Well, we're not going to break faith with the American people. Tax reform will go ahead as scheduled. As I've been saying all along, my pledge to veto any tax rate increase remains rock-solid. There will be no tax rate increase in the 100th Congress. It's time Congress cut the Federal budget and left the family budget alone.

The President. I need all the help I can get from people like yourselves and from the people themselves. There are 43 Governors -- and I was one of them -- in this nation that have the line-item veto. Almost all of those States, or maybe all of them, have also in their constitutions a balanced budget amendment. As President -- or as Governor, I vetoed, in that manner, 943 times, and the vetoes were never overridden once by the same people who had sent the budget to me, having voted to pass it. Yet the Congress just digs in its heels and seems to think that would be giving a President some kind of power that he shouldn't have, but I claim it's the basic answer to getting control, once and for all, over this built-in deficit spending -- and it is built in to our very structure. We've been doing it now for more than a half a century. Well, as I've said so often, it isn't necessary to make the Congress see the light; make them feel the heat. [Laughter] So, get busy.

The President. Well, we've been studying that. And at the high school level -- well, and at the elementary level there has been great improvement since that Commission of ours, the Commission on Excellence in Education, came out with its report. And our Secretary of Education [William J. Bennett] did a great job of getting this throughout the country. There are 37 States already that have increased the requirements for high school graduation, and many of them have lengthened the school year. There's no question but that we drifted into a relapse in what had been a great educational system here. And I think it's going to be up to all of us -- and that doesn't mean the Federal Government, for the 7 percent of education that we fund trying to get 70 percent of control. The control of education belongs right back there in the community with the parents, where they can raise Cain if they don't like what's going on.

The President. Well, we've sent ours up, and they have proposed a kind of a summit meeting, but without coming up with a budget of their own. And very frankly, I have said to them: ``Look, you don't like the budget I've sent up? You make out a budget. Then let's sit down and talk about the two budgets.'' Well, they've never sent us one. They just want to talk about ours.

I have today signed into law H.R. 1056, which limits the fees that may be charged by the Government National Mortgage Association (GNMA) for its guarantees of privately issued mortgage-backed securities. Despite my approval, I have a number of serious reservations concerning this legislation that must be addressed promptly through remedial amendments. This law prohibits GNMA from increasing its current fee of .06 percent charged to issuers of single-family, mortgage-backed securities. It also restricts GNMA's ability to set other types of fees and charges. Finally, it requires the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development to certify to the Congress, at least 90 days before any increase in GNMA fees or charges becomes effective, that the increase meets certain conditions specified in the law.

Mandating a .06-percent GNMA fee in statute, rather than establishing standards under which fees should be determined, is an unnecessary and risky congressional intrusion into GNMA's ability to respond quickly and flexibly to changes in financial markets. It hampers GNMA's ability to maintain the reserves necessary to meet its obligations, particularly in light of a disturbing increase in claims and in GNMA's contingent liabilities. While GNMA losses have historically been small, claims and advances in the current fiscal year are expected to amount to one-half of those in the previous 16 years combined. The legislative cap on fees could well call into question the adequacy of GNMA's current reserve of $1.4 billion, given the $250 billion in GNMA-guaranteed securities presently outstanding and GNMA's monthly contingent liability of $3 billion. Finally, the current low GNMA fee results in securities issuers receiving higher fees for servicing GNMA-guaranteed issues than for servicing similar securities without a GNMA guarantee.

By imposing a virtual straitjacket on GNMA's ability to set other fees and charges, and by virtue of the 90-day ``certification'' procedure, this legislation further impedes GNMA's ability to adjust quickly to changing market requirements. I am signing this legislation despite my objections because, given the bipartisan support for this bill in the Congress, I believe that remedial amendments offer the best opportunity to rectify the serious problems I have described. Based upon my understanding that there is a willingness in the Congress to consider appropriate amendments, I have instructed Secretary [of Housing and Urban Development] Pierce to work with the Congress in drafting revisions to this legislation that will restore GNMA's ability to administer its mortgage-backed security guarantee program as effectively in the future as it has since its establishment in 1970.

Among Greece's most cherished and revered contributions to mankind are the ideals of freedom and democracy. Because these ideals have played a central role in the history of our Nation, it is most fitting that we observe a day in celebration of Greek independence and of our shared love of democracy.

One hundred and sixty-six years ago, inspired by the legacy of liberty and democracy left them by their ancestors, the Greek people began a long struggle in which they regained freedom. The same legacy has inspired many peoples throughout history. Those who framed our Declaration of Independence, and the Constitution whose bicentennial we celebrate this year, drew upon the political and philosophical experience of the ancient Greeks and their followers through the centuries.

By joining in the independence celebration of the Greek people, we pay special tribute to the democratic values that we in the United States, together with our friends and allies such as Greece, are committed to defend.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-fourth day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The President. Well, obviously, I disagree with the decision. But the court has made it, and I'm not going to quarrel with that. But all our position has been is we shouldn't let affirmative action deteriorate into a quota system that would then be counterdiscriminary -- or discriminatory.

Note: The exchange began at 9:52 a.m. at the South Portico of the White House, prior to the President's departure for Columbia, MO. The Supreme Court had recently upheld a voluntary affirmative action plan for public employees to correct sex discrimination.

Anyone playing hooky? Well, we're here today because Columbia has some of the best schools and best students in America. And the schools here are helping America prepare for the 21st century. One of America's best is Ridgeway Elementary. And one of America's best high schools is Rockbridge High, the home of the Bruins. I know that Immaculate Conception is here and the 701 Cub Scout troop is here. [Applause] There they are.

Well, my thanks to all of you. You know, maybe what you all have achieved here with regard to your education setup, maybe I should take some of you back to Washington and we'd straighten out some of those puzzle palaces on the Potomac. Well, I thank you all very much for coming out. I know that I have to move on, we've got quite a busy schedule, but thank you all. Thank you for the musical greeting. I used to be a drum major in a band just like yours myself in Dixon, Illinois. Well, thank you all very much for coming out and for this warm welcome. God bless you all.

The President. Well, I can tell you that, but I can tell you also that the first thing I've been doing on the plane here is calling some Senators with regard to sustaining my veto on the highway bill, which is -- we're not against having a highway bill, we just don't like this one. And we're hoping that the Congress will come up with one that I can sign.

The President. Now, you asked the question about what we're doing here. Columbia happens to -- I wasn't kidding here in my remarks to these young people -- Columbia happens to have had some great achievements in the improvement in education throughout the country. And one of the schools I'm visiting today will be a school that has received an award. And I will be talking about -- well, in the few years that we've had this, several students from one school -- the high school here, had been awarded. And that's a pretty good percentage when there are only 141 such awards given a year.

Q. Mr. President, the Democrats are going ahead and putting together a budget -- like you said you wanted them to -- and they're putting it together with tax increases. Are you going to look at the budget they propose to you?

The President. Well, I've enjoyed this. I wish it could go on longer. I hope that you all realize that you are part of a really exceptional school system. That's why we're here. The schools here in Columbia have achieved so much improvement over the years and such quality, that's why the Secretary and I and the others are all here.

But also in this civics class, and what you were doing -- you know, it brings to mind about people like myself, like the Secretary and the people that you were talking about there in the Congress. We don't really make the country great. You and Mrs. Hassemer, and you and your parents and the people of this country determine the quality of the country, because all of us work for you. We're the employees of the people of this country. And if the people of America are good, and they are, and they're patriotic, things will go right.

And with all of this, and the checks and balances which you've been speaking about here today, the legislative, the executive branch, the judicial branch over all, to make sure we obey the law, all points up to the fact that, when we had our Revolution 200 years ago -- there had been revolutions all over the world before and since. But most of those revolutions just changed one set of rulers for another set of rulers. Our Revolution was much deeper than that. We created something that had never before been done in the history of man. We created a government that was run by the people. And that's the difference between our Constitution and all those others.

I've read an awful lot of constitutions. I've read the Soviet Constitution. It talks about right of assembly and freedom of speech and things of that kind. But what's the big difference, then, between theirs and ours? Well, all those other constitutions say we, the government, will allow you, the people, to do the following things. Our Constitution says we, the people, will allow the Government to do the following things, and the Government can't do anything that is not prescribed there in the Constitution. And that makes us so totally different from anyone else in the whole world. And pretty soon, you're going to be growing up and be in a new century, and you're going to be running the country. And you don't have to hold public office to do that. You, the people, are in charge.

I could go on here, but I know I shouldn't. Could I, just as a closing in here -- since you were all being asked so many questions, I know I only have time for one. We have to move on to some other classes. Would someone like to ask -- well, my partner here would.

The President. What had made it worthwhile? Well, this was one of the things why I asked for a commission to be appointed to bring out all the facts. You know, there was a revolution in a country called Iran, and the Ayatollah Khomeini took over and became the dictator of that country. Before that, it had a royal family, the Shah, the King. And he was thrown out of the country. But he had been -- well, I knew him personally, and had met him and had been there in Iran. And he was doing what he thought was right for the people.

Then, this revolution decided that we, the United States, we were the Great Satan, we were the evil force. And yet, that's a very strategic country there in the Middle East, where there is so much trouble, and yet, where so much trouble for the world can be caused. And we got word that some people there in the government would like to talk to us about maybe reestablishing a friendly relationship between the two countries.

Now, there is a terrorist group in another country, Lebanon, that we believe also sort of may not take orders exactly, but it gets its direction from the Ayatollah Khomeini's government. And they are holding some Americans as hostages. They've kidnaped them, and they're holding them there. They've had them there more than a year. And we thought this was an opportunity -- if we could establish a better relationship with these people in the Iranian Government who wanted to have a better relationship, or said they did. And, so, we sent some people over to start talking to them. And they wanted us to prove that we really were serious. And, so, they asked us to sell them some weapons. We hadn't been doing that because they're engaged in a war. But these people said they were opposed to the war themselves, and they would like to see it ended. So we agreed, but on a basis that we said you can prove your qualifications, as you're asking us to prove ours, by seeing if you could get this terrorist group to free our hostages. And we would each do this for each other.

Well, this is what we started. And I'm afraid it wasn't carried out the way we had thought it would be. It sort of settled down to just trading arms for hostages, and that's a little like paying ransom to a kidnaper. If you do it, then the kidnaper's just encouraged to go kidnap someone else. And finally, all of this came out into the open. Up until then, we'd had to keep everything very secret because we felt that the people who were talking to us from Iran would be executed by their government if they were found doing this. And it all came out in the public. I don't know what has happened to all those people there or not. And I have to say that I still think that the idea was right to try and establish a friendly relationship, try and bring about peace between the two countries that are at war, and try and get our people freed. But it kind of deteriorated into something else, and as I said the other night on television, I won't make that mistake again.

The President. And I think this is wonderful what you're doing, but at least I have to tell you this: You're way ahead of me, because I haven't caught up with computers yet. We didn't have them when I was in this grade in school, and I think it's wonderful that you do.

But I'd also like to say to you that a great many things that you have -- spaceships and jet airplanes, radio, television -- all of those things came after I was born. There hadn't been any such things. And yet you are going to -- just as we now, who've grown up with all of these things coming along during our lifetime, and seeing all these miracles -- and I call computers miracles -- you're going to see many things you can't even imagine today.

But this very problem also touched on something that was one of the great things of our land, and that is the ability for anyone who gets an idea about a kind of business -- wants to be in business for themselves -- can do it. And we call that, in our country, we call that independent, or maybe even small business, because it isn't like the great corporations that make the automobiles and airplanes and that sort of thing. But that small, independent business in America accounts for most of the new jobs that give people employment, and indeed is responsible for most of the jobs in the country that people must have to make their living. So, you are learning something that is not just schoolwork that you can walk out and forget. You're learning some pretty practical things that will come in handy the rest of your life. And I just congratulate you and just wanted you to know that you're way ahead of where people like the Secretary and I were when we were in your class, or in your grade. So, carry on, and thanks for letting us interrupt. Bye bye.

The President. You see, what they're all teasing me about is the fact that our government is spending more than it takes in. And each year the debt gets greater. And I would like to say back to them -- because they're trying to tackle me because we're having deficits now -- we've been having deficits in our country for the last 56 years, spending more than we've been taking in. So, we now owe over $2 trillion. And what we're trying to do right now in Washington, people like the Secretary and myself, is persuade the Congress to get back to where we're not spending more than we take in. Because if you did that with your orange stand, you'd be out of business the first day.

The President. Well, thank you, Bill, and thank all of you very much for a wonderful welcome. You know, I put some things down on a card here so I wouldn't forget, and then he took care of it and asked you, and you answered, all the questions and so forth. So, I don't know whether this card is worth anything or not. But I'm grateful for your principal, James Wells, inviting us here to be here today, and I have a special thanks for Mrs. Hassemer and Mrs. Loethen and the classes that I have just visited here.

And also I have with us Ms. Joy Underdown, and she's kind of special to us because, out in California before she came here, she was the teacher of our son, Ron. And we thought she was a very wonderful teacher, and so did he. And so, I was glad to make contact again after a certain number of years that have gone by since he was there. But I wasn't surprised to find her teaching in such a great school. And because I know that you -- and that's great, the way you feel about it, but do you know something else? A lot more of us who hadn't even been here before know that this is a great school. And it has been so rated because of the progress that you've made and the quality of the education that you're getting here and the level of all of you as students -- that this is one of the truly fine schools in all of the United States of America. And all of you it takes to make it that way, your faculty, your teachers, your administrators, you students, your parents. It's taken all of you and your very fine Governor here to make this the great school that it is.

So, you are busy now because in the 21st century you'll be in charge; you'll be taking over. And what you're learning right here are the things that you need to know when you are running the country in that new century. So, again, I just want to thank all of you for letting us come here and be with you for a while this morning. And I know that we've got someone waiting for us now at another great school, one of your high schools here, and we have to get on to that high school. You wouldn't want us to keep them waiting, would you?

The President. Well, there was a little divided opinion there, but -- [laughter]. And I'm flattered by that, but the ones that said no are the ones that will have to decide. And we'll have to get going. But, again, thank you all. God bless you all.

The President. Thank you very much. Just don't mind me -- I'm just passing through. I saw a band and they were playing wonderful music and I just followed them and here I am. Now, they tell me that this is the home of the Kewpies. And from the look of the trophy cases in the hall, one time or another, the Kewpies have been champs in just about everything including all-around -- particularly academic, you've had championships. And that's why Secretary Bennett and I are here today.

If America is to be what it should be in the 21st century, then it's going to need a lot of schools, good schools. And Hickman, I'm pleased and proud to tell you, is one of the best. I appreciate your principal, Kenneth Clark, inviting us here, and the faculty and all of you and the citizens that have made us so welcome here in Columbia. But it is true, the schools in Columbia are renowned and have been chosen and awarded honors for the progress that has been made in academic quality. And so, I'm delighted to congratulate all of you on that.

Bill, could I interject a comment here, because you've talked about something that's very dear to my heart. I think, back in California when I was Governor, that we were sort of in the forefront with regard to bilingual education. But my belief in the definition of that was it meant that -- faced as we are there, particularly with the Hispanic group and language talked at home and not at school -- that we were to provide, if we could, teachers adept in both languages, so that if a student was not getting what he should get, they could find out whether it was a language difficulty or not. And I met one young man who had graduated there in East Los Angeles from high school, top in his class. He had spent several years in a class for the mentally retarded because teachers had just decided that was what was wrong. And then along came -- God bless her -- a teacher who went a little deeper and found out it was the language problem.

But I have to say -- and I think that the Federal Government has a part that is played in this, and not a good part -- that we have come to the point where we're talking about teaching both languages and teaching students in their native language, instead of what the move should be if they're going to be in America: They have to learn our language in order to get along. And I will do anything that I can to help to get rid of any Federal interference that is trying to force local school districts to continue teaching students in their native tongue. Their job is to teach them English.

And could I just say one last thing? I'm taking too much time here. In East Los Angeles I met with a group of parents, Hispanic parents. And I asked them -- a group of mothers -- I said, well, why couldn't you take turns volunteering to sit in the class where there's a high percentage of these students, and if the teacher is confused, not aware that it's the language problem, you who speak both languages now, you could interject and find out if that is the problem with this student's lack of understanding. And they told me that there were regulations that prevented them from being able to sit in a classroom and do that, because they didn't have certificates to do such a thing. Well, I think it's time we started looking at the regulations and getting back to the main subject, which is, yes, let's get everybody to talk in our language.

When we talk about what works in education, we're really talking about preparing for America's future. Last month I said that it was time to begin a great American discussion about our future and how to prepare America for the world of the year 2000 and beyond. What kind of country will we pass on to our children? That challenge, preparing America for the 21st century, is as great an adventure as the one that faced settlers who, more than a century-and-a-half ago, started a town along the Flat Branch that they called Columbia. It includes being sure that we make the best use of our science and technology, so that when we're first to invent something, we're also first to bring it to market. It includes improving the climate for entrepreneurship and growth, so that the young people here in Columbia and around our nation can live in a world where the only limits on what they achieve are the limits of their own dreams and determination. The key here is lower tax rates and fewer needless regulations, and we've made great progress in both those areas. But the job won't be done until we get control of Federal spending, so that tax rates won't go up again. That's why it's time for Congress to cut the Federal budget and leave the family budget alone.

The challenge of preparing for the 21st century also includes working to build a fair, open, and expanding world economy. This is where the jobs and prosperity of our future will come from. And finally, it includes making sure our young people are ready for the jobs of the 21st century, making sure they're ready to lead a strong America in a strong and growing world economy. In short, making sure that American education is the best in the world. Yes, it's a challenge for every American, the challenge of preparing America for the next century.

This conference today is just one sign that in the area of education America is no longer just waiting for things to happen. We've come a long way from where we were 4 years ago, when our National Commission on Excellence in Education issued its report card on American schools called ``A Nation at Risk.'' The Commission found that high school students were scoring lower on achievement tests than at any point in the past 25 years -- that's 13 percent of all 17-year-olds were functionally illiterate -- and the American students ranked last among industrial nations on 7 of 19 academic tests. ``A Nation at Risk'' galvanized a citizens' movement for educational reform.

This movement has gone ahead at every level, from local communities to statehouses to the Federal Government. And the Governors have been out in front in every State in trying to make the improvements that must be made. Our Governors have been among the most important leaders in this, including those Governors who are here today. This conference and the Governors' report, ``Time for Results,'' grew out of that movement, a movement that has produced a broad consensus on what needs to be done. And part of that consensus has been that more money is not the key to higher quality. The sixties and seventies were decades of rising spending but falling SAT scores. And then it turned out that a number of States -- for example, New Hampshire -- spent only modestly on education, but had among the Nation's most effective schools. Another part of the consensus is that wealth and status in a community do not guarantee good schools or their absence mean schools will be bad. Inner-city schools in poor neighborhoods, like those in East Harlem District 4 in New York City and Charles Rice Elementary in Dallas, stand among America's best.

The secret to educational quality is not in the pocketbook; it's in the heart. It's in the simple dedication of teachers, administrators, parents, and students to the same basic, fundamental values that have always been the wellspring of success, both in education and life in our country. You don't need schools filled with high technology to give children a good education. You need schools that set high standards and pay attention to the basics of reading, math, science, language, and the meaning of our sacred national heritage. You need orderly schools that assign homework. You need schools with strong principals who have a sense of mission. You need committed teachers who lead students to do their best and keep regular tabs on progress. You need schools that teach a sense of right and wrong. And you need parents and communities that care.

Basic skills, standards, discipline, work, family support, ethical principles -- this is the new American consensus on the secret to quality education. And forgive me for saying so, but the only surprise here is that it's new. Plato would have recognized such ``secrets;'' so would Confucius, Matthew Arnold, and Benjamin Franklin. And yet these so-called secrets were new in most places, but not in Columbia. Last week members of my staff came out here for a day. Columbia has a remarkable number of outstanding schools.

Yes, too often in the decades of declining achievement, we heard school officials say that teaching right and wrong was none of their business. A story about this appeared in the newspapers some time ago. A guidance counselor asked a class what they should do if they found a purse with $1000 in it. Well, the class decided that returning it with the money would be neither right nor wrong; it would be just dumb. And when they asked the counselor what he thought, he said he wouldn't force his values on them. ``If I come from the position of what is right and what is wrong,'' he told the reporter, ``then I'm not their counselor.'' Well, I'm not sure what he thought he was.

Now, let me say I don't believe the students in that class were typical of America's young people. We have the best young people today we've ever had. I have a hunch they want more attention given by schools to ethical standards, not less. After all, in an area related to values, drugs, they've been miles ahead of most adults. With many adults saying that taking drugs was a matter of doing your own thing, young people were telling us that drug abuse was the most serious problem facing their schools. A while back, a student in California asked Nancy what to do when drugs were offered, and she answered, ``Just say no.'' Today there are more than 12,000 Just Say No clubs across the country, and there's one here at Hickman High. So, I believe young people do want to hear about values and standards of right and wrong, and they want to hear about them from adults.

Some adults ask: Well, what values would you teach? Well, how about the Judeo-Christian ethic? It's as simple as the Ten Commandments and as enduring as the Scriptures. And here are some samples: ``Love thy neighbor as thyself.'' ``Honor thy father and thy mother.'' And, yes, ``Thou shalt not steal.'' I've dwelt on values for a reason. Part of it is that standards of right and wrong are essential to any life that is lived well and should be a part of education. It's just this simple: Students with strong values do well in school. But also, a school is a community, and the Judeo-Christian ethic is a prescription for a happy and productive community, city, State, or nation. Getting back to values is part of getting back to basics. It's part of preparing our country for the 21st century. And it's basic to what every school should do for every child in every classroom in America.

Since ``A Nation at Risk'' came out 4 years ago, Governors, as I said, have been leaders in the return to the fundamentals of what works in education. Many States have raised education standards. Almost every State has increased either promotion, high school graduation, or college entrance standards, or college exit requirements. Several States have increased them all. Many States have also worked to improve the quality of their teachers. Missouri has started a career ladder program and gives special scholarships and loans to encourage bright students to become teachers and, together with many other States, has given teachers raises. Utah also has begun a career ladder program, as we were told, and has pioneered the use of computer and satellite technology in teaching.

And States and school districts are experimenting, which is why we came here today: to hear about experiments in the 16 districts in the 8 States that are part of the National Governors' Association program for improving the quality of education. Here in Columbia, one test involves getting parents involved in early education of their preschool children. Oak Ridge, Tennessee, is working to broaden the professional experience of both teachers and administrators. And in the White Mountains Regional District of New Hampshire, they're using computers to analyze student progress as well as the strengths and weaknesses of curricula and textbooks.

Well, let me say a little bit about what we're doing in Washington. We've proposed restructuring some of our programs to give States and schools more flexibility and to make the programs more effective. But we know that 93 percent of the money for education comes from States and cities. The Federal Government provides less than 7 percent. So, the most important thing it can do is help the teachers, administrators, and parents. Reports like ``What Works'' and ``Schools Without Drugs'' are crucial; sound information is crucial. Education suffered when the Federal Government tried to give too much direction to local schools. Yes, the Federal Government tried to buy much too much for its less than 7 percent of funding. Some seem to think that education is best directed by administrators in Washington. Well, I say the American people know better than anyone in Washington how to fix their own schools.

By being clear about what we want and what works, we've stopped the slide in SAT scores. They're on the rise again. By 1990 let's reduce by one-quarter the 40 percent of 13-year-olds reading below skill level. By the year 2000 let's have everyone reading at their skill level. By 1990 let's resolve that SAT scores will have made up half the ground they've lost, and by the year 2000 let's have them exceed their 1963 record high, which still stands. And finally, by the year 2000 let's raise literacy levels so that every American can speak, read, and write English and fully participate in the opportunities of our great country. I brought Secretary Bennett along with me today. And, Bill, I'm going to give you a little homework assignment. In April 1988 it will be 5 years since we issued ``A Nation at Risk,'' and that's when I'd like you to issue a new report telling us how far we've come and what still needs to be done, what reforms have worked, and what principles should guide us as we move ahead. We need milestones on our road to the 21st century, and in education this report will be the first.

Well, today I've talked about preparing America for the 21st century. Well, the kindergarten children I saw today at Fairview will graduate from high school in the year 1999. This year's high school graduates will spend most of their working lives in the 21st century. In the life of a man or a woman, or the life of a nation, the 21st century's but a short, short time away. If we begin to prepare for it now, it can be the beginning of America's greatest century, a time when Americans scale peaks of opportunity and achievement that we didn't dare dream of reaching before. Yes, we can set sail on new oceans of challenge and reach new continents of hope. You are the pathfinders. You are the navigators. So, today let's set our compasses by the fixed star of basic skills and enduring values, and start out the new century together.

Sec. 2. Functions. (a) The Board shall facilitate the development and coordination of national drug policy and shall coordinate activities of Executive departments and agencies to reduce the supply and use of illegal drugs, including international activities, enforcement, prevention and education, treatment and rehabilitation, and research relating to illegal drugs.

The President. If the American people need any further proof as to who's responsible for the deficit, all they have to do is look at this $87\1/2\ billion budget-busting highway and transit bill passed by Congress last week. The bill's a textbook example of special interest, pork-barrel politics at work, and I have no choice but to veto it.

In doing so, let me stress that I'm not only willing but anxious to sign a responsible bill to continue highway and transit programs. And, in fact, the Secretary of Transportation, Elizabeth Dole, at my direction, has drafted legislation that addresses our most serious objections. The Congress need only pass this cleaned-up version, send it down next week, and I'll sign the bill within the hour.

I also want to reaffirm my strong support for allowing the States the authority to return to the 65-mile-an-hour speed limit. It's long past due. But I'm not going to sacrifice this country's economic well-being, and that's the issue -- jobs and economic growth. And it's time for me to start writing. And that is the veto on top of the bill.

The President. I'm worried that I seem to be the only one that interpreted the question correctly. I am convinced in my own mind that she asked specifically about the trouble and was the cause worth it. And I answered in that way. I was shocked and surprised to find that the other guy, he thought that there -- she was just asking generally about is the whole job worth it. And if I'm wrong, I was wrong. But I believe that I answered her question; as a matter of fact, I heard the word Iran.

I am returning herewith without my approval H.R. 2, the ``Surface Transportation and Uniform Relocation Assistance Act of 1987.'' I want to make clear that I strongly favor an adequate and fiscally responsible Federal-aid highway and transit program, and I support the provisions in H.R. 2 that would provide essential funds for legitimate transportation construction and safety projects. I also support allowing the States to raise their speed limits on rural interstate highways to 65 miles per hour. However, the bill authorizes excessive funding levels of $87.5 billion over 5 years, $10.1 billion more than my original request and more than is brought in by highway user taxes. It includes unjustifiable funding for narrow, individual special interest highway and transit construction projects, and it unfairly distributes transit funds. All of these reasons force me to veto H.R. 2.

H.R. 2 is an unsound bill. It represents a failure to exercise the discipline that is required to constrain Federal spending, especially pork barrel spending. I remain firm in my commitment to the American people to hold down Federal spending, and I ask the Congress to join me in that commitment by promptly enacting a bill that is consistent with the need for fiscal discipline.

In vetoing H.R. 2, I recognize that the States are rapidly running out of highway funds and that legislation is necessary to make funds available for the 1987 construction season. I am committed to that goal. Therefore, I was deeply disappointed when the Congress failed to pass an acceptable bill before it adjourned last year. The Administration transmitted its own bills to the Congress in January so that funds could be made available promptly to the States for legitimate projects. I am ready with an improved and acceptable proposal that I urge the Congress to enact without further delay. This proposal does not include special ``pork barrel'' projects, and provides a fair and equitable distribution to States of both highway and transit funds.

Some of the unaffordable provisions in H.R. 2 include add-on funding for 152 highway special interest projects. The 5-year Federal cost of the 152 highway projects is estimated to be $1.4 billion, and nearly $900 million of this amount is not subject to any spending controls. The total cost to complete these highway projects is estimated to be $5.5 billion, and they have not even been selected through the established Federal-aid highway program mechanism that relies on the expertise of State and local officials. In fact, there is virtually no hearing record and related analyses regarding the merits of these projects. The States, not the Congress, should determine their highway program needs.

The expansion of the scope of the Boston Interstate projects eligible for interstate highway funds would increase the Federal cost to complete the Interstate System by $1.1 billion. This provision is unfair because, for all other States, the Interstate System was closed to add-ons in 1981.

The direction in Title III to fund the Los Angeles Metrorail project also grossly distorts funding priorities. The provision would require that up to $870 million, or 14 percent, of the fuel taxes paid by motorists for the national transit program be spent in one city. Moreover, Los Angeles has not decided where to build the project, and the environmental review process is incomplete. The Department of Transportation should not be statutorily required to execute a new contract or make available additional money to Los Angeles or any other specific city, beyond amounts already agreed to by the parties.

Since 1983, over $4 billion collected from motorists in fuel taxes has been authorized for transit programs. Because these funds are not distributed by formula, this revenue has not been distributed equitably to each of the States. For example, in 1986, eleven cities received over 80 percent of the funds made available that year.

We must provide for a more equitable distribution of the fuel taxes that are collected from motorists and reduce the level of General Funds going to mass transit. An increase in the required local share for major mass transit projects is also needed to encourage the planning of more economically viable projects. In addition, I am opposed to the sharp increase in certain excise taxes contained in this bill.

Finally, H.R. 2 contains ``Buy America'' provisions that would be harmful to our trading interests. The increase in the domestic content requirements related to transit projects and the requirement that foreign rolling stock must be 25 percent cheaper than U.S. products are unwarranted. The changes invite retaliation against U.S. exports that are produced and marketed by U.S. businesses.

I am committed to the expeditious enactment of authorization legislation so that funds will be available for use during the impending construction season. To make that point I have made an alternative proposal. Let me briefly describe what my proposal would do. With regard to highway programs, we would authorize $66 billion over 5 years; the same levels provided in the Senate-passed bill. Compared to H.R. 2, our bill would provide a more fair distribution, with more money going to States through regular program formula distributions. States would be able to fund the projects identified in H.R. 2 from their allocation of highway funds, if they so choose, but not with add-on funding. There would be no special treatment for large projects.

We would apply the equity principle to transit programs as well. We would authorize $16.1 billion over 5 years, increase the local match for major projects, and would promote a fairer distribution of the gas tax receipts that are collected in all States but that now only benefit a few cities. We would not spend the taxpayers' dollars on high cost projects of dubious merit like the expansion of Los Angeles Metrorail.

In short, this is the way a reasonable and fair highway and transit bill should be constructed. Now, there is no reason why the Congress cannot send me a bill that I can sign quickly before the spring construction season is any further along.

If the American people need any further proof as to who is responsible for the deficit, all they have to do is look at the $87.5 billion budget-busting highway and transit bill passed by Congress last week. This bill is a textbook example of special interest, pork-barrel politics at work, and I have no choice but to veto it. But in doing so, let me stress that I am not only willing but anxious to sign a responsible bill to continue highway and transit programs.

In fact, the Secretary of Transportation, at my direction, has drafted legislation that addresses our most serious objections. The Congress need only pass this cleaned-up version, send it down here next week, and I will sign the bill within hours.

There is a world of difference between legitimate funding for badly needed highway construction, which we wholeheartedly support, and the expensive, special interest projects that lard this bill. I'm not the only one who doesn't like these blatant special interest politics. The editorial pages of the Wall Street Journal, the New York Times, the Washington Post, and numerous other papers, all have pointed out serious problems with this bill. Let me give you just a few of many reasons why: the so-called demonstration projects, for example. One would construct three parking facilities to, quote, ``demonstrate the effectiveness of construction of parking facilities to reduce on-street parking congestion . . .'' The only thing these projects demonstrate is the ability of Congressmen to bring home the ham hocks.

At the same time, the funding for most of these projects is not subject to normal spending controls; moreover, completion of these projects will likely cost several billion dollars beyond funds identified in the bill. And a few favored cities, with politically powerful Congressmen, get hugely disproportionate amounts -- billions -- while other communities are cheated of their fair share. I just have to think that's a disgrace to the American way of governing. Over the last several years I have had many pledges of support from Congressmen and Senators who have promised to help cut our deficit and back up my veto of overweight spending bills. Today I'm taking them all up on it. I'm asking them to hold the line, right here and right now, against deficit spending.

Now, there is important, legitimate highway construction that does need to be carried out. As I mentioned, all we have to do is clean up this bill, pare away the waste, knock out the politically motivated spending, and I'll sign this highway bill in hours. But we have made a pledge to the American people: it's called Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, and we're not backing off that pledge. Neither are we going to raise taxes or tax rates, and that's a promise. Congress can't have it both ways. They can't continue to decry budget deficits while voting for budget-busting bills.

If Congress is institutionally incapable of controlling its spending urges, it's time for reform. Let's give the President what Governors have, the line-item veto. And while we're at it, let's pass a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution, so America can have some peace of mind.

Yesterday marked the close of the special extended session of negotiations between the United States and the Soviet Union on intermediate-range nuclear forces (INF), a part of the nuclear and space talks in Geneva. We extended this session beyond the March 6 closure of the other NST negotiating groups in order to make further progress toward our long-held goal of deep, equitable and effectively verifiable reductions in U.S. and Soviet longer range INF (LRINF) missiles, with the ultimate objective of their complete global elimination.

On March 4, at my direction, our U.S. negotiators tabled a draft INF treaty text which follows the formula that General Secretary Gorbachev and I agreed upon at our meeting in Iceland in October 1986. We have now presented and explained in detail to the Soviets our draft treaty text, which calls for reductions to an interim global ceiling of 100 warheads each on U.S. and Soviet longer range INF missiles, with none in Europe, along with constraints on shorter range INF missiles and provisions for effective verifications.

United States and Soviet negotiators have established working groups to facilitate discussion of the draft treaty which we put forward, and they are working to develop a joint text. These discussions with the Soviets have been businesslike and productive. I want to emphasize that our position on these negotiations is based on very close consultations with our friends and allies in Europe and Asia, whose security is most directly affected by the Soviet INF buildup. Our allies, moreover, made substantial contributions to our proposals.

On-site inspection will be an important element of any effective verification regime. Such inspections will assist in verifying the initial exchange of data on INF systems and the subsequent destruction, dismantlement and conversion of LRINF systems, and will play an important role in ensuring continued compliance with treaty limitations. Another key provision of our draft text concerns shorter range INF (SRINF) missiles. We and our allies have made clear since 1981 that constraints on SRINF are essential in an initial INF agreement so that the Soviet Union cannot undercut LRINF limitations through a buildup in shorter range INF missiles. These constraints, therefore, must provide the United States with a right to equality with the global level of deployed Soviet SRINF systems.

At Reykjavik, General Secretary Gorbachev and I reaffirmed the important principle agreed by our negotiators during the INF negotiations of 1981 - 1983. Namely, that an interim INF agreement must include constraints on SRINF systems in order to ``ensure the viability and effectiveness of an agreement on longer range missiles.'' In recent weeks, however, the Soviets have backtracked from this position and are now saying that the question of shorter range INF missiles should be taken out of the current INF negotiations and be dealt with instead in separate negotiations. This new Soviet position on shorter range missiles would allow the Soviet Union a continued monopoly of these systems and would leave them free to increase their existing force. This clearly is not acceptable to us or our allies.

The crucial issue now is whether the Soviet Union is prepared to accept equal constraints on SRINF missiles in the context of an initial INF agreement, or whether it will insist on maintaining superiority over us in this important area and, with this superiority, the ability to undercut any INF agreement. Since the United States obviously cannot permit such an outcome, we will continue to insist that equal constraints on shorter range INF missiles must be an integral element of an initial INF treaty. I remain fully committed to achieving an equitable and verifiable INF reductions agreement. For this reason, I welcomed Mr. Gorbachev's recent statement on INF, which removed an obstacle to progress that the Soviets had imposed at Reykjavik. The United States then put forth a comprehensive, realistic draft treaty for Soviet consideration. Now is the time, therefore, for the Soviet Union to live up to its previous commitments on INF and to come to terms on an equitable agreement.

Finally, let me say a word about the strength and unity of our alliances. It was, above all, NATO's cohesion in carrying out its 1979 two-track decision on INF that helped to bring the Soviets back to the negotiating table and persuaded them to negotiate seriously. Our own commitment to the security of our friends and allies in both Europe and Asia, all of whom have been threatened by Soviet INF missile deployments, remains as strong as ever. We will continue to work closely with them, as we seek Soviet agreement to equitable and verifiable INF reductions.

The United States and the Soviet Union have agreed to begin round eight of the NST negotiations on April 23. Thus, the INF negotiating group, along with the strategic arms and defense and space negotiating groups, will resume their work on that date. The U.S. and the Soviet Union have agreed at the same time, however, that this date could be adjusted when Secretary Shultz and Soviet Foreign Minister Shevardnadze meet in Moscow on April 13 - 15 to discuss these and other issues on the broad U.S.-Soviet agenda.

I am today announcing my intent to raise tariffs on as much as $300 million in Japanese exports to the United States. I am taking these actions in response to Japan's inability to enforce our September 1986 agreement on semiconductor trade. Regrettably, Japan has not enforced major provisions of the agreement aimed at preventing dumping of semiconductor chips in third country markets and improving U.S. producers' access to the Japanese market. I am committed to the full enforcement of our trade agreements designed to provide American industry with free and fair trade opportunities.

Under the agreement, which was negotiated to resolve a series of unfair trade practice cases brought by my administration and American industry, the Government of Japan agreed to prevent Japanese semiconductor producers from selling below cost in markets outside Japan and to provide additional access in Japan for foreign producers. Despite monthly consultations with the Japanese since the agreement was signed and repeated assurances that all aspects of the agreement would be fully implemented, the most recent evidence we have demonstrates that dumping has continued. Moreover, American firms' access to the Japanese market has not improved from last fall's levels.

The Government of Japan has, in recent days, announced a number of actions aimed at improving their compliance with the agreement. I am encouraged by these steps, and that is why we are not terminating the agreement. When the evidence indicates that third-country dumping has stopped and U.S. firms are enjoying improved access to the Japanese market, I am prepared to lift these sanctions.

Mr. Dawson served as Director of the President's Special Review Board that examined the Iran-contra matter and was Director of the President's Blue Ribbon Commission on Defense Management. He also served on three congressional committees.

I went up to Capitol Hill this week where many Congressmen were wearing a button with the number ``108 in '88'' on it. And therein lies a story, and today I'd like to tell you about it. The group was the House Republican Conference, and the number stood for the 1988 fiscal year's deficit target: $108 billion. Now, before you anticipate lots of Washington talk about budgets and deficits, don't -- as we used to say in the old days of radio -- touch that dial. Believe me, this issue concerns your job and America's prosperity; it's about keeping inflation low and making sure government doesn't take any more of your take-home pay.

But this, of course, came only after a long, hard struggle. When we came to Washington in 1981, the momentum of the Federal spending juggernaut seemed unstoppable; and year after year Congress, through the higher inflation caused by Federal borrowing or through higher taxes, saddled the American people with the bill. But over the last 6 years, we changed the terms of the entire debate. For the first time, even the big spenders in the Congress were talking about the deficit like the problem that it is. What a breakthrough that was to those of us who remember Congressmen and economists who actually thought we could spend ourselves rich -- that's just like the fellow who thought he could drink himself sober. So, when Gramm-Rudman-Hollings was adopted, it broke decades of bad tradition, and many were hopeful Congress would keep its promise and hold to the deficit targets.

But you know Congress and spending. Only this week the Congress sent me a highway construction bill that was loaded with pork-barrel projects. I haven't seen so much lard since I handed out blue ribbons at the Iowa State Fair. It was $10 billion overboard. I got out my veto pen and used it fast. I told the Congress to pare away the waste, to clean this bill up, get it back down to me within the week, and I will sign it within the hour; because America does need a highway bill in time for spring construction and one that restores authority for the 65-miles-per-hour speed limit. But not this one, not a budget-busting handout to the special interests that ultimately you, the American worker, will have to pay for.

And that's just the point: Gramm-Rudman-Hollings was not just a pledge for fiscal responsibility but a pledge to keep America's economy growing and creating new jobs. We need to remember that one of the reasons the economy is prospering and the financial markets are responding is the message the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings plan sends to potential investors and entrepreneurs, a message that says it's safe and smart to invest in our economy, to create new jobs, because government is going to hold down spending and prevent inflation and tax increases from returning. So, you do have a tremendous personal stake in this budget battle and Congress' pledge to hold down the deficit. I've said so often that the reason things changed in America is because those of you at home made those in Congress who didn't see the light on economic issues at least feel the heat. Well, I'm going to be needing your help again.

Well, Vice President Bush and distinguished members of the Cabinet and Chief of Staff Baker, and all of you, it's an honor to be able to join you here today on this our sixth get-together since that January day in 1981 when we started a revolution. Permit me to begin today by welcoming those who've joined our team in recent weeks and months, those in the audience and, yes, those here on the dais.

In foreign relations our accomplishments have been just as profound. The rebuilding of our defenses -- we've shown the Soviets that we're willing to negotiate genuine arms reductions, but at the same time, we're absolutely determined to stand for the cause of world freedom. In fact, since we took office, not 1 inch of territory has fallen to the Soviets, while one nation, Grenada, has been set free. Indeed, during our administration the world has witnessed a crucial turning point in the world struggle. From Afghanistan to Nicaragua, today the guerrillas fight not for communism but for freedom. And everywhere freedom-loving men and women, including those of us here today, stand with them in -- well, if you'll permit me to use a word with special meaning -- stand with them in solidarity.

I could go on and on listing achievements and the outstanding work the Department of Justice has done in helping me to nominate fine judges to the Federal bench, to the way the Department of Education has put our schools at the top of the national agenda. And in a sense, it would be only fitting for me to provide such a list, because each achievement is the result of your own hard work and spirit of sacrifice, your willingness to put up with the long hours, your ability to stomach the frustration and stick with it when you discover that it takes longer to make a change in Washington than you perhaps had thought it would.

One reason for this is that the Congress has been lumping more and more appropriation bills together, making it harder and harder for a President to exercise his veto power. This undermining of the President's veto power profoundly alters the constitutional balance of power that the Founding Fathers have set in place. And with the Budget Act of 1974, Congress further restricted the President's authority in the budget process. And remember, a President is the only single official in that process who represents the interests of the Nation as a whole, including the national interest in a limit on the overall size of the budget.

And consistent with this, we need a constitutional amendment requiring Congress to balance the budget. I've prodded Congress for 6 years, and now I intend to take our case to the people. Just 2 weeks ago I wrote to the minority leader of a State senate that was noting a call by the States for a constitutional convention -- could give the balanced budget amendment a powerful boost. Thirty-four States would need to call for a convention to draft a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution. The number that have already done so is 32. We're that close. Now, I would prefer to have the Congress do it. It would be less time-consuming and more certain. And I know you'll agree, on this, the bicentennial year of our Constitution, it would be only fitting -- indeed, it is our simple duty -- to restore the constitutional balance between the President and Congress that the Founding Fathers intended.

In foreign policy we must go forward with our Strategic Defense Initiative. And let me pause here to set the record straight: SDI is not now, nor will I ever permit it to become, a mere bargaining chip. I've said for a long time that the doctrine of mutual assured destruction, what's called the MAD policy, is downright immoral. We used to have agreements and rules of warfare in an earlier day under which noncombatants were protected by both sides in a war. And here, now the world is basing its security on weapons whose ultimate target is the noncombatant: the innocent people; the men, women, and children; the cities that would be destroyed.

Now, there's another great issue before us in foreign affairs: the cause of liberty in Central America. And permit me to comment for a moment upon the recent House vote in this connection. As you know, the House voted to withhold a portion of the aid to the freedom fighters that Congress approved last year. Of course I would have preferred the vote to have gone the other way, but to tell you the truth, after thinking it over, there's a sense in which I actually found the vote encouraging. In the first place, it was overturned by the Senate. But beyond that, the House vote took place during one of the more frustrating times of this or any administration. In the preceding 4 months, we had endured a relentless barrage, yet after 4 months of ceaseless attack, a change of just 18 votes would have won the day for the stand against Communist expansion in Central America. Now, I just have to believe that when it comes to providing the freedom fighters in Nicaragua with more of the assistance they so badly need we'll be able to find those 18 votes. The issue is clear. The choice is communism versus freedom, and I don't care what ``60 Minutes'' said last night about it. There's the fact that in recent years we've been reestablishing a bipartisan consensus of foreign policy. Democrats and Republicans alike have joined in supporting freedom fighters in Afghanistan, Africa, and Cambodia, and last year in Nicaragua.

The President today announced his intention to appoint T. Kenneth Cribb, Jr., as Assistant to the President for Domestic Affairs. He will be responsible for implementing the domestic agenda for the White House. He will have direct liaison with the Office of Cabinet Affairs, the Public Liaison Office, and the Office of Policy Development.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Edwin J. Feulner, Jr., as a consultant to the White House. He will work with the Cabinet and the White House staff to coordinate the administration's domestic agenda.

We only have to look around us this morning, if we could, to look beyond the White House lawn to the graceful monuments of George Washington and Thomas Jefferson, to be reminded [of] the historic struggles for freedom and liberty which have bound our nations together for generations. Indeed, the park directly across the street from the north entrance of the White House bears the name of a brave Frenchman who, as a young man, became a trusted aide and almost a son to George Washington, Lafayette.

As you know, Mr. Prime Minister, this year we Americans are celebrating the 200th anniversary of our Constitution. In doing so, we're rededicating ourselves to the aspirations of all men to live in freedom and peace, aspirations captured in that ageless document. It was written by Americans, of course; but today it is only right to point out that they were Americans -- James Madison, Alexander Hamilton, and others -- who had been influenced by the great names of the French Enlightenment, like Montesquieu, for one, and by the hopes for liberty and human rights so ardently expressed by the French people themselves.

Some months ago, Mr. Prime Minister, our two great nations celebrated the 100th anniversary of the Statue of Liberty, a gift from the people of France to the people of the United States. Lady Liberty, now beautifully refurbished, her torch rekindled, has rightly become cherished throughout the world as a symbol of human freedom. But even Lady Liberty, as magnificent as she is, would be nothing but an empty symbol had not the American and the French peoples, time and again, joined together in moments of peril, joined together in common sacrifice to preserve and defend freedom itself. Three years ago I stood on the windy beaches of Normandy and, as Frenchmen and Americans, recalled together the most perilous days of the Second World War. And this spring Americans will join in celebrating the 70th anniversary of the arrival in France of the American expeditionary force of World War I. Indeed, Mr. Prime Minister, from Yorktown to Belleau Wood, from Normandy to Beirut, Frenchmen and Americans have stood together and, yes, died together in the name of peace and freedom.

Today we continue to face grave challenges together as we seek to ensure a safer world and a more prosperous future, one in which our peoples and those of other nations can live in still greater prosperity and freedom. We both understand that to achieve that end our friendship must remain deep, our alliance strong and bold. And we both believe that today it is the forces of freedom that are on the march.

You have a very busy day ahead of you, Mr. Prime Minister, one that I do not intend to delay. Nancy and I hope during your all too brief visit to talk of our common goals, but also to deepen the personal friendship with you and Madame Chirac and with your colleagues. Once again, we offer you and Madame Chirac our warmest welcome. And on behalf of all Americans, soyez les bienvenus aux Etats-Unis [welcome to the United States].

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, ladies and gentlemen, let me, first of all, Mr. President, tell you how really delighted my wife and I are to be here with you today among our American friends and our French friends. And let me first thank you, Mr. President, for having invited me to come on an official visit to the United States, where I stayed and worked, some 30 years ago, alas, when I was a young student just discovering this New World. And finally, let me convey to the American people the feelings of friendship, brotherhood, and admiration and affection that the French people have for them and also, Mr. President, the affection that the French people have towards you yourself and Mrs. Reagan. Feelings of brotherhood, yes, because our two countries have always been side by side in crucial moments of their history.

Three years ago, as you mentioned, Mr. President, you came to France to commemorate D-day in Normandy and to honor the resting places of so many young Americans who gave their lives to free France and Europe. And last year you celebrated, as you recall, the 100th anniversary of the Statue of Liberty, a gift of the French people, and especially a symbol of the American dream and of American reality. This year, almost 70 years to the day after the United States went to war alongside France and its allies of World War I, I have come to tell you, Mr. President, this: France has not forgotten. When I go and pay tribute during my brief stay in Washington to the memory of General Pershing -- a great man, a great soldier, and a great American -- I shall be paying tribute to all of the American boys who fell on France's soil to defend my country against all kinds of hegemonies in 1917 and again in 1944. And now that I am here in the United States, there is something I want to tell you with all my heart, and that is this: Thank you, America. France has not forgotten. France remembers.

But, Mr. President, I have not come solely to convey this message of remembrance. I have come to tell you that we continue to uphold the same ideals of freedom, to be driven by the same will, to face the dangers that confront us all together: terrorism, war, hunger, poverty, new diseases, drugs, and yet other dangers. In the face of so many trials, so many threats, we are resolved, as you are yourselves, to go on fighting and affirm the importance of our ideals. We are side by side in all these great struggles. Today, as we set forth on a technological adventure to conquer new fields of intelligence -- biology and space -- we must work together in an ever-growing spirit of trust, cooperation, and true market competition. We have to work together to face the challenge of the future. With these feelings and in this spirit, I am entering into these 2 days of talks that will enable us, I am sure, Mr. President, to find, together with American leaders, common guidelines for future action on the scale of the ambitions we share.

The President. Prime Minister Chirac and I are pleased to announce today an agreement that will foster international cooperative efforts in research, education, and the exchange of technology dedicated to the eradication of AIDS. An agreement has been reached between the Department of Health and Human Services and the Institut Pasteur which resolves the differences between the two over the patent rights for the AIDS antibody test kit. The two medical groups will share the patent, and each party will contribute 80 percent of the royalties received to establish and support an international AIDS research foundation. This foundation, which will also raise private funds, will sponsor AIDS-related research and will donate 25 percent of the funds that they receive to education and research of AIDS problems in less developed countries.

This agreement opens a new era in Franco-American cooperation, allowing France and the United States to join their efforts to control this terrible disease in the hopes of speeding the development of an AIDS vaccine or cure. So, Mr. Prime Minister, Dr. Bowen, and Dr. Dedonder, we thank you all, and I hope this is just one of the many cooperative efforts between our two countries in the years ahead.

The Prime Minister. Well, the President said what should be said. I just want to add how glad I am about this agreement to fight against this terrific disease. We in the United States and France have very, very good and efficient scientists, and they will now work together and also create a foundation to fight against AIDS. And it's, I think, a great step to be successful in this very important battle. And I'm very glad about it, and I thank very much the Department of Health of the United States and L'Institut Pasteur de Paris for all that they have done.

In my address to the American people on March 4, I promised that I would report to the Congress by the end of March on all the steps I have taken to implement the recommendations of the President's Special Review Board chaired by former Senator John Tower.

I hereby submit to the Congress for its information the text of the decision directive I issued to implement the Special Review Board's recommendations. This directive mandates certain actions to put the National Security Council (NSC) process in better order and to avoid any recurrence of the deficiencies and abuses that the Special Review Board described. Many of these remedial measures -- including the prohibition of NSC Staff engagement in covert activities -- were implemented before the Special Review Board reported to me on February 26. The remaining steps have been taken or will be completed shortly.

The President and the Congress share a significant responsibility for safeguarding and advancing the interests of the United States in the world at large. When our two branches of government are at odds, we weaken ourselves as a force for international peace and freedom; when our two branches work in harmony, there is little our Nation cannot accomplish. Each branch is jealous of its constitutional prerogatives; yet, each must also respect the prerogatives of the other.

In this regard, I endorse the Special Review Board's recommendation that the structure and procedures of the National Security Council system not be the subject of further legislation. The NSC and NSC system have traditionally been a flexible instrument for presidential management of national security affairs. Every President since 1947 has used this instrument in a different way; as my successors, too, will discover, its flexibility is an important part of its usefulness. Similarly, the Special Review Board found that it was not the present structure or procedures that were at fault; rather, the problem was that the properly established structure and procedures were not properly used.

I look to the Congress to do its share, as well. In the intelligence field, I welcome the Congress's oversight role as it has developed in the last decade. At the same time, this is a sphere of policy that requires a strong Executive role -- for constitutional, historical, and practical reasons -- as well as a special spirit of close cooperation between our two branches.

The Special Review Board recommended that the existing Intelligence Committees of the House and Senate be merged into a new Joint Committee, with a restricted staff, to oversee the intelligence community. This is a recommendation that deserves to be enacted as it would help ensure the necessary secrecy of deliberations in this sensitive area. In addition, I must make clear that I will strongly oppose legislation that would attempt to encroach further on what I regard as the President's independent constitutional authority in the intelligence field.

I pledge to the American people and to the Congress that I will follow through on all the commitments set forth in the decision directive that I am transmitting. I intend, as well, to move ahead on the pressing agenda of foreign policy challenges and opportunities that lie before us. This agenda will not wait. I was elected to carry forward this Nation's vital role of leadership in the world, and I intend to do so.

But no one can live in this house for long without feeling the vibrant spirit of our French and American forebears, of Thomas Jefferson and Benjamin Franklin, of Lafayette and Rochambeau. And I just have to believe they'd be proud to know that the common commitment to freedom that served as the foundation of our friendship so long ago remains alive in the White House tonight. But even as we look to the legendary figures of the past, we look as well to the major French and American figures of the present. And certainly, there are many here tonight, many who personify the bonds between us in diplomacy, in culture and commerce, in entertainment and science. Just recently we reached an important agreement regarding AIDS research, an agreement recognizing that French and American scientists stand together in the forefront of the battle against this tragic disease.

To everyone, all of our eminent guests, welcome. This evening, too, Nancy and I cannot help but recall our own travels to France during these last 6 years. I remember especially meeting with my summit colleagues in the halls and gardens of the Palace of Versailles, that place of immense beauty so alive with the history of France. And we remember standing on the beaches of Normandy, with the Channel waters behind and the cliffs above, thinking of the men who fought and died on that terrible day nearly 43 years ago when the fate of the free world hung in the balance, of the men who fought and died for freedom.

As is only befitting with close friends, Mr. Prime Minister, our discussions were frank and constructive. We covered East-West issues, arms control, the struggle against terrorism, regional conflicts -- a broad agenda. We discussed our differences on trade issues, and how to narrow those differences in ways that would advance the economic well-being of our peoples. I know that you continued those discussions through the day with Secretary Shultz, Secretary Weinberger, and Secretary Baker, and that tomorrow you will meet with Vice President Bush.

As always, our discussions were able to take almost for granted certain shared values. Yet these values -- liberty, democracy, the dignity of each individual -- these values are sacred. And nowhere are they more important or more in evidence today than in the strength of the Atlantic alliance and in the unshakable commitment of the United States to share in the defense of Europe. So it is that, even as we seek to negotiate arms control and other agreements with the Soviet Union, we'll continue to consult closely with our European allies. Our message is clear to friend and foe alike: America stands with Europe.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, ladies and gentlemen, dear friends, my wife and I are extremely touched by the warmth of your welcome, as we are by this beautiful reception, which marks the end of a day we have just spent under the sign of friendship in this city of Washington. I wish to extend special thanks for this warm reception which brings together in this famous and beautiful house men and women of America and France from the worlds of the arts, of science, and of politics. And these thanks go to you, Mrs. Reagan, especially, because I know the personal part you have played in preparing this reception. And let me say how much we appreciate the elegance, the warmth, and the friendship of it all.

And let me tell you also, Mr. President, how happy we are to be with you here tonight, with a man who has managed to reconcile America with itself, to restore its self-confidence, and to give it the chance to hope anew -- in other words, to restore the vigor of the American dream. And you know what high regard, friendship, and yes, indeed, affection Europeans and the people of France, in particular, have for you, sir.

When I arrived here this morning, what I said came from the heart. France is more than an ally; France is a faithful friend. America is sometimes convinced that she is insufficiently loved and does not always, however, set sufficient store by the intensity of France's feelings for America. These feelings are not only the result of the trials we have always borne side by side. They are not solely due to the fact that we share the same values: liberty. Today these ties are stronger than ever before because we naturally ask ourselves the same questions, because we have to meet the same challenges, and because we share a common will precisely to do so.

I'm rediscovering the same self-questioning spirit, the same will to go forward, to face the future with open eyes, to make hope triumph over doubt which I first experienced 30 years ago when I visited your country as a student. But I also want to emphasize how much France, in the alliance of Western democracies, is indeed a strong European partner that the United States can rely upon. And this strength is due to the deep commitment of the whole of the people of my country to the principles that govern our foreign policy and our national security. These principles are those which General de Gaulle defined 30 years ago, and all of the Governments of France since then, without fail, have abided by them.

In no other European country is there such a large consensus on the main lines of foreign policy: respect for existing alliances, national independence, and being present in world affairs. In Europe, France is working both for the development of unity and respect, at the same time for diversity. In Africa, she's fighting attempts of destabilization. In Latin America, defending democracy against dictatorship. In the Middle East, she wishes to engage in dialog with all parties concerned, so as better to explore the paths of peace. In the Pacific, she wishes to enhance the region's harmony and stability. And finally, France fervently hopes that the rich countries of the world through greater generosity will be able to prevent a larger number of countries from sinking even deeper into debt and experiencing even worse poverty. And France intends to work steadfastly towards the attainment of this goal.

In no other European country is there such a consensus in favor of development and modernization of defense capabilities, and more particularly, in favor of a nuclear deterrent that guarantees respect for national independence and liberty in all circumstances. And finally, one cannot forget the French people's unanimous agreement not to give in to terrorist blackmail and remain in adversity, one and determined.

But, Mr. President, the message which I bear today is also that of a new France which has learned the lessons of economic crisis and has decided to turn its back on outdated remedies and patterns and to undertake deep change, modifying century-old habits in order better to meet the requirements of tomorrow. Over the last thousand years, monarchy has shaped France's identity, and the price of this was a necessary process of centralization, which under the revolution and the Napoleonic empire were indeed consolidated. And as you were mentioning yourself, Mr. President, to me, Alexis de Tocqueville quite aptly remarked: In a country where for centuries at end everything was handed down by the top of the power structure, things had to change.

And indeed, an actual revolution is today underway in which hitherto nationalized companies are being handed back to the private sector, in which the audiovisual media still under state control are being given over to private initiative, in which regulations that long stifled the economy's efficiency are being eliminated, in which an increasing number of responsibilities are being transferred to local authorities.

Now, a year ago Francois Mitterrand, President of the French Republic, appointed me Prime Minister. The people of France have entrusted to my government the mission to release the energies of our country and to give free rein to its creativity and can-do spirit, which have traditionally found an outlet in the arts, in which most today show their mettle in economy, business, and industry. Loyal, strong, open to the world around it, Mr. President, such is the France that is visiting you today.

The President. I'm going to Europe to meet with a group of friends and colleagues: the leaders of the North Atlantic alliance. We and our foreign affairs and defense ministers see a good deal of each other, just as friends should. But the meeting that begins in Brussels tomorrow will be special. It'll be the first time in almost 6 years that leaders of all the NATO countries have met together for a summit.

Much has happened in those 6 years that we can be very proud of, including the INF treaty with the Soviet Union that removes an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear weapons -- weapons that, on the Soviet side, have held the European continent at risk. That historic agreement was possible because the alliance's steadfast political and military resolve backed up our negotiations with the Soviets. But the purpose of this summit is not self-congratulations. Our responsibility is to the future, and it will be to the future that we turn our attention tomorrow.

Our first priority is to maintain a strong and healthy partnership between North America and Europe, for this is the foundation on which the cause of freedom so crucially depends. We will never sacrifice the interests of this partnership in any agreement with the Soviet Union. NATO's agenda for peace and freedom has always been ambitious, and it must remain so.

In the arms control area, we will continue to press for Soviet agreement to 50-percent reductions in the strategic nuclear forces on both sides and for a truly global and verifiable ban on chemical weapons. My colleagues and I will be working to give negotiations on conventional forces a new start as well. We will also discuss Soviet behavior toward its own citizens and toward other countries, since problems of human rights and external aggression remain key obstacles to long-term improvement of East-West relations.

If our common approach to the East over the years has given coherence to our message of peace and world freedom, it has been our unwavering commitment to defend ourselves that has given it credibility. Arms reduction can only succeed if it is backed up by a strong defense. My Atlantic colleagues and I will rededicate ourselves to maintaining the deterrent that has protected our freedom and prosperity for almost 40 years. I will repeat to my colleagues my strong conviction that American troops will remain in Europe, under any administration, so long as Europeans want them to stay.

We can be rightfully proud of these 40 years of peace that our common commitment has brought, but the job is not finished. We in the alliance will not be satisfied merely with a record period without war. We seek nothing less than permanent peace with freedom in Europe and the North Atlantic. This bold objective can be attained, but we must have the courage to follow the course that we've set for ourselves. For four decades the combination of a strong common defense and pursuit of dialog with the East has been a winning formula for NATO. It is a combination that can lead us to a future of peace, freedom, and prosperity for generations to come.

Preservation of the civil rights of Americans is an important function of government. In the area directly affected by the Grove City decision of the Supreme Court -- education -- my Administration has supported the effort to end discrimination against women, such as in collegiate athletics. In this and other areas, we remain committed to the effort to eradicate invidious discrimination in American society.

Unfortunately, the Grove City bill dramatically expands the scope of Federal jurisdiction over State and local governments and the private sector, from churches and synagogues to farmers, grocery stores, and businesses of all sizes. It diminishes the freedom of the private citizen to order his or her life and unnecessarily imposes the heavy burden of compliance with extensive Federal regulations and paperwork on many elements of American society.

The bill poses a particular threat to religious liberty. It interferes with the free exercise of religion by failing to protect the religious tenets of schools closely identified with religious organizations. Further, the bill establishes unprecedented and pervasive Federal regulation of entire churches and synagogues whenever any one of their many activities, such as a program to provide hot meals for the elderly, receives any Federal assistance. Moreover, and in further contrast to pre-Grove City coverage, entire private elementary and secondary school systems, including religious systems, will be covered if just one school in such a private system receives Federal aid.

I regret that the Members of the House of Representatives were not given the opportunity to consider and solve these and the many other problems with the bill through the normal process of committee consideration. I urge the House to correct these deficiencies.

I have a statement. Today's meetings have been extremely productive. There is a strong sense of unity in the alliance, as reflected in the statement on conventional imbalance in Europe. This document is a major step forward for the alliance. The most direct threat to our security and to stability in Europe lies in the Soviet Union's massive military presence at a level far exceeding its defense needs.

First, effective defenses are vital. We're determined to ensure that the alliance's defenses remain strong. We'll continue to cooperate on better and more efficient ways to maintain our defenses. Second, we also seek to strengthen stability through effective and verifiable conventional arms reduction. Large asymmetrical reductions in the Warsaw Pact tanks and artillery, which pose the greatest threat to peace, are essential in meeting this goal; but arms reduction is not enough. Arms are only the symptom, not the cause of the political division of Europe between free and unfree societies. In addition to arms reductions, we also look for greater respect for the human rights and fundamental freedoms on which lasting security and stability in Europe ultimately depend.

During my meetings in Brussels, I have kept close watch on the situation in the Middle East. Secretary Shultz briefed me fully on his negotiating efforts, and it's clear all countries in the region believe it is useful for the United States to remain engaged in this process. We'll spare no effort in our search for a comprehensive peace settlement. I have directed Secretary Shultz to return to the Middle East tomorrow to continue his discussions.

I asked you earlier: Some critics are saying that at this summit you're papering over some of the real differences within NATO about burden-sharing and what to do about modernizing with short-range nuclear weapons.

The President. I have to say first that that is the only question. I'm going to get back where it's warm now. But that's the only question -- that actually there's no foundation for the question. There are no great fundamental differences there. I have never seen such harmony and togetherness as we have. And all of the statements that were made today -- and every head of state had an opportunity to speak in there -- all of them were supportive of what's going on and what we're doing.

The case for such support is compelling. If we do not sustain the Nicaraguan Resistance, we face the prospect of a consolidated Marxist-Leninist regime on the American mainland and prolonged troubles for Nicaragua's democratic neighbors.

If, on the other hand, meaningful assistance is provided, we can enhance the prospects for democracy inside Nicaragua and advance the cause of regional peace in accordance with the Guatemala Accords of August 1987.

It is, of course, not only the mere fact of continued assistance to the Freedom Fighters which is important. The quantity, nature and means of delivery of such help are also vital factors. I have said in the past and continue to maintain that our aid must be sufficient to sustain the Resistance in the field, provide equipment indispensable to those purposes and include effective means for transporting approved materials into Nicaragua under extraordinarily hazardous conditions.

This brings me to the question of the alternative assistance packages which the House will consider today. It is my considered judgment that the aid package offered by the Democratic Leadership does not meet the essential criteria I have outlined above. Their proposal will not enable us to sustain the Freedom Fighters inside Nicaragua at anywhere approximating their present numbers. The proposal would alter the delivery arrangements to DOD responsibility, a notion which I am not prepared to accept.

And, finally, the Democratic Leadership's proposal would not assure a future vote on further assistance should the peace process fail to produce the results we all hope for. Without such provision it is quite obvious that all the Sandinistas have to do is play a waiting game instead of bargaining seriously with their internal opponents and democratic neighbors.

In contrast, the alternative put forward by the House Republican Leadership meets the minimum criteria I have outlined. Program responsibility would remain in the tried and tested hands of experienced professionals who have amply satisfied their oversight committees with their competence and thorough accountability. And, of course, the Republican alternative provides for expedited procedures in case of eventual need, an element which I consider indispensable to any package which ultimately emerges from the Congress.

Today could represent a watershed in our policies toward Central America. One avenue will lead to rapid debilitation of the Resistance and further encouragement of Sandinista intransigence. The other could keep alive prospects for democracy and meaningful talks toward peace. For the reasons set forth, I strongly urge you and your colleagues to vote against the proposal of the Democratic Leadership and in favor of the Republican package.

The meeting of the NATO alliance concluded with extemporaneous remarks by President Reagan concerning the values of the alliance in the free world. The President spoke eloquently and with great feeling concerning the unique role of the alliance in preserving freedom. The President praised the solidarity of NATO and the strengths that emanate from each country's commitment to one another.

The President. Good afternoon. My alliance colleagues and I have just concluded our latest round of consultations on the full range of issues facing us. First, let me say that the state of the alliance is excellent. We're strong, we're united, we're prosperous, and we're free.

NATO will soon begin its fifth decade. The North Atlantic alliance is the most successful in history. While other alliances have been formed to win wars, our fundamental purpose is to prevent war while preserving and extending the frontiers of freedom.

INF treaty is the most recent NATO success. My colleagues and I are all justifiably proud of that achievement. It was the direct result of our steadfastness and persistence in carrying out the two-track decision that we made as an alliance over 8 years ago. It goes without saying that our allies support this treaty, and every leader solidly reaffirmed its value to the security concerns of the alliance. So, now our focus turns on meeting the challenges of the future.

During the past 2 days we went over the full range of issues that affect our collective security. I reiterated the strong bipartisan support that exists for the alliance in the United States and the commitment that American troops will remain in Europe, under any administration, so long as the need for a forward defense of our common values remains. We cannot and will not put our peace and freedom, and that of our children and their children, at risk. All of us understand the absolute necessity of maintaining the credibility of our deterrent. We will never trade that credibility away at the negotiating table, and we won't give it away through neglect.

The most direct threat to our security and to stability in Europe lies in the Soviet Union's massive military presence. The alliance has given its needs a lot of thought, knows what it wants to do, and has programs that it has committed to carry out. And there's no doubt the alliance stands on strength and unity.

The alliance is the most dynamic force for improvement of East-West relations. From our meetings here, our commitment is to move forward to meet our defense requirements while continuing discussions on our four-part agenda with the new Soviet leadership. The alliance has agreed on its arms control priorities and is ready to get down to business. NATO fully supports my effort to negotiate deep reductions in strategic weapons.

So, while arms reduction is a part -- but only a part -- of our discussions, progress in this area must always be based on enhancing our security, not substituting for it. Our alliance has guaranteed peace in Europe and the North Atlantic for almost 40 years. I am more confident than ever, after these 2 days of meetings, that the alliance remains on the right path and that, as always, we have the courage and the will to follow it.

Let me conclude by noting that this will be one of the last alliance meetings for Secretary General Peter Carrington. Lord Carrington has been at the helm of the alliance and NATO for 4 crucial years. He has steered this ship of 16 states with a steadiness that has earned our unbounded admiration. I'm sure that I speak for all my colleagues in expressing our heartfelt thanks to Lord Carrington and our best wishes to Dr. Manfred Worner, whose strong hand will soon be at the helm. The West has no better champions than these two distinguished statesmen.

Our Alliance is a voluntary association of free and democratic equals, united by common interests and values. It is unprecedented in its scope and success. Our security is indivisible. Our Alliance is dedicated to preserving peace in freedom and to collective self-defence, as recognised by the United Nations Charter. None of our weapons will ever be used except in response to attack.

Report has successfully stood the test of time. It remains valid in its two complementary and mutually reinforcing approaches: political solidarity and adequate military strength, and, on that basis, the search for constructive dialogue and co-operation, including arms control. The ultimate political purpose of our Alliance is to achieve a just and lasting peaceful order in Europe.

American democracies to the preservation of peace and security in Europe is vital. The presence in Europe of the conventional and nuclear forces of the United States provides the essential linkage with the United States strategic deterrent, and, together with the forces of Canada, is a tangible expression of that commitment. This presence must and will be maintained.

Likewise, a free, independent and increasingly united Europe is vital to North America's security. The credibility of Allied defence cannot be maintained without a major European contribution. We therefore welcome recent efforts to reinforce the European pillar of the Alliance, intended to strengthen the transatlantic partnership and Alliance security as a whole.

Conventional defences alone cannot ensure this; therefore, for the foreseeable future there is no alternative to the Alliance strategy for the prevention of war. This is a strategy of deterrence based upon an appropriate mix of adequate and effective nuclear and conventional forces which will continue to be kept up to date where necessary.

While seeking security and stability at lower levels of armaments, we are determined to sustain the requisite efforts to ensure the continued viability, credibility and effectiveness of our conventional and nuclear forces, including the nuclear forces in Europe, which together provide the guarantee of our common security. Taking into account the structure of the Alliance, each of us undertakes to play his part in this joint endeavour in a spirit of solidarity, reaffirming our willingness to share fairly the risks, burdens and responsibilities as well as the benefits of our common efforts.

We seek a just and stable condition of peace in which the sovereignty and territorial integrity of all states are respected and the rights of all individuals, including their right of political choice, are protected.

We want gradually to overcome the unnatural division of the European continent, which affects most directly the German people. We will continue to uphold the freedom and viability of Berlin and to support efforts to improve the situation there.

The search for improved and more stable relations with the Soviet Union and the other countries of Eastern Europe is among our principal concerns. We call upon these countries to work with us for a further relaxation of tensions, greater security at lower levels of arms, more extensive human contacts and increased access to information. We will continue the effort to expand co-operation with the East wherever and whenever this is of mutual benefit.

This creates the prospect for greater openness in their relations with their own people and with other nations. We welcome such progress as has been already achieved in certain areas. But we look beyond pronouncements for tangible and lasting policy changes addressing directly the issue dividing East and West.

However, we have to date witnessed no relaxation of the military effort pursued for years by the Soviet Union. The Soviet Union persists in deploying far greater military forces than are required for its defence.

This massive force, which the Soviet Union has not refrained from using outside its borders, as is still the case in Afghanistan, constitutes a fundamental source of tension between East and West. The steady growth of Soviet military capabilities, as it affects every region of the Alliance, requires our constant attention.

We will continue to be steadfast in the pursuit of our security policies, maintaining the effective defences and credible deterrence that form the necessary basis for constructive dialogue with the East including on arms control and disarmament matters.

To meet our security needs in the years to come will require ever greater efficiencies in the application of our scarce resources. We are therefore determined to expand our practical co-operation in the field of armaments procurement and elsewhere. In this context we recognise the challenges to our industrially less advanced Allies and the need to address them through mutual assistance and co-operation.

Arms control is an integral part of our security policy. We seek negotiations not for their own sake but to reach agreements which can significantly reduce the risk of conflict and make a genuine contribution to stability and peace. We shall work together vigorously and on the basis of the closest consultation to this end.

Our representatives to the North Atlantic Council continue actively the further development of a comprehensive concept of arms control and disarmament as directed in the Statement of our Ministers at Reykjavik in June 1987.

The recently concluded INF agreement between the US and the Soviet Union is a milestone in our efforts to achieve a more secure peace and lower levels of arms. It is the impressive result of the political courage, the realism and the unity of the members of the Alliance. The treaty's provisions on stringent verification and asymmetrical reductions provide useful precedents for future agreements. We look forward to its early entry into force.

It must be firmly based on full respect for fundamental human rights. As we continue our efforts to reduce armaments, we shall press for implementation on the part of the governments of the Soviet Union and of other Eastern countries of all of the principles and provisions of the Helsinki Final Act and of the Madrid Concluding Document. We support the continuation and strengthening of the CSCE process. It represents an important means of promoting stable and constructive relations on a long term basis between countries of East and West, and, moreover, enhances closer and more fruitful contacts between peoples and individuals throughout Europe. We call upon all participating states to make every effort for an early conclusion to the CSCE follow-up meeting in Vienna with a substantial and balanced final document.

We agree that the speedy and complete withdrawal of Soviet troops from Afghanistan and the effective restoration of that country's sovereignty would be of major significance. It is against these criteria that we shall assess General Secretary Gorbachev's recent statements.

We strongly support the efforts of the United States. These fully accord with our consistent policy to seek, through high-level dialogue, early and substantial progress with the Soviet Union on a full range of issues, including greater respect for human rights, arms control, a lessening of regional tensions, and improved opportunities for bilateral contacts and co-operation.

Reflecting upon almost four decades of common endeavour and sacrifice and upon the results achieved, we are confident that the principles and purposes of our Alliance remain valid today and for the future. We are united in our efforts to ensure a world of more secure peace and greater freedom. We will meet the opportunities and challenges ahead with imagination and hope, as well as with firmness and vigilance. We owe no less to our peoples.

Thank you all for coming out here on what is not exactly a sunshiny day. Could I just tell you, you've made me very proud by coming out this way to see me off. But you've made me even more proud by the fact of what you represent. You are the largest American delegation in Europe. And you're here serving our country, some of you with regard to the European Community, some with regard to the alliance, and then, many of you are here also just representing our government and certainly the military. I am so proud of the detachment that is here assigned to the NATO alliance and that is defending America as well as the peace of the world.

House has once again failed to approve an aid package for the Nicaraguan democratic resistance. I call on the House and Senate to act urgently to develop an aid package which is effectively deliverable and of sufficient quantity to sustain the Nicaraguan freedom fighters. If not, the prospects for peace and democracy inside Nicaragua will diminish quickly.

This year marks the 75th year of service to our Nation by the United States Department of Commerce; three-quarters of a century ago, on March 4, 1913, the Department was established in its current form. Its mission of fostering, promoting, and developing the domestic and foreign commerce of the United States has ever since remained both vital and truly worthy of public recognition.

Throughout this century the Department of Commerce has helped Presidents and the Congress develop policies to support our economic growth, our scientific and technological advancement and security, and our international trade. The Department provides business and government planners with critical data they need for intelligent decision-making, urges inventors and entrepreneurs to bring products to the marketplace, encourages firms to seek legitimate export opportunities, and makes sure that fair trade laws are enforced vigorously. The Department of Commerce also supplies oceanic information and formulates telecommunications and information policy.

The employees of the Department of Commerce have always reflected the finest traditions of public service. That was surely true of the Department's late Secretary, Malcolm Baldrige, and our present Secretary, C. William Verity, Jr.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourth day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

By its action last night, the House of Representatives again failed to approve further assistance for the Nicaraguan freedom fighters. Without renewal of aid soon, the resistance will cease to provide the pressure necessary to ensure that the Sandinista regime honors its promises under the Guatemala accord of August 1987 and the San Jose Declaration of January 1988 to bring about democracy in Nicaragua.

In the days ahead, I will be consulting with bipartisan supporters in both Chambers to put together an effective package for aid to the resistance. Prompt renewal of assistance to the resistance remains essential to advance the national security interests of the United States.

As many of you know, I recently returned from Brussels, Belgium, where I met with the leaders of the North Atlantic alliance. I'm glad to say that the Western alliance remains a strong and unified guardian of the free world, ready to meet the many challenges before us.

In all of my meetings with allied leaders there was a unity of purpose and resolve that I found heartening and uplifting. That strength and unity have never been more sorely tested or better proven than in the events leading up to, and making possible, the recent signing of our historic treaty with the Soviet Union to eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear weapons. Let me, if I may, review those events, because they provide a lesson that was much on my mind this week in Brussels, a valuable lesson about the only effective way to deal with the Soviet Union: from a position of strength.

INF refers to intermediate-range nuclear forces. They only became an issue in the seventies and early eighties when the Soviets began targeting their new SS - 20 missiles against every major city in Western Europe and our friends in Asia, as well. The free nations had no comparable weapon to counter this new threat. So, NATO agreed on what we called a dual-track policy. We would negotiate with the Soviets to get them to remove their missiles or to reduce them to the lowest possible equal level, and we would also deploy our own forces to counter their new threat.

After the removal of the Soviet intermediate-range missile threat, our highest priorities are: first, to negotiate a 50-percent reduction in strategic arms; second, to address the fact that the Warsaw Pact conventional forces, arrayed offensively along the Iron Curtain, far outnumber NATO's; and third, to address the problems created by the continued Soviet maintenance of the world's largest chemical weapons arsenal.

That's why continued modernization of NATO forces, nuclear and conventional, is essential. Most of you have heard of SDI -- our Strategic Defense Initiative that may one day make ballistic missiles obsolete. At the same time, we must continue to pursue NATO's conventional defense initiative to develop high-tech conventional weapons that may be an important part of the answer to the Soviets' aggressive strategy on the European continent.

These issues were on our agenda in Brussels. We resolved there to press for large, asymmetrical reductions to Warsaw Pact conventional forces, for example, tanks and artillery. General Secretary Gorbachev talks at home about perestroika -- that's Russian for restructuring. Well, it's time for some restructuring in the Warsaw Pact. It's time for the abandonment of the Soviet offensive strategy on the continent.

So, let me conclude by saying, I found this week in Brussels what the Atlantic alliance has demonstrated now for 40 years: that a peace built on strength can and will endure. And I am convinced, after our meeting, that the alliance of free nations has never been stronger.

Today as veterans you're still defending freedom. Whether it's supporting adequate defense budgets or aid to the freedom fighters in Nicaragua or teaching America's young people the meaning of our precious rights through your Voice of Democracy program, the members of the VFW are still on the front lines, still leading the charge, and still showing what true patriotism really means. That's why when you sound the bugle this is one old rider in the horse cavalry who snaps to attention.

As you may know, I returned last Thursday from a 2-day visit to Europe, where I met with the leaders of the other Western allies, and I'll talk about that meeting in a moment. At another time, I might have liked to take a few more days over there, see some sights, and maybe buy Nancy a few presents. But I had a meeting here in Washington I couldn't miss. I've told you this before, and it's true as ever. I'd travel halfway around the world to meet with the VFW.

Let me say here something that I regard as an obvious truth, but one that seems to need repeating. America owes a great debt to its fighting men. And it's a debt that our nation will carry as long as it lives, for without our fighting men, our nation would not live. That's why I don't understand those who would so easily forget. I'm speaking about those who would turn their backs on the men missing in action in Southeast Asia. We have a moral bond as sacred as any a free people can make with one of their own to close no books, write no last chapters, reach no final conclusions until we have the fullest possible accounting of every soldier, airman, aviator, marine, and civilian lost in Laos, Cambodia, or Vietnam.

To you who came home, the Emergency Veterans' Job Training Act I signed at your convention in New Orleans 5 years ago and the new GI bill I signed last June are the least we can do to show America's gratitude. And as you know, I believe we also should create a Cabinet-level Department of Veterans Affairs.

At the meeting last week, the Atlantic alliance celebrated one of the great achievements of its history. More than a decade ago, without warning, without provocation, the Soviet Union challenged the strategic balance in Europe and stationed an entirely new level of weapon, one for which NATO had no fully effective deterrent: the intermediate-range SS - 20 nuclear missile. To keep the balance that keeps the peace, NATO had to meet this challenge, and meet it NATO did. In 1979 it voted to deploy U.S. intermediate-range nuclear forces. It also voted to press for a U.S. negotiation with the Soviets on this issue.

Shortly after I came into office, I proposed that our negotiators should work for what we called the zero option -- remove all U.S. and Soviet longer range INF missiles. You may recall that some of our critics said I couldn't be serious, that this was just a ploy to ambush arms control and put it out of commission for the duration. The Soviets said they would walk out of negotiations if we went ahead with deployment. Well, we did, and they did.

NATO moved forward. Many faced demonstrations at home, and some of those demonstrations turned to violence. But eventually, after the missiles went in place, the Soviets returned to the bargaining table, and today we have the agreement our critics said was impossible: the zero option. Now, I can't think of any better demonstration of what you and I've been saying for years: that the road to peace is through American and free world strength.

And no one should ever forget that you helped America stand its ground against the political assault here at home and finally to take the hill in arms talks. Yes, once again you defended our nation's security, peace, and freedom.

Keeping America strategically strong means going forward, as well, with our research, development, and testing on a strategic defense against ballistic missiles. SDI is America's best guarantee that the Soviets will stick to their agreements in arms reductions. It's also protection against an accidental missile launch and against some madman who might take over a country that can get ballistic missiles. In short, as I've said before, it's an insurance policy, and we're not the first ones the agent has visited.

Soviets have been spending far more money developing strategic defenses than we have and have been doing it longer. In the last decade, they've poured roughly $200 billion into their programs. In 2 weeks, we mark the fifth anniversary of our Strategic Defense Initiative, and in that time, we've spent only $13 billion -- less than 7 percent what the Soviets spent in the decade. To give you an idea of the magnitude of the Soviet efforts, they've assigned 10,000 of their top scientists and engineers to their military laser program alone. It would be foolhardy not to pursue SDI, and that's why America must research, develop, and test SDI. And when it's ready, we must deploy it.

Now that we have the INF treaty, our negotiating priorities are a 50-percent reduction in strategic arms; a conventional arms balance in Europe; and an effective, verifiable, and truly global ban on all chemical weapons. We'll need to keep up our strength if we're to succeed, and that's why the Congress must not further reduce the defense budget.

You know, recently the Government of El Salvador found documents on the body of a Communist courier. The papers included a review of the situation in Central America, and in those papers it said: ``The defeat of the contras would be a grave strategic defeat for the United States, especially if we take into account the geopolitical position of Central America.'' Well, the VFW understands this. The Communists in Central America understand this. The Soviets understand this. It's time that Congress understood it, too. A Soviet base on the American mainland is a pistol pointed at the heart of the Americas.

During the first round of debate on aid to the freedom fighters a few weeks ago, one of the congressional leaders opposing aid said that we shouldn't keep money flowing to the contras, because for every dollar we gave them, the Soviets would give the Sandinistas five. Well, he ought to remember something Pericles, the great leader of ancient Athens, said: ``The secret of liberty is courage.'' Too many of the opponents of aid to the freedom fighters claim to be the heirs of Franklin Roosevelt, who told us when the odds are stacked against us that America had a rendezvous with destiny and then led us to the fight, and of Harry Truman, who helped Greece and Turkey stand up to communism and led us into NATO.

Courage hasn't exactly been the watchword of some opponents of contra aid. Harry Truman said: ``The buck stops here.'' But last week, aid opponents tried to pass the buck of responsibility for abandoning in the field the young men and women of the democratic resistance. And that ploy failed, as it should have. Now it's time for Congress to show that it knows you can't have real peace negotiations when one side has helicopter gunships and the other has bandages. Recently, Daniel Ortega has said he's going to crush the freedom fighters, and he has thrown out the peace mediator, Cardinal Obando y Bravo. You know where Ortega stands. Isn't it time for Congress to have the courage to show where it stands?

In thousands of foxholes and trenches, cockpits and decks, around the world, the American spirit of justice and the just fight, our love of freedom and devotion to the dignity of man have been the hope of millions for liberty and a better life. You more than anyone else know what courage it has taken. It was courage like that of Sergeant Howard Collette, whose bomber was hit over the Celebes, and as it plunged toward the Pacific, he was heard over the radio reading aloud from his pocket Bible to his wounded comrades, calming them, comforting them, as he and they fell to their final rest.

I'm delighted all of you could come by today. The question before us is a simple one: What value do we place on human dignity and on human worth? I realize that's rather bluntly put. But you know, one of the things I've been intrigued by while I've held this job is an attitude in government that says every approach to public policy issues must be complicated and indirect. Now, come to think of it -- and I know this will come as a surprise -- it kind of reminds me of an anecdote from back in the days when I was also in the media business, in radio.

And most of you will remember for those radio dramas the sound-effects man and all of the things that he devised, from coconut shells that he would pound on his chest to be a horse galloping and so forth. This one particular time at WHO-Des Moines, rehearsing for a play there, and there was a sound effect that called for water falling on a board. And the sound-effect man went to work. He tried sand on a drum, and he tried rice on cardboard and peas on something else. And he was going on, and he couldn't get anything that sounded, through the microphone, like water on a board. And it was getting near show time, and somebody suggested trying water on a board. [Laughter] And you know, it sounded just like water on a board.

Well, that may seem a long way from the drug problem, but it isn't. Trying water on the board is really what we've tried to do with America's problem. You see, so much has changed during the past few years that I'm not sure many of us remember the skepticism that greeted early antidrug efforts. There were even those who questioned whether drugs were that much of a threat to society. Well, we're wiser now, and sadly so. We know that the price our society and our children have paid for laxity about what is quite simply a public health menace of the first order. Which is what brings us here today.

I know most of you in the media are cautious about being part of joint efforts with any government agency, and as a general rule, I think this caution is well-advised. But on certain matters of life and death, on questions of national survival, I think there's room for common purpose between us. The fact that those of us here today and people from almost every walk of life are now allied on this issue indicates a new public consensus, a consensus that has developed around what we just talked about, a very simple, very direct set of propositions: that drugs hurt, that drugs kill, that each of us must in our daily lives just say no to drug use and drug users. And saying no doesn't just mean a private refusal to use drugs: It also means taking active steps against drugs or drug use whenever it occurs and whenever we see it.

Now, this set of very direct propositions has had impact. For the first time, we're seeing progress -- progress measured in statistics, but also in something much more profound: a change in awareness across America, a change that puts the goal of a drug free generation within our grasp. The most recent survey of the Nation's high school seniors is indicative of the change. Even more revealing than the fact that one-third fewer seniors acknowledged current use of cocaine in 1987 than the year before, almost all the students said it was wrong even to try a drug like cocaine. So, America, and especially young people, are realizing that we have a drug abuse problem and that illegal drugs are deadly and wrong.

It's gratifying to see that in homes, schools, businesses, and communities across the United States the wall of denial is crashing down. We're also recognizing that individual freedom does not include the right to self or social destruction. Drug use is not a victimless crime; it is not a private matter. While we must be concerned with the personal consequences for the individual, we must demonstrate our great concern for the millions of innocent citizens who pay the high price for the illegal drug use of some. These costs are measured by crime and terrorism. One recent study suggests as much as 50 to 75 percent of crime is drug-related. There is also lost productivity, increased health care costs, continuing threats to worker and public safety, the transmission of AIDS, and an overall degradation of our society.

I could interject right here: In a community in California several years ago, before we began to get as serious as we are about this problem, the Santa Barbara Police Department -- they were pretty much aware of the users and so forth, and on a weekend they rounded all they could gather, rounded them up, and put them in the hoosegow for the weekend. And they did it as an experiment.

So, we're also overcoming an erroneous perception of the illicit drug user as powerless to act against drug availability, peer pressure, or his or her general lot in life. In fact, our nation's law enforcement officers, while hitting the pushers and suppliers with a force greater than ever before, acknowledge that the drug abuse problem will ultimately be solved by preventing nonusers from ever starting to use illegal drugs and getting current users to quit.

Finally, we're having to face squarely those things which we've built into our culture that enable illegal drugs to exist in our society. As citizens and individuals, we're realizing that, although government must do everything possible to help, a solution to the drug problem will only come when each of us directly confronts and rejects the cultural acceptance of illegal drug use in our daily lives.

Last week Nancy and I spoke to over 2,000 such individuals at the White House Conference for a Drug Free America. Believe me, not so long ago, this conference would not have been possible. And there are still those who continue to say that, because we have not quickly solved a problem which took decades to develop, we should throw in the towel. Let's remember that our actions today are an investment in the future.

We know there are a large number of individuals, primarily those who acquired their drug-use habits in the sixties and seventies, who persist in using illegal drugs. And this persistent demand for illegal drugs is met by sometimes seemingly limitless supply. But a surge in drug-related crimes, deaths by overdose, births of drug-addicted and drug-impaired babies, and even the destabilization of national governments by traffickers should not be viewed as harbingers of defeat in our war on drugs. These events should instead strengthen our resolve to stop this insidious evil once and for all.

America's awakening to its drug problem has not come easily. We remember a nation stunned after the death of Len Bias. The same rude awakening has occurred only recently in the Washington, DC, area and nationally as to the stranglehold of drug criminals on foreign governments. But believe me, with each jolt into reality, we strengthen our offenses and move closer to a drug free America. Remember, the shock of recognition is not a sign of defeat; it's the beginning of victory.

Many important campaigns are now underway. Businesses are taking strong action against drug use in the workplace. Several States, such as New Jersey and Missouri, have enacted stricter laws against illegal drug use and trafficking. A number of important initiatives are underway to achieve drug free schools, drug free public housing, and drug free transportation. Our law enforcement officials have aggressive offenses underway. We're working to improve treatment and to increase the drug users' incentives for seeking help. And we're working internationally with the individual countries and organizations, like the United Nations, to stem growth, production, and transit of narcotics.

And here your own work has been particularly important. Long gone are the days when drug coverage focused on what the Government was -- or too often, was not -- doing to solve the drug problem. Today drug abuse is the subject of major industry initiatives and in-depth specials on the nightly news, daily newspapers, and weekly magazines. Also gone are the days when drug use was frequently glamorized in movies and television, on radio, and in print. Today the media is revealing the deadly truth about drugs and why each of us must take a stand.

So, in addition to your individual efforts, I hope you will keep up your tough reporting on this story. This means holding government officials accountable, of course, but it also means keeping a close eye on trends in drug use in America and reporting to your readers fully and fairly about those efforts. Let me assure you that when Nancy and I see stories about how far we have to go in this battle, we welcome them.

I also want to mention at least some of your individual programs. The Academy of Television Arts and Sciences is actively promoting an ongoing awareness of the drug abuse problem to be reflected in everything which is broadcast. The National Association of Broadcasters is now in its fifth year of the NAB on-air initiatives, which include a variety of major programs against drug and alcohol abuse. The Media-Advertising Partnership for a Drug Free America, the largest antidrug use advertising campaign ever attempted, is working toward a $1\1/2\ billion in volunteered media time and space to``unsell'' illegal drugs. The 3 major TV networks, 13 cable networks, 13 radio networks, and the Nation's newspapers and magazines are donating space and time for the media-advertising partnership antidrug use advertisements. The Miami Herald has published more than 175 anti-drug use public service ads, many of them full-page, since joining the campaign just last year. Capital Cities/ABC broke with its tradition of local autonomy for its many print and broadcasting properties in 1984 after the death of an employee due to a drug overdose. They implemented a companywide substance abuse policy.

I don't want to brag, but one of these PSA's features my own leading lady. All of these initiatives liberally [literally] represent billions of dollars in expertise and coverage, which has been invaluable in moving toward a drug free America. And this is just to mention a few examples of the excellent work that all of you are doing.

So, on behalf of the next generation of Americans -- the many lives that will be saved and whose futures will be bettered -- I want to extend a heartfelt thank you to each one of you. Thank you, and God bless you.

History Month is a time for us to recognize and salute women's contributions to the American family and to society. Women have been making these contributions since this continent was explored and settled and America won its independence.

Women continue to strengthen the family and enrich our lives with intellectual gifts, creative talents, and an indomitable spirit -- in business, government, volunteer activities, religious life, education, health, the military, sports, the arts, and many other areas. Historians will record the accomplishments of women at home as well, chronicling the tremendous contributions countless women have made by helping to raise children who adhere to the moral, ethical, civic, and patriotic principles that have made us, and kept us, a great country. We should be proud and grateful as we celebrate Women's History Month.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventh day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Well, that's how each of you got to the Olympics. And I must tell you, we have hundreds of groups here each year, but I can't think of any that I'm prouder of than you. Years of practice and years of dedication, years of dreaming and working for your dreams have made each one of you -- medal or no medal -- an American champion and an American success story.

Olympic skater, pre-med student -- I wonder if your name should be Debi or Superwoman. I know that you draw a lot of your strength from the strength and love and example of your mother. Yes, you were disappointed with your bronze, but the grace with which you accepted your disappointment won you a gold medal in the heart of every American.

Their devotion to each other captured the heart and earned the admiration of our entire land. Dan, you received the United States Olympic Committee's Olympic Spirit Award, and everyone here and around the country applauds the committee's choice. You dedicated that honor to your sister, her memory, and your entire family. And now you're back in competition and number one in World Cup points. Yes, your family is very precious in your life, and if recently a cause of great sadness, it is also a source of great strength. And that strength is an inspiration to the entire world.

Now, there's been a lot of talk -- too much talk in my opinion -- about the number of medals that weren't won. The heart of the Olympics is the sport and the competition. It's the exuberance of the hockey team. It's Bonny Warner breaking new ground in American women's luge. It's the pride of Marion, Indiana, at the performance of Wayne and Natalie Seybold in pairs skating. And, yes, it's the spirit of Pam Fletcher, who returned to the slopes 2 hours after breaking her leg in a practice run to cheer for her teammates. It's striving with the support and love of family and community to be the best you possibly can be, because you love your sport and -- win, lose, or draw -- you love the competition. And for that, all of you get gold medals. There's one thing you can remember above all.

Boitano. I think winning medals is one thing, but I think the thing that I'll, and we'll, most remember about Calgary is the outstanding support that not only all of our teammates gave us but that we got from our own country. It filled me personally with so much patriotism. And I think, speaking on behalf of all of the athletes, that we're very appreciative to be a part of this country, and we really respect it a lot. Bonnie Blair would like to make a presentation to make President Reagan a part of our team.

President of the United States, that I think that we had 165 heroes representing the United States up in Calgary. Men and women who won their regionals, their nationals, their trials, and since then have gone on to win world championships and world cups. And each one of them -- there's 165 stories of personal struggles, personal sacrifices, not only sacrifice of their time but economic sacrifice.

And the Congress of the United States and you, Mr. President, have done something to really help the economic sacrifice, and that is the passage of the Coin Act, which is going to bring new resources to help support these athletes in their Olympic challenges. And on behalf of the United States Olympic Committee and this team and the summer team going to Seoul, I want to thank the Congress and the President for the Coin Act. Thank you very much.

United States welcomes the statements issued by President Delvalle, Vice President Esquivel, and the political parties and Civilian Crusade of Panama favoring a government of national reconciliation. This is a blueprint for progress toward democracy in Panama. We support their goal of restoring democratic government and civilian constitutional order. Once this goal has been achieved, we will work cooperatively with the Government of Panama toward the recovery of Panama's financial and economic health. The United States remains committed to fulfilling its Panama Canal treaty obligations, and we are prepared to resume working with the Panamanian Defense Forces under the treaty once civilian rule and constitutional democracy are established.

Development Organization, whose Constitution was ratified by the United States on August 2, 1983, and entered into force on June 21, 1985, is hereby designated as a public international organization entitled to enjoy the privileges, exemptions, and immunities conferred by the International Organizations Immunities Act. This designation is not intended to abridge in any respect the privileges, exemptions, or immunities that such organization has acquired or may acquire by international agreements or by Act of Congress.

I would like to interject here, if I could, that it's difficult to stand before you and make you understand how great that legend was at that time. It isn't just a memory here and of those who knew him, but throughout this nation he was a living legend. Millions of Americans just automatically rooted for him on Saturday afternoon and rooted, therefore, for Notre Dame. Now, of course, the Rockne legend stood for fairplay and honor, but you know, it was thoroughly American in another way. It was practical. It placed a value on devastating quickness and agility and on confounding the opposition with good old American cleverness. But most of all, the Rockne legend meant this -- when you think about it, it's what's been taught here at Notre Dame since her founding: that on or off the field, it is faith that makes the difference, it is faith that makes great things happen.

I was under contract to Warner Brothers, but I had been all over the studio talking about my idea for a story. Having come from sports announcing to the movies, I said I thought that the movies ought to make the life story of Knute Rockne. And then one day I picked up the Daily Variety and read where Warner Brothers was announcing that they were making the life story of Knute Rockne and were starting to cast the film. Well, all I'd ever wanted was to play the Gipper if they some day made the film. And I approached Pat O'Brien, who was going to play Rockne -- he'd been my choice -- and he told me bluntly that I talked too much and that's where Warner's got the idea. [Laughter] And I told him what my ambition was, and he said, ``Well, they're looking for a name actor.'' But Pat did intervene with the head of the studio, the top producer, Hal Wallis. Hal was, to put it mildly, unimpressed with my credentials.

I wasn't very polite, because I told him, ``You're producing the picture, and you don't know that George Gipp weighed 5 pounds less than I weigh right now. He walked with a kind of a slouch and almost a limp. He looked like a football player only when he was on the field.'' And then I went home, because some cameramen had told me that the fellas in the front office, they only knew what they saw on film. And I dug down in the trunk and came up with my own pictures of myself playing football in college and brought them back and showed them to Hal Wallis.

Well, anyway, I was asked whether I knew that George Gipp was no angel, that he played in some pool games and card games in his time. And of course, that was true, and I said so. But it was also true of George Gipp -- and it is legitimately part of the legend -- that he used his winnings from those games to buy food for destitute families and to help other students pay their way through Notre Dame. And the reason he got so sick and later died from pneumonia was because he had promised a former teammate who had become a high school coach that he would give his students some pointers. Author James Cox tells us it was during that training session in Chicago that an icy wind blew in across Lake Michigan and the Gipper first felt the ache and sore throat that would lead to the illness that would take his life. You see, there were no miracle drugs in those days. And a promising young life was ended, but the point is, George Gipp couldn't forget a friend.

I know a fine example of this is the charitable care 80 of you students give the handicapped children at the Logan Center. This and other acts of good will say much about your generation. There are those who suggest the 1980's have been characterized by greed. Well, charitable giving is up. I think our detractors are looking in the wrong places. If they want to see the goodness and love of life of this generation, the commitment to decency and a better future, let them come here to Notre Dame. It's a place where the Golden Rule, the legend of Rockne, and the idea of religious faith still live.

I interrupt myself here for a second and tell you something else about him? As a sports announcer, I was told by many of the great coaches in this land whose teams had played against Notre Dame teams under Rockne that one of their hardest problems when playing Notre Dame was that their team worshiped Rockne -- [laughter] -- that they were fans of his, and that when they came out in the field the first thing they looked for was where was this great, great coach. Rockne, you see, was a man of vision. And that's how he came by his reputation as someone larger than life and a miracle man. Because of his tremendous success in sports, it's easy to forget that he was something else as well, something not too many people knew about him. He was also a man of science, having taught chemistry here at Notre Dame for 4 years. I must believe that he would not be at all surprised at the enormous advances that have taken place over the five decades since his death.

Much has been said about the technological revolution in which we are living. Every time we turn around, it seems to be staring us in the face. Typewriters are being replaced in corporate offices throughout the country by highly efficient word processors. With the almost universal proliferation of copy machines, carbon paper has almost gone the way of the buggy whip. Not only deregulation, but design and technology have made our airlines more efficient.

Just in the last 5 years, manufacturing productivity of our working people has increased 4.7 percent annually. And from the plant floor to the corporate boardroom, there is more cooperation, a sense of common purpose, more of a winning spirit, and state-of-the-art equipment and machinery available to do the job. I've seen it in the many companies that I've visited all across this nation, and I've heard it from the working people themselves. And don't let all the gloom and doomers tell you any different. There's a will to succeed evident in our land. I happen to have always believed in the American people. Don't ever sell them short. Given the proper tools and a level playing ground, our workers can outproduce and outcompete anyone, anywhere.

It's a far different picture than the agonizing sight of a decade ago, when many were counting out American workers and American industry. We were told that Americans would no longer go the extra mile, no longer had the drive to excel; that our country was in decline and that we, as a people, should lower our expectations. Well, today we see an America ready to compete, anxious to compete. In fact, our workers are so productive that foreign companies are opening plants in the United States, sometimes to manufacture products for export to other countries. Our industrial base, contrary to a totally false yet widespread impression, is strong and, in fact, is growing. We've added almost 300,000 manufacturing jobs in the last 6 months, and that trend is continuing. There are over 19 million manufacturing jobs today, about the same as the last 20 years, while manufacturing output is up almost 40 percent over the last 5 years. And unemployment continues to decline.

In short, American industry is lean and mean and ready to meet the competition head on. I predict that as this year progresses we will see American manufacturing reemerge as the leading force in the world marketplace. Exports will, in fact, race ahead and lead our domestic economy.

What is propelling our country forward? -- that fundamental element of the American character that no tyranny and few of our competitors can ever hope to match. Knute Rockne knew and appreciated it -- the creative genius and omnipresent optimism of our people. We had faith in them these last 7 years, and they did the rest. That's why, instead of giving up, we set our sights high. We didn't raise taxes, drain the investment pool, and tell our working people and business leaders to hunker down and prepare for the worst, to lower their expectations. We asked them to dream great dreams, to reach for the stars. We left resources in the private sector that others would have drained into the bureaucracy.

The individual investment made in companies, large and small; the retraining of our work force to handle the jobs in this technological age; the search for new ideas and innovative approaches; the modernization of older industries and investment in the new; energy, creativity, and, yes, hard work on a massive scale throughout our country, from the bottom up -- this is the foundation of our prosperity and the impetus for national progress. Our program has been to foster innovation and to keep our country in the forefront of change.

And that's why last year we committed ourselves to building the world's largest particle accelerator, superconducting supercollider to maintain our leadership in high-energy physics research and America's scientific and technological competitiveness. That's why we're developing a space plane that by the end of the century will take off from a runway, but once at high altitude will rocket into near space and zip to its destination at 10 and even 20 times the speed of sound. And that's why I'm proposing to Congress in my fiscal year '89 budget a new Thomas A. Edison prize program, offering monetary awards to any American who can develop workable, groundbreaking technologies that could improve our quality of life. And that's why scientists right here at Notre Dame are blazing trails in superconductivity research, finding ways so that this breakthrough technology can be put to use for the betterment of all mankind. Because someday, because of research being done here, transcontinental railroads will slide heavy cargoes on a magnetic cushion, cheaply and quickly across the country. Perhaps our energy costs will drop below anything we could have imagined a decade ago.

That's why we're not just going to compete, we're going to win. And that's also why this year we'll see the return of the American space shuttle, symbolic of America's tenacity. We never give up. And I cannot help but believe that the heroes of the Challenger will be cheering along with the rest of us when the United States reclaims its rightful leadership role in leading the conquest of this, the last frontier.

And you know there are always those who say the problem's too big, it can't be helped, let's prepare for the worst. But a few years ago, we heard that about the drug problem here in America. But a few people, including my roommate, Nancy -- [laughter] -- said it was time for action, not gloom and doom. And the statistics are starting to show what her commitment and the commitment of millions of others has accomplished. Not only did a recent survey of high school seniors show that one-third fewer seniors acknowledged current use of cocaine in 1987 than the year before, but almost all the students said it was wrong to even try a drug like cocaine.

We still have a long way to go, and when Nancy and I see stories saying just that in the newspaper, we welcome them. But let's also remember that the shock of recognition is not a sign of defeat: It's the beginning of victory. And victory will be ours. And I hope that each of you will join us in saying that drugs hurt, drugs kill, that each of us must just say no to drugs and drug users, and most of all in giving America what America deserves: your very best. And that means a drug free generation. And may I challenge you? Why not? Why not make your generation the one that said, once and for all, no more drugs in the United States of America or the world?

Excellence too is returning to our schools. We've learned what's always been known here at Notre Dame: that values are an essential part of educational excellence. Throughout the Nation, parents and teachers are gaining greater control over local curriculums, emphasizing basics and making their children's education a priority in all of our lives. And they're right to do so, because all of the wonderful gains I've talked about so far, especially those gains built on the growth of technology, depend on young Americans who know how to think, calculate, write, and communicate.

Now, there are those who see a dark side to our technological progress. Yes, they admit our well-being has been enhanced in so many ways. Technological advances now are making it more likely, for example, that our natural resources will be spared as long-haul telephone lines and electrical cable give way to the satellite transmissions and computer chips. I spoke to the young people of Europe not long ago via our WORLDNET system and reminded them that only a short time ago such a transmission would have required thousands of tons of copper wire and other resources. Instead, our talk was transmitted quickly, cheaply, efficiently, almost miraculously from our continent to theirs, via satellite.

Yet it is pointed out that, regretfully, as man has advanced into this new age, so has his capability to kill and destroy; and it's no longer just those in uniform who are victimized. In World War I, more than 8 million military personnel lost their lives and over 12 million civilians died. During the Second World War, almost 20 million in uniform lost their lives; however, there were about 14 million civilians killed. And if there's ever another such conflagration, a Third World War, hundreds of millions will lose their lives.

I was in college, I remember a debate in one of my classes. This was back in the days when the bomber was just being recognized as the potent weapon that it later became in the post-World War I days. Our class debated whether or not Americans -- people who, to our way of thinking, stood for high moral standards -- would ever drop bombs from an airplane on a city. And the class was about evenly divided. Half felt it might be necessary. The others felt bombing civilians would always be beyond the pale of decency, totally unacceptable human conduct, no matter how heinous the enemy. Well, a decade later, few, if any, who had been in that room objected to our country's wholesale bombing of cities. Civilization's standards of morality had changed.

Well, today, technology is pointing toward a way out of this dilemma. It's given us the promise of basing our security in the future on protection rather than the threat of retaliation. SDI offers a chance to reverse not only the nuclear arms buildup but also to reverse the trend that in effect has put a lower and lower value on human life. Technology offers you young people who debate in today's classroom an option that threatens no one and offers a shield rather than ever sharper, more deadly swords. It offers you young people a chance to raise the moral standards of mankind.

I came here in 1981 for one of the first major addresses of my Presidency, I acknowledged the difficulties we faced in the world, not only the threat of nuclear war but also totalitarian expansion around the world, especially in places like Afghanistan. But I also said that in avoiding these two unacceptable choices of nuclear confrontation or totalitarian rule the West had a secret resource of strength: the spiritual values of our civilization and the essential decency and optimism of our peoples.

And something that got a warm response from you undergraduates, but was treated very skeptically in Washington, was my suggestion that these values were so strong and this inner strength was so great that, in the long run, the West would not contain communism: We would transcend communism, that the era of the nuclear threat and totalitarian darkness would someday be put behind us, that we would look again with all the people of the Earth to the bright, sunlit uplands of world peace, world prosperity, and yes, world freedom. How much has changed since those days. And as we look back at 7 years of peace as well as progress in arms reductions and the hope of a Soviet exit from Afghanistan, we can be pleased that the inner strength of our nation and our civilization is increasingly apparent with every day that passes.

Yes, we've seen more change in the last 50 years, since Knute Rockne was with us, than in all the other epics of history combined. You are the beneficiaries of this, and it is you who'll continue the struggle and carry mankind to greater and greater heights. As Americans, as free people, you must stand firm, even when it's uncomfortable for you to do so. It won't always be easy. There will be moments of joy, of triumph. There will also be times of despair, times when all those around you are ready to give up.

It's then I want you to remember our meeting today. And ``some time when the team is up against it and the breaks are beating the boys, tell them to go out there with all they've got and win just one for the Gipper.

President today announced his intention to nominate Barry M. Goldwater, Jr., to be a member of the Board of Trustees of the Barry Goldwater Scholarship and Excellence in Education Foundation. This is a new position.

The President. Well, no, because I believe that peace is inevitable. I don't think that anyone -- we may have some differences there as to how to achieve it, but I don't think anyone believes that we can go on just with a constant state of warfare and unrest. And I believe that we have presented for discussion a pretty good solution that would remove some of the problems besetting the people in the occupied territories.

The President. Well, I don't think it's so much pressure as it is just an attempt at persuasion. But also, I'd like to point out that his Cabinet is pretty evenly split on the solution. So, it isn't a case of outside pressure there. He has a great element in his own government that sees merit in the proposals that we've made.

The President. Frankly, I haven't given much thought to that and to their election process there as to whether it would or not. I know that he has now broached that subject. And yet if they were held, maybe it is that he would believe that he might have more support for his position, because the other faction, then, in the election is the one that is already differing from the Prime Minister and supportive of what we've proposed.

The President. Well, I'm a great believer in a free press and the right of the people to know, and so I would have to be opposed to it, thinking that they want to conduct operations in which they would rather not have public knowledge of them.

The President. Well, this is a problem, because you have a situation there where the Soviet Union has not recognized Israel as a nation. That's very difficult to have someone participating in a conference of that kind who doesn't even believe in the right of statehood of the other country. What we've also thought is not the kind of international conference that would seek to impose a settlement. I don't think that really is the province of the other countries, but to be helpful and see if we could not join in helping arrive at a solution that would once and for all end the hostilities. I think most of the world tends to forget that war between Israel and the Arab States still is a fact. It has never been settled. There has never been any peace agreement arrived at, and it would be a great achievement if once and for all that state of war came to an end.

The President. Well, I would say quite the contrary -- not as to whether Japan is an emerging power. I think that having been Governor of a State on the Pacific Basin, in the western part of our country, I believe that the old adage ``Go west young man'' still holds true, that the Pacific rim is something very great economically for the future. It is coming into being as a great economic force.

But I'm speaking of the developing nations when I speak about the other. But I would think the reverse is true. I believe that with our economic summit, that our turning away from protectionism to the extent that we are, and our efforts to even do more of that with the GATT [General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade] treaty and all, that we've made great improvement in world economy. And we have to face the fact that it is a world economy, that none of us anymore can believe that we can stand off and just achieve prosperity by ourselves.

The President. Well, you see I was still up against that Legislature with that other philosophy. But I do believe that that's one of the things that's happened in these 7 years -- is that instead of the argument as it had been for more than half a century, in which those who believed in deficit spending defended it, and they said, oh, this brings prosperity, this is necessary to do this. Now that argument, which was a fallacious argument, is gone, and the only debate between us now is how best to achieve the balanced budget. There is no longer anyone defending deficits.

The President. I think I should remain neutral there, also, that that would be best for all of us. And I wouldn't want to seem to be trying to involve myself in what the course of the French people should be.

The President. Well, I think my philosophy there would have to be the same as it is here in our own election process: that until decisions are made as to who the nominees are going to be, I will remain neutral.

The President. Well, this is one of the problems. It's a pretty complex negotiation that is going on. Apparently, both sides would like to get this 50-percent reduction in weapons, but it's a little more complex than the INF treaty that we did agree to because of the verification features and all. So, I am acting on a supposition that he also wants the treaty. And it's a case of not setting a deadline whereby you have to hurry and maybe accept something less than is possible simply to meet a deadline. So, we've set no date, but we're working just as hard as we can to arrive at an agreement.

The President. Oh, yes, because I think there are other things. Our negotiations at the summit meetings and our discussions have been on a number of things -- not only the arms control but the regional problems, Afghanistan, Nicaragua, things of that kind, and also human rights. We believe that that is of great importance if the relations between our countries is to improve, that there must be some solution to these things that we think are such violations of human rights. And we've made progress in all of our meetings on all of these subjects. And so, I'm looking forward to the summit. It will be nice if we have reached a point at which, as we did here, we could sign that treaty. But if not, I think we would continue to discuss it, make progress, and eventually come to a signing.

The President. Well, you know, there might be some merit in the fact that we now know each other. We've laid a groundwork of relationship. And someone coming in new -- and he remembers his own experience coming in -- there would be probably a wait while someone else established themselves in the position and you discovered what their ideas were and so forth. So, I think that probably he would like to get some things wound up because of all the groundwork that's been laid.

The President. I do agree. And I think that probably what she is saying is something that I've also said, but that hasn't been recognized as much. And that is that this idea that came into being of a nuclear-free Europe at the same time that we're all aware that in conventional weapons the Soviet Union is far in advance of NATO -- and it is only the presence of some of the nuclear, particularly tactical weapons, that have redressed that imbalance.

On the other hand, I believe that as we continue with our Strategic Defense Initiative, the seeking of a defensive weapon -- there never has been an offensive weapon yet in the world that has not led to a defense, even the sword and the shield. And I believe that it is possible to come up with a defensive system that can render the nuclear weapons obsolete. Because I have said -- as a matter of fact, to your Parliament, when they graciously allowed me to address them -- I have said a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought. There can't be a victor in a nuclear war. Where do we live after we have poisoned the Earth?

The President. I try to refrain from speaking in such details, as matters that are strategy, that I don't think should be discussed. So, I can't go beyond that. I don't want to talk about systems that -- that, I think, is information that should be held.

The President. Well, the truth is that there are still a great many nuclear weapons in NATO, in the tactical and battlefield-type weapons. We still have our Trident submarines and so forth and are going forward with those programs. And I think the enemy's well aware of that. So, I don't think that first fear that was expressed by some people that INF was in some way lowering our defensive strength.

Let me point out that it was the Soviet Union that came along with a nuclear weapon that was targeted on all the leading targets and cities and so forth of Europe. NATO had nothing to match it. NATO appealed to us -- this was before I was in office here -- for weapon systems to provide a defense -- or not a defense, a deterrent, I should say. And when I came in office, I inherited this situation.

And if you'll remember, there was great objection on the part of many people to that. At the same time, however, that we went forward, and the Soviets were quite upset and left the table. I proposed to the Soviets that we would join them in a zero-zero option. And again, there was some scorn about that -- as if I had done something that could not possibly happen. And the Soviets left the bargaining table. But they returned.

The President. Well, couldn't that grow from such things as I also suggested? In addition to tearing down the wall, and without going so far as to offer an opinion about reunification, I said that couldn't Berlin then become a city in which maybe some things -- for example, Olympics games, meetings, international meetings and so forth -- could take place, and also a change in the whole aerial position, aircraft position so that Berlin could once again become a hub for international air traffic. And then maybe, from all of those things, reunification could grow.

The President. Well, we have achieved some results with them, because mainly we have talked about regionalism, things like Afghanistan and Nicaragua and so forth. We've talked about human rights and the violation there and what an effect that has on our trying to improve relations with each other. And we have made gains.

There has been a softening in their position on human rights, and they have freed political prisoners and so forth. We think they have a long way to go to meet our standard of human rights. And also, we see now his determination to leave Afghanistan. So, no, we talk about all those differences that are between us as well as the arms matters. And obviously we've made progress now in that with the treaty that has already been signed and the one that is being negotiated now.

The President. Well, there are a number of things in which we've made progress that I would like to see us speed up the progress. Economically, for example, we're on the path now toward returning to the balanced budget idea. For almost 60 years, the opposition party has been, in the main, in control and has practiced a policy of budget deficits. We at least now -- the argument about whether you should or should not deficit spend has changed to where, for these last 7 years, it is only a case of, well, how fast do you restore the balance, and how do you -- what methods do you use to restore a balanced budget? So, we've made a gain there. I would like to see us act faster with that -- some modernization of our budgeting process that I think is very lacking right now.

Then, we have one spending area in which there is controversy. And that is when I took office, on any given day, half of our military aircraft couldn't fly for lack of spare parts. Half of our naval vessels couldn't leave port for the same reason or for lack of crew. And I said that, even with my intent to try and eliminate the deficit, if it was a choice between eliminating the deficit or rebuilding and refurbishing our national security I would have to choose the national security. And we did. We made great progress. Only in this last year or so, that now that -- again, the opposition party has a majority in both houses of our legislature. They have forced reductions in defense spending on us that I think are very detrimental and are going to remove some of the advantage that we have gained, and I would hope that we could change and continue to restore and reach our defense targets. I think that peace comes through strength.

There are some other things of that kind, some changes -- we as you know, a unique thing about our country, we are a federation of sovereign States. And a great deal of authority has been left in the hands of local government and the State governments. Clear back when Franklin Delano Roosevelt ran for election, his promise was to restore the authority and autonomy to those local levels of government that had been unjustly seized, as he put it, by the Federal Government. Well, things didn't get better over the years, but we have embarked on a program of restoring that Federal balance, restoring the sovereignty of the States. And we've made progress in it, just as we've made great progress in improving the business management of government.

We estimate that in these few years, we have reduced the amount of paperwork imposed on our citizens, on our businesses, and on our local levels of government by 600 million man-hours of work a year. And I would like to see this continue.

The President. Well, maybe people are surprised to hear this, but yes, I do enjoy it. I was out there as a citizen making speeches and arguing about things and campaigning for individuals for government posts and so forth, and then to -- I never expected this -- but to find myself in a position where I can actually deal with the problems is very exciting, indeed.

If you look back at the last 7 years, that it's mainly the accomplishments you like to remember, or is there some failure you would say, I wouldn't repeat it again -- remembering, for example, your visit in Bitburg, '85, in the war cemetery in Germany? Do you regret that?

The President. Not at all. Not at all. I thought that it was very worthwhile, and I came home with a message also for our own people: that I think the courage of your country in maintaining those evidences of the horror of the Holocaust and bringing your own young people in to see them so that this can never happen again -- I think is something that you have every reason to be proud of.

The President. [Laughter] No, and she's very embarrassed about the press stories that for some reason continue to say that. No, she has been a good and faithful wife, and I share secrets with her and my problems and all of that. But, no, I'm surrounded by people that I have appointed to the Cabinet positions and all. And I have made it very plain from the first that I want to hear from them their views on these problems.

Even if they differ with what my own might be, I want to hear that from them. And one thing I do not want to hear. I do not want to hear the political ramifications on any problem, whether it is good politically to do something. All I want from them is their opinion as to whether is it good or bad for the people of this country. And then I will make the decision, having heard them out.

I ask the Congress to consider the rescission or repeal of the wasteful, unnecessary, or low priority spending projects that were included in the full-year fiscal 1988 Continuing Resolution (P.L. 100 - 202). These are the projects that, if I were able to exercise line item veto authority, I would delete. They consist of Congressional directives and amendments concerning activities which are unnecessary and for which my administration has not requested funds. It is my hope that the funds appropriated for these projects will not be spent as directed and can instead be spent on worthwhile projects or retained by the Treasury to lower the deficit. Accordingly, I am informally asking that the Congress review these projects, appropriations, and other provisions line by line and either rescind or repeal them as soon as possible. I reserve the option of transmitting at a later date either formal rescission proposals or language that would make the funds available for more worthwhile purposes, for any or all of these items.

I assumed this office, the Congress has appropriated billions of dollars for questionable purposes, much of it in the context of massive spending bills passed in great haste that not even Congress had an adequate chance to evaluate. Because current law so severely restricts my ability to impound or not spend appropriated funds, I again appeal to the Congress to provide the Chief Executive with permanent line item veto authority. In the meantime, I urge your prompt attention to this request for legislative action in order to avoid these unnecessary expenditures of taxpayer dollars.

In my State of the Union Address, I said I would send back to Congress examples of spending items that are wasteful, unnecessary, and low priority, and that if I had a line-item veto I would have struck from the legislation.

The items I have chosen represent only the more excessive examples from the continuing resolution itself. I have not included fundamental policy differences, such as major program terminations, that I have with the Congress.

Nor have I included the many earmarks that appear in the report language accompanying the appropriations. The report itself is never sent to me and, as the Supreme Court has said, has no force of law. In fact, I am directing all executive agencies to provide a full justification before they expend any funds to comply with these earmarks. And I am not including even more items tucked away inside the other piece of legislation I received in December, the reconciliation bill, that actually increase the deficit without benefit to the taxpayers.

I believe the American people can see by this exercise why I have consistently appealed for a line-item veto. We need to restore some discipline to our budget process. Does the Congress have the discipline to vote on these projects and take this next step?

I have said, I have limited this initial list, and as a result -- while it will have an immediate beneficial effect -- it will not, by itself, solve our budget problems. I urge the Congress to take the necessary action on this limited list in order to avoid these unnecessary expenditures of taxpayers' dollars. It is another step on the road to a balanced budget, a demonstration in discipline.

The President. Yes, oh, yes. We're going to pursue that and hope that well before my time is up we will have that resolved. But there are other things here in our own domestic problems. I think that our budgeting process that has led to the deficit spending over the last almost 60 years must be corrected. And I am going to be fighting for legislation to achieve that. And for my successor -- that he could have some things I haven't had, such as what's called a line-item veto -- the power to pick things out of a legislation and veto them. And we still have further to go in the building up of our national security. And that is important to me, as is our relationship with our allies in Europe and NATO.

The President. My views haven't changed. But you must remember that the Soviet leaders, when I first came into office, kept dying. And finally there was little chance to work with any of them on some of the things that I thought should be straightened out. Now there is a new leader, and he does seem to want to make some changes in their system.

And so, we have been able to reach agreement on some of the things that we've discussed in our summit meetings. I always take up the matter of human rights, and there has been an improvement in that. Regional conflicts -- and we see them now -- this leader wanting to get out of Afghanistan. So, I think progress can be made, but as I have frequently said to him -- I'm not a linguist, but I have learned a Russian proverb that I use on him every once in awhile: Dovorey no provorey -- trust but verify.

The President. No, not at all. As a matter of fact, we're still going forward, and we've made progress. And there have been breakthroughs. I believe that the Strategic Defense Initiative that we're working on can be such an effective defense, that it makes so much more sense than thinking that a deterrent in which we're trying to keep the peace by threatening to blow each other up, that if we can come up with a defensive weapon -- and I have expressed to General Secretary Gorbachev my belief that we'd be willing to share it -- that if we could have a defense that did render those weapons obsolete -- because I have stated many times that I do not believe that a nuclear war can be won nor should it be fought. Where would a victor live after we'd poisoned the Earth with an exchange of these multiple weapons that we have?

The President. Well, we have the one treaty signed already now -- the intermediate-range weapons. That was targeted on every principal city in Europe, and now it no longer exists. And we're now trying to negotiate a treaty that would reduce by half the strategic ballistic missiles. But to those people who talk denuclearization and think that somehow I am suggesting something that might be dangerous to Europe -- not at all. I recognize that the tactical nuclear weapons that we have and the airborne weapons and so forth are necessary to balance the great superiority that the Soviet Union has achieved in conventional weapons. And until those weapons can be reduced and we achieve a defensive parity there, until then, you cannot go on with further denuclearization.

The President. On the economic side, I think we've made great progress in changing a philosophy that was here in our land in which the political debate was between how much more deficit spending the Government should do. Now that whole argument has been changed, and it's down to, well, what is the best way to eliminate or reduce the deficit spending. And the argument is how to reduce the spending, not between one side that wants to spend more as against the other. I'm proud of that, and I hope that before I leave we can have some improvements in our budgeting process that will be adopted by our government. I am proud of that. I'm also proud of the fact that when I came into office our national defense was quite a shambles. On any given day, half our military aircraft couldn't fly for lack of spare parts. Today we have achieved a great improvement in our military. And I think the fact that we have signed this INF treaty with the Soviet Union is evidence of the fact that peace comes through strength.

The President. No, I am sure there were things I would have -- I think there were some things that, whether they were failures or whether they were just terrible disasters -- one, namely, the terrorist murder of some 240 of our young marines is a tragedy I will never forget. And I will never forget the families that I met with of those young men.

United States has had a long and mutually productive relationship with Panama. The people of the United States consider the people of Panama to be near neighbors and friends. The historic Panama Canal treaties exemplify the close cooperation that has traditionally characterized the friendship between the two countries, which created one of the great engineering works of the human race.

Out of concern for our friendship, we have been saddened and increasingly worried in recent years as Panama's political crisis deepened. Our policy with respect to the situation in Panama is clear: We strongly favor a rapid restoration of democracy and the resumption by the Panamanian Defense Forces of a role consistent with constitutional democracy. In the present circumstances, I believe that General Noriega would best serve his country by complying with the instruction of President Delvalle to relinquish his post. In so doing, General Noriega would contribute very substantially to reducing political tensions and set the stage for a prompt transition to democracy in Panama. Until such a time as democratic government is restored in Panama, the United States cannot proceed on a business-as-usual basis.

Today, therefore, I have taken a number of steps against the illegitimate Noriega regime that will contribute significantly to the goal of a democratic, stable, and prosperous Panama. I have directed that actions be taken to suspend trade preferences available to Panama under the Generalized System of Preferences (GSP) and the Caribbean Basin Initiative.

Further, in keeping with the spirit of our war against drugs, I have ordered that Panama be subject to intensified scrutiny by our Immigration and Customs Services in order to apprehend drug traffickers and money launderers. Moreover, because we recognize President Delvalle as the lawful head of government in Panama, I have directed that all departments and agencies inventory all sources of funds due or payable to the Republic of Panama from the U.S.

In that light, I have directed that certain payments due to Panama from the Panama Canal Commission be placed in escrow immediately. This step is in complete compliance with our obligations under the terms of the Panama Canal treaties. I am prepared to take additional steps, if necessary, to deny the transfer of funds to the Noriega regime from other sources in the United States.

We have welcomed the recent statements issued by President Delvalle, the political parties, and the Civilian Crusade of Panama calling for a government of national reconciliation. We support their goal of restoring democratic government and constitutional order. Once Panamanians achieve this goal, the United States is fully prepared to work with the Government of Panama to help quickly restore Panama's economic health. The United States has been, and remains, committed to fulfilling faithfully its obligations under the Panama Canal treaties. We are also prepared to resume our close working relationships with the Panamanian Defense Forces once civilian government and constitutional democracy are reestablished.

Well, we're here to talk about America's strength in international trade. And seeing each of you -- manufacturers large and small, people who know about trade not just in theory but in practice, people who don't hide from a challenge but compete with the best of American ingenuity and energy -- yes, knowing you and knowing America's working men and women, as well, I know why today American exports are the highest they've been in the entire history of the United States of America.

Now, to see the charges that some of our critics throw around, you'd never guess that we export so much as a paper clip. You've heard their charges: the deindustrialization of America, the decline of the middle class, the loss of American jobs. We keep knocking them down with facts.

We hit them with the more than 15 million jobs created since our recovery began. We keep pounding away at the fact that these are better, higher paying jobs, as well as that after years on a falling roller coaster the real income of the average American has risen steadily now for 5 years. We throw at them a three-punch combination of surging manufacturing exports, the longest peacetime expansion on history, and the reality that more Americans are at work today than ever before. And after all this, you'd think they'd stay on the mat and wait for the bell, slip back into the locker room in shame. But, no, they just keep coming up with new charges and new demands for a return to old and discredited policies. You know, this Washington sparring match -- in one form or another, it's been going on since the day I took office.

Well, today we're here to knock down again some of those fellows that are taking the wild swings. And the wildest is that American manufacturing and American workers are losing out in international trade. As Al Smith used to say: ``Let's look at the record.'' Over the past 15 months, the volume of exports has been growing four times as fast as the volume of imports.

On one hand, since 1980 the United States manufacturing economy has increased its productivity more than three times as much as in the previous 7 years. The result is that, as one German manufacturing expert put it recently, the United States is, in his words, ``the best country in the world in terms of manufacturing costs.'' The other reason for our manufacturing export boom is, in a single word, entrepreneurship -- smaller businesses that are growing rapidly and seeking new markets. Since our recovery began, businesses with 100 or fewer people and businesses that are 5 years old or less have created most of the new jobs in America. They are also responsible for many of our exports, like one small furniture manufacturer from St.

Louis who visited Europe late last year. It was kind of a busman's holiday. He started looking at European furniture. And he said, ``I discovered that my products were a lot better and cheaper.'' Now he's selling tables and chairs to Scandinavia.

All of this adds up to one thing. As economics writer Warren Brookes reported recently: ``One of the best kept secrets in economic circles these days is that the Reagan administration could end with a bang, not a whimper, as the Nation makes an apparently successful shift to an export-led economy.'' Well, I'm very grateful to Mr. Brookes for saying that. Those were his words, not mine. You'd think this would all be cause for rejoicing here in Washington -- not among our critics. They've been predicting economic disaster for 5 years. They've waited; they've been patient. Now they're tired of waiting. Some of the provisions they've put in the trade bill now before the House-Senate conference would hurt American jobs, American competitiveness, and the entire American economy.

For example, when David Birch, MIT's expert on job creation, asked why the United States has so much more entrepreneurship and, therefore, so much more job creation than Europe, he found some straightforward answers. Among these were, as he's written: ``Regulations are much more onerous in Europe than in the United States, eliminating much of the flexibility that is the bread and meat for entrepreneurs.'' And to point out the principal villain, he added: ``Europeans face a host of rules governing their right to close down facilities, fire workers, and relocate operations . .

Another example, this week Honda began exporting its first cars from America to Japan. Foreign investment has helped create new American jobs and American exports. It has contributed to the rising productivity of American manufacturing that I mentioned earlier. So, what does the trade bill include? New disclosure requirements that would dampen and discourage foreign investment from coming into this country.

One final example, potentially the most serious: Today over 10 million American jobs depend on imports, exports, or both. We're continuing a pattern that began in our first days as a nation. In periods when our total international trade has expanded, the number of jobs has risen. When trade has fallen, so have jobs. Since the end of World War II, the expansion of international trade has been in the framework of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, the GATT.

Not 5 people in 100 can tell you what GATT is, but without it the world would long ago have fallen back into the cycle of protection and retaliation, every country for itself -- a cycle that helped to bring on the worldwide Great Depression of the 1930's.

Mandatory retaliation provisions could require me and future Presidents to take actions in direct violation of the GATT. If enacted, they could weaken the international trading system and could require the President to start trade wars. It's a bad proposal under any circumstance, but it's particularly bad now that American exports are soaring and American manufacturers are exporting as never before and so are vulnerable to retaliation as never before. Yes, too many backers of the trade bill talk about making America more competitive but support provisions that would bench some of the best competitors on our team.

I've mentioned three problems we have with the trade bill. There are many, many more -- more than there's time to touch on here. But we've listed them in detail for the conference members and said how strongly we feel. My veto pen remains ready and available if the final work product of the conference remains antitrade, anticonsumer, antijobs, and antigrowth. But my hope, which I believe you share, is that I won't have to use that pen. The administration is working diligently with the Congress to avoid that, to get a trade bill that will complement our efforts to promote trade, exports, jobs, and productivity, not stymie them.

Now, you all know that the House-Senate conference on the trade bill is working away and plans to finish its job by Easter. While there's much left to do in this process, it got off to a good, constructive start earlier this month by throwing overboard many objectionable provisions. We just hope that the rest of the other 16 subconferences will follow the example of flagship subconference number one and that the flagship subconference will continue on this constructive course. As they continue their work, I would note that on Tuesday those who had predicted that protectionism would be embraced in the South were proven wrong. The American people know that putting up walls around our country is a prescription for ruin, not renewal.

Congress considers the Omnibus Trade bill, it can either help or hinder a free and open trading system. Let me suggest that provisions on the trade bill stick to five rules. One, that they're GATT legal. Two, that they not provoke retaliation against our bombing export business -- wait a minute -- our booming export business -- [laughter] -- or U.S. firms abroad. Three, that they not restrict the flexibility of U.S. business to adjust to foreign competition. And four, that they not tie the hands of U.S. negotiators who are working to open markets abroad. And five, sort of summing it all up, a kind of golden rule, don't pass any trade law that we wouldn't want another nation to pass in just the same form, regulating Americans who do business there. The golden rule -- it's not a bad way to do business, in the home or in the marketplace, around the world. I hope we can count on the support of each of you in the next few weeks. Now is not the time to turn out the lights on America's export boom.

I'd like to talk to you today about our nation's trade policy. I can't think of a recent economic issue that has generated more heat and less light, yet has more importance to our long-term national interest, than trade.

Throughout the 7 years I've been in office, professional doomsayers have latched onto one issue after another as evidence of an American decline. They can't seem to acknowledge the obvious good news that surrounds us -- the low inflation, the over 15 million new jobs since November 1982, and the longest peacetime economic expansion of the century. Trade is only the most recent subject of lamentation by our critics. For them, our trade deficit is an excuse for getting the Government more involved in private business decisions. They say that Americans can't compete with foreign workers, so we should slow imports by erecting protectionist trade barriers. As usual, the doom merchants are wrong.

The United States economy remains the most dynamic and exciting one on the globe. Our entrepreneurs, our can-do spirit, and our economic freedom are the envy of the world. The pessimism used to justify protectionism is totally unfounded.

Let's clear up a few myths. First, the trade situation is improving far more quickly than people realize. Economists may disagree on the impact of the trade imbalance, but there is no disagreement that there has been a remarkable turnaround in the real trade deficit. Since the third quarter of 1986, the merchandise trade deficit in real terms has declined 18 percent. And over the past 15 months, the volume of exports has grown over 4 times as fast as the volume of imports. Clearly, we are in an export boom. American industries, particularly manufacturers, are setting records. Unfortunately, there's a threat to all this good news. I'm talking about the trade bill pending in Congress. Adopting protectionist measures and starting trade wars now would be like closing the barn door just as the horse is trying to get back in. The best way to keep our exports growing is to keep international trade expanding. And that brings me to another myth: that Congress can pass a law that will reduce the trade deficit without destroying our prosperity. Legislation can reduce a trade deficit only if it reduces economic activity. If people are not working, they're not trading. We had a trade surplus and 25-percent unemployment in the Great Depression.

It is filled with scores of provisions that are protectionist and defeatist. My veto pen is ready if the final bill remains antitrade, anticonsumer, antijobs, and antigrowth. However, the administration is willing to work diligently with Congress to produce a bill that would increase our international competitiveness and complement our efforts to promote trade, exports, jobs, and productivity, not stymie them.

All those working on the bill should take a deep breath, take another look at the trade outlook, and work together in a constructive spirit. It is still possible to write a bill that I can sign. Indeed, I'm encouraged by reports on the status of the trade bill negotiations. The conference committee working on the final draft of the bill has already eliminated a number of troublesome provisions, including illegal quotas, budget-busting giveaways, and protectionist measures. Many objectionable provisions remain, including proposed procedural changes in the law, but I'm hopeful that in the next phase these will be jettisoned. Only wholesale elimination of many of the existing items will produce a bill I can sign.

Regardless of whether I sign trade legislation this year, we will continue our free and fair approach to trade policy. We will challenge unfair trade practices of other countries in order to achieve a level playing field for American industries. We will negotiate to knock down trade barriers on a bilateral or multilateral basis. In that regard, we will seek early enactment of the U.S.-Canada free trade agreement and push for concrete progress in the upcoming Uruguay round of trade negotiations. Finally, we will continue to coordinate economic policies with our major trading partners, thereby helping to maintain a favorable international climate for trade expansion.

America's open market is its great strength, not its weakness. International trade has helped bring unparalleled prosperity to the American people. It would be a tragic mistake to surrender to doubt and defeatism just when our prospects are looking so bright.

New breakthroughs in 1987 demonstrated the increasing importance of international cooperation in science and technology. The discovery of superconductivity at high temperatures has the potential to revolutionize the way we work and live; international agreement on a protocol concerning protection of the ozone layer was a major accomplishment which will benefit future generations.

Official, government-to-government science and technology cooperation, such as our highly successful cooperative programs with India and China, supports our foreign policy objectives, as well as the mission objectives of the domestic agencies involved. Through the space sciences and environmental agreements we engaged in practical cooperation with the Soviet Union, while the signing of an S&T agreement during the Vice President's September 1987 visit to Warsaw provided a visible signal of our desire to improve relations with Poland. Such international cooperation should provide positive science and technology benefits to involved domestic U.S. agencies commensurate with their cost.

United States preeminence in science and technology has been a major force in our leadership of the free world since World War II. Today we are putting new emphasis on assuring continued U.S. strength in science and technology in the years ahead. Employing science and technology to improve American industry's competitiveness is a major objective of this Administration.

On April 10, 1987, I issued an Executive order to facilitate industry access to federally funded research and development and to assure more effective access by American researchers to developments in science and technology abroad. In negotiating new S&T agreements, we are seeking equitable access by American researchers to foreign research facilities, balance in the contributions and benefits for countries participating in the agreements, and assurance of protection for intellectual property rights.

We are working with our economic partners and allies to ensure that all industrialized countries make equitable contributions to the world scientific enterprise. We are negotiating with Japan to restructure our Head of State-level S&T agreement to reflect new realities, including Japan's prowess in science and technology.

In numerous developing countries, science and technology are instrumental in furthering U.S. foreign policy objectives. Agency for International Development-funded programs continue to produce major advances in the health sciences and increased global stability through improved agricultural output, while facilitating the entry of American vendors into overseas markets.

To implement the U.S.-Brazil Presidential S&T initiative announced in September 1986, a distinguished binational panel of scientific experts met twice during 1987 and identified priority areas of research for cooperative projects. The recommendations of that eminent panel will be considered by the U.S.-Brazil Joint Commission for an expanded program of cooperation, as envisioned in the 1986 initiative.

Impressive gains were made in Fiscal Year 1987 in utilizing our S&T relations to enhance America's defensive capabilities through increased foreign participation in the Strategic Defense Initiative and through other cooperative S&T activities, such as those carried out under NATO auspices. At the same time we have negotiated several agreements that significantly strengthen free-world efforts to control illicit transfer of advanced technology to potential adversaries.

Participation in international science and technology activities is vital to U.S. national security in the broadest sense. Science and technology can be a powerful force to enrich cooperative relations with friends and adversaries, as well as to strengthen our Nation's competitive posture in the economic arena. International cooperation can accelerate the rate of scientific discovery and the development of new technologies to meet the needs and challenges of the future. In many cases, the benefits of such cooperation accrue first to the partners in the joint effort, and such returns make it feasible to sustain a long-term commitment to cooperation. Ultimately, however, all the world's people are beneficiaries. I remain committed to the belief that international cooperation in S&T is vital to the future prosperity and security of our Nation and of the earth.

Dr. Pfaltzgraff, thank you, and thank you all very much. Let me say it's a great honor to be addressing so many distinguished scientists, business leaders, and academics, so many who live the life of the mind and use their talents for the benefit of mankind.

It hardly seems like 5 years since we first embarked together on this noble enterprise to find an alternative to nuclear terror. When I addressed the American people on that March 1983 day, I said it was time to turn the great technological might of our nation not to inventing ever more deadly weapons of destruction but instead to creating new instruments of peace -- defensive technologies that harm no one. I said it would take years, probably decades, of effort. There would be setbacks and failures as well as successes. But we could not ignore this great challenge: to develop the means of rendering ballistic missiles impotent and obsolete. If anything, we overestimated the technological challenge back then. The technologies of our Strategic Defense Initiative have progressed more rapidly than many of us ever dreamed possible. The creative genius and ingenuity of U.S. and allied scientists and engineers and the steadfast support of so many in this room have helped make that rapid progress possible.

But if we've learned anything in 5 years, it's that it's sometimes easier to bring into being new technologies than it is to bring about new thinking on some subjects. Breakthroughs in physics are sometimes easier than breakthroughs in psyches. Perhaps the most astounding reaction to the announcement of our Strategic Defense Initiative was the sudden conversion of many on a certain side of the political spectrum to the strategy of mutual assured destruction, whose very appropriate acronym is MAD. I remember that only a few months before the announcement of SDI I received a letter from 41 academic leaders, presidents, and board chairmen of many of our most distinguished colleges and universities. And in that letter they called upon me to, and I quote, ``to make a major investment in planning, negotiating, and cooperating to establish civilized, effective, and morally acceptable alternatives to nuclear war.'' We could no longer rely on the notion, they said, that, ``no nation with nuclear weapons will pull the trigger.'' Well, I couldn't agree more. In fact, I've been waiting for another letter from that same group supporting SDI. [Laughter] I guess the mails are just a bit slow. [Laughter] I do promise to write back right away.

The philosopher John Stuart Mill said, I think aptly, that ``no great improvements in the lot of mankind are possible until a great change takes place in the fundamental constitution of their modes of thought.'' Sometimes, however, it's not so much mankind in general as it is the experts who have trouble changing the fundamental constitution of their modes of thought. The fact is, it would probably stop any inventor dead in his tracks if he listened for too long to the advice of experts in his field.

Well, we've had our share of naysayers when it comes to SDI as well. But some of the difficulties they said were insurmountable have already been surmounted much more rapidly and effectively than anticipated. For example, our Delta 180 and, most recently, 181 tests, demonstrating among other things our ability to track fast-moving targets in space and distinguish between dummy warheads from the real thing, showed a technical ability that some scientists, concerned and otherwise, had said could not be achieved so quickly. But, you know, I don't give up hope for our opponents. It has been estimated that the sum total of human knowledge doubles every 8 years. Maybe they just need a little bit more time.

Now, for the impressive technological feats that we've recently seen, immense credit goes to the brilliant and hard-working scientists and engineers who made them possible. And I want them to know they are not working late into the night to construct a bargaining chip. They are building a better future, free from the nuclear terror, and generations to come will thank them. We'll continue to research SDI, to develop and test it, and as it becomes ready, we will deploy it.

There's one serious problem that the SDI program has had a great deal of difficulty with, however. It would probably be listed in the physics textbooks under the heading, ``Inertial Resistance of Large Bodies'' -- [laughter] -- in this case, some in the United States Congress. In every one of the last 4 years, Congress has cut back on our requests for SDI funding. And those cuts have already set the program back 1 to 2 years. In what can only be described as a self-fulfilling prophecy, they have voted down funding because they say SDI won't work.

Even now that the Soviets have acknowledged their own SDI-like program, some in Congress would bind us to an artificially restrictive interpretation of the ABM treaty that would effectively block development of our SDI program and perpetuate the Soviets' advantages in advanced strategic defenses. This effort makes even less sense when the Soviets aren't even abiding by the ABM treaty, while we are. Virtually all experts, even some of our biggest critics, agree that the Soviet construction of the large, phased-array radar at Krasnoyarsk is an out-and-out violation of the ABM treaty.

A few months ago, I raised a serious specter. I pointed out that it is not only in the development of strategic defenses that the United States could be left behind. A recent report released by the Department of Defense called ``The Soviet Space Challenge'' warns that the Soviet space program points in one disturbing direction, and I quote: ``the methodical pursuit of a war-fighting capability in space.'' Soviet launch capacity far outstrips our own. We should be concerned that, together with the longstanding program and the construction of the Krasnoyarsk radar as part of an updated early warning system, the Soviets may be preparing a nationwide ABM defense of their territory. In other words, they may be preparing to break out of the ABM treaty. In that eventuality, without SDI, we would be dangerously unprepared.

There has been a tendency by some in Congress to discuss SDI as if its funding could be determined purely by domestic considerations, unconnected to what the Soviets are doing. Well, that is, to put it plainly, irresponsible in the extreme. The fact is that many Americans are unaware that at this moment the United States has absolutely zero defenses against a ballistic missile attack. If even one missile were to be accidentally fired at the United States, the President would have no way of preventing the wholesale destruction of American lives. All he could do is retaliate -- wipe out millions of lives on the other side. This is the position we find ourselves in; to perpetuate it forever is simply morally untenable. Vengeance is not the American way. It certainly cannot form any plausible longstanding basis for Western strategy if a better form of deterrence can be established. Flexible response has worked. And we, of course, remain committed to our present strategy, but we remain equally committed to our search for a safer way to deter aggression.

It can be said that the old discredited policy of MAD is like two adversaries holding loaded guns to each other's head. It may work for awhile, but you sure better hope you don't make a slip. People who put their trust in MAD must trust it to work 100 percent -- forever, no slip-ups, no madmen, no unmanageable crises, no mistakes -- forever.

For those who are not reassured by such a prospect, and I count myself among their number, we must ask: Isn't it time we invented a cure for madness? Isn't it time to begin curing the world of this nuclear threat? If we have the medicine, can we in good conscience hold out on the patients? I believe that, given the gravity of the nuclear threat to humanity, any unnecessary delay in the development and deployment of SDI is unconscionable. And that's why we'll move forward, when ready, with phased deployments of SDI.

As of last August, the Department of Defense has begun focusing on six specific defensive technologies, and they are now moving ahead with them to the demonstration and validation phase. The development and deployment of an initial phase, when it is ready, will be undertaken in such a way that it provides a solid foundation for a continued evolution toward a fully comprehensive defense system, which is SDI's ultimate goal. Among the objectives of this first phase will be to strengthen deterrence by denying the Soviet Union confidence in their ability to achieve any objectives through the use of ballistic missiles. It will also protect the population of the United States and its allies against an accidental launch of ballistic missiles. Every extra minute that we leave the population of the West defenseless against ballistic missiles is one minute too long.

Equally important, SDI will continue to prove an irresistible force behind offensive arms reductions. Our SDI program, in fact, already has helped to make this world safer because, along with NATO's INF deployments, it was one of the major factors that led to the treaty signed by General Secretary Gorbachev and myself that will for the first time reduce the nuclear arsenals threatening mankind.

At the same time, we must work to strengthen our conventional deterrence. SDI will likely prove instrumental here, too, by providing high-tech spinoffs for NATO's Conventional Defenses Initiative, CDI, that could help to address the imbalance of forces in Europe. And SDI helps to solve what is perhaps the greatest paradox of arms reduction: that reductions, if not carefully managed, could mean greater instability and risk. As arms are reduced to lower and lower levels, each violation could become more and more threatening. SDI can play a key role in solving this paradox of nuclear arms reductions. We may build an edifice of peace and arms reductions, but just like your homes, it needs an insurance policy against fire and theft. SDI is it: vital insurance against Soviet cheating.

A few days ago, when I went to Notre Dame, nostalgia was much the order of the day, but I did bring up an issue, a very serious issue. I spoke about when I was in college and a debate that I remember having in one of my classes in those post-World War I days, when the bomber was just being recognized as the potent weapon that it later became. Our class debated whether or not Americans -- people who, to our way of thinking, stood for high moral standards -- would ever drop bombs from a plane on a city. And the class was about evenly divided. Half felt it might be necessary. The other felt that bombing civilians would always be beyond the pale of decency, totally unacceptable human conduct, no matter how heinous the enemy. We believed that young men in America would refuse such an order. But a decade later, during World War II, few, if any, who had been in that room objected to our country's wholesale bombing of cities under the hard pressures of total war. Civilization's standards of acceptable conduct had changed.

It's hard to say they changed for the better. We have the opportunity to reverse this trend, to base the peace of this world on security rather than threats, on defense rather than on retaliation. Those who say it can't be done, who stand in the way of progress and insist that technology stops here -- I plead with them to consider what they're saying. For no matter how effective arms reduction negotiations ever are, we can never ``uninvent'' the nuclear weapon. We can never erase the knowledge of how to build a ballistic missile. If they were able to succeed in stopping SDI, then we would be left forever with that loaded pistol to our heads, with an insecure and morally tenuous peace based forever on the threat of retaliation.

But the world is rapidly changing, and technology won't stop here. All we can do is make sure that technology becomes the ally and protector of peace, that we build better shields rather than sharper and more deadly swords. In so doing, maybe we can help to bring an end to the brutal legacy of modern warfare. We can stop the madness from continuing into the next century. We can create a better, more secure, more moral world, where peace goes hand in hand with freedom from fear -- forever.

Each one of you has made your family proud and your country grateful for the active role that you've taken in community and world events and especially for your loyalty to the United States and Israel and to the wonderful work of the United Jewish Appeal. I believe you also know where I stand. As I look back on these last 7 years, I remember many emotional, many poignant moments, but few, believe me, will ever match those times I have spent with you, especially on those occasions when we commemorated the victims of the Holocaust and pledged to each other and the world: Never again.

Those of us in this room are as one on this point: We know what Israel is. We know what Israel means. And as I will tell the Prime Minister tomorrow, when it comes to Israel, the United States is not a bargainer or a broker: The United States is a friend and an ally. And that's why one of the things I'm proudest of is the steps we've been able to take during this administration to build a stronger foundation of enduring friendship and cooperation. For example, strategic cooperation -- something other administrations shied away from -- is now a commitment our two governments have made to each other. It responds to our mutual needs and is a reminder to all that no wedge will be driven between the United States and Israel.

Our commitment to close relations and to Israel's security has been reflected in our foreign aid levels, our commercial cooperation of research and defense, and the vital and historic free trade agreement that we have signed. Our commitment to Israel's security is also reflected in our latest peace initiative. Making progress toward peace in the Middle East not only serves mutual interests, it is urgent. It's in America's and Israel's interest to develop a credible basis on which to make progress, one that promises to overcome stalemate and make genuine reconciliation possible. That's why I'm delighted that Prime Minister Shamir is here.

We will not leave Israel to stand alone, nor will we acquiesce in any effort to gang up on Israel. Peace will not be imposed by us or by anyone else. It will and must come from the genuine give-and-take of negotiations. That's what we're working to set in motion now.

And while our work on behalf of Israel is a vital part of why we're there today, I would be remiss if I didn't speak to you about other efforts to make U.S. foreign policy consistent and strong. Only a few years ago, some Americans were beginning to question what we stood for in the world. Our nation has now regained its confidence and sense of purpose. We've returned to proclaiming enthusiastically the democratic ideals that inspired our Founding Fathers and the Founding Fathers of Israel. And I think this vigorous foreign policy is good, of course, for Israel because the United States is thought of today as a strong nation and a reliable ally. This has helped move the process of peace forward throughout the world, and it has enhanced the security with all our friends and allies.

And what I hope you've noticed during the past few years is that we have moved American foreign policy away from the notion that mere containment is enough, that we have willingly and openly proclaimed to the world that our goal is not just peace but freedom as well, that we seek not separate spheres of influence or a simple balance of power or a deadening stalemate with totalitarianism, that we seek instead a day when every person in every land will share fully in the blessings of freedom. And that's the core of our foreign policy: protecting the security of the United States while advancing the cause of world freedom and democratic rights. It's in this context that I think you can understand why we've moved forward boldly on a broad range of foreign policy issues like SDI, the Persian Gulf, and aid to those fighting against Communist tyranny.

That last subject is particularly appropriate. I want to take a moment of your time to talk about it, and I hope you'll give some thought to this after we part today. You know, so frequently, I have found that the measure of any regime or government can be taken by its official attitude toward anti-Semitism.

And as most of you know, few regimes today so blatantly sanction and practice official anti-Semitism as the Sandinista Communists in Nicaragua. The Jewish community has been forced out almost entirely. Managua's one synagogue has been defaced and firebombed. And Nicaragua has officially aligned itself with Mu'ammar Qadhafi of Libya and of course the PLO, an organization that has again revealed its true colors, opposing our efforts of peace and trumpeting its responsibility for a sickening terrorist attack on a bus carrying Israeli men, women, and children. It's no accident that Sandinista leaders were trained in the seventies by the PLO, and the PLO has established a presence in Nicaragua. So, too, one of the hijackers some years ago of an El Al airliner was a Sandinista. He died in the attempt and is now a national hero. They have named a geothermal plant after him. And of course, the Sandinistas have led the way in sponsoring recent anti-Israel resolutions in the U.N.

I think it's time that some in Congress who want to turn away from the reality of leftwing anti-Semitism face the facts about the anti-Semitism of the Sandinistas as well as their ties to the PLO and other terrorist groups. It is the Nicaraguan freedom fighters who are resisting this kind of moral corruption. It is the freedom fighters who are fighting for the political, civil, and human rights of Jews and Christians in Nicaragua. It is the freedom fighters who must be sustained and supported in this struggle.

You know, I just don't understand the inability of some people to realize what the Sandinistas are all about. Only the other day we saw newspaper accounts of the Castro connection in international drug dealing. So, too, the evidence has been compelling for a long time that the Sandinistas have been involved in such drug trafficking. In one of my TV addresses on the subject of contra aid, I showed a picture of a drug smuggler's aircraft landing in Nicaragua at a military airfield and being met by Nicaraguan officials and soldiers. And the Commission on Organized Crime, chaired by Judge Irving Kaufman, concluded that top-level members of the Sandinista leadership were involved in the international drug trade. Well, anyway, the point that I'm making here is that all of us have a stake in what happens in Nicaragua as we do in the fate of Central America in general.

You know, many people early on said that we could not save El Salvador, and our aid package passed by only a few votes. And now democracy is prospering in El Salvador, Honduras, Costa Rica, and Guatemala. Nicaragua is the odd man out and a menace to the cause of regional democracy. But the struggle in Nicaragua goes on, and with Congress' help, we'll see to it that democracy wins there too.

I hope you can see how these issues are interrelated and how our foreign policy is not just strong for the sake of being strong, that we seek to do more than just project national pride and firmness. Our real motivation, our root motivation is the cause of human freedom, and this has no small bearing on the mutual concerns that bring us here today.

As all of you know, I expect to be in Moscow one of these days for a summit meeting with Mr. Gorbachev. As it was at the Washington summit and the summits before that, the issue of Soviet Jewry will, I assure you, be high on our agenda. The General Secretary knows of my profound concern on this point and of your concern as well. And I'll be making this very plain again in Moscow.

So, let me conclude then by thanking you for all you've done on behalf of the issues of Soviet Jewry and Israel's security. The safety and security of the United States and the safety and security of Israel are all part of a larger cause, the cause of human rights for every man, woman, and child on this Earth. And today, as we meet here, let's rededicate ourselves to that cause. Thank you very much.

American Presidential Inaugural. Prior to joining the White House staff, he was executive assistant to the director of the White House transition team, and assistant to the president for administration at the American Enterprise Institute for Public Policy Research.

African Government urging clemency for the Sharpeville Six on compassionate and humanitarian grounds. We have been in consultation with other governments on this matter and understand that similar appeals will be made to the Government of South Africa by Britain and West Germany, among others. We trust the South African Government will respond favorably to these requests for clemency. An act of compassion such as this by the South African Government would be welcomed by all Americans.

Government historically has used the formal exercise of the power of eminent domain, which provides orderly processes for paying just compensation, to acquire private property for public use. Recent Supreme Court decisions, however, in reaffirming the fundamental protection of private property rights provided by the Fifth Amendment and in assessing the nature of governmental actions that have an impact on constitutionally protected property rights, have also reaffirmed that governmental actions that do not formally invoke the condemnation power, including regulations, may result in a taking for which just compensation is required.

Responsible fiscal management and fundamental principles of good government require that government decision-makers evaluate carefully the effect of their administrative, regulatory, and legislative actions on constitutionally protected property rights. Executive departments and agencies should review their actions carefully to prevent unnecessary takings and should account in decision-making for those takings that are necessitated by statutory mandate.

The purpose of this Order is to assist Federal departments and agencies in undertaking such reviews and in proposing, planning, and implementing actions with due regard for the constitutional protections provided by the Fifth Amendment and to reduce the risk of undue or inadvertent burdens on the public fisc resulting from lawful governmental action. In furtherance of the purpose of this Order, the Attorney General shall, consistent with the principles stated herein and in consultation with the Executive departments and agencies, promulgate Guidelines for the Evaluation of Risk and Avoidance of Unanticipated Takings to which each Executive department or agency shall refer in making the evaluations required by this Order or in otherwise taking any action that is the subject of this Order. The Guidelines shall be promulgated no later than May 1, 1988, and shall be disseminated to all units of each Executive department and agency no later than July 1, 1988. The Attorney General shall, as necessary, update these guidelines to reflect fundamental changes in takings law occurring as a result of Supreme Court decisions.

Communications between Federal agencies or departments and State or local land-use planning agencies regarding planned or proposed State or local actions regulating private property regardless of whether such communications are initiated by a Federal agency or department or are undertaken in response to an invitation by the State or local authority.

Governmental officials should be sensitive to, anticipate, and account for, the obligations imposed by the Just Compensation Clause of the Fifth Amendment in planning and carrying out governmental actions so that they do not result in the imposition of unanticipated or undue additional burdens on the public fisc.

Actions undertaken by governmental officials that result in a physical invasion or occupancy of private property, and regulations imposed on private property that substantially affect its value or use, may constitute a taking of property. Further, governmental action may amount to a taking even though the action results in less than a complete deprivation of all use or value, or of all separate and distinct interests in the same private property and even if the action constituting a taking is temporary in nature.

Government officials whose actions are taken specifically for purposes of protecting public health and safety are ordinarily given broader latitude by courts before their actions are considered to be takings. However, the mere assertion of a public health and safety purpose is insufficient to avoid a taking. Actions to which this Order applies asserted to be for the protection of public health and safety, therefore, should be undertaken only in response to real and substantial threats to public health and safety, be designed to advance significantly the health and safety purpose, and be no greater than is necessary to achieve the health and safety purpose.

While normal governmental processes do not ordinarily effect takings, undue delays in decision-making during which private property use is interfered with carry a risk of being held to be takings. Additionally, a delay in processing may increase significantly the size of compensation due if a taking is later found to have occurred.

The Just Compensation Clause is self-actuating, requiring that compensation be paid whenever governmental action results in a taking of private property regardless of whether the underlying authority for the action contemplated a taking or authorized the payment of compensation. Accordingly, governmental actions that may have a significant impact on the use or value of private property should be scrutinized to avoid undue or unplanned burdens on the public fisc.

When a proposed action would place a restriction on a use of private property, the restriction imposed on the use shall not be disproportionate to the extent to which the use contributes to the overall problem that the restriction is imposed to redress.

When a proposed action involves a permitting process or any other decision-making process that will interfere with, or otherwise prohibit, the use of private property pending the completion of the process, the duration of the process shall be kept to the minimum necessary.

Sec. 5. Executive Department and Agency Implementation. (a) The head of each executive department and agency shall designate an official to be responsible for ensuring compliance with this Order with respect to the actions of that department or agency.

Executive departments and agencies shall, to the extent permitted by law, identify the takings implications of proposed regulatory actions and address the merits of those actions in light of the identified takings implications, if any, in all required submissions made to the Office of Management and Budget.

Significant takings implications should also be identified and discussed in notices of proposed rule-making and messages transmitting legislative proposals to the Congress, stating the departments' and agencies' conclusions on the takings issues.

The Director, Office of Management and Budget, and the Attorney General shall each, to the extent permitted by law, take action to ensure that the policies of the Executive departments and agencies are consistent with the principles, criteria, and requirements stated in Sections 1 through 5 of this Order, and the Office of Management and Budget shall take action to ensure that all takings awards levied against agencies are properly accounted for in agency budget submissions.

General shall, in consultation with each Executive department and agency to which this Order applies, promulgate such supplemental guidelines as may be appropriate to the specific obligations of that department or agency.

This Order is intended only to improve the Internal management of the Executive branch and is not intended to create any right or benefit, substantive or procedural, enforceable at law by a party against the United States, its agencies, its officers, or any person.

The President. It's been a pleasure to meet with Prime Minister Shamir again and to have this opportunity to review with him the important issue of peace in the Middle East. We have a unique relationship with Israel, a relationship of trust, friendship, and shared ideals. I think we can be proud of the achievements that we've made over the last 7 years in giving more substance and dimension to the strong ties between Israel and the United States. In the remainder of my term, we'll continue to work to strengthen those ties.

The main topic of our discussion today was the search for peace in the Middle East. We've seen a new sense of urgency on the part of many in the region and a wide recognition of the reality that the status quo is unacceptable. Our efforts have been geared toward trying to find a reasonable and practical way to make real progress -- progress that will assure the security of Israel and its neighbors and achieve the legitimate rights of the Palestinians.

The present situation is a challenge and an opportunity to move decisively to break the deadlock that has lasted far too long. I hope we will not lose this opportunity. Today Prime Minister Shamir and I discussed the proposal for moving forward rapidly to peace negotiations, which Secretary Shultz left with Israel, Jordan, and Syria during his recent visit. We believe this proposal offers a realistic and achievable way to change the relationship between Israel and the Arabs. It's a concrete demonstration of my commitment to finding a solution to the Arab-Israeli conflict through a negotiating process that would begin soon. As I told Prime Minister Shamir, the United States is prepared to be an active partner in this process, and we hope that all the parties involved will seize this opportunity.

So, let's be clear about several things. The United States will not slice this initiative apart and will not abandon it. And those who will say no to the United States plan -- and the Prime Minister has not used this word -- need not answer to us; they'll need to answer to themselves and their people as to why they turned down a realistic and sensible plan to achieve negotiations. This is a time for all the parties to the conflict to make decisions for peace.

Minister Shamir and I also reviewed our countries' robust and vital bilateral relationship. As you know, Israel has been designated one of our major non-NATO allies and friends, and we have developed a solid basis of strategic cooperation between our two countries. Strategic cooperation is a symbol of our converging needs and our mutual commitment to ensuring that no wedge will ever be driven between us. I want to add that Prime Minister Shamir and I both remain very concerned about the many thousands of Jews that remain in the Soviet Union and yearn to emigrate or fully express their Jewish identity. The plight of Soviet Jewry shall remain at the top of my agenda in my discussions with Secretary Gorbachev.

I bid farewell to Prime Minister Shamir, I wish him and the people of Israel a happy 40th anniversary. Our prayer is that this anniversary will mark the beginning of the era of peace and accommodation in the Middle East.

President. This visit to Washington has given me an opportunity to meet again with President Reagan, Secretary of State Shultz, Secretary of Defense Carlucci, and Secretary of the Treasury Baker. My colleagues and I have also met with congressional leaders and other friends in the Congress, in the administration, and in the general public.

I am indebted to the President for this kind invitation. It affords me the opportunity to discuss matters of common concern and to deepen the friendship and understanding between our two countries. In the talks with the President and with Secretary Shultz, we reviewed the state of U.S.-Israel relations and the efforts to advance peace in the Middle East. Mr. President, we have always been in complete agreement with the principle of negotiating from a position of strength for which you have always stood. We have stepped up efforts to seek a framework for conducting direct peace negotiations between Israel and those of its Arab neighbors that we hope will join us in the quest for peace.

American involvement and the Secretary's efforts in this search. We have confidence in the American role because we share the same goal of peace with security for all the countries in the Middle East. I have strong reservations concerning the proposed international conference which, in my view, is not conducive to peace. Some months ago I accepted a proposal by Secretary Shultz to launch direct negotiations with the blessing of the U.S.-Soviet summit in order to grant international legitimacy for the negotiations for those states desiring it. Unfortunately, it was rejected.

Nevertheless, I shall be ready to consider a similar proposal. Israel firmly believes that those who are prepared to live with each other in peace must learn to negotiate directly with each other. We remain committed to the Camp David accords, which have provided a workable agreed framework for peace between Israel and each of its Arab neighbors.

President, these are difficult times for Israel. We shall overcome them in the best possible way consonant with our tradition and our eagerness to prevent the loss of lives. Mr. President, on the eve of Israel's 40th anniversary, the people and Government of Israel are united in hailing the deep friendship and the close cooperation between our two countries. This friendship has reached unprecedented levels under your leadership. We have established a strategic cooperation agreement between Israel and the United States, a free trade area agreement between our two countries, and the designation of Israel as a major non-NATO ally of the United States. We are confident that a solid foundation of friendship between Israel and the United States will remain unshaken in spite of occasional differences of opinion that may arise.

I am sure I speak for all the people of Israel and for peace-loving persons everywhere when I express our gratitude for your untiring efforts to reduce tensions in the world and to bring peace to our war-torn region. We will continue to do our utmost to cooperate in the search for peace. I return to Jerusalem confident that with the friendship and understanding of the United States Government and its people we shall succeed. Thank you.

Freedom of Information Day reminds us of some of our most important principles. ``We the People,'' as the framers of the Constitution called us in the Preamble, govern ourselves through representative government. All of us, of course, have the right to do so. We are best able to do so when every citizen is informed on matters of public importance and can therefore take full part in civic affairs and in the exercise of fundamental rights. We can all be grateful indeed to the Founders who through the Constitution -- including the Bill of Rights -- provided for freedoms for all Americans that make a well-informed electorate possible.

No one understood these principles more thoroughly than James Madison, our fourth President, whose birthday, March 16, is the occasion for Freedom of Information Day. Long before he became President, he served as chief recorder of the Constitutional Convention; he was perhaps the most influential architect of our charter of liberty and limited government. Throughout life he championed conditions that could foster responsive government, such as a free press and a vigorous flow of information among the public, tempered with the recognition that for legitimate government to function, some matters must remain outside the public domain. He maintained this balance eloquently when he helped draft the Bill of Rights, and especially the First Amendment, while restricting access to most of the documents that form the Constitutional record.

Two centuries later, Madison's ideals continue to strengthen our Nation. We Americans cherish our freedoms and use them; we thrive on the benefits of free exchanges with those who represent us in government and discharge the public trust. This interaction requires forthrightness in government and public access to most government information.

Indeed, the responsible flow of such information to the public is entirely compatible with the necessary and proper protection of vital public interests such as national security, privacy, and effective law enforcement.

On the anniversary of President Madison's birth, let us celebrate our history and heritage of freedom of information by remembering and revering the life and example of this wise and generous patriot and lover of liberty.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this sixteenth day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

I am returning unsigned with my objections S. 557 and transmitting for your prompt consideration the Civil Rights Protection Act of 1988. The Congress should enact legislation designed to eliminate invidious discrimination and to ensure equality of opportunity for all Americans while preserving their basic freedoms from governmental interference and control. Regrettably, the bill presented to me fails to achieve that objective.

There is no matter of greater concern to me than ensuring that our Nation is free of discrimination. Our country has paid a heavy price in the past for prejudices, whether based upon race, gender, ethnic background, religion or handicap. Such attitudes have no place in our society.

It was with this commitment in mind that in the wake of the Supreme Court's 1984 Grove City College decision, I voiced my support for legislation that would strengthen the civil rights coverage of educational institutions that existed prior to that decision. I have repeatedly endorsed legislation to do just that. Today I am sending to Congress a bill that goes further than the legislation previously endorsed. This proposed bill is intended to accommodate other concerns raised during Congressional consideration of the Grove City issue.

Our bill complements well our body of existing Federal civil rights laws. But even more remains to be done. For example, I have urged the Congress to enact responsible legislation to deal with some obvious failures of the Fair Housing Act of 1968, including the need to protect persons with disabilities.

Congress, on the other hand, has sent me a bill that would vastly and unjustifiably expand the power of the Federal government over the decisions and affairs of private organizations, such as churches and synagogues, farms, businesses, and State and local governments. In the process, it would place at risk such cherished values as religious liberty.

The bill presented to me would diminish substantially the freedom and independence of religious institutions in our society. The bill would seriously impinge upon religious liberty because of its unprecedented and pervasive coverage of churches and synagogues based on receipt of even a small amount of Federal aid for just one activity; its unprecedented coverage of entire religious elementary and secondary school systems when only a single school in such a system receives Federal aid; and its failure to protect, under Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972, the religious freedom of private schools that are closely identified with the religious tenets of, but not controlled by, a religious organization.

Businesses participating in Federal programs, such as job training programs, would be subject to comprehensive Federal regulation. While some proponents of S. 557 have claimed that it would not apply to farmers who receive Federal crop subsidies or food suppliers who accept food stamps, the ambiguity in the statute and its legislative history indicates that these exemptions should be made explicit.

A significant portion of the private sector -- entities principally engaged in the business of providing education, health care, housing, social services, or parks and recreation -- would for the first time be covered nationwide in all of their activities, including those wholly unrelated activities of their subsidiaries or other divisions, even if those subsidiaries or divisions receive no Federal aid. Again, there was no demonstrated need for such sweeping coverage.

Further, this bill would be beyond pre-Grove City law and expand the scope of coverage of State and local government agencies. Under S. 557, any agency of such a government that receives or distributes such assistance would be subject in all of its operations to a wide-ranging regime of Federal regulation, contrary to the sound principles of federalism.

The cost and burdens of compliance with S. 557 would be substantial. The bill would bring to those it covers -- which is most of America -- an intrusive Federal regulatory regime; random on-site compliance checks by Federal officials; and increased exposure to lawsuits, which are costly to defend even when you win.

Moreover, such legislation would likely have the unintended consequences of harming many of the same people it is supposed to protect. For example, persons with disabilities seeking to enhance their job skills are not helped if businesses withdraw from Federal job-training programs because of their unwillingness to accept vastly expanded bureaucratic intrusions under S. 557. Business groups have indicated many of their members may do just that.

Civil Rights Protection Act that I am proposing today addresses the many shortcomings of S. 557. The Civil Rights Protection Act would protect civil rights and at the same time preserve the independence of State and local governments, the freedom of religion, and the right of America's citizens to order their lives and businesses without extensive Federal intrusion.

In light of the significant cross-border incursion by Sandinista armed forces into Honduras from Nicaragua, and at the request of the Government of Honduras, the President has ordered the immediate deployment of an infantry brigade task force consisting of two battalions of the 82d Airborne Division from Fort Bragg, North Carolina, two battalions from the 7th Infantry Division at Fort Ord, California, plus supporting units to Palmerola Air Force Base in Honduras for an emergency deployment readiness exercise.

In addition to its value as a test of the proficiency of our military units, this exercise is a measured response designed to show our staunch support to the democratic Government of Honduras at a time when its territorial integrity is being violated by the Cuban- and Soviet-supported Sandinista army. This exercise is also intended as a signal to the governments and peoples of Central America of the seriousness with which the United States Government views the current situation in the region.

Patrick's Day is a joyous occasion on which we celebrate the Irish heritage in America and the ties of kinship, culture, and values which the American and Irish people share. The friendship between our two nations, treasured for generations, will continue to be strengthened by our shared commitment to democracy, justice, and peace.

It is appropriate to pause in our celebrations today to consider the still unresolved problems in Ireland. Northern Ireland continues to suffer from senseless violence, which tragically we have seen repeated in recent days, and high unemployment. We can best address these problems by supporting those who seek peaceful settlements to disputes and rejecting those who seek solutions through terror. Concerned Americans can help by refusing financial or moral support to any Irish terrorists.

We support the Governments and people of the United Kingdom and of Ireland in their work for justice, progress, and reconciliation in Northern Ireland. Our government welcomed the landmark Anglo-Irish agreement when it was signed in 1985. It has already yielded important results. As an expression of our continuing support, the United States is contributing $120 million to the International Fund for Ireland to promote economic progress and reconciliation -- the goals of the agreement. Reconciliation and an end to discrimination in the workplace can best be accomplished in an environment of economic growth. We therefore support economic development, the creation of new jobs, and equal employment opportunity in Northern Ireland.

President today requested the Congress to transfer funds to critical programs, make other offsetting reductions, and provide additional support for some entitlement programs, such as veterans. This request is fully in accord with our 2-year bipartisan budget agreement.

These transfers are few, but of critical importance. First, the Coast Guard is currently hampered in its drug interdiction efforts because the Congress failed to appropriate sufficient funds. This change would restore $60 million to allow the Coast Guard to maintain its efforts to stop drugs from entering this country. Second, within the Department of Justice, program revisions are necessary to cover ongoing expenses as a result of the Mariel Cuban prison riots. A budget amendment for FY 1989 is also included to provide for the reconstruction of these prisons. Third, NASA's request is necessary to support additional personnel for shuttle recovery operations -- personnel previously approved by the Congress. And fourth, the Small Business Administration is experiencing an unforeseen demand for disaster loans.

In addition to these transfers, other changes are needed to make additional funds available. For example, unanticipated currency fluctuations have severely depleted accounts for the Board for International Broadcasting. The Department of Defense requires additional authority to reprogram funds later in the year for INF verification. This request also includes several entitlement programs that are not under the control of the appropriations committees nor subject to the strictures of the budget agreement. There are several veterans' programs, including replenishment of the revolving fund for housing loans, that require immediate action. Finally, the judiciary is requesting $57 million in additional funding to cover FY 1988 pay raises. The executive branch is required by law to simply transmit this request without review or alteration.

As with the President's FY 1989 budget submission, this package complies fully with the budget agreement. The President urges the Congress to act expeditiously on this request while maintaining the integrity of our 2-year budget plan.

President today announced his intention to nominate E. Allan Wendt, a career member of the Senior Foreign Service, Class of Minister-Counselor, for the rank of Ambassador during his tenure of service as Senior Representative for Strategic Technology Policy in the Office of the Under Secretary of State for Coordinating Security Assistance Programs.

The President. Well, thank you very much. I know that they've got me scheduled. So, I just have a minute or two to say something here, and first of all, a very great thank you to Pat Troy, the owner of this particular place. Jack Kilpatrick and I -- this has been a very happy surprise. We just thought we were coming over here for a St. Patrick's Day lunch. [Laughter] It was quite a surprise, but a very pleasant surprise.

You know, my father told me when I was that high that the Irish built the jails in this country and then filled them. [Laughter] And then I -- no, I'll tell you, you're thinking what I did, and for a long time I was very chary about saying anything. I didn't know why he was so proud of that -- [laughter] -- until I got a ticket once from a Chicago cop. [Laughter] And when I heard that brogue I found out what he meant.

Well, no, I really set out to tell you that on that same trip to Ballyporeen, where I found that pub, I went up on Cashel Rock later, where St. Patrick erected the first cross in Ireland. And the young Irish guide who was showing me around took me through the cemetery, and he stopped beside one very ancient, large tombstone there. And the inscription on the tombstone read: ``Remember me as you pass by. For as you are, so once was I.

Seamus Wright -- [laughter] -- I'll keep this brief. On St. Patrick's Day, you should spend time with saints and scholars, so of course, you know, I have two more stops I have to make. [Laughter] I turned back to the ancient days of Ireland to find a suitable toast, and I think I have found it. St. Patrick was a gentleman who through strategy and stealth drove all the snakes from Ireland. Here's toasting to his health -- but not too many toastings lest you lose yourself and then forget the good St. Patrick and see all those snakes again.

Today the President received the report of the President's Commission on Privatization. Chairman Linowes and members of the Commission worked hard to prepare this final report, and they are to be congratulated on an excellent achievement. The Commission's spirit of bipartisanship, as well as the diverse backgrounds of its members, make the Commission's forward-looking recommendations especially useful as we consider what steps are needed to attain an appropriate division of responsibilities between the Federal Government and the private sector.

The work of the Commission on Privatization is close to the President's philosophy of government. He campaigned for the Presidency on a platform of limited government, and one of the earliest priorities of this administration was to reestablish the proper relationship between the Federal Government, which had grown too big and powerful, and the private sector. We are continuing those efforts, and the Commission's report today is an important contribution to them. The Commission's recommendations on privatization will prove greatly helpful to this and future administrations and to the Congress in achieving a proper balance between the public and private sectors. The President commends the members of the Commission for an excellent achievement.

Republic of Cyprus held presidential elections in mid-February 1988 and elected George Vassiliou, an independent candidate, as President of the Republic for a five-year term. I sent a message of congratulations to President Vassiliou noting the friendly, warm relations that exist between our two countries. I expressed the hope that his election would be the signal for progress in the search for a lasting, mutually acceptable settlement of the Cyprus problem.

There have been recent developments that reinforce my belief that there is an opportunity at this time to make real progress toward a settlement of the dispute. The new Special Representative of the United Nations Secretary General, Mr. Oscar Camilion, arrived in Cyprus shortly after the election of President Vassiliou and expressed his hope that there will be progress in the near future. Prior to his departure for Cyprus, Mr. Camilion met with U.S. Ambassador to the United Nations Vernon Walters and with the U.S. Special Cyprus Coordinator M. James Wilkinson.

The two leaders have resolved to increase their cooperation and to work toward lasting solutions of the issues dividing Greece and Turkey. We welcome this development and the resultant building of confidence and lessening of tensions in the area. This new dialogue in the Greek-Turkish relationship can serve as an example and positive force in the region.

While there are thus hopeful signs, it remains for the parties directly involved to work diligently toward the common goals of peace and justice. Leaders of both sides face a challenge requiring patience and the exercise of farsighted statesmanship. I want to reemphasize that the Government and people of the United States of America remain committed to helping them work toward a lasting, mutually acceptable settlement.

President today announced the members of the United States delegation of election observers to the March 20, 1988, legislative/municipal elections in El Salvador. The President believes that this round of elections represents yet another example of the development and consolidation of democracy in Central America.

In contrast to recent developments in Panama and Nicaragua, El Salvador's democratic elections demonstrate the commitment of the Government and citizens of El Salvador to democratic processes and rule. The Communist guerrillas of El Salvador, the Farabundo Marti National Liberation Front (FMLN), who have been supported by Nicaragua's Communist regime since 1979, have chosen not to participate in the elections and have instead engaged in the acts of violence and terrorism to intimidate citizens and disrupt the elections. But as has been demonstrated in the past, the determined and courageous people of El Salvador have never succumbed to the violence and threats from the FMLN. They have voted in record numbers in a progression of elections from 1982 on, repudiating the Communist FMLN and affirming their commitment to democracy. The President strongly supports the people of El Salvador and their democratic aspirations and is demonstrating this support by sending this delegation.

The Working Group shall consult, as appropriate, with representatives of the various exchanges, clearinghouses, self-regulatory bodies, and with major market participants to determine private sector solutions wherever possible.

In view of the extraordinary events in the financial markets in 1987 and the findings of the numerous market studies, including studies by Federal agencies, self-regulatory organizations, and the President's Task Force on Market Mechanisms, it is clear that further, closely coordinated work needs to be done. Despite our financial system's notable success in withstanding the shock of those events, we need to ensure that the public is protected by assuring financial integrity of the markets during periods of significant price changes.

We also must be concerned about the quality and fairness of our markets for all participants and the willingness of individuals and institutions to participate in these markets. In addressing these issues, we must keep clearly in mind the vital national interest in preserving the efficiency and international competitiveness of our financial markets and institutions.

To these ends, the President is asking the Secretary of the Treasury to chair a select Working Group on Financial Markets to coordinate the Government's efforts to evaluate recommendations and to seek the resolution of the complex issues involved. The other Working Group members will be the Chairmen of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Securities and Exchange Commission, and the Commodities Futures Trading Commission.

President expects that they will consult with the various exchanges, clearinghouses, self-regulatory bodies, and major market participants as they proceed. He has asked the Working Group to consult also with the Congress as this work progresses. The goals of the Working Group are twofold: first, to ensure the continued integrity, competitiveness, and efficiency of our nation's financial markets, and second, to maintain the public's confidence in those markets. Much can be done within the existing legal framework by both regulators and market participants, but the President has asked the Working Group to consider also whether any legislature changes are necessary.

In the President's judgment and that of his senior advisers, the major items the Working Group should address are investor confidence, credit and settlement system risks, and maintenance of orderly, efficient, and internationally competitive markets. The issues raised by the several studies that in our view merit the greatest attention are listed below. None of them is simple, and while deserving high priority, may not be resolved quickly or without considerable reflection. A significant number of issues have been suggested by most of the reports and commentators, while others have had more limited support. The list, which was developed in consultation with all members of the Working Group, is not intended to include all of the suggestions made nor all of the items that may be addressed by the Working Group; nor is it intended to imply an endorsement of all items listed. The major issues the President has asked the Working Group to address are attached.

Changes in margin requirements and additional security deposits for financial protection against price-spike volatility, settlement capability for variation margin, and positions with concentrated risk.

Use of ``open outcry,'' ``one price auction,'' and specialist book disclosure approaches in large, intraday order imbalance situations in specialist markets to facilitate price discovery and market clearing and minimize intermarket disruptions and discontinuities.

Investigation of the usefulness of enhanced reporting requirements for broker-dealer recordkeeping, large trader tracking systems, and program trades, with due consideration to financial privacy concerns and international capital flows.

Careful consideration of the desirability of more formal intermarket coordination and cooperation mechanisms, different regulatory regimes, a ``tie-breaking referee'' for intermarket issues, or emergency powers.

As a Nation we are blessed deeply and in many ways. The agriculture that sustains us is truly one of those blessings. We do well to give thanks for our bountiful crops. They are the yield of our fertile fields; of the skills and cooperation of countless Americans, including farmers, ranchers, scientists, farm organizations, commerce, and government; and, surely, of the liberty in which the American people are free to work, create, and produce for their mutual benefit.

Some of the world's best farmland is here in our country; roughly half of the land in the contiguous United States has a capacity for crop production. Our bounty supplies needs both at home and abroad; today, one American farmer produces enough food and fiber for 114 people. Our agricultural production, processing, and marketing provide jobs, generate wealth, and strengthen our economy, our standard of living, and our position in world trade markets. Thanks to our agricultural efficiency, American consumers, on average, spend less of their income on food than do citizens of any other nation.

As we give thanks for our rich harvests, let us be sure to express gratitude to all those in agriculture and its related endeavors who through the years have contributed so much to our Nation and the world and who continue to shape and to share the spirit and the heritage of the American people.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighteenth day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

There was a nice celebration of St. Patrick's Day up on Capitol Hill this week, but believe me, that wasn't the only reason Congress knew I had my Irish up. On two issues vital to our national security, I had some stern words for some of our lawmakers.

The first has to do with the safety of our hemisphere. Back in the early 1980's, there were those who argued that the prospects for democracy in Central America were bleak and we would do little to prevent Marxist dictatorships there. But after the administration built a consensus, Congress finally passed our economic and military aid program, and today the countries of Costa Rica, El Salvador, Honduras, and Guatemala are democratic. Indeed, tomorrow, El Salvador -- the nation some in Congress were gloomiest about -- will host congressional and municipal elections, just one more sign of a successful democratic reform in that nation and region.

However, in one Central American nation, Nicaragua, the cause of freedom is in grave peril. Up until the end of last month, the United States had been aiding the freedom fighters who've been trying to restore democracy by resisting the regime of Soviet-backed Sandinista Communists. However, just as the heroic efforts of the democratic resistance have forced the Communists to cut back on their aggression abroad and to make peace concessions, the Congress, in a close vote, decided to cut off aid to the freedom fighters.

Since the Congress rejected our package of assistance for those fighting for freedom in Nicaragua, the Communist dictators have done exactly as we predicted. Instead of giving peace a chance, the aid cutoff is giving the Communist dictators a chance -- a chance they long hoped for, a chance to smash their opponents. They have hardened their negotiating position. They have fired the mediator, Cardinal Obando y Bravo. They have sent mobs of thugs against peaceful opposition groups. And now, instead of negotiating for a cease-fire, they have launched a major military assault on the weakened contras, invading democratic Honduras in the process.

Now, from the beginning, our Central American policy has been designed to prevent another Cuba and to let the people of Nicaragua win back their freedom and their independence from the Soviet Union on their own, to do this without having to commit American military personnel. But now, because of Congress' aid cutoff last month, the Sandinistas have mounted their major cross-border incursion into Honduras. In response, and at the request of President Azcona, we have sent American military units to Honduras to conduct an emergency readiness exercise. Our purpose is to send a signal to the Governments and peoples of Central America about the seriousness with which we view the situation.

The freedom fighters are in desperate need of support. If they are to remain a viable and effective force, they must have assistance now. There is not a moment to spare. If urgently needed help does not reach them soon, we face the prospect of a collapse of the democratic resistance, the attendant consolidation of a Marxist-Leninist regime in Nicaragua, and an increased threat to Nicaragua's democratic neighbors.

Now, another vital security matter where the Congress has not been doing its job has involved our work on a strategic defense against ballistic missiles. This coming week marks the 5th anniversary of my call for just such a Strategic Defense Initiative, or SDI. I am taking this occasion to note that the Soviets have been making extensive progress on their own SDI-like program in the last few years. Indeed, the Soviets may be preparing a nationwide defense, which would mean a breakout from the restrictions of the ABM treaty, which prohibits a massive deployment of such a system. However, at the very moment when the Soviets are so far along in their efforts, Congress has been cutting back ours.

Every year Congress has cut the SDI budget. We are now 1 to 2 years behind schedule, and this despite the fact that the actual SDI program is progressing faster than we expected. But our scientists and engineers must have Congress' support, and they must have it soon.

I can't think of two more vital national security issues than these: preventing the establishment of a Soviet beachhead in Central America and erecting a defense shield that will reduce the nuclear threat that has so overshadowed the postwar era. That's why we cannot permit some in Congress to take dangerous risks with America's national security.

Well, we're gathered here today to mark the beginning of a new year for the valiant, freedom-loving people of Afghanistan. We may be approaching an historic moment. We all hope that what we hear from Moscow means there will be a complete and irreversible withdrawal of all the Soviet forces from Afghanistan, that the Afghan people will be able to freely determine their own future, and that the millions of refugees can return to their homes with dignity. The struggle for freedom waged by the people of Afghanistan is inspiration to free people all over the world. We have supported them in their effort to liberate their country from foreign domination, and we'll continue that support as long as it's needed. As a free people we can do no less, for their struggle is our struggle.

It now appears possible that the tenacity and tremendous sacrifices of the Afghan people will bear fruit in the coming period. The Soviet leadership seems to have finally recognized that the will of the Afghan people to be free cannot be broken. Indications of Soviet willingness to withdraw are an important step forward, though their seriousness can be proven only by the actual, and total, removal of Soviet troops from Afghan soil. To be acceptable, Soviet withdrawal must be complete, irreversible, and verifiable.

Our objectives have been and remain: prompt and complete withdrawal of Soviet forces; restoration of Afghanistan to an independent, nonaligned status; self-determination for the Afghans; and return of refugees in safety and honor. I reiterated this commitment and our support for the brave Afghan Mujahidin in my meeting last November with Afghan Alliance leader Yunis Khalis.

United States Government has also repeatedly told the Soviet leadership that any guarantees of noninterference that they and we would undertake must be symmetrical. An agreement at Geneva must not serve as a pretext for continued Soviet military support to the discredited minority Kabul regime. Some 120 members of the United Nations have voted year after year for self-determination in Afghanistan, recognizing that the present government in Kabul does not represent the Afghan people but is a direct result of outside interference. The Mujahidin and the refugees are the true voice of the Afghan people.

Soviets withdraw. We will join other nations and international organizations to help the Afghans rebuild their country and their institutions; millions of men, women, and children will be returning to a country devastated by Soviet aggression.

United States has consistently supported the Afghans in their long ordeal. That support will continue. We will rejoice with them when true peace is achieved and Afghanistan once again takes its rightful place in the community of nations. Let us pray and strive to make sure that this moment of liberation will come soon.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 21st day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Our job in the next few months is to keep the leadership on the other side of the aisle from ramming through legislation that would send the longest peacetime economic expansion on record into a tailspin. You know the legislation I mean -- plant closing regulations, protectionist trade legislation, a huge hike in the minimum wage which will guarantee unemployment for millions of poor urban teenagers, costly new entitlement programs, and hidden tax increases. Yes, working together, we've kept the rascals in the majority in line. The stakes in our continued success are high. When economist Jude Wanninski was asked not long ago why the stock market crashed on October, he replied -- here are his words -- ``the perception that the Congress, controlled by the Democratic Party, which is a party of pessimists, believes we must have protectionist trade legislation, we must have tax increases, we must even have a recession'' and the fear that Congress might have seized control of economic policy from the administration. Well, thanks to you, in the last several months we've proven to the world that the party of faith, hope, and opportunity is still in the driver's seat.

In a vote you may cast today, you can reassure the world once again. I'm talking about the so-called Civil Rights Restoration Act of 1987, commonly known as the Grove City bill. Equality before the law is the American standard. We can never allow ourselves to fall short. Discrimination is an evil, pure and simple, and cannot ever be tolerated. Ending discrimination and protecting civil rights are not, however, the issues at stake here. The real issue is that accepting one dollar in Federal aid, direct or indirect, would bring entire organizations under Federal control, from the charitable social service organizations to grocery stores to churches and synagogues.

Over the weekend a spokesman for the National Federation of Independent Businesses said that, ``There is a lot of confusion out there.'' The group is telling all small businessmen that it would like to sustain the President's veto so that an alternative can be passed which clarifies who is covered and who isn't. ``Confusion'' is exactly the right word. As Bob Michel and Trent Lott said so aptly -- the House was given almost no opportunity to amend the bill to make its intent clear. Jim Sensenbrenner was given a one-shot amendment which would have been very helpful if it had passed, but the Rules Committee gave the rest of you no opportunity to strengthen the bill on the floor so that the American public could know for sure what the legislation accomplished.

I ask you, therefore, to sustain my veto so that we Republicans can demonstrate our commitment to civil rights and our resolve to overturn the Grove City decision in a responsible manner. With my veto message on the Grove City bill, I transmitted to Congress the Civil Rights Protection Act of 1988, which is designed to ensure equality of opportunity and eliminate discrimination, while preserving our basic freedoms. It would strengthen the civil rights coverage of education institutions and accommodate other concerns raised during congressional consideration of the Grove City issue. It would extend the Federal civil rights laws to an entire plant or facility receiving Federal aid, but it would not single out certain sectors of our economy for nationwide coverage, as S. 557 would. If my veto is sustained, this is the bill that Republicans can all help move through the Congress to strengthen the protections afforded the civil rights of our citizens.

Now, let me turn to another area: our national security. If anyone still doubted what you and I've been saying for years -- that the road to peace is through the strength of America and its friends -- you'd think the INF treaty would have set their doubts to rest. But apparently it hasn't. The same issue is at stake in Central America today, and the same people are making the same old mistakes. Those who led the fight against our package of assistance to the democratic resistance cannot escape responsibility for what happened. Immediately after the House vote against our package of aid to the freedom fighters, Daniel Ortega called for the ``complete and total defeat'' of the contras. Our critics -- the ones who told us that taking pressure off of the Sandinistas would move them in a more democratic direction -- these critics dismissed Ortega's words as ``idle rhetoric.'' We know now that physical preparations for the incursion began immediately.

This incursion is no mere political mistake by the Sandinistas. It is part of a broad offensive that is both military and political. It is meant to deliver a knockout blow to the democratic resistance. And rather than pointing the way to more democracy, the cutoff of aid has also been followed by more harassment and oppression in Nicaragua -- including attacks with rocks, chains, and pipes by Sandinista-sponsored mobs on political demonstrations; the harassment of opposition journalists; and not-so-veiled threats to the opposition parties.

The truth about Nicaragua is getting out. Early last week, for example, I spoke to major contributors to the United Jewish Appeal and got a warm response when I talked about Sandinista anti-Semitism and Sandinista ties to drugs, Castro, and terrorism. I mentioned that Sandinista leaders had been trained by the PLO, and the one hijacker who died in a PLO hijacking of an El Al airline was a Sandinista who now has a powerplant named after him in Nicaragua. I mentioned the attacks on Managua's only synagogue. And I mentioned, too, the line from the Commission on Organized Crime report tying members of the Sandinista leadership to international drug trafficking.

Under this agreement, which is of unlimited duration, each party is committed to establish a Nuclear Risk Reduction Center in its capital, staffing its center as it deems appropriate. The U.S. and Soviet centers will communicate by direct satellite communication links, which are capable of rapidly transmitting full texts and graphics. To help ensure the smooth operation of the centers, the U.S. and Soviet representatives will hold regular meetings at least once each year. The Nuclear Risk Reduction Centers will pass notifications required under a number of existing and, possibly, future arms control agreements, as well as ``good will'' notifications, which may be provided at the discretion of either party.

Politico-Military Affairs. He will be assisted in the day-to-day management of the center by a staff director appointed by the Department of State and a deputy staff director appointed by the Department of Defense. The centers will operate 24 hours a day.

President is pleased to announce this step, which advances his efforts to increase strategic stability and to reduce the risk of war through accident or miscalculation. The ribbon cutting ceremony for the U.S. center will take place at the Department of State at 11:35 this morning. Secretary Shultz and Foreign Minister Shevardnadze will participate.

Well, ladies and gentlemen, President Owens, thank you all very much. It's good to have you all here in Washington. As you may have noticed, Washington, DC, isn't like other cities. Harry Truman, a man famous for saying exactly what he meant in a very few words well chosen, once said of Washington, it's the kind of city that if you want a friend you should find a dog. [Laughter] Well, that isn't true today, at least. I've counted on your friendship and support going on 8 years now. Eight years we've hung tough and hung together, often against seemingly overwhelming odds. Anybody who has come up through elected politics as a Republican knows how important that solidarity is.

It's like a story our first Republican President, Abraham Lincoln, once told when he found out all but one of his Cabinet officers ranged against him on an important issue. His story was about a man who fell sound asleep during a revival meeting and didn't hear when the minister said, ``All of you who are on the side of the Lord, stand up.'' Of course, everyone stood up immediately, except for this one man, who was still asleep. But the preacher was only getting started and bellowed out, ``All of you who are on the side of the devil, stand up.'' Well, at that the man woke up and standing as straight as he could said, ``I didn't exactly understand the question, parson, but I'll stand by you to the end. It does seem we're in a hopeless minority.'' [Laughter] Well, as Republicans, you may be in a minority in terms of numbers at this year's meeting of the National League of Cities, but always remember, the ideals and beliefs that you stand for are the majority beliefs in this United States of America. On everything from education to crime, federalism to welfare reform, to keeping the American economy a growth and opportunity economy, the people of this country agree with you.

Executive Order 12612. Everything in this town has a number attached to it -- usually a large one. But this order is a breakthrough. We took a lesson from the environmental movement, and now when any agency in the executive branch takes an action that significantly affects State or local governments, it has to prepare a federalism impact statement, which only seems proper to me. The Federalist system given us by our Founding Fathers is a precious natural resource, and every bit as much as our environment, it should be cherished and protected.

Now it's time for Congress to join us and pass a truth-in-spending initiative that requires that all legislation include a financial impact statement, detailing the measure's likely economic effects upon the private sector and State and local governments. Last month I sent to the Congress the Truth in Federal Spending Act of 1988. I hope you'll join with me and urge the Congress to promptly enact this legislation. We see the momentum of federalism in the move in States across our country to reform welfare. In my State of the Union Address, I said that some years ago the Federal Government declared a War on Poverty and poverty won. Instead of providing a ladder out of poverty, welfare became a net of dependency that held millions back. Instead of hope, we've too often bred despair and futility.

It's time, as I said to Congress, for the Federal Government to show a little humility, to let a thousand sparks of genius in the States and communities around this country catch fire and become guiding lights. You know, on the subject of federalism, I remember back when I was Governor; we had something that was a bit more common back then -- campus protests. And one thing the protesters would often chant was that we should give power back to the people.

Yes, we've made tremendous progress with federalism, but all that progress and more could be destroyed by one bill that I vetoed last week, but some hope to pass over my veto. I'm talking about the so-called Civil Rights Restoration Act of 1987. Equality before the law is the American standard. We can never allow ourselves to fall short. Discrimination is an evil, pure and simple, and cannot ever be tolerated. And there are already laws, many laws, on the books to protect our civil rights. We can ensure equality of opportunity without increasing Federal intrusion into State and local governments and the private sector.

It's a power grab by Washington, designed to take control away from States, localities, communities, parents, and the private sector and give it to Federal bureaucrats and judges. One dollar in Federal aid, direct or indirect, would bring entire organizations under Federal control -- from charitable social organizations to churches and synagogues. To give just one example, if a church or a group of churches operates a nearby summer camp open to all faiths, and that camp uses surplus Federal property, not only the camp but the entire church or group of churches would come under Federal control -- even if the church itself received no aid.

What does that mean? It means masses of new paperwork, random on-site compliance reviews by Federal bureaucrats, and a field day for lawyers -- we'd see lawsuits multiply faster than flies in springtime. The Grove City bill would force court-ordered social engineers into every corner of American society. And that's why I won't play politics with such a vital issue. I won't cave to the demagoguery of those who cloak a big government power grab in the mantle of civil rights. I have vetoed the Grove City bill, and I ask every Senator and Representative to rise above the pressures of an election year, to make a stand for religious liberty by sustaining my veto of this dangerous bill.

Now, as a reasonable alternative, I've transmitted to Congress the Civil Rights Protection Act of 1988, which is designed to ensure equal opportunity while preserving our basic freedoms. This bill properly addresses the Supreme Court's decision in the Grove City case. It would strengthen the civil rights coverage of educational institutions and accommodates other concerns raised during congressional consideration of the Grove City issue. It also would preserve the independence of State and local governments by limiting Federal regulation to that part of a State or local entity that receives or distributes Federal assistance. It's hard to believe that anyone who thinks seriously about the current Grove City bill would ever support it.

The fellow left happy. A few minutes later, another constituent came by, and this one wanted him to vote against the bill. The Congressman listened to his reasons, sat back, and said, ``You know, you're right.

The inability of some in Congress to say no to special interests is right now the biggest threat to our prosperity and our democratic way of life. And that's why few election years will be more important than 1988. As you know, reapportionment comes up just 3 years later, in 1991. Having Republicans in State and local offices is the only hope we have of getting a fair deal, and that's all we're asking for: an end to the antidemocratic and un-American practice of gerrymandering congressional districts.

Fahrenkopf and the Republican Party have challenged the Democrats' gerrymandering in court, but ultimately it's in the State legislatures that the battle for fairness must be won. And that's why Republicans are going to have to campaign with all our heart and soul for Republican State legislative candidates.

I promise you this: As far as the President of the United States is concerned, he's not going to be sitting around his garden sniffing roses in 1988. I'm going to be out on the campaign trail, telling the American people the truth about how the electoral process has been twisted and distorted and that it's time to give the vote back to the people. And I'm going to be telling them, in the name of the American system and in the name of fairplay: Vote Republican in 1988.

One final note, if I may. It's on a subject that concerns State and local officials and every American -- every citizen who cherishes our freedom and shares a concern for our national security. I'm talking about the crisis developing in Nicaragua. No, crisis is not too strong a term. Those who voted to cut off aid to the freedom fighters claimed it would bring peace to Nicaragua. We pleaded with them that abandoning our friends in the region was no way to bring peace. We warned that even though we cut off the freedom fighters the Soviets would continue their massive aid to the Communists. And as I pointed out in my press conference, Soviet military aid to the Communist Sandinista regime doubled in the first 2 months of this year compared to last year. Well, our worst fears have come to pass. Only 7 weeks after the first vote in Congress, the Sandinista Communists have launched an offensive against the freedom fighters, hoping to deliver a killer blow before anyone can come to their rescue. The freedom fighters, with all aid cut off, sit trapped inside Nicaragua, prey for the Sandinistas and their Soviet-supplied weapons. Who can't but question whether the only plan that Daniel Ortega ever intended for the democratic resistance was their elimination?

Well, if the freedom fighters are extinguished and Communist rule is consolidated in Nicaragua, the American people will be the ones to decide who is responsible. Congress must immediately redress the grave mistake they've made and send aid urgently to the freedom fighters before it's too late. In every forum available to you, with your constituents and with your Representatives in the Congress, make your feelings on this issue known, and do it now because soon it may well be too late.

It's good to be here and to see one of my oldest and truest friends, a former Senator and a former Governor, but always a current statesman, Paul Laxalt. For both Paul and me, one of the highest priorities of this election year is to make sure that another old and true friend stays where he belongs: in the United States Senate. And, of course, I'm talking about Senator Chic Hecht.

Now, we're all together on that. That's why we're here. And don't think I'm not aware of and don't appreciate what each of you is doing to help Chic. And I just heard, as evidence, of what you've done. Well, I am, and I do. Chic is going to have a tough race. We all know that. But he's a scrapper. Time and again his opponents, as well as the press, have underestimated him, given him up for goners, only to see him out ahead of the pack on election day. This year they've been writing him off again, as you were told. You didn't know you were using a couple of my lines. [Laughter] He was 31 points down in the polls just a while back, and that didn't phase Chic. He got to work, and now it's the opposition that's sweating. And he's narrowed that gap, as you've been told, to just 7 points, and he's closing fast.

That's the kind of spirit I like. It reminds me of reading a poll about another candidate in January 1980. [Laughter] It was taken at a National Press Club luncheon here in Washington on the eve of the primary season. Those in attendance were asked who would be the next President of the United States. Jimmy Carter got a large number of votes and so did Teddy Kennedy. But there was one candidate on the Republican side who got so few votes from the wise men of Washington that it wasn't even reported in the lineup.

He's the kind of Senator who doesn't make a lot of noise; he just gets things done for Nevada and the Nation, and more often than not he comes out on top. Nevada may be the Silver State, but Chic Hecht has gone for the gold medal among Senators, and so far as I'm concerned, he's won it.

I'd like to turn to a matter that shows just how critical it is to put Chic and men and women like him in the next Congress. I'm talking about Central America and the situation in Nicaragua. Last week's Sandinista attack on Honduras was greeted by too many in Congress not as the proof that funding the freedom fighters is the one way -- the only way -- to get the Sandinistas to the peace table and keep them there. No, one Senator spoke for too many when he shook his head about the political mistake of those in Managua -- as if they'd stumbled in some primary or caucus.

Well, maybe if these critics thought for a moment, they'd just see what the nature of this so-called mistake really was. Troop movements, small-team reconnaissance missions, the positioning of fuel and supplies -- in short, the logistical preparations for the incursion -- began just after Congress voted to reject our package of aid to the democratic resistance. We saw it happening. This was a precise and carefully prepared operation that showed the influence of outside advisers and must have required several weeks to plan. It was not some spontaneous Sunday afternoon outing.

In other words, counting back to when we first saw logistical preparations commence and before that to when planning would have had to start, this invasion was beginning or underway even as, in late February, a group of liberal House Democrats sent a letter to anti-aid lobbyists saying that, in their words: ``Nothing will bring peace faster than destroying contra hopes for more military aid.'' This was the same period in which we were warning that an end to congressional aid would set back, not advance, the cause of peace and democracy in Nicaragua.

Preparations for the incursion were continuing when Sandinista mobs were breaking up peaceful demonstrations in Managua -- something they'd eased off on as the congressional vote on aid to the freedom fighters approached -- but this time their attacks showed a savagery that had rarely been displayed before, as thugs pounded demonstrators with clubs and metal bars. And believe me, they did not just do this to their fellow men. They did it to groups of women and ladies who were simply walking in the streets and protesting various things the Sandinistas were doing. The stage for the attack was set even before Daniel Ortega fired the peace mediator, Cardinal Obando y Bravo, and boasted he was going to crush the contras.

Well, now we know he had reason to believe he could. The attack he knew was approaching involved multiple combat battalions, thousands of troops, and the close support of MI - 17 and MI - 25 attack helicopters -- Soviet craft. Were the signs of danger ever clearer? Yet throughout this time our critics were saying over and over that only by stopping aid would we give the peace process a chance. I'm not questioning the sincerity of our critics, only their judgment.

I'm saying that we need -- America needs -- more men and women on both sides of Capitol Hill with the good judgment of Chic Hecht. He's understood what's been going on in Central America from the first, and as on so many matters, I've always found him to have a cool, clear head. And I know that others have recognized these qualities in Chic as well. He's been endorsed by the Chamber of Commerce, and I understand that he just received the coveted Watch Dog of the Treasury Award. You know, he told you he was a businessman, and he is. And you know, principles of the kind that are just commonplace out in the private sector and in the business world are still in great need in our Nation's Capital.

And in a moment, I'd like to discuss world trade with you in some detail. But before I do so, it's clear from all I've just said that we have indeed been through a great deal together, you and I. And I just want to pause for a moment and let you know how much your friendship and support have meant to me, and to say: From my heart, I thank you.

Yet there's a great deal still to do in these remaining 10 months, and so to get on with business, let's consider for a moment America's role in international trade. Now, you'd think the United States never exported so much as a paper clip. The truth is that today America can claim surging manufacturing exports, the longest peacetime expansion on record, and the reality that more Americans are at work today than ever before. And in today's climate, I can just see some of those people out there saying, ``Oh, yes, but that's because of the increase in population.'' Well, there's an answer to that. We have the highest percentage of the potential work pool employed than ever in the history of our nation. So, that takes care of the increase in population charge.

But the critics never learn. Since the third quarter of 1986 the volume of American exports has been growing some 4 times as fast as the volume of imports. And much of this export surge is in manufacturing exports. Industry after industry is finding itself in an export boom. As Business Week magazine reported recently: ``Basic manufacturers, once considered a dying breed, are selling products many thought wouldn't even be made in the United States any longer -- escalators to Taiwan, machine tools to West Germany, lumber to Japan, and shoes to Italy.'' Well, the dollar's helped, of course. But what's happening here goes beyond the dollar.

Too many backers of the trade bill currently under consideration in Congress talk about making America more competitive, but support provisions that would do just the opposite. They talk about saving jobs, but they want provisions that have the potential to destroy thousands, if not millions, of American jobs.

We've listed our objections to this bill in detail for the House-Senate conference members. My veto pen remains ready and available if the final work product of the conference remains antitrade, anticonsumer, antijobs, and antigrowth. But my hope, which I believe you share, is that I won't have to use that pen.

Well, we're tearing down the walls, the tariffs, that block the flow of trade and eliminating the tangle of restrictions and regulations that bind our commerce and inhibit economic cooperation. As this agreement takes effect, Americans and Canadians will conduct business, invest, and trade where they like, rejecting beggar-thy-neighbor policies, and putting aside special interests in favor of the common interest. We've broken new territory by covering areas, such as investment and services, traditionally beyond the scope of trade agreements.

What better example could there be for the GATT [General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade] Uruguay round, which is currently underway in Geneva. But success will depend in large part on people like you who are willing to operate in a truly free environment for trade and investment. And I'll be looking for your support in obtaining congressional approval for this historic, pathbreaking agreement.

I know it's bad manners to quote oneself, so please forgive me if I read you a few lines from a speech I delivered all the way back in November of 1979: ``A developing closeness between the United States, Canada, and Mexico could serve notice on friend and foe alike that we're prepared for a long haul, looking outward again and confident of our future; that together we're going to create jobs, to generate new fortunes of wealth for many, and provide a legacy for the children of each of our countries. Two hundred years ago, we taught the world that a new form of government, created out of the genius of man to cope with his circumstances, could succeed in bringing a measure of quality to human life previously thought impossible.'' Well, let us dare to dream, I said, of some future date, when the map of the world shows a North American continent united in commerce, committed to freedom where borders become what the U.S.-Canadian border is today: a meeting place rather than a dividing line.

My friends, I look forward to working with you once again in behalf of the economic freedom in which we both so deeply believe. Yes, let us dare to dream, and let us work on to make our dreams come true.

Today marks the fifth anniversary of a program vital to our future security. On March 23, 1983, in announcing our Strategic Defense Initiative -- SDI -- I put forward the vision of a safer and more secure future for our children and our grandchildren, a future free from the threat of the most dangerous weapon mankind has invented: fast-flying ballistic missiles. It was on that date that I challenged our best and brightest scientific minds to undertake a rigorous program of research, development, and testing to find a way to keep the peace through defensive systems, which threaten no one. If we can accomplish this, and I am more and more convinced that we can, we will no longer have to face a future that relies on the threat of nuclear retaliation to ensure our security.

Soviets not only are ahead of us in ballistic missiles but also are deeply engaged in their own SDI-like program. If they are allowed to keep their near monopoly in defenses, we will be left without an effective means to protect our cherished freedoms in the future. But with our own investigation of defenses well underway, we have been able to propose to the Soviets at our arms negotiations in Geneva that both of us protect our nations through increasingly effective defenses, even as we cut back deeply our strategic offensive arms. SDI, in fact, provided a valuable incentive for the Soviets to return to the bargaining table and to negotiate seriously over strategic arms reductions. And as we move toward lower levels of offense, it will be all the more important to have an effective defense.

SDI program is progressing technologically even faster than we expected. We have demonstrated the feasibility of intercepting an attacker's ballistic missiles. We have made rapid progress on sensors, the eyes and ears of a future defensive system. And our research has produced useful spinoffs for conventional defenses and for medicine, air traffic control, and high-speed computing. The problems we face now are largely political. Every year, Congress has cut back the SDI budget. We are now 1 to 2 years behind schedule. Some of our critics question SDI because they believe we are going too fast and doing too much, while others say we should move now to deploy limited defenses -- perhaps to protect our own missiles. While such a defense may initially strengthen today's uneasy balance, SDI's goal is to create a stronger, safer, and morally preferable basis for deterrence by making ballistic missiles obsolete.

American people can never be satisfied with a strategic situation where, to keep the peace, we rely on a threat of vengeance. And we must recognize that we live in an imperfect, often violent world, one in which ballistic missile technology is proliferating despite our efforts to prevent this. We would be doing a grave and dangerous disservice to future generations if we assumed that national leaders everywhere, for all time, will be both peaceful and rational.

No article the product of Panama and entered, or withdrawn from warehouse for consumption, into the United States on or after the effective date of this Proclamation shall be eligible for preferential tariff treatment under the GSP or under the CBERA.

This Proclamation shall be effective with respect to articles entered, or withdrawn from warehouse for consumption, on or after the fifteenth day following the date of the publication of this Proclamation in the Federal Register.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-third day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

The agencies or subdivisions thereof set forth in Section 3 of this Order are hereby determined to have as a primary function intelligence, counterintelligence, investigative, or national security work. It is also hereby determined that Chapter 71 of Title 5 of the United States Code cannot be applied to these agencies or subdivisions in a manner consistent with national security requirements and considerations. These agencies or subdivisions thereof are hereby excluded from coverage under Chapter 71 of Title 5 of the United States Code.

Nation at Risk'' -- that report itself said that the educational foundations of our society were being eroded by ``a rising tide of mediocrity that threatens our very future as a nation and a people.'' Well, it was time to stem that tide, to get our educational house in order, or to suffer the consequences.

I'm particularly pleased to have the opportunity to learn about what Fairfax County has done to improve the quality of your teachers. You have become leaders in promoting excellence in the teaching profession, and I'm here to find out more about what works. Next month Secretary Bennett will turn in to me a homework assignment -- yes, even Cabinet members have homework assignments -- one that I gave him last March, asking for a status report on American education. Come to think of it, Bill, that's an awfully long time to complete an assignment. [Laughter] But don't worry; your work so far has been ``A-plus.'' But the Secretary's report will tell us what kind of progress we've made over the last 5 years, and it will tell us what things we still must do. Secretary Bennett, I'm looking forward to reading your report and to continuing to work closely with you on specific ways that we can improve education. There are few areas of American life as important to our society, to our people, and to our families as our schools.

By the way, if I could just interject something here, if there's anybody who proves that learning doesn't have to be dull, that education and fun can go together, it's our nation's Secretary of Education, Bill Bennett. Secretary Bennett has a law degree and a Ph.D. in philosophy -- that's pretty serious-sounding stuff. But he also happens to be an expert on something many of you probably know quite a lot about: rock 'n' roll. [Laughter] And I'll prove it.

Now, some of you may have heard that I've taken to visiting schools lately to find out firsthand what's going on. I must say these trips have strengthened my confidence in our country's future. The reason? When you visit schools like Oakton, you realize that they just don't come any better or any brighter than America's students and teachers.

Two months ago I visited Suitland High School in Prince George's County, Maryland. A few years ago Suitland had problems, bad problems -- low academic performance, poor attendance by both students and teachers. But Suitland High School turned itself around, and it did so in large part by supporting some of the key articles of the education reform movement: parental choice in the form of magnet schools and increased accountability on the part of students, teachers, and administrators alike.

I've come to Oakton. I've done so to pay tribute to your school and to your superintendent, Robert Spillane, for his outstanding efforts on behalf of excellence in education in Fairfax County. And I'm especially impressed by all you've done in attracting and retaining good teachers. And it's teaching that I'd like to speak about for a moment or two today. It seems to me that given the job that teachers do, given the number of young lives they affect, teachers deserve at least as much praise and thanks and honor as those in any other profession in our society. So, I wonder: Would you students join me for a moment in applauding your own teachers here at Oakton? [Applause] You don't know what you've just done. I come from a business where getting a hand was the most important thing in life.

You know, I have to tell you a little story, if I could, about a teacher that had an impact on my life. And this happens, and will happen to all of you, as the years go on. Yes, I remember a teacher. I was in his office one day -- and not by invitation -- by order. [Laughter] He was the principal as well as the English teacher in our school at that time. And in the course of his words to me he said, ``Reagan, it doesn't matter much to me what you think of me now.

I guess I just took that in stride. But, well, after 15 years I had the pleasure of telling that man how much an impact he had made on my life and then, those many years later, how important he was to me in all the things that I was doing. And to increase the pleasure I get from that memory was that it was only a short time later that I heard he had departed, he had left us, died. But I was able to tell him, and he had been right about when I would remember about him.

I was very pleased the other day to read of a poll that shows a sharp increase among college students who intend to enter the teaching profession. And I'm curious -- having heard some remarks about this very subject just a moment ago -- could the students in this audience who are just thinking that maybe they might become teachers please raise their hands? I see from up here a scattering of more hands than you down there probably. So, well, good for you.

Years later, as Sam Houston looked back over a lifetime of accomplishments, he wrote that being a teacher gave him a higher feeling of dignity and self-satisfaction than any other office or honor he had ever held. Well, that speaks volumes.

Now, just why have we seen this increase in teaching lately -- this increased interest, I should say. Well, in part, it's because we've begun to reward excellence in the teaching profession -- as you've been told already -- just as we reward excellence in any other profession. We've begun to introduce free-market principles like incentives and accountability in education. Listen, for a moment, to the recommendations of the ``Nation at Risk'' report: ``Salaries for the teaching profession should be increased and should be professionally competitive, market-sensitive, and performance-based.

Well, today we can see that Fairfax County has taken these recommendations to heart. Your blue ribbon commission pointed to the necessity of recruiting and maintaining excellent teachers, and said that the people of Fairfax County are willing to pay more for good teachers if there is assurance of quality control and accountability.

Fairfax County has shown the Nation how to upgrade the teaching profession by demonstrating how to attract and retain good teachers. Career ladders, performance-based pay, and other initiatives help to keep good teachers in the profession. Everybody benefits -- students, parents, and teachers. To improve the quality of the teaching force, Virginia is moving toward requiring a prospective teacher to have a bachelor of arts degree in a subject area rather than an education degree. Virginia also allows teachers to enter the profession through the alternate certification route. Your alternate certification allows school systems to draw from an expanded pool of qualified teachers and enables qualified ex-military personnel, scientists, engineers, and others to become teachers. I wonder, Superintendent Spillane, do ex-Presidents qualify for this program? [Laughter] Well, there you have it. It's no mystery. It's a miracle. We know what works in education, and we understand, in particular, the vital importance of good teaching.

There's one topic in this regard that's of special importance to Nancy and me: putting an end to drug abuse. When it comes to drugs and education, let me just say this: If a school has a drug problem, then we might as well stop and forget about improving education through qualified teachers, a solid curriculum, high expectations, performance-based pay, or any other reform measure. If students are using drugs, then no education can work. If kids are using drugs, they won't learn. It's that simple. It's that awful. And so, we need to get tough on drugs, on drug pushers, but also on drug users. We need to get drugs out of our schools and our neighborhoods. We need to get drugs out of our children's lives. So, I commend Fairfax County for your efforts -- commend you from my heart -- and urge you to continue the good fight.

You know, let me just say something to you here and issue a challenge. You stop to think: not only the drugs and the effect they have on people and the destruction that they can create but that there are some soulless people who are living in the veritable lap of luxury, with literally billions of dollars, at the highest standard of living, and paying no taxes or supporting no worthwhile operation. They are supported by those who are their customers. Why shouldn't your generation -- now with the changes that we've tried to make in your behalf -- why don't you make up your minds that your generation is going to be the one that decides there will be no more drug customers in this country of ours, that you are going to eliminate drugs by taking away their customers?

Well, that isn't a bad public. It's our teachers' public. And I've come here today to pay tribute to you for your efforts. And to you here at Oakton High who have done so much to foster good teaching and an understanding of teaching's importance, on behalf of a great many people in this country, I thank you.

Now, it so happens that in order to give Secretary Bennett that pop quiz I did a little homework myself. And to tell you the truth, I was really struck by Michael Jackson's song, ``Man in the Mirror.'' It's a wonderful song. It's full of energy and drive and, of course, that helps to make the point that I was talking about earlier: learning and fun go together.

Well, it's true -- whether the problem is improving education or eliminating drug abuse or helping the homeless -- whatever the challenge, individual initiative and responsibility is always part of the answer. And so, as I thought about the message I'd like to leave with you, as I considered what word I could give to you, in your youth, and for many years, well, I decided that this week's top song would do just fine.

My young friends, you've given me such a gift today -- the gift of your energy, your exuberance, and your love of learning. And, always to remember: ``No message could be any clearer. If you want to make the world a better place, just start with the man in the mirror.'' Thank you, and God bless you all.

The President. Yes, it is because the period that I was referring to -- back then, we had not entered into that decline that seemed to come upon us in later years. I don't know what caused it, but it did happen. But, no, we had curriculums that were stiff and required courses that you had to take. And you find out later that they were very beneficial -- in taking them. And also, we had a great feeling about our land.

But that principal that I spoke about that had such an imprint on my life -- because not only the principal and the English teacher but by virtue of that particular class -- he also directed all the school plays and the drama club plays. And many years later in Hollywood I once said to myself, I haven't come across a director yet that was better than B.J. Frazier. So, it's there, and it's possible. And I don't think they detract at all. Even though I spoke and asked some of you if you were thinking about being teachers, let me say another word of encouragement. If you're still pondering and you haven't thought of what you want to be in life, don't get discouraged. I graduated from college unable to say exactly what I wanted to do with my life.

The President. Frankly, I think the problem of the homeless, like so many other problems, actually belongs at the local community and State level, with the Federal Government ready to help in any way that it might be able to in which something would come properly under the Federal Government's province. But you see, that's one of the great secrets of this country that we tended to forget for about 40 or 50 years. As we started going into more and more Federal domination and Federal interference in local programs, including education, we played a hand in the decline of education by thinking that in addition to doing some added funding we could use that as an excuse for the Federal Government trying to run the public schools. The schools for a long time have been run in this country best when they're closer to the people in the communities where the parents and the students are. And so, I have to say that in this particular thing that you've raised, the problem of the homeless, is best known by the people in the community where it's taking place -- why they're homeless, can see them as individuals instead of a mass of faceless people that the Federal Government just thinks of in numbers. So, as I say, if there is a way in which the Federal Government's help can be used, whether it is in financing or what else, actually the administering of this belongs right back where the people are.

The President. No, we're going to abide by the Canal treaty, and we're not going to be the big Colossus of the North once again coming into our smaller neighbors' places of living and business and trying to guide and direct them. They have a very difficult problem there. We think that they're moving toward solving it with the reaction of the people to the man that has caused so much of this problem. We want to be of help in any way we can, and so we've helped them in that regard in the economic restraints that we've put down there so that there can be pressure focused on this particular individual. But, no, there's no danger of us coming in with our power and muscle and saying this is the way it has to be.

The President. Hmmm. [Laughter] I'm a little old to be a teacher, in spite of what I said earlier. [Laughter] Well, I tell you, I do have some ambitions for when that time comes. There are some things that I would like to crusade for that I could not crusade for while I'm President -- some I could but some others that I couldn't -- because it would seem as if I was selfishly doing it in my own interest.

For example, I would like to start calling to the attention of the people of this country the flaw in the 22d amendment to the Constitution, passed a few years ago, which says a President can only serve two terms. Now let me explain something here. The reason I have to wait is because, as I say, I couldn't dare open my mouth and do this in my own behalf while I'm here, and I don't want to.

But what I want to call to the people's attention is: The President is the only one in government who is elected by all the people, and it seems to me that that constitutional amendment, which was born out of vengeance against Franklin Delano Roosevelt -- I think that that amendment is an infringement on the democratic rights of the American people, who should be allowed to vote for who they want as long as they want and -- [applause].

And also, I'm going to crusade for some other things, too, like the line-item veto and the -- [laughter] -- 43 Governors had it. I had it when I was Governor of California. I line-item vetoed out of budgets 943 times in 8 years and was never overridden once. Now, in California, the legislature takes a two-thirds majority to pass the budget, and then they send it to the Governor. And it only takes two-thirds of a majority to override a veto. But when I found spending things in that budget and I vetoed them 943 times, you could not get the same two-thirds majority in the legislature when that was exposed all by itself out there -- not buried in the whole budget -- you couldn't get two-thirds of them to override my veto, not once.

The President. Oh! [Laughter] Well, I don't know whether that's possible. You know, you've heard that the President is the most powerful man in the country, if not the world and so forth. I have to tell you something: Every day they hand me a piece of paper that tells me what I'm going to be doing that day -- [laughter] -- for every 15 minutes of that day. And long before graduation time, I'm sure that my schedule -- first, I suppose, I should ask you the date of your graduation.

Reagan. Well, I only have to say, of course, that we've looked forward to this and hope it continues. But, I still think that -- just as in some other meetings that have gone on in which I've been involved -- I think that we should keep in mind that both parties must be dedicated to the things that are said and agreed to at those meetings.

President Reagan, can we ask you some questions about the relations with the Dominican Republic and the United States? Is there a possibility of getting more help from the United States of America Republic in terms of the sugar war, things like this?

Reagan. As you know, we've had some problems both ways, with the Congress and matters of that kind, but I can assure you that we feel that the relationship we have with the Dominican Republic is of the best, and we treasure it and hope to continue that close relationship.

Reagan. It has been my great pleasure to have met with President Balaguer. His remarkable leadership has been an important element in the significant, positive role that the Dominican Republic has played in regional affairs.

Balaguer has been a driving force throughout his country's democratic development. In 1966 he led democracy's return to the Dominican Republic after years of political uncertainty and turmoil. Indeed, he is, in many ways, the father of Dominican democracy. It's a great honor to have him here. The United States and the Dominican Republic traditionally have enjoyed very close and warm relations. Our meeting today reflected the important historical, cultural, political, and economic ties that bind our two countries. We discussed the economic problems that face us and examined possible solutions.

Balaguer described the serious impact that low world sugar prices and declining market access are having on the Dominican Republic. I applaud his government's courageous efforts to meet difficult economic and developmental challenges through diversification and private sector investment. The United States Government wants to participate in these processes. Within our budget limitations, we will continue to support development and growth in the Dominican Republic.

Sharing a common hemisphere and democratic beliefs, we examined important political developments elsewhere in the Caribbean and Latin America. We are both concerned by recent events in Central America and Panama. I deeply appreciate President Balaguer's insights into these issues. We both hope for democratic and peaceful solutions to the problems of the region.

Soviet armament that fuels that pursuit. I congratulated the President on his government's role in hosting the first Nicaraguan peace talks mediated by Cardinal Obando y Bravo. We discussed bilateral cooperation in the critical area of narcotics. I want personally to thank President Balaguer for his assistance in combating illegal narcotics in the Caribbean. His government's efforts have been crucial, and we look forward to continued cooperation on this matter of national and hemispheric security.

So, thank you again, Mr. President, for coming to visit me today in Washington. You're a close and good friend of the United States; a leader dedicated to freedom, democracy, and peace; a trusted ally. I wish you well and look forward to working with you as our two countries face the challenges of the future.

Balaguer. Mr. President, this is a beautiful spring day to pay this visit on President Ronald Reagan, which is a great honor to me, but not really to me, but an honor which is really a distinction on my country.

I have told President Reagan today of not only my personal admiration but that of the whole people of the Dominican Republic for himself, personally, for his policies as a leader of the world in the defense of human rights, and for the progress of democratic regimes in Latin America and throughout the world.

The Dominican Republic has received a great deal of help from the Reagan administration, especially in terms of the Caribbean Basin Initiative. This is the most constructive initiative which has ever come to Latin America.

It is the most practical initiative and the one from which we have derived the most advantage. And here I include the Good Neighbor Policy of Roosevelt and the Alliance for Progress of President Kennedy, because those were theoretical abstractions, whereas the Caribbean Basin Initiative has been a pragmatic movement which has achieved a great deal of practical good for our countries.

Dominican Republic specifically has improved its economy, has progressed, has established a large number of free trade zones, opening foreign industries, and thus has reduced its unemployment rate a great deal. Also, the Reagan plan has permitted us to export more to the United States because of the lowering, or total elimination, of tariffs. We have exported more clothes, more apparel, manufactured in the Dominican Republic, as well as other products -- which we have now started exporting to the United States, thanks to the lowering of tariff barriers, with once again, the consequence of lowering unemployment.

There are problems which subsist in our relations, especially in connection with the lowering of our sugar quota, but this we have discussed with President Reagan and with his senior advisers in this area of expertise. We also discussed the subject this morning on Capitol Hill with a number of Senators who are friends of the Dominican Republic. We found there a very receptive climate and feel confident that the problem will be solved, taking into account the interests of both of our countries. Our talks today regarding our policies vis-a-vis other countries of the region have been ones in which we have agreed on almost every point. We agreed, for example, on the subject of Haiti and on our discussions of other countries which are our neighbors. And we have almost total and virtual agreement between the two countries.

It is a great pleasure to me now to thank you, President Reagan, very warmly for your hospitality, for your great cordiality and an honor which this visit has done to my country, the Dominican Republic. If when I get home I am asked if I come with my hands full or my hands empty, I will say that my hands are very full -- full of friendship, full of affection, and full of admiration for the United States and for its President, Ronald Reagan. My admiration for Ronald Reagan is nothing new. It is something which I have always spoken of, saying that he is not only a leader of his country and of the continent but a world leader -- with his revolutionary economic policies, his loyalty to democratic regimes everywhere, and his fight against drug trafficking in the world.

And here I would like just to interject a word of admiration for Mrs. Reagan -- for Nancy, the First Lady, whose human struggle against drug trafficking stands as an example to women all over the world, especially in Latin America, which is suffering so much from this scourge, telling us all that we all must make our own efforts to eradicate this plague in order to save the youth of this generation and succeeding generations.

Thank you, President Reagan. Believe me, your economic policies leading to the recovery of the American economy are also leading to the recovery of economies throughout the world. You will continue always to be an inspiration and a guide to me. I am always conscious of your struggle to increase the defense of human rights, to reduce unemployment, to solve the social problems of the world -- things that we will do together and we will always remember in the Dominican Republic.

United States and Greece are old allies and friends. Our nations and peoples are bound by interests, kinship, values, and a record of common achievement. Ancient Greek ideals of freedom fueled our own struggle for independence, and American friends supported Greece's effort to forge a modern nation in 1821.

Over the years, millions of Americans of Greek ancestry have enriched and strengthened the United States. In this century, Americans and Greeks fought and died together in three wars. The Truman Doctrine, which helped Greeks preserve their independence and launch Greece toward prosperity, is a proud achievement of American foreign policy. Today, Greece and the United States are partners in the NATO alliance, which has kept the peace and preserved freedom for nearly 40 years.

The democracy we so cherish began in Greece a millennia ago. The grandeur the ancient Greeks left has endowed modern Americans and modern Greeks with democracy's promise of liberty. Today, the world is still inspired by the eternal values and aspirations for which modern Greeks reached when they began their quest for independence on March 25, 1821.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 25th day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Center for the Study of the Presidency. For more than two decades, the center has contributed to our understanding of the high office that for a brief time the American people have entrusted to me. Under the leadership of Gordon Hoxie, the center has helped both the country at large and the men who've held this office to see more clearly the institution and the challenges of the day that the Presidency and its trustee face.

The modern Presidency is, like everything else in our system, the product of both the founders' design and later practice. I remember this every time I give a press conference. Perhaps you know that historians date the Presidential press conference back to our sixth Chief Executive, John Quincy Adams. Before that, Presidents didn't have press conferences. But it seems that every morning before dawn, Adams would stroll down to the Potomac River, take off his clothes and take a swim. [Laughter] And one summer day a woman -- not a man -- of the press followed him to the river.

One of the most important tools that the President has, both in economic policy and in foreign policy, is the veto. From the very beginning there were repeated attempts to get around the intent of the framers when they gave Presidents this tool. The entire scope of the veto was challenged.

Americans for conjuring up constitutional limitations out of thin air. People said the veto was solely the means furnished the President for carrying out his oath to `preserve, protect, and defend the Constitution' and was not validly usable for any other purpose. They said that it did not extend to revenue bills, having never been so employed by the King of England, and that it was never intended to give effect merely to Presidential desires.'' But these challenges to the plain and straightforward meaning of the Constitution all failed.

Today we're facing another challenge to the use of the Presidential veto. In recent years, Congress has unjustifiably diminished the veto's utility, particularly when it comes to the budget. You may remember that I had a costar when I delivered the State of the Union Address this year. It was that 1,000-page continuing resolution that Congress sent to me last December and gave me only 10 hours to study and then sign or shut down the Government. I've been reluctant -- as I believe any President should be -- to allow the Government to stop functioning. So, for the second year running, I signed a single monster bill that funded most of the Government. But as I told Congress in January, never again. Next time I veto, and they can choose whether to shut the Government down or not.

But the question I would ask you is: Doesn't the new practice of creating gigantic continuing resolutions require a new and better response? Can anything but enactment of a line-item veto provide the leverage we need to curb wasteful and unnecessary spending?

It legislated major shifts in the checks and balances of budgetmaking power. And the results came immediately. Before that, Federal deficit with inflation taken out had been steady or falling for a quarter of a century. Since then, it's been in a steep climb.

In my years in the White House, I've seen one Member of Congress after another call for lower deficits and less spending and then go out and vote for more spending. Some, of course, just want more spending, but many are sincere. They are caught in what scholars call a ``prisoner's dilemma.'' If nearby districts or States get Federal dollars, they feel they have to match it or look bad to the folks back home.

The fact is that there is only one way, once and for all, to stop them before they spend again. And that's to restore the role in the budget process of the only elected official who speaks not for local interests but for the interest of the entire Nation: the President. And the way to do that is with the line-item veto.

You know, we say that the States are the laboratories of democracy and have been since our earliest days. Is there any provision of government that has been more successfully tested on the State level than the line-item veto?

Forty-three Governors have it. When I was Governor of California, I used it 943 times and was never overridden once. I found that somehow things got in the budget that just couldn't live in sunlight, and that's all the line-item veto is -- a way for the President to let some sunlight into the dark, dank caverns of the budget process.

Mr. President, I would like to thank you for vetoing the recent so-called civil rights legislation recently sent through Congress. After your veto, why do you think you had problems getting enough Senators or Congressmen to help you sustain your veto? And if you would have had the line-item veto, what specific aspects of that civil rights legislation do you think you could have vetoed?

The President. Well, the things that I would have changed with the line-item veto are what made me veto the bill. I'm not against the whole purpose of that bill. As a matter of fact, I sent up a bill that called for it -- virtually what was in this one -- except for the provisions that were in there that would now give the Federal Government regulating control over everybody down to a farmer or a mom and pop grocery store or anything else. That's what I had against the bill. I'm not against extending civil rights. But it was so written that if -- well, as I said in one of my statements, if a church or a group of churches, for example, put together, as many of them do, a summer camp, and if that summer camp happened to, let's say, be located on Federal land or surplus land or anything of that kind, automatically, all of the churches involved in that would be subject to Federal regulation.

And thus they would be -- well, I can tell you what that excess regulation can do, and maybe there are some here from the -- physicians in the colleges and universities -- that know. It was not too many years ago in the Federal Government -- we've been trying to get the Federal Government out of things where it doesn't belong and get them back to local and State control and so forth. I actually learned of a college like that that many of you go to. The college's average cost for administrative overhead was $50,000 a year. Federal regulations imposed brought that up to $500,000 a year just for the administrative overhead and the paperwork that was required of the Government rules. And I don't think it improved education a bit.

The President. Well, actually, there has been a decrease now mandated by Congress on foreign aid. And frankly, it has set us back a great deal. Foreign aid isn't just a charity that -- for example, it includes security features, also. And it helps other countries provide for their own defense where, because of our own national interest, if they can't do that, we have to. And ours is more expensive than their own homegrown variety. So, we're trying to reverse that.

I just met with another President of one of our Caribbean nations today, and this hit them very hard. And their economy is virtually strapped because of cutbacks that were made by the Congress. So, I think we've got to look with -- it's so easy to say, well, we've got so many problems, what are we doing helping these people over here? Well, we do live in the world with them, and you can't be isolationist anymore, and certainly not a country like ours.

Federal Government decided to get itself involved. But the Federal Government only contributes 7 percent of the total cost of education. But for that 7 percent, the Federal Government gets greedy and wants a lot more privilege and authority over education than they've bought for 7 percent.

But with regard to need -- here we're looking at welfare reforms, also. Because again, I once found a program when I was Governor, a Federal program, that the administration overhead was $2 for every $1 they got to a needy person. We believe that some reforms are needed to make it more practical than that. And right now, the most effective aid to the people is coming from what I call the private sector. Last year, private individuals and groups and organizations raised $84 billion for charitable causes for the needy.

The President. I try not to think of the history books -- [laughter] -- very much about that, contrary to what a lot of people say. I think it's -- I've always looked at this job, as I indicated it in my remarks -- you don't become President, you are given temporary custody of an institution called the Presidency. And you don't have any right to go around changing its traditions or rules or anything else, as some have tried to do. But when we came into office, we were in quite an economic bind. Inflation was in double digits, unemployment was up -- well, we really were in something of a recession. Interest rates -- the prime rate was 20.5 percent. And we set out to make some economic changes.

Maybe one thing that I'll remember with joy -- I don't know whether anyone else will -- having gotten my degree in economics, that makes me able to tell ethnic stories about economists -- [laughter] -- I had always believed, and put it into practice over great opposition -- and that was the most important part of our economic reform -- was the reduction of the marginal tax rates. A man named ibn-Khaldun, a few centuries ago said that at the beginning of the empire the rates were low and the revenue was high. He said at the end of the empire the rates were high and the revenue was low.

Well, over all the objections, we cut the marginal tax rates, and that has been the most important part of our economic recovery. We have the highest percentage of the potential labor pool in America employed that we've ever had in our history. We have had the longest economic expansion that we've ever had in the history of our country. And, I can tell you that when you look at the revenues for the tax rates, they have vastly increased all the way across as we reduced the rates. At the lower rates, more money is coming into the Government. Well, I'd always believed that back from my days in school during the Great Depression, and so I think I'll remember that with great pleasure.

I think what you mentioned a little while ago, also -- after all of the rioting and the cynicism that came out of the Vietnam experience, and the campus riots and all, I found that a great many of our military wouldn't dare leave the base without getting into civilian clothes. And I decided that maybe we needed a change of attitude in this country. And today, we have it. I think our country has once again discovered a pride in being an American. And I can tell you there's nothing I'm more proud of than the young men and women -- your age -- who are in our military today, and they're volunteers. And they wear the uniform; they don't take it off to go out among us civilians anymore. And I'm very proud of what has been accomplished there.

Hello, Mr. President. My question is that in a TV documentary I saw that we have nuclear weapons in Europe that a single person can carry and which are effective over a 1-square-mile area. If such weapons fall into the hands of terrorists, how could we prevent them from smuggling them into the country when we cannot do enough to stop the drug trafficking and the entry of illegal aliens to our southern borders?

The President. Well, all I can tell you is that we have a very elaborate program of security for anything nuclear, including even the plants where things like that are constructed. And I think it is as effective a program as we possibly can have. I think, also, you're probably talking about a type of nuclear weapon that is not included in the INF agreement where we've gotten rid of a whole system for the first time of nuclear weapons.

I'm speaking of the tactical battlefield weapons, which would be what you were referring to there. Those weapons we cannot start trying to reduce until we engage the Soviet Union in reduction of conventional weapons. They have such a great superiority that the only thing that evens us out in the NATO line are those tactical nuclear weapons. If we got rid of them, we would automatically put the Soviets in a tremendous superiority with the conventional. And I've already notified the General Secretary, and he's expressed a willingness to sit down and talk about them. So, once we can get this START treaty on top of the INF, then we'll go after the conventional weapons, and when those are equal, then we can go after the short-range tactical nuclear weapons.

Hello, Mr. President. My question is in regards to your veto on the civil rights legislation -- excuse me -- [laughter] -- legislation. I, in fact, was not in favor of your veto; however, you did express that you had an alternate plan. I'd like to know some of what that involved or detailed.

The President. Well, it was the thing we've been trying ever since to reverse the Grove City ruling, and so it was basically what was the most apparent thing in the program that I vetoed, or the bill that I vetoed, except that they added, as I've said, all those other things of controls in there. Well, virtually, there was a Senate bill on the floor about the same time that the one that I vetoed had been on the floor, and that one was defeated in favor of this other one. And my bill was very similar to that Senate bill. So, in trying to persuade some legislators to vote to sustain my veto, I reminded them that their record showed that they had voted for that other bill and then voted when they didn't get that, voted for this one. And I said, I'm giving you a chance to vote again on the same kind of bill you wanted to pass before as that Senate bill.

I've tried to explain there; it was only those other factors that they gave the open door for excessive government regulation. For example, when I said, all the other people -- well, this grocery store -- if people came into that grocery store with food stamps, that automatically made them subject to Federal regulation and things of that kind that were never intended.

I've just talked to our people. Now, since our veto wasn't sustained, I've talked to them. But why don't we pick out one-by-one those things now that are in that legislation that's been passed and introduce legislation one at a time to get those other things canceled.

North is a hero. And at the other hand -- and any talk about what I might do or pardons and so forth -- I think with the case before the courts, that's something I can't discuss now. But from my -- I just have to believe that they're going to be found innocent because I don't think they were guilty of any lawbreaking or any crime.

I've got to take a second and tell you something that -- [laughter] -- you know. The whole so-called Iran scandal -- I find it hard to think of scandal in connection with it. We were contacted by some individuals, not the Government of Iran. And these individuals -- there was great talk at that time that Khomeini was maybe not going to live out the week.

Well, we, behind the scenes, have been trying for years to get an end to the Iran-Iraq war, for example. So I said, yes, we'll meet with them. Incidentally, they came through a third country in the Middle East and that country recommended them to us as being dependable people. Our people met with them. It had to be secret because, obviously, they were risking their lives for doing such a thing. They'd be -- I don't know that they haven't been executed. I've never heard of them since this whole thing blew up in the press. But our people met with them. And then the word came back that those people asked if we could make a kind of token sale of arms to them, which they would turn over to the military. And this, they said, would first of all confirm that our people really were representing the top in government, but also that it would give them a prestige they might need when the day came that they were going to try to redirect the Government of Iran.

I thought about it, and there was a lot of objection among some of our people and all -- and debated. And I knew that the Hizballah [radical Shi'ite terrorist group operating in Lebanon] has a kind of philosophical relationship with Iran. So, I said, all right, to prove their credentials -- the Hizballah are holding our people hostage -- tell them, yes, we'll do this if they will use their influence to see if they can't convince the Hizballah to release our hostages. And it was a token shipment of arms, and they were sent. I didn't put it on there that they don't get the arms unless -- we delivered the arms. And they were delivered then by somebody to the -- from the other side of the ocean into Iran. They were given to the military, and we got our money back -- exactly what we had asked for. At the same time, we had two hostages released, and we were supposed to have in 48 hours another two. And that was when that leak in a newspaper in Lebanon revealed this secret operation of ours, so we never did get the other two hostages back.

And it wasn't until then that our Attorney General discovered a memo that seemed to indicate that there was more money than we had received, although we had received the price we asked. And I immediately took him and went before the joint leadership of the Congress and told them what we'd discovered -- we had no explanation for it, but were going to try to find out; that I'd asked for a special investigator and also that I had appointed a commission to look into this and see what was going on because this money was supposed to be in a Swiss bank account.

Now, that's the whole extent of the so-called scandal -- what our intent was and what happened. And you know something? After all the investigation, today I still don't know who got that extra money or where it came from. I'm hoping to find out.

I have indicated in previous statements to the Congress, my central arms control objective has been to reduce substantially, and ultimately to eliminate, nuclear weapons and rid the world of the nuclear threat. The prevention of the spread of nuclear explosives to additional countries is an indispensable part of our efforts to meet this objective. I intend to continue my pursuit of this goal with untiring determination and a profound sense of personal commitment.

This week, as our thoughts begin to turn toward Easter, the cause of peace among nations is foremost in our minds, a cause that was also at the top of our work agenda here in Washington as I received Soviet Foreign Minister Shevardnadze at the White House. My talks with him were cordial but, as you might expect, to the point.

Mr. Shevardnadze's stay, I announced May 29th through June 2d as the dates for my summit meeting in Moscow with the leader of the Soviet Union, General Secretary Gorbachev. And of course, this was good news. The last U.S.-Soviet summit in the U.S.S.R. was 14 years ago, so this meeting will give me and, in a sense, you, the American people, an opportunity to convey the message of peace and freedom to the Soviet people. But let me also say that while lengthy talks held between Secretary Shultz and Mr. Shevardnadze at the State Department were useful, they also made clear how difficult the issues are between the United States and the Soviet Union.

Now, some progress was made here and there in various areas, but there's much more that needs to be done, given the importance of the topics discussed. Our agenda with the Soviet Union deals not only with arms reduction but also regional matters, human rights, and people-to-people exchanges. And as our discussions continue in each of these areas, I can assure you that the United States will sign only those agreements that are in our best interest. Let me also assure you, as negotiations continue on efforts to further reduce United States and Soviet strategic nuclear arms, that my administration will carefully review such proposals.

An important accomplishment of the first few summits, however, will be before the United States Senate Foreign Relations Committee next week for approval; this is the INF treaty on intermediate-range nuclear forces that Mr. Gorbachev and I signed when he was here for the Washington summit last December.

Now, some of you've heard me say before that our progress with the Soviets is based on their awareness that we have no illusions about them and on our determination to deal from a position of strength. Now, that strength means, of course, keeping our defenses ready and second to none; but it also means a strong and vigorous economy and a place for America as the world leader in trade. That's why the other matter that is being considered in the Congress is of critical importance; that is the legislative conference on trade legislation.

Last year, there was trade legislation coming through the Congress that would have meant serious risks to America's prosperity and indeed the world's. Fortunately, working with our administration, Congress has made some progress in producing a sounder bit of legislation. However, the legislation now before a conference committee still contains provisions that would restrict trade, deter investment in the United States, require mandatory retaliation that invites trade wars, and unnecessarily hamper my prerogatives as President. For example, one proposal still very much alive would create an obligation for the Government to help each and every company that can't keep up with legal, totally fair imports -- in effect an entitlement program for businesses that can't compete.

So, my hope is that the Congress will stay on course and that we will settle on a bill that avoids the great danger of choking off international trade and slowing down economic growth. I will not sign a bill that imperils our economy and threatens growth. And by the way, that economic growth keeps coming right along. Only this week we heard that the gross national product growth for last year was 4 percent. Now, this was higher than our own expectations -- expectations that, by the way, were criticized as too rosy a scenario when we first made them. Well, the rosy scenario was even rosier than the one the critics were down on. It just shows what can happen when spending and taxes are held down and trade is encouraged. In fact, right now much of our economy is being driven by the growth in exports that bad trade legislation would discourage.

So, you can see there's much on our minds this week in Washington. And before anyone looks prematurely forward to the arrival of the Easter Bunny, I hope Congress will stay focused on the important matters this week: the INF treaty and trade legislation.

Thank you all very much, and thank you Bill Bourke, for that kind introduction. And thanks to Chairman Reynolds for hosting this event, and thank you all very much. And I'd like to say hello, too, to your Senator John Warner, who is down there, and your Congressman Bliley. I've already said hello to them because I brought one of them with me.

Today, in my tour of your plant, I saw an example of why American exports are the highest they've been in the entire history of the United States of America. It's called American free enterprise. Today it's increasingly becoming a high technology operation. And I just wish that all of the negativists who talk about the decline of America or say that we can't compete overseas -- I wish they'd come to this plant and take a look. It might open their eyes.

America is now in the 64th straight month of economic expansion. That's the longest peacetime expansion in our nation's history, beating out the previous record by 6 months already. And we're still going strong. Gross national product rose nearly 5 percent this quarter and a strong 4 percent for the whole of 1987. Such growth in the fifth year of an expansion probably also belongs in the record books. But I don't think one of those 64 months has gone by without some expert or some politician predicting imminent disaster. Sometimes we'll be lucky and escape only with a recession; sometimes it's another Great Depression, according to the so-called experts. I'm sorry, but it seems to me that these people are out of touch.

I'll match our program of low taxes, free and fair trade, reduced increases in government spending, and reductions of Federal regulations against our opponents' calls for more protectionism, higher taxes, and big government spending programs any day of the week. I suspect you'll be hearing more about these two approaches in the months ahead. But the fact is you have to give our critics credit. They're running perhaps the greatest myth-making operation in history. The myths keep evolving as they encounter contrary evidence, but the myth makers don't give up. The three big ones today are the deindustrialization of America, the decline of the middle class, and the loss of American jobs.

They've been patient. And now they've seized their opportunity. They've got a trade bill before Congress that could squelch productivity, destroy American competitiveness, and make all their doomsday myths a reality. In an apparent attempt to import ``Euro-malaise,'' they've written in European-style regulations that would create America's first national rules restricting a company's right to close down facilities and relocate operations.

Another example: Honda recently began exporting its first cars from America to Japan. Foreign investment has helped create new American jobs and American exports. It has contributed to the rising productivity of American manufacturing that I mentioned earlier.

So, what do some in Congress propose including in the trade bill? New disclosure requirements that would dampen and discourage foreign investment from coming into this country. But potentially the most serious are mandatory retaliation or automatic protection provisions that could require me and future Presidents to take actions that would be in direct violation of the GATT and seriously harmful to the national interest. If enacted, they could weaken the international trading system and could require the President to start trade wars. It's a bad proposal under any circumstance, but it's particularly bad now that American exports are soaring and American manufacturers are exporting as never before and so are vulnerable to retaliation as never before.

You may have been reading lately that the trade bill is making good progress, that a lot of protectionist provisions have been jettisoned. Well, there is some truth to that, but there's a long way to go before the legislation does more good than harm to the U.S. economy. Now, I'll veto if I must. Only wholesale elimination of the objectionable provisions will produce a bill that I can sign. I won't let them destroy the American growth economy. But I'd rather work with Members of Congress to bring about not just an acceptable bill but one that genuinely improves upon our current law.

There are any number of positive things that can be accomplished: renewed negotiating authority so that we can continue to produce compacts like the historic Canada free trade agreement that is so important and that Bill Bourke mentioned. We've advocated a new program that would provide training to workers who are displaced as our economy becomes more competitive. And there are many reforms to existing U.S. laws, such as protection of patents and copyrights and streamlining export controls that would enhance our ability to export. As they continue their work in Congress on this bill, I would note that on Super Tuesday those who had predicted that protectionism would be embraced in the South were proven wrong.

I've often talked about Senator Reed Smoot and Representative Willis Hawley and the bill they coauthored that brought about the collapse of the world trading system and helped send America into the decline of the Great Depression -- the Smoot-Hawley tariff. Well, both of them felt that a bit of demagoging about trade was good politics. It certainly did get them in the history books. And what many people don't realize is that they were both thrown out of office 2 years later when the voters had time to see the effects of their bill. Protectionism isn't just bad economics, it's bad politics. I think the American people have decided that one Great Depression is enough, and they aren't going to give the trade demagogues a second chance.

History points in the opposite direction: more trade, not less; increasing cooperation, not isolationism and retaliation; expanding global networks of investment, production, and communication, not mercantilist national economics shrinking behind tariff barriers. And that's why we've pushed for a new GATT round, which has now been launched to negotiate the most ambitious multinational trade agenda in history.

This took some doing at the economic summits that we hold each year with several of our trading partners, and why, as was mentioned earlier, we've negotiated an historic trade agreement with Canada that will expand jobs, growth, and opportunity, as you've been told, on both sides of the border.

The transformation of Reynolds Aluminum that we saw here today is part of a larger picture. The world economy is in the midst of a profound transformation. It's been called the information age, the computer age, the technological revolution. America can either accept the challenge, as you here at Reynolds have done, or we can opt out of competition and, therefore, miss out on the new horizons opening before us.

If automotive technology had progressed as fast and as far as semiconductor technology has in the last 20 years, he says, a Rolls Royce today would cost less than $3; it would get 3 million miles to the gallon; it would deliver enough horsepower to drive an ocean liner; and six of them would fit on the head of a pin. [Laughter] This is more than simply a productivity explosion.

Reynolds has put that quantum power to work for it, and to work for U.S. competitiveness. America is still the leader in innovation and entrepreneurial drive. And if we're willing to compete, I have no doubt we'll be the ones leading the way into the new century and the new world economy. And, Bill, when I was listening to you a moment ago, I want to tell you, this is what we're up to with our trading allies in the world, and we want to bring about that very thing you mentioned with regard to our ability to compete on a fair and level playing field, and that's what we're going to keep driving for until we get it -- all the way.

I really meant it about magic. And I just -- here, in the plant I was just through, I saw what I think is miraculous -- and total accomplishment of yours from the machinery that performs the miracles to the miracles that they perform. And I just want to thank you all for letting me be a part of this, and I'll go home feeling a little taller than when I left Washington.

Note: The President spoke at 3:26 p.m. in the main lobby of the headquarters building. In his opening remarks, he referred to Bill Bourke, president and chief executive officer, and David Reynolds, chairman of the board of directors. Prior to his remarks, the President attended a Virginia State Republican Party fundraising reception at the Hyatt Richmond Hotel. He also toured the foil plant.

The President. Bill, thank you very much. Your good Senator John Warner is here with me. I'm going to take him back to Washington and put him back to work. [Laughter] You know, I've been told that you all heard what I was saying in there to the others. Is that right?

Well, that's enough, here. You've stood here long enough. And I just want to thank you all for not only a great welcome, but, as I told you in those remarks in there, you're performing miracles, and you make me so proud of what you're all doing and what America means and why we can hold our own with anyone in the world and better them.

Note: The President spoke at 3:55 p.m. outside of the headquarters building. In his opening remarks, he referred to Bill Bourke, president and chief executive officer of the company. Following his remarks, the President returned to Washington, DC.

Section 1. The second paragraph is amended to read as follows: ``All members of the Armed Forces of the United States are expected to measure up to the standards embodied in this Code of Conduct while in combat or in captivity. To ensure achievement of these standards, members of the armed forces liable to capture shall be provided with specific training and instruction designed to better equip them to counter and withstand all enemy efforts against them, and shall be fully instructed as to the behavior and obligations expected of them during combat or captivity.''.

Voluntarism is rooted in the world's religions and cultures, and just as those religions and cultures have found haven in America so has the spirit of neighborly compassion that Emerson envisioned when he wrote, ``The only gift is a portion of thyself.'' Throughout our history Americans have reached out in service to others, near and far, and thereby strengthened their communities, our country, and the entire world. From the smallest act of kindness to the dedication of a lifetime, volunteers respond in times of joy and tragedy alike. From the smallest child to the most venerable senior citizen, more than half of all Americans give of their time and energy in private sector initiatives -- for each other.

Voluntarism's essence is the willingness to share blessings and the courage to pursue an ideal. Voluntarism's currency is love, and volunteers measure their riches in terms of what they freely give their countrymen and the people of the world.

In the continuing struggle against cancer, Americans have put their trust in research; today we can affirm that the public trust has been rewarded. Just a few years ago, the cancer cell was seen as a deadly, unsolvable mystery. The mystery is still complex, but today it is considered solvable. We now know a good deal about what the cancer cell does and how it does it.

We have begun to see cancer not as a random event, but as an error in the normal process of growth and development. Researchers have found minute but critical differences in the genes of normal and cancer cells. They have identified and isolated oncogenes, which play a role in changing normal, healthy cells to cancer. And, with every passing day, scientists come closer to understanding how and when oncogenes ``turn on'' and transform cells.

In time, our knowledge of how oncogenes work may help cure many patients, improve the quality of life for others, stave off recurrences for still others, and enable us to prevent cancer before it starts.

New knowledge about cancer prevention and treatment has improved the outlook for cutting the cancer death rate. With regard to prevention, we now know that type of diet, exposure to the sun, and use of tobacco can trigger events in the cell that cause up to 80 percent of all cancers.

We can reduce our risk of cancer if we take a few sensible steps. Adding fiber and reducing fat in our diet can significantly cut cancer incidence and mortality; we should choose more fruits, vegetables, and whole-grain breads and cereals and cut down on fatty meat, eggs, dairy products, and oils in cooking and salads. Researchers have shown that overexposure to the sun's rays causes skin cancer; they advise us all to wear protective clothing and to use sunscreens to reduce the risk of this illness.

The biggest culprit -- responsible for 30 percent of all cancer deaths -- is smoking and other tobacco use. The scientific evidence linking cigarette smoking to cancers of the lung and mouth is undeniable. Smoking also contributes to cancers of the bladder, pancreas, and kidney. The message is clear: stop smoking or, better yet, don't start.

U.S. Public Health Service has found that when people are warned about health hazards, they tend to change their habits for the better. More and more of our citizens want information to help protect their health. Of course, the ideal solution is not to let cancer happen; by modifying the way we live, we can greatly reduce our chances of developing this disease.

This year, the American Cancer Society celebrates its 75th anniversary. The work of the American Cancer Society, the National Cancer Institute, and other organizations devoted to cancer research and control has made a difference.

Cancer Control Month. I invite the Governors of the fifty States and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and the appropriate officials of all other areas under the United States flag, to issue similar proclamations. I also ask the health care professionals, communications industry, food industry, community groups, and all other interested organizations and individual citizens to unite during this month to reaffirm publicly our Nation's continuing commitment to control cancer.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-eighth day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

The President. I'm going to impose on you here this morning before taking your questions -- that there are a number of major issues being discussed on the Hill today, INF ratification and the contra aid bill. But I want to take a couple of minutes, if I could, to talk to you about the trade bill.

America's now in its 64th month of economic expansion. That's the longest peacetime expansion in the history of our country, and we're still going strong. Gross national product is up; exports are up. And we continue to create new jobs -- 15\1/2\ million since the expansion began. There's no time for protectionism. I could argue that there is never a time for it, but now is definitely not the time. It's not the time for mandatory retaliation against our trading partners, and it's not the time to violate our GATT [General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade] agreements, and it certainly is not the time to close our borders to foreign investment while we are pressing to open other borders to U.S. investors.

We can pass a trade bill that will improve our current trade laws, protecting patents and copyrights, and streamlining export controls, and renewing negotiating authority that makes historic compacts like the Canada free trade agreement possible. We can have that kind of a trade bill, and I won't sign one unless we do.

Frequently throughout these last several years we've gone out and invited people like yourselves who are outside the White House press corps, or even the beltway press, to come in here, and it has always been a pleasure to take your questions.

Mr. President, we often hear local officials complain that your budget priorities force them to swallow Federal programs they can't afford, so they reach their taxing limits and cut basic services. Do you take responsibility for what California counties, for instance, called their unrelenting fiscal crisis?

The President. Well, the reverse of all of that is really true. There are some programs that we've cut simply because we've been able to make administrative improvements. I came here with a memory fresh in my mind as Governor of California of coming across a government program to help the needy in which the administrative overhead was $2 for every dollar delivered to a needy person, and set out to do something about that. Some programs, we have thought, are not proper for the Federal Government. But at the same time, one of the things that had been imposed on local and State government by the Federal Government was the usurpation of authority and autonomy that belonged at the local and State level.

And the Federal Government actually had acquiescence, in that over a great many years, by simply taking up so much of the taxing potential that not enough was left for local or State government for the things that they might want to do.

And this then was the excuse for the Federal Government to step in with things that, as I say, properly belonged at that other level. Well, now, with our very beginning of our recovery program, it was based on tax reductions and the idea of thus reopening sources of taxation that other elements of government or levels of government could call upon.

The President. I would have to see the specific case as to what that was about, but I'd like to call to your attention that the Federal -- or the State and local governments basically have, while we've been running budget deficits, have basically been achieving surpluses. As a matter of fact, if you take the total national deficit and add in local and State government -- the total cost of all government in the United States -- you would find that the deficit is not as -- well, it isn't -- there are other countries that have greater deficits than we do if you figure all of that. It's at the Federal level that we're still excessively spending.

Roosevelt ran for office, and part of his platform was to restore authority and autonomy to States and local governments that had been unjustly seized by the Federal Government. And we have a program we call federalism in which we're trying to restore fully that concept that the United States is a federation of sovereign States.

It can be questioned as to the wisdom of putting them in there. They had not been billeted in that building, but it was steel and concrete construction. And out where they were, encamped around the airport, which was part of our duties, there were victims of sniping, things of that kind. And the commanding officers, having that kind of structure available, moved these men in there as a place for the nights, not thinking about a suicide bombing that simply drove a truck into the building with the explosives that blew them up. And then we had to retreat. And another reason we had to retreat and give up was it began to be more evident, also, that the Lebanese military was divided in its loyalties and were loyal to some of these, what I called warlords, to the extent that it was difficult to get them in many instances to take action against the forces they were supposed to be clearing out.

Mr. President, last week you said you still think Oliver North is a hero, despite his indictment on conspiracy, theft, and fraud charges. If requested, will you testify on his behalf? And can you tell us why you still consider him to be a hero?

It was a specific question: Did I still consider him a hero? I should have augmented that and said why, and that is look at the record and at the honors and the medals that have been awarded him for bravery in combat. And I have to say those were heroic actions and he is a valid hero. And that was what my answer was based on, although, as I said, I should have augmented it as I did here and reminded them of his war record.

The President. You have said allegations, and now you come down to what is a kind of a sore point with me about a lot of the things that have been going on with regard to people in our administration. And that is that someplace along the line many of us have forgotten that you are innocent until proven guilty beyond reasonable doubt.

And what has happened, I think, in the case of this kind is it's just everyone is accepting guilt on the basis of accusation. And I say they've got a right to be presumed innocent until someone proves them guilty of the charges.

I see that I'm getting a signal here. He isn't just restless. [Laughter] It means that my time is up, and that I'm supposed to leave here. But I'm going to turn this over to my Chief of Staff, Senator Howard Baker, and he'll continue to take your questions. And I'm sorry that I have to quit. I've been enjoying this. As a matter of fact, I want to tell you just something before I go. I enjoy taking your questions more than I do from the White House press corps.

Education that emphasizes the ethical values and principles upon which America was founded, and upon which all civilization rests, remains as vital to our country today as ever in our past. History, reason, experience, and the desires of the human heart teach us that individuals and nations alike need, in addition to technical knowledge and skills, all the wisdom, guidance, and inspiration that ethical values provide. We ourselves possess these treasures only because our ancestors cherished and preserved them through the ages; we are duty-bound to pass them along to our children, who need them and seek them just as much as we and members of every generation have needed them and sought them.

These truths are known and practiced now by more and more citizens and educators. One group that exemplifies this is Hasidic Judaism's worldwide Lubavitch movement, led by Rabbi Menachem Mendel Schneerson. It is fitting that we salute his lasting achievements in education, as well as those of his late wife, the Rebbetzin Chaya Moussia Schneerson; of their many colleagues; and of everyone who fosters education that incorporates our prized heritage of ethical values.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-ninth day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

There's a terrible fear that comes when you're told that you have cancer, a fear that is the same whether you are 8 or 80. But that fear was not the end for you, but a challenge. And that's where that courage begins. First you accept the challenge to fight cancer in any way you can. And for all of you here today, your battle with cancer has become more than a personal battle. That is because you've all made conscious decisions to help others who have cancer. Many of you are active volunteers for the American Cancer Society. Some are officers in their units or divisions. Some have written books or worked on instructive videotapes. You've all used your experiences with cancer to help others come to terms with cancer in their lives.

Nancy and I faced that same decision ourselves. We made a conscious decision that it was important to ``go public'' with the fact that -- in both her case and mine -- good medical supervision, early detection, and prompt treatment were the keys to victory over cancer. People need to know that cancer isn't something to run and hide from. Cancer is a fact that must be faced and dealt with. You have all done that, and with extraordinary courage.

Here are just a few examples. After an operation on her tongue, Marcia Williams Kling took speech therapy and within 4 months was back entertaining preschoolers on her own television program. Connie Haines also beat cancer and continues to entertain the public. After two operations and 3 years of chemotherapy, Connie is back and as melodious as ever.

I was interested in discovering that members of this group not only have shown courage in a difficult time but truly achieved triumphant victories over the physical aftereffects of cancer. Just look at how the members of this group spend their spare time: camping, motorcycling, swimming, and running. In spite of an amputated leg, one Courage Award winner is a silver medalist in three-track snow skiing at the Special Winter Games. Others have enrolled in a wilderness survival program or else used their excess energy in engaging in ballet, gymnastics, soccer, or judo.

Well, it's an honor being in Jason's book, but every one of the American Cancer Society Courage Award winners is very special. You're here to be recognized for your courage and for your zest for life, and I'm proud to salute you all today.

I'm proud to present to you, Jill Ireland, the 1988 Cancer Courage Award. Jill and Charlie [Bronson], your courageous battle against cancer is an inspiration to others. In the acknowledgement to your book, ``Life Wish,'' you write that upon being told about the cancer you would have loved to talk to someone who had had the disease. Well, by sharing your story, the fears and the triumphs, you've become a companion for the many others going through the isolation of catastrophic illness. And for that, I thank you. And on behalf of the many whose lives you've touched, it is my honor to present to you this award.

Eyre. Mrs. Reagan, we owe you a special debt of gratitude for speaking up so frankly about your personal experience with breast cancer. You have reported and renewed confidence in the use of mammography, a lifesaving technique. You are a visible example of strength and courage to women and Americans all across the Nation. We feel proud to honor you as the recipient of the American Cancer Society Courage Award. And to present this award, I would like to ask Chairman Kay Horsch to join me.

Reagan. Thank you very much. I'm very honored to receive this award from Ronald Reagan. [Laughter] I can't say that it's an award that I dreamed of getting when I was growing up, but that's what happens sometimes in life. And if you can help other people to deal with this problem, then that makes you feel good. And I hope that's what's happened. Thank you very much.

April is a milestone in the history of civil rights. It marks the 20th anniversary of the passage of Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968, popularly called the ``Fair Housing Act,'' which declared as a national policy that housing throughout our country be made available to all citizens on the basis of equality and fairness. The Act outlaws any discrimination in the sale, rental, or financing of housing because of race, color, religion, sex, or national origin.

Fair Housing Act reflects Americans' willingness and determination to make sure that housing is available to all without discrimination. In the 2 decades since its passage, judicial and administrative enforcement and public and private efforts to induce voluntary compliance with the law have helped countless people obtain the housing they desire. America truly has succeeded in moving closer to the ideal of a society open to all.

American is entitled to freedom from discrimination in housing; the 20th anniversary of the Act is an appropriate time for all of us to reaffirm our dedication as a Nation to the principles of equal opportunity on which the Fair Housing Act is grounded.

But the reason we're here, of course, is to talk about the superconducting supercollider, as you've probably guessed already. I have to confess that when I first heard about this place where things go round and round at great speeds and then crash into each other I thought they were talking about a Presidential campaign. [Laughter] At first I was a little nervous addressing so many distinguished scientists on a subject of such complexity, but then I realized these are people who spend their days talking about things called quarks, which some claim exist in two places at the same time. And I thought, why worry?

The fact is, I envy the students here today because they exist in a world that seems to put no limits on the imagination. Outer space used to be called the final frontier, but today we've begun to tap another frontier -- inner space -- whose infinitesimal constellations hold out infinite possibilities. It may be a cliche, but it's nevertheless true that the pace of progress is constantly accelerating. I think one of the reasons I've always had so little patience with those who talk about the limits to growth is that in my lifetime I've seen those limits shattered again and again by questing minds. When I was very young, horsepower was still the kind you fed with hay. Powered flight was still a relatively new thing. And before the turn of the century, we plan to have men living and working in stations in space and a new hypersonic plane that can fly from here to Tokyo in less than 3 hours.

I know that some people may question the practical applications of the superconducting supercollider. The strange world of subatomic particles they may think will never be more than an arcane interest to a few highly specialized scientists. But the truth is, the practical applications of this knowledge are already changing the way we live.

Well, the technological revolution he's describing is transforming our world, and it was only made possible by the knowledge scientists have brought back from their explorations of inner space. Every time someone turns on his desk computer, makes a phone call, or plays a video game, he's plugging into that mysterious world of quantum physics. The superconducting supercollider is the doorway to that new world of quantum change, of quantum progress for science and for our economy. In the face of ever-increasing global competition, the United States must maintain the leading edge in science and technology, and building the world's largest particle accelerator is a visible symbol of our nation's determination to stay out front. Benjamin Franklin once said that an investment in knowledge pays the best interest.

I want to commend you all on your cause, your vision, and the message of progress and competitiveness you carry with you today. And it's my hope that Congress will show equal vision by approving funding to initiate construction of the supercollider. I think all they'd need to do is meet with some of these students here today to see that it is our responsibility to the next generation to keep America a place where we can dream big dreams and then make them real.

I have to interject something here before I conclude. In my lifetime -- and only the recent part of my lifetime -- after about 25 years in movies and so forth, I was representing the General Electric Theatre on television. And I visited one of their plants in Schenectady early on, and they proudly took me in and showed me what turns out to be the first computer. They called it an electric brain. It would have -- well, it would have fit in the Rose Garden here, but it was about as long as from the edge of the platform to the bushes over there and almost as thick. And that is what -- I just thought of that when I mentioned here someone sitting down to his desk computer -- that, in just those years, from there up to here, is what has happened. So, maybe that fellow about the Rolls Royce was right -- six of them on the head of a pin.

Note: The President spoke at 11:10 a.m. in the Rose Garden at the White House. In his opening remarks, he referred to Steven Weinberg, professor of physics at the University of Texas, who presented him with a letter from six physicists supporting the administration's efforts in the field of superconductivity.

We're all gathered here to welcome into the Office of Secretary of the Navy as my representative on Capitol Hill an outstanding public servant who has won the respect of the leaders of both parties and to whom I've repeatedly turned for help and advice for the past 2 years: Will Ball.

You know, sometimes you find that someone else has put things in a way you just can't improve upon. When Senator Talmadge introduced Will to the Senate Armed Services Committee, he said, ``One prerequisite for the Secretary of the Navy is character. Will Ball has character in abundance.'' And he added, ``The second prerequisite is patriotism, which Will Ball also has in abundance.'' Well, I second that all the way. Will takes over the Navy at a critical time. The defense budget has now been cut for 4 consecutive years. And yet we must maintain the gains this administration has made in rebuilding our naval and military capabilities. The good ship -- or the 600-ship Navy remains our goal.

Ball. Thank you, Mr. President. You honor me and my family by your presence here, and I shall be forever grateful to you for the privilege of serving on your staff and for this great opportunity you have given me. I also want to thank my new boss, Secretary [of Defense] Carlucci, for being here; my former boss, Secretary [of State] Shultz, for being here; and the other members of the Cabinet who could join us today. I especially appreciate the many Members of Congress who have come down from the Hill on a very busy day to be with me in this historic room to share this special moment. I want to express special gratitude to Senator Howard Baker for his guidance and leadership and his patience with me as Chief of Staff. And of course, I will forever owe a debt of gratitude to John Tower for the opportunities and the lessons and the inspiration that he gave to me years ago.

And it was just 23 years ago that I received a message from another gentleman in this room, when I was a senior in high school, and my mother called from home and said I'd received a telegram. And she, as an inquisitive mother would want to do, opened it, and it was a message from my senior Senator saying that I had been accepted in the Navy's ROTC program. And it was that message that began my forthcoming association with the Navy. One week ago, that same senior Senator called me and told me that the Senate had just confirmed me as Secretary of the Navy. And I don't know of any duty that a constituent could ask a senior Senator to do more than that which Strom Thurmond has done for me and for my family down through the years.

I am ready to assume my duties, Mr. President, and with the continued support and assistance of the Congress, we on your Navy and Marine Corps team will remain strong and prepared and will plan wisely for our future so that we can stay that way. As you have time and again explained to the American people, it is only by doing so that we can expect to preserve the peace and ultimately extend the special gift that is freedom to people the world over. Thank you.

For more than a century, the members and friends of the Actors' Fund of America have served the entertainment world by helping show people to aid their own in time of need. This long tradition of concern and compassion for fellow workers truly touches the lives of thousands for the better, exemplifies and perpetuates America's volunteer spirit, and is worthy of every recognition.

Actors' Fund assists, in addition to actors, true entertainment professionals who work in any capacity in ballet, circus, the legitimate stage, motion pictures, opera, radio, television, and variety. Its many services and benefits are designed to accommodate the unique needs of those in show business. In wartime and in peacetime, the members of the Actors' Fund have sought to foster the well-being of their fellow entertainers and of all their fellow countrymen.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirtieth day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Coronary heart disease is the leading cause of death in the United States -- each year responsible for more than 1.5 million heart attacks, 500,000 of them immediately fatal. High blood cholesterol is one of the three controllable risk factors for coronary heart disease, along with high blood pressure and cigarette smoking.

More than a quarter of adult Americans have blood cholesterol levels that put them at a significantly increased risk of coronary heart disease. Most Americans are aware of their blood pressure levels, but less than half have had their cholesterol checked and less than 10 percent know their blood cholesterol level. Extensive studies have shown that elevated levels of blood cholesterol lead to early development of hardening of the arteries and coronary heart disease, and that the higher the cholesterol, the higher the risk. Now there is firm evidence that lowering high blood cholesterol reduces that risk.

National Cholesterol Education Program, a joint program by the Federal government, medical groups, voluntary health organizations, industry, and State and local health agencies, has undertaken a campaign to educate professional, patient, and public audiences about the importance of lowering a high blood cholesterol level. The program urges all Americans to learn about the relationship among blood cholesterol, diet, and heart disease; to have their cholesterol level checked; and to know what their number means. The program's long-term goal is to reduce the death and disability from coronary heart disease that is attributable to elevated levels of blood cholesterol.

American should know his or her cholesterol level and should take measures to reduce too-high levels. The test is simple and quick; a sample of blood is obtained and the total blood cholesterol level is measured. A high level can be reduced, with diet as the primary approach and drug therapy if needed.

Each year, up to 1.8 million Americans, most of them under age 30, suffer head injuries; and more than 50,000 survivors of such injuries will experience long-term physical and mental difficulties and often need extended care and rehabilitation in returning to productive lives. Advances in medical treatment now save the lives of many people with severe head injuries; improvements in long-term rehabilitation need to continue.

Prior to joining the White House staff, Mr. Gregory founded the American Campaign Academy and served as its president. The academy is a political training school for campaign professionals. From 1981 to 1985, Mr. Gregory was with the National Republican Congressional Committee as field director for the southern region and later as the director of the department of training and speakers.

In approving this legislation, I note that section 3 of the bill establishes a ``Buy America'' requirement for the purchase of materials, supplies, and services related to the production of coins by the United States Mint, which is part of the Department of the Treasury. It requires the Secretary of the Treasury to grant preference to U.S. producers and suppliers over producers and suppliers whose principal place of business is in a foreign country that does not accord U.S. companies the same competitive opportunities for its mint's procurements as it accords to domestic companies. This requirement, standing alone, conflicts with certain of our Nation's international obligations.

In particular, the United States is a party to the Agreement on Government Procurement of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT). The Procurement Agreement requires entities (e.g., government agencies) specified by a party upon its accession to the Agreement to accord national treatment to the products and suppliers of other parties. When we acceded to the Procurement Agreement, the United States designated the Department of the Treasury, including the Mint, as an agency subject to the Agreement. Certain other parties elected not to designate their mints as subject to the Procurement Agreement; however, they may have designated other agencies that the United States excluded from its coverage. Forbidding the Mint from accepting bids from suppliers in countries that are parties to the Procurement Agreement, but that do not accept bids from United States suppliers with respect to their mint procurements, could be viewed by our trading partners as violating our obligations under the GATT Procurement Agreement.

Canada is one of the parties to the Procurement Agreement that has not designated its mint as subject to the Procurement Agreement. Canada and the United States recently signed a Free Trade Agreement. Among other things, the Free Trade Agreement reaffirms, and incorporates by reference, the rights and obligations of the Procurement Agreement. Thus, failure by the United States to grant Canada national treatment with respect to procurements by the Mint could also bring into question our obligations under the Free Trade Agreement, once it enters into force following approval of the implementing legislation which I will submit to the Congress.

Fortunately, section 3 of H.R. 2631 permits the Secretary of the Treasury to waive the Buy America provision in certain circumstances (i.e., when he finds that compliance with the provision would be inconsistent with the public interest or the cost to be unreasonable). The public interest of the United States includes adhering to our international obligations, and these obligations should be taken into account by the Secretary of the Treasury in making procurements affected by section 3 of this bill.

This law authorizes and directs the exchange of approximately 38,840 acres of public land in Nevada for some 4,650 acres of Florida wetlands of equal value owned by the Aerojet-General Corporation. Aerojet would be entitled to lease an additional 14,000 acres in Nevada for 99 years. The Nevada lands will be transferred with a variety of stipulations for the protection of wildlife.

These lands will be used for the construction of rocket manufacturing, assembly, and testing facilities. Placing them in private ownership not only will expand significantly the tax base of the affected counties, but will also provide major employment opportunities in these areas.

The lands acquired by the United States will be sold to the South Florida Water Management District, a State agency, and used to augment the water conservation activities of that agency. These include both the protection of drinking water for the millions of people living in the Miami area and the maintenance of proper water flows into Everglades National Park.

The funds resulting from that sale will be utilized for purchase of important wildlife habitat at two National Wildlife Refuges in Florida to aid in the effort to preserve the endangered Key Deer and the Manatee.

We commend those persons who are resisting General Noriega's threats and intimidations to provide him with financial resources. We urge all U.S. companies and persons to comply with the lawful requests of President Delvalle concerning payment of financial obligations to the Government of Panama.

United States Government payments due the Government of Panama are to be deposited in an account of the Government of Panama at the Federal Reserve Bank of New York. This account will be set up at President Delvalle's request.

The Department of Justice will participate in actions by private parties who have debts to the Government of Panama to declare that President Delvalle is the leader of the recognized Government of Panama.

The Internal Revenue Service will issue guidance to U.S. taxpayers explaining how tax credit may be claimed for Panamanian income taxes paid into an account to be specified at the Federal Reserve Bank of New York.

Through these measures, we are giving U.S. companies and persons an incentive and opportunity not to provide financial support to the Noriega regime. Should these measures prove insufficient, we will review additional legal steps that may be necessary to deny transfer of funds to the Noriega regime from U.S. companies and persons.

United States remains committed to the goal of restoring democratic government and constitutional order in Panama. When that goal is achieved, the United States is fully prepared to work with the Government of Panama to help restore quickly Panama's economic health. In addition, the U.S. Government is providing one-quarter million dollars to support the Caritas emergency feeding program in Panama. We will continue to examine the food needs of the poor in Panama.

In order to provide preferential tariff treatment under the GSP to certain designated eligible articles, and to provide that one or more countries should no longer be treated as beneficiary developing countries with respect to certain eligible articles for purposes of the GSP, the TSUS are modified as provided in Annex I to this Proclamation.

In order to provide preferential tariff treatment under the GSP to certain countries which have been excluded from the benefits of the GSP for certain eligible articles imported from such countries, following my determination that a country not previously receiving such benefits should again be treated as a beneficiary developing country with respect to such article, the Rates of Duty Special column for each of the TSUS items enumerated in Annex II(a) to this Proclamation is modified: (I) by deleting from such column for such TSUS items the symbol ``A*'' in parentheses, and (II) by inserting in such column the symbol ``A'' in lieu thereof.

Effective with respect to articles the product of Israel that are entered, or withdrawn from warehouse for consumption, on or after the dates specified in Annex IV to this Proclamation, the rate of duty set forth in the Rates of Duty Special column followed by the symbol ``I'' in parentheses for each of the TSUS items enumerated in such Annex shall be deleted and the rate of duty provided in such Annex inserted in lieu thereof.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 31st day of March, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

California Council of Civil Engineers and Land Surveyors in 1972 and received the Citizen Award from the Department of the Interior in 1975 in recognition of outstanding leadership in the effective development of the nation's water resources.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Warren T. Lindquist to be a member of the Board of Directors of the New Community Development Corporation, Department of Housing and Urban Development. Upon appointment by the President, he will automatically become General Manager of the Corporation and serve as Chief Executive Officer under the Board's general direction.

Mr. Lindquist is currently chairman and director of SCETAM, Inc., a management consulting firm concerned with regional economic development. He is also a general partner in Q-L Partners, a New York real estate investment and management firm.

House Conference on the Aging and of the Panel on Government and the Management of Growth of the White House Conference on Balanced National Growth and Economic Development. He was a member of the National Public Advisory Committee on Regional Economic Development and chaired its finance subcommittee.

Secretary Baldrige took place in the meeting also -- took part in it. I should say at the very beginning that the Deputy Prime Minister expressed his concern over our President, and I told him that after my visit today to the hospital that I could report to him, firsthand, that our President was, indeed, doing very well.

The U.S. values its constructive relations with Poland, and we want to develop those relations further on the basis of mutual respect and reciprocity. We're following a policy of nonintervention in Poland's internal affairs; and of course we are anxious that others do the same, and we're doing what we can to ensure that. We support the policy of the Polish government, which is to use peaceful means to resolve Poland's internal problem. And we also welcome the Polish leadership's policy of renewal and economic reform.

We talked a good deal about that, the Deputy Prime Minister explaining in considerable detail the concerns of the Polish people and of his government. And we recognize that these economic problems can only be resolved through an economic program which does have the full support of the people. We're very sympathetic to Poland's economic difficulties. And the American people have, as I told him, a very strong, compatible, humanitarian interest in the welfare of the Polish people.

Prime Minister, and that is that the United States Government will sell at concessionary prices certain dairy products, surplus dairy products to Poland. This food, consisting of dried milk and butter, was requested by the government, and we were pleased to be able to reach agreement on that. There are other matters that the Deputy Prime Minister raised with us in terms of things that we might do to help further the economy of Poland. Those matters are being considered with a matter of some urgency, because he impressed upon us the problems facing his country.

The Deputy Prime Minister. Just as the Vice President has said it, I would like on my own part to confirm that our meeting was very interesting and that it was very fruitful, above all, and very advantageous. This allows us to present a wide spectrum of matters very important to our country, for Poland, from economic problems of general meaning and about the means that we in our own country, Poland, to solve the problems with which we are faced and confronted in our country in the most effective way, in the interest of the whole of our people.

I have emphasized once again that the will of my highest authorities is the consistent implementation of the Polish Socialist renewal and the solution of all swelling problems by political means. It is clear that the essential role is assigned to economic matters. And in their solution we expect assistance on the part of our friends, the United States. We are fully cognizant that we must solve these matters, referring at this point to economic matters, by means of our own resources and forces by our own work; increasing its productivity, reinforcing law and order.

But we expect also to have assistance from our friends. This will be a subsequent consecutive demonstration of efforts to expand our economic cooperation as much as the historically shaped ties of friendship.

America was founded on the principles of liberty and the rule of law. And throughout our Nation's history, the preservation of individual rights has been dependent upon the dedication of our people to liberty and the institutionalization of its principles in the law of the land.

Freedom: the Declaration of Independence, the Constitution and the Bill of Rights. These documents, which are the very foundation of American law, guarantee certain inalienable rights and privileges to every citizen. Among these are: freedom of speech, freedom of the press, freedom of religion, freedom of contract, the right to assemble and petition, the right of property ownership, and the right to due process of law.

This year marks the Nation's twenty-fourth annual celebration of Law Day, U.S.A. -- a special day for reflection on our heritage of individual freedom and for rededication to maintaining, through law, the principles of liberty which govern this land.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this second day of April in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

Vice President Bush today met with Ilter Turkmen, the Foreign Minister of Turkey, who has come to the United States at the invitation of Secretary Haig. The meeting included senior officials from both Turkey and the United States Government.

The Vice President and the Foreign Minister reviewed in a cordial way a number of bilateral and international issues. They discussed in particular the need for all NATO allies to continue concerted efforts to enhance their defense posture in response to existing threats in Southwest Asia and Europe. The Vice President also noted with satisfaction Turkish efforts to improve bilateral relations with Greece and Turkish support for the ongoing intercommunal talks on Cyprus.

The Vice President took special note of the excellent state of the Turkish-American relationship and the significance of this year, which marks the centennial of the birth of Mustafa Kemal Ataturk, the founder of modern Turkey.

Ataturk was a great national leader in times of war and peace. He was, and he remains, first in the hearts of his countrymen. For Turkey and its people, the Ataturk Centennial Year is as important an event as the 1976 Bicentennial was for us.

The visit of Turkish Foreign Minister Turkmen in this centennial year gives us cause to take note of the great value and importance of Turkish-American relations. The United States of America and the Republic of Turkey have been firm friends and allies for more than a generation.

Beginning with Harry Truman, every American President has viewed a strong and stable Turkey as an essential goal of American policy. This is no less the case in the Reagan administration. In recent years, the United States has been working vigorously with other nations to provide Turkey the resources necessary to regain economic health and to meet its important goals as a member of the North Atlantic Treaty Organization. The United States fully supports the efforts of the Turkish Government to eradicate terrorism and to carry out basic reforms that will assure the long-term stability of Turkish democracy and the well-being of the Turkish people.

I know I speak for everybody here that we wish the President were standing right here on this beautiful day. I know that if he were here, he would first express his deep appreciation to the American Cancer Society, to Dr. Scanlon, who's president, to Mr. Jonas, his chairman, and the others who do such magnificent work. But today, we here at the White House want to join with the Cancer Society in presenting to Karen Anderson the 1981 Cancer Courage Award. Karen's personal courage in overcoming leukemia -- I guess, got it at 18, and now 26 and totally recovered -- is a great inspiration. And it shows what research has done. It shows what the Cancer Society has contributed to in such a magnificent way. And we view you, in a sense, as a symbol of victory. The volunteers and the staff of the Cancer Society, by their hard work and commitment, show us also what Americans can do when they work together to tackle tough problems, in this instance, this insidious problem of cancer.

Cancer Control Month. My family was hit with leukemia 30 years ago, and I just can't tell you what this magnificent progress means, personally. And I know I express to you, Karen, our congratulations, and I know I speak for the President on this one.

Senators here and to the Senate itself for its performance yesterday. But let me just briefly make some comments that there is in the administration clearly -- and the President has asked the Chief of Staff to have me convey this deep gratification by the Senate's action on the budget yesterday.

We hope that it will serve -- speaking for the administration, and I'm sure the Senate feels that way, having responded overwhelmingly on that vote -- we hope it will be an example to the Members of the House of Representatives, who now have the same responsibility ahead of them in the future weeks here.

So, I express the President's congratulations, and I commend the Senate for its thorough examination, open debate, on the important issue of economic recovery. Obviously, the debate was spirited at times, but bipartisan cooperation prevailed and that was the encouraging thing.

Yesterday's vote, we recognize, was simply an important initial step, but combined with tax reduction and relief from overregulation and stable money supply, we are confident that there will be a restoration of our economic vitality in this country.

The Senate really behaved magnificently in the view of the administration, and I really came up here today to simply say, ``Thank you.''And if you would convey that to others -- we caught the Senate at a rather quiet time, but after what you've been through, why, it's appropriate there be a little lull.

There is considerable evidence to indicate that the transition to majority rule in Zinbabwe, which was consummated at Lancaster House and came into effect on April 18, 1980, is now gathering momentum both economically and politically.

Real growth for 1980 is estimated to have been 8 - 10 percent. Inflation averaged between 12 percent and 15 percent for the year. With the announcement of a high pre-planting price and a good rainy season, Zimbabwe is expecting a million-ton maize surplus this harvest. The mining sector remains solidly prosperous despite some uncertainty about a possibly increased government role.

Equity'', the government has committed itself to the maintenence of a mixed economy aimed at satisfying black aspirations and assuring white confidence by attracting foreign investment and aid to generate continued economic growth.

Zimbabwe's economic success is partly associated with the fact that more than 90 percent of the country's white population, about 200,000 people, have chosen to stay in Zimbabwe. We estimate that about 20,000 whites have left, 15,000 of them have gone to South Africa. Nevertheless, white emigration has led to some dislocations in areas of the economy dependent upon mechanical and technical expertise, e.g. railroad maintenance and telecommunications. The country's 5,000 white commercial farmers have almost all stayed in Zimbabwe.

Politically, the dire predictions which were heard at the same time of independence have not come to pass. Black-white political conflict has been inconsequential. The expected Ndebele-Shona political conflict has materialized; however, despite two bloody clashes in Bulawayo, the tension has been contained by the existing political and military structures and senior leaders on both sides have responded to the problems which have arisen with a view toward the long-term best interests of the country. On the whole, the political scene has been marked by increasing stability and the enhancement of the authority of Prime Minister Robert Mugabe.

The process of military integration of ZIPRA and ZANLA continues to move forward slowly despite the collapse of three of the eleven integrated battalions in last month's difficulties. Most observers now believe that Zimbabwe will for at least the near term have a larger army than was initially anticipated, due to the fact that most of the remaining 25,000 guerillas will probably be incorporated into the new national army.

Zimbabwe on the whole has a good record in living up to the guarantees on civil liberties contained in the Lancaster House accords, in particular those contained in Annex C. Zimbabwe continues to be a functioning, multi-party, parliamentary democracy in which the rights of the population as set forth in the constitution are respected.

The basic rights called for in the agreement such as the right to life, personal liberty, freedom from torture and inhuman treatment, freedom from deprivation of property, privacy and freedom of conscience, expression, and assembly are in effect. Thus, for example, at the time of this report, there are no persons under detention in Zimbabwe because of their political views. In order to end South African control of the press, the government purchased controlling interest from the Argus Groups and invested it in a national press board which appears so far to operate independently.

The House of Assembly and the Senate which were set up pursuant to the Lancaster House agreement have proven to be active political bodies in which substantive and frank debate is the order of the day. Regularly scheduled elections continue to be held, most recently at the local level. Nevertheless, disturbances led to the postponement of local government elections in Bulawayo following clashes between partisans of competing political parties.

The court system recognized in the Lancaster House agreement functions as set forth in the agreement. Thus, for example, ZANU-PF Secretary General Edgar Tekere, who was charged with the murder of a white farmer, was freed by the court under a law passed by the former regime to protect government officials. While many Zimbabweans may have lamented Tekere's release, it was widely noted that, as promised, Prime Minister Mugabe's government did not interject itself in any way into the judicial process. The public service and the police also operate as set forth in the Lancaster House agreement.

Emergency Health Services, American Public Health Association. She is a past member of the board of directors, Northern Virginia Health Systems Agency. Ms. Pizzano has authored articles on health care and medical systems.

The theme of law as the language of liberty calls to mind several points of particular current significance. One is the problem of violent crime. The rule of law represents the civil discourse of a free people. Violent crime is the uncivilized shout that threatens to drown out and ultimately silence the language of liberty. The events of last Monday were a tragic reminder as the violent act of one man sought tho hush the voice of the Nation as to who its leader would be. But no less tragic are the daily, less dramatic acts of violence inflicted upon our citizens by a criminal few.

Attorney General Smith has stated that reduction of violent crime is his number one priority, and under the direction of the President, he's established a task force to determine the ways that Federal, State, and local governments and officials can work together to fight violent crime. This work is vital if the language of liberty is to continue to be spoken in our land.

Declaration of Independence, the Constitution, and the Bill of Rights. These founding documents remind us that the language of liberty in America has a particularly rich heritage, but they tell us something else about law as the language of liberty. They are legal documents, but they are really much more than that. Their language is central, fundamental, inspiring, rather than narrow and technical and legalistic. These charters of freedom truly speak the language of liberty, a language addressed to free men and women who know its vocabulary, its tone, its emphasis, and its objectives. Its message is muted and distorted when law becomes too technical, too regulatory, too great an interference in the lives of free citizens. President Reagan's emphasis on our charters of freedom encourages each of us to redouble our efforts to make our laws consistent with the principles these great documents, the cardinal statement of our freedom, express.

And finally, the theme of law as the language of liberty underscores that the rule of law is the common language of free people. Our Founding Fathers knew that our freedoms depended, in the final analysis, on the virtue of the American people, people to whom the laws of civilized existence were second nature, whose instincts for decency provided the necessary forum in which the language of liberty could be spoken and heard by all. This is no less true today. Our laws cannot make us good and decent citizens and human beings. To the contrary, we must be a good and decent people if law is to survive.

President Reagan's proclamation of Law Day, U.S.A., 1981, refocuses our attention on this basic truth and calls each of us to strive to live and act in ways that will keep the language of liberty clear, not only for us but for generations of Americans yet unborn.

In her position as chief of staff/administrative assistant to Senator Packwood, Mrs. Dawson has had primary responsibility for the operation of the Senator's personal staff, the Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, and the National Republican Senatorial Committee, both chaired by the Senator. Commerce Committee jurisdiction included communications, including telephone, telegraph, radio, television, cable television, and satellite communications.

The American automobile industry is in serious trouble. Our national economic condition and strangling regulations have helped cause the layoff of an estimated 500,000 workers in automobile and related industries. Last year, domestic production dropped to a 19-year low, and American auto firms lost an unprecedented $4.3 billion.

I believe in the American worker, in American innovation, and in our free marketplace. Today I am announcing steps that can help the automobile industry restore its competitive position both here and abroad. The industry must solve its own problems, but the Government must not unnecessarily hamper its efforts through excessive regulation and interference.

The first step to be taken in aid of this industry is to create a stronger and more stable economy. It is therefore essential that the Congress act quickly to pass our comprehensive package for economic recovery.

The second step is to reduce unnecessary regulations by the Environmental Protection Agency and the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration. Our proposals for these two areas will save the industry and consumers more than $9 billion during the next 5 years. Our Task Force on Regulatory Relief is considering additional regulatory changes which could result in even greater savings.

Fifth, the Attorney General has pledged a quick response to the industry's request that he seek the lifting of certain prohibitions against cooperative ventures and joint presentations before regulatory agencies. He will respond to that request immediately following the resolution of a related action now pending in the Court of Appeals.

At the invitation of the Japanese Government, a briefing delegation is being sent to Japan. We believe this closely coordinated exchange of information will lead to a greater understanding and cooperation between our two countries, and will ultimately strengthen our economic relationship with Japan.

It should be understood that real recovery will not be accomplished by government alone. We only can remove the Federal shackles and improve the economic environment within which the automobile industry operates. It is up to automobile management and unions to take the strong necessary steps to restore our competitiveness with other nations.

My Budget Reform plan, first presented February 18th and submitted in detail on March 10th, was one of four parts of my comprehensive program for the Nation's economic recovery. The Budget plan called for substantial budget savings and a redirection of Federal Government activities. It included more than 200 proposals for spending reductions, user charges and off-budget savings that are necessary to put the Federal Government on a path toward fiscal responsibility.

We have already provided extensive information on the proposed budget savings. However, I want to be sure that the Congress and the American people fully understand the reasons for the planned budget savings. Accordingly, I have directed the Office of Management and Budget to compile a document to make available additonal details on the specific savings proposals.

I also want to thank Ambassador Brock, Chairman Bill Brock, if you will, and John Heinz, who though not in their political offices now in terms of the Senate and National Committee, both of whom did this magnificent job in shaping the victories that were ours last November, and also to convey my best wishes to our new, very able chairman, Dick Richards, the new chairman of the Republican National Committee, who has a tough act to follow in following Bill Brock, but whom I'm confident will do a magnificent job.

Republicans is like pinch hitting for George Brett out there in Kansas City. You know, it's almost impossible, and there's no way that you can possibly do the job as well as the person you're filling in for. But it is a pleasure to be here in front of this distinguished audience and to thank so many solid party supporters who helped make the great Republican victory of 1980 possible and now and are hard at work, as you've heard from previous speakers, laying the groundwork for 1982.

And thanks to your efforts we now have a Republican President, and thanks to your efforts we now have a Republican Senate. But two out of three, while it may be pretty good -- .666 in baseball -- may be okay, but it isn't good enough when it comes to turning this country around completely. We have Howard Baker as Senate Majority Leader, and now we need, and President Reagan needs, Bob Michel as Speaker of the House of Representatives. That is our objective.

Every American, regardless of party, regardless of where you come from, is heartened by the magnificent progress that our President is making on his road to recovery. I stopped over there just for a couple of minutes on the way to this dinner, and I must say that he looks well. That fantastic humor and spirit is there, and I'll tell you, here's one guy that just can't wait for him to get out of that hospital and get back to the Oval Office. The country needs it so much. We need his strength, we need his resilience, we need his articulation about division of our country's future, and we need his will and his determination to make the decade of the eighties one of a great new beginning for our country.

And while we're at it, I expect I express the sentiments of everybody here when I say the same goes for Jim Brady, the same goes for Secret Service Agent McCarthy, who did get out of the hospital today, and the same goes for that heroic policeman, Mr. Delahanty. We need them. We need them back at what they were all doing, each in their own way, so very well indeed.

It's been only 2 months since the President launched what Joe talked about, this new beginning for the Nation, but the signal is clear for everybody to see -- in President Reagan we have a leader now who inspires new confidence, who inspires new hope in our country's future. I see it at home, and I see it abroad, as we meet with leader after leader from overseas. Ten days ago, speaking here, the President outlined the basic philosophy that guides his administration, the philosophy that those of us who work with him day to day have heard him express in various ways whenever key issues are being discussed.

We Republicans, as Guy Vander Jagt put it, we believe in the American people. We have faith in the people's ability, through exercising individual freedom and their God-given ingenuity, to make better lives for themselves, their families, and their communities. And the record of the past half century shows that under Democratic leadership we've had ever expanding, ever more centralized government trying to run the lives of our citizens. And the Reagan mandate of 1980 was a clear and unmistakable message from the people to turn that trend around, to make America once again a government of, by, and for the people, and not of, by, and for the bureaucrats.

Until this year the opposition party had held control over both Houses of the Congress for 46 years out of the last 50 years. And last November, thanks to the help of many here, we broke that monopoly by winning a majority in the Senate. And next year, 1982, with your help, we're going to finish the job on Capitol Hill by electing a Republican majority in the House. And we're going to strengthen the Republican majority that now exists in the Senate. I feel that deep down inside me. If this program, and I want to mention briefly, is successful, we are going to win control of the House of Representatives and get this country back to work again.

The mandate of 1980 was only a beginning. It was a birth of the new coalition in American politics, a major realignment, if you will, of the Nation's electorate. This new coalition, the Reagan coalition, created that mandate last November. It repudiated the old and discredited opposition philosophy, and it endorsed a real, not simply a rhetorical, program to restore our country's economic stability at home. And that program calls for several things.

First, a reduction in the growth of Federal Government spending. And if we're going to curb inflation and unconscionable interest rates, we've got to begin by curbing the excessive, wasteful spending policies and programs inspired and supported by the opposition leadership year in and year out, fighting the very concept that we must control the growth of spending. That is the first ingredient of the Reagan program. And last week, under the great leadership of Senator Howard Baker and Pete Domenici, the inspired leadership in that Senate, we took a major step in that direction with the Senate cutting some $40 billion odd from the fiscal '82 budget.

And I'm happy to note that many members of the opposition, Democrats, joined in, responding to the people's wishes -- joined the Republican majority in supporting the President. The vote was, I believe, 88 to 10. And we all owe a tremendous debt to Howard Baker and to Pete Domenici for spearheading this legislative effort to make that victory possible.

Let me tell you something about that vote. Amendment after amendment, I believe Howard told me today at lunch, there were 43 amendments -- and a lot of them popular amendments, a lot of them molded so you could try to pull away a vote or two, voting for something that had a very attractive label on it. And under the leadership of Howard Baker and of Pete Domenici and others, we held that line firm in the United States Senate, and thus set the pattern saying to the people, ``We are going to do what we were elected to do -- control the growth of Federal spending'' -- a masterful job by the majority leader and by the chairman of the Budget Committee.

Secondly, the Reagan program for economic recovery calls for creating new jobs for millions of unemployed Americans who want to work by revitalizing our nation's productive capacity and encouraging investment in the private sector. And to do this the President's economic program calls for a bold, innovative tax program providing for a 10-percent, across-the-board rate cut every year for the next 3 years, and that next 3 years is important. We've got to be able to plan ahead so that we can invest and so that we can build and so we can put this country back to work again. This program is the program that President Reagan campaigned on, was elected on last November, and its enactment is absolutely essential if we're going to make the promise of the Reagan mandate a reality and pull America out of this quagmire of economic stagnation.

Force and let it be known that he wanted that Task Force to go forward full speed toward one goal -- getting the Federal Government off the backs of the American people in their daily lives and livelihood. We have regulated ourselves to death in the United States, and President Reagan is going to change it.

The President made me Chairman of that Task Force, and I can tell you his leadership is continual. That pressure is on us to perform, and we recognize the responsibility of government in protecting the environment. Of course we do. We recognize the Government's responsibility in the safety of the workingplace. Of course we do. But unrealistic, overzealous regulators have made a mockery of the good intentions, and by their arbitrary actions they've added tens of thousands of workers to the unemployment rolls, and they've threatened the very existence of some of these small businesses. Large businesses can cope, with big computers, a lot of people out there. But small businesses are being driven to their knees by the excesses of Federal regulation, and our Task Force has already taken action in several key areas of the economy.

Yesterday we moved to eliminate needless, burdensome regulations that have held down the productive capacity of the American automotive industry, and we're going to put unemployed Americans back to work. And our first step must be to free this economy from the shackles of unneeded bureaucratic regulation, and I just can't tell you how much I enjoy my job when it comes to this Regulatory Task Force. Something's going to happen out there, and it's going to be good for the working man in this country.

And fourth, as the President told the National Conference of Building and Construction Trades, we intend to cooperate with the overall economic program and have with it also, working with it, a monetary policy designed to stabilize the money supply, reduce inflation, and bring down interest rates.

And a fifth element of the program, though not directly related to economic recovery, is also fundamental to the meaning of the Reagan mandate, and we're determined to reverse the trend of recent decades where bureaucratic decisionmakers in Washington increase power at the expense of State, local, and county governments. The Founding Fathers created a Federal system based on the premise that the closer the government is to the people, the more responsive government will be to the needs and desire of the people. And that idea, untested in recent years as powers gravitated to Washington, is as true today as it was two centuries ago. And restoring that concept to relations between the national, State, local, and county governments is an integral part of the way President Reagan views his November mandate.

He feels strongly about getting those answers closer to the people and not having them all done right here in Washington, D.C. And as this federalism unfolds, I believe that those local governments will increase in excellence and increase in their responsiveness to the people if they feel they can have, through block grants, the funds to make possible their own priorities, take care of their own priorities at these various levels of government.

These are five ingredients, and three of them -- the control of the growth of spending and the tax thing and the regulatory thing -- are all part of it. But let me tell you what concerns me tonight, and I don't want to assign guilt to anybody that puts out a thousand bucks for a plate. That gets you in, and you shouldn't be harassed. But I'll tell you something about my own office.

We get this country back to work and produce and create and innovate and save, and then we'll have plenty of time to second-guess the President of the United States. But for now, we need your help in holding this program together and getting it through the House and getting it through the Senate, so the people will say at last, ``We have a President who did, after elected, what he said he was going to do.'' And that President, my friends, is Ronald Reagan.

Statistics reported by the Federal Bureau of Investigation and other law enforcement agencies indicate that crime continues to be a very serious national problem. But statistics cannot express the human tragedy of crime felt by those who are its victims. Only victims truly know the trauma crime can produce. They have lived it and will not soon forget it. At times, whole families are entirely disrupted -- physically, financially and emotionally. Lengthy and complex judicial processes add to the victim's burden. Such experiences foster disillusionment and, ultimately, the belief that our system cannot protect us. As a Nation, we can ill afford this loss of faith on the part of innocent citizens who have been victimized by crimes.

We need a renewed emphasis on, and an enhanced sensitivity to, the rights of victims. These rights should be a central concern of those who participate in the criminal justice system, and it is time all of us paid greater heed to the plight of victims.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

United States, public officials from State and local governments, and members of the Legislative and Executive branches of the Federal government, who shall be appointed by the President. The members shall serve at the pleasure of the President.

The Presidential federalism advisory committee that I am forming today is a first step in helping me to restore a proper constitutional relationship between the Federal, State, and local governments. Unfortunately, our decentralized system of government has over the years been bent out of shape. The Federal Government too often has treated elected State and local officials as if they were nothing more than administrative agents for Federal authority. I will look to this Advisory Committee to help me find ways to return towards a proper balance.

My administration looks forward to working with them in concrete ways. We need to provide for greater authority and responsibility in the States, counties, cities, and towns -- to return government to those closest to the people most affected.

I am particularly pleased that my good friend Senator Paul Laxalt, who served in county government before being elected Lieutenant Governor and then Governor of the State of Nevada, has agreed to serve as Chairman of this Committee. I am further pleased that a bipartisan cross section of Governors, State legislators, mayors, county officials, and Members of Congress have agreed to serve on this Committee.

I've been delighted by the progress in moving our economic recovery program forward. I'm sure you regret as I do the House Budget Committee's recent actions, however. I fear that too many of our colleagues in the House prefer that we return to business as usual -- that we can solve the problems of the future by continuing the economic mistakes of the past.

On my behalf, would you please convey my strongest concern that we redouble our efforts to enact all the key elements of our plan for economic recovery. Together, we can gain a significant victory for the American people.

In World War II his conspicuously brilliant leadership thrust him to the top of the U.S. military command. Whether at Normandy, North Africa, or Sicily, the Bradley command always meant good fortune for freedom's defenders.

Nancy and I were honored to have Omar Bradley as our friend, and honored that one of his last public appearances was at my Inauguration. Both of us extend to General Bradley's family our deepest sympathies.

United States shall be flown at half-staff upon all public buildings and grounds, at all military posts and naval stations, and on all naval vessels of the Federal Government in the District of Columbia and throughout the United States and its Territories and possessions until his interment. I also direct that the flag shall be flown at half-staff for the same length of time at all United States embassies, legations, consular offices, and other facilities abroad, including all military facilities and naval vessels and stations.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this ninth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

The President is very pleased by this strong expression of allied unity. It reflects the results of the full and extensive consultations which the administration has had with our European allies since January 20. The President, the Secretaries of State and Defense, and other senior administration officials have met frequently with European leaders both here and abroad. This series of talks has resulted in common understandings on the key problems facing the Alliance. The President is gratified that that sense of understanding has been made dramatically clear by the statement of the NATO Defense Ministers. He believes the statement has made a significant contribution to the prospects for world peace.

The American people are blessed with freedom and material abundance, yet they are not deaf to the cries of agony from those who suffer deprivation. Today, cries for help are heard from Africa where more than 4 million of our fellow human beings have been displaced.

African Refugee Relief Day and to call upon the people of the United States to observe that day by increasing their awareness of the plight of the African refugee. Further, I call on Americans of all faiths to involve themselves directly in this problem with their prayers and with contributions to recognized private voluntary agencies which provide care and relief to African refugees.

Commander John W. Young and Captain Robert L. Crippen, you go forward this morning in a daring enterprise, and you take the hopes and prayers of all Americans with you. You go in the hand of God and draw on the courage of life.

Our countryman and poet William Cullen Bryant said America is where mankind throws its last fetters. With your exploits, we loosen one more. Who, he said, shall place a limit to the giant's strength, or curb his swiftness in the forward race?

For all Americans, Nancy and I thank you and the 50,000 others who have worked to make this day possible. As you hurtle from Earth in a craft unlike any other ever constructed, you will do so in a feat of American technology and American will.

Since 1976 Dr. Melady has been president of Sacred Heart University where he is also a professor of political science. He has been serving as chairman of the Connecticut Conference of Independent Colleges.

He served previously as Ambassador to Burundi and to Uganda. He was a member of the U.S. delegation to the United Nations. Dr. Melady was executive vice president of St. Joseph's University, Philadelphia, Pa., prior to his position at Sacred Heart University. He was chairman of the department of Asian studies and nonwestern civilization at Seton Hall University.

As my stay at the George Washington University Hospital reaches its end, I want to express my deep and heartfelt appreciation to all who have contributed to my care. The entire staff at the hospital contributed to my comfort and recovery, and I will always remember their special efforts on my behalf.

I look forward, of course, to returning to the White House. And I return with a new respect for the men and women who serve in the medical profession and with tremendous gratitude for their dedication, professionalism, and genuine concern for their fellow man. They represent the best of America, and I am proud to know them.

Since 1967 Dr. Lloyd has served as president, Center for Leadership Development, a private management development corporation. He was recently special consultant for reorganization and management to Secretary of Education Terrel Bell.

The son of an Alabama sharecropper, Joe Louis fought his way to the top of professional boxing and into the hearts of millions of Americans. Out of the ring, he was a considerate and soft-spoken man; inside the ring, his courage, strength, and consummate skill wrote a unique and unforgettable chapter in sports history.

All of America mourns his loss, and we convey our sympathy to his family and friends. But we also share their pride in his professional achievements, his service to his country, and his strength of heart and spirit.

Every American remembers with pride the dignity, determination, and quiet courage with which they withstood the abuse of their captors. We remember the joy and thanksgiving that united the Nation on their release.

We must be resolved that this cruel episode in our history shall not be forgotten -- that we will ensure our professional diplomats and military personnel every means of protection that America can offer.

Service who worked and prayed so hard for their return. But the deepest debt of all is to those eight Americans who gave their lives in an effort to win freedom for their fellow citizens. All these citizens, with their dedication, are the basis of America's strength.

Recent years have brought many changes to the lives of American mothers. Today they are increasingly involved in business, politics, education, arts, sciences, and government as well as the vital work of the home and family.Yet, whether they seek careers outside the home or work as homemakers, they remain the heart of the American family.

You were right, Captain Crippen, when you said the Columbia and her voyage would mean much to this country and to the world. Today the world watched us in triumph. Today our friends and our adversaries are reminded that we are a free people capable of great deeds. We are a free people in search of progress for mankind, and today we found a little more.

The increase of quantity was to be effective pending further action; specifically, after receipt of a report of findings and recommendations of the United States International Trade Commission, which was scheduled to conduct an investigation into this matter pursuant to section 22 of the Agricultural Adjustment Act of 1933, as amended (7 U.S.C. 624). The Commission has conducted an investigation and reported its findings and recommendations.

And while the unique contributions of each segment of our population are important, the significant fact remains that each of us, whatever background, remains loyal to the Nation and to the ideals of freedom for which it stands.

Throughout our history, all Americans have toiled together to build this land into the freest and most prosperous Nation on earth. And when the times required it, our people stood shoulder-to-shoulder proclaiming to any in the world who would threaten, that all were Americans and proud of it.

Seldom are we called upon to consciously consider and express loyalty to our Nation and its ideals of liberty. It would be well to do so. The world is filled with tyranny and deprivation. Each of us can thank God that we are living in this blessed land. And when differences arise among us, which is only natural in a free society, we should always remain aware that we are one people, together and indivisible.

Because it was not possible to gain United Nations Security Council agreement to assume responsibility for supervising the security arrangements called for by the Peace Treaty, the United States Agreed during September 1979 talks with Egypt and Israel to monitor adherence to the Treaty's military limitations. Verification inspections, conducted by the Sinai Field Mission, began in April 1980 and will continue until April 25, 1982, the scheduled date for total Israeli withdrawal from the Sinai.

My Administration has initiated bilateral discussions with both Parties on the security arrangements to be implemented in the Sinai following Israel's final withdrawal. The United States intends to carry out its commitment to ensure the establishment and maintenance of an acceptable alternative multinational force if it proves impossible for the United Nations to support the security arrangements under the Treaty. We share the desire of both Parties to move forward expeditiously on this question. We will keep the Congress fully informed and will consult as our discussions of this matter progress.

After graduation from West Point in 1967, he spent almost 5 years as an Army field artillery officer in command and staff assignments in the United States, Europe, and Vietnam. Mr. McCoy was assigned by the Army to the Defense Intelligence Agency and the National Security Agency and was employed as a civilian by the Central Intelligence Agency as an intelligence officer. For 5 years Mr. McCoy worked full- or part-time as staff assistant in the immediate office of five Secretaries of Defense. He has also served as a staff member of the National Security Council; as scientific assistant to the Assistant Secretary of the Navy for Research, Engineering, and Systems; and as the Director of Policy Research in the Office of the Under Secretary of Defense for Policy.

Mr. McCoy's work in his various assignments has covered a wide range of U.S. foreign and defense policy issues and intelligence subjects. His awards are numerous, they include the Secretary of Defense Meritorious Civilian Service Medal.

While April 15 serves as a reminder, the people of the United States truly do not need to be reminded. They are victims of inflation, which pushes them into higher tax brackets. They are robbed daily of a better standard of living. They are discouraged from work and investment.

There are a few other alternative tax proposals now before the Congress, but compared to our proposals, they will result in higher taxes for the American people. In fact, these alternatives are not the answer; they are the problem.

Taxes are much tohigh to deal in half measures. In 1965 less than 6 percent of all taxpayers faced marginal rates of 25 percent or more. Today, more than one of every three taxpayers is in at least the 25 - percent bracket. In addition, since 1965 the marginal tax rate for a median-income family of four has jumped from 17 percent to 24 percent in 1980. And under current law it would grow to a crushing 32 percent in 1984. We simply can't allow our already overburdened and demoralized taxpayers to suffer this unacceptable increase.

The choice before us is clear. I strongly feel that the great majority of Americans believe that nothing would better encourage economic growth than leaving more money in the hands of the people who earn it. It's time to stop stripping bare the productive citizens of America and funneling their hard-earned income into the Federal bureaucracy.

Today is a day when the people reaffirm their commitment to our system by contributing a portion of their income to the Government. Americans have always been prepared to pay their fair share, but today they should make it clear to all elected officials that government has gone beyond its bounds and that the people will not tolerate the ever-increasing tax burden they have experienced in recent years.

Their convictions in the U.S. District Court, on appeal at the time I signed the pardons, grew out of their good-faith belief that their actions were necessary to preserve the security interests of our country. The record demonstrates that they acted not with criminal intent, but in the belief that they had grants of authority reaching to the highest levels of government.

America was at war in 1972, and Messrs. Felt and Miller followed procedures they believed essential to keep the Director of the FBI, the Attorney General, and the President of the United States advised of the activities of hostile foreign powers and their collaborators in this country.

Four years ago, thousands of draft evaders and others who violated the Selective Service laws were unconditionally pardoned by my predecessor. America was generous to those who refused to serve their country in the Vietnam war. We can be no less generous to two men who acted on high principle to bring an end to the terrorism that was threatening our nation.

Forty-five percent of Federal employees who responded to the survey said that in the last 12 months they had observed or had evidence of waste or illegality; 17 percent have personal knowledge of Federal property being stolen; 11 percent have personal knowledge of ineligible recipients getting funds, goods, or services. These are far from trivial matters. Indeed, 9 percent of the employees in the survey claimed to have observed specific incidents each involving over $100,000 of waste or mismanagement.

Government: Federal employees or private citizens who wish to report incidents of illegal or wasteful activities are not only encouraged to do so but will be guaranteed confidentiality and protected against reprisals.

I also want every member of this administration -- from those in the Cabinet, to the sub-Cabinet, to Federal employees beginning their careers today -- to understand that we will not tolerate fraud, waste, and abuse of the taxpayers' dollars. Every allegation of wrongdoing, every investigative lead will be pursued thoroughly and objectively.

The vital element in any program designed to fight fraud and waste is the willingness of employees to come forward when they see this sort of activity. They must be assured that when they ``blow the whistle'' they will be protected and their information properly investigated.

During the past few decades, government programs have multiplied and expenditures have grown by quantum leaps. But during this time little attention has been paid to the serious problems of mismanagement and criminal fraud. One Department of Justice study has revealed that in social programs fraud alone could be as much as 1 to 10 percent of the expenditures for those programs.

It is time to put a halt to this waste and wrongdoing. These steps I have mentioned today represent only a beginning in one of the toughest and most important programs this administration will undertake: eliminating waste and fraud, and restoring the public's faith in the integrity of government.

This weekend, people across the world will join in holy celebrations, drawing spiritual sustenance from their worship. Here in America, religious beliefs are central to our founding principles. We draw special strength from our unity as a people who trust in God, and from the lessons for us and our children in our rituals.

Beginning with the traditional Seder meal, Passover is rich with tradition and symbolism. Its observance reminds us that the fight for freedom and the battle against oppression, waged by Jews throughout their history, is one of which all free people are a part.

Beginning today and culminating on Sunday morning, Christians will celebrate with their families the resurrection of Christ, His victory over death. We will remember that He gave His body and His blood -- washing clean the faults and the shortcomings of the world. In our rejoicing we will renew the hope that is ours through the risen Lord.

Nancy joins me in extending to all who celebrate Passover or Easter our warmest wishes for a time filled with joy and spiritual fulfillment and our hope that one day men and women everywhere will be able to worship God in the manner of their choosing.

He has been a member of many scientific and professional societies including: American Society for Oceanography, Marine Technology Society, Society of Economic Paleontologists and Mineralogists, American Association of Petroleum Geologists, and the University Corporation for Atmospheric Research. He is the author of many articles and papers on geology and oceanography.

Today, I'm asking the heads of all Federal departments and agencies to impose an immediate moratorium on the production and procurement of new audiovisual aids and Government publications. The Federal Government is spending too much money on public relations, publicity, and advertising. Much of this waste consists of unnecessary and expensive films, magazines, and pamphlets.

Government. While we have a duty to keep the citizens of this country accurately and fully informed about government programs and activities, we should not use this as a license to produce films, pamphlets, and magazines that do not truly serve the public interest.

Over the past few months, many of you have sent examples to us of publications and pamphlets, most of them unsolicited, that you felt were useless and a waste of the taxpayers' dollars. We are grateful for this contribution to our efforts to eliminate waste in this area. Additionally, some Federal agencies have already conducted their own reviews of public relations activity. Their investigations indicate that there is potential for significant savings from a review of this type in all our departments and agencies.

I am asking the heads of agencies and departments to impose a government-wide moratorium on these activities so that a comprehensive review of current and planned spending may be conducted. I am asking the head of each department and agency to develop specific plans to prevent abuses in the future. I have instructed the Director of the Office of Management and Budget to issue procedures and guidelines to carry out the directive, to assist agencies in developing plans, and to monitor the savings. I am requesting that all departments and agencies begin their reviews immediately and report their progress and plans no later than July 15, 1981.

During these difficult economic times, we cannot afford to waste time and money on activities that have limited benefit to the people of this country. Controlling spending on public relations, publicity, and advertising is an important contribution to our overall goal of cutting out waste in the Federal Government.

The United States is a Nation comprised almost entirely of immigrants and their descendents. The interaction of different cultures, each of which has become a vital part of a culture uniquely American, constantly revitalizes our national spirit and heritage.

Asian-Pacific cultures. Asians have brought to the United States values and traditions that profoundly enrich American life. In a variety of fields that span the spectrum of human endeavor -- including art, dance, agriculture, the sciences, medicine, commerce, government and philosophy -- Asian and Pacific Americans have made outstanding contributions to the cultural and technological development of their adopted Nation. Their hard work, creativity and intelligence have inspired their fellow citizens, added new dimensions to our national life and strengthened the social fabric of our land.

Asian and Pacific Americans have been squarely within this tradition. Overcoming great hardships, they have lived the American dream, and continue as exemplars of hope and inspiration not only to their fellow Americans, but also to the new groups of Asian and Pacific peoples who even now are joining the American family.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 20th day of April in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

Our two nations have built a friendship based on good will and mutual respect, recognizing that we both have independent, national interests to pursue. I believe that the proposed course of action will ensure the settlement of the maritime boundary by an impartial and binding procedure, and that it will allow a future fisheries relationship with Canada to be based on better known facts and circumstances.

United Kingdom which was applied to the British Virgin Islands in 1959. The Convention takes into account the modernization of tax treaties which has taken place since that time and is based primarily on the United States and OECD model tax treaties published in 1977. The most important differences from the model tax treaties are the rates of tax at source on investment income. Because of the positive rates at source, the use of the Convention by third country residents in deriving investment income from the United States will decline substantially.

An important feature of the Convention, which benefits the United States in particular, is found in the provisions of Article 25 which provide for the exchange of information. The note of the Government of the British Virgin Islands confirms that financial information will be made available, on request, to the United States. It also confirms that, under the terms of the Convention, the United States may terminate the Convention if, as a result of a change in law or practice in the British Virgin Islands, such information is not made available.

The President. Actually, I can't recall too clearly. I knew I'd been hurt, but I thought that I`d been hurt by the Secret Service man landing on me in the car. And it was, I must say, it was the most paralyzing pain. I've described it as if someone had hit you with a hammer.

But that sensation, it seemed to me, came after I was in the car, and so I thought that maybe his gun or something, underneath, when he had come down on me, had broken a rib. But when I sat up on the seat and the pain wouldn't go away, and suddenly I found that I was coughing up blood, we both decided that maybe I'd broken a rib and punctured a lung. So, that's when we headed for the hospital. And I walked in and gave them my own diagnosis, and the next thing I knew I was on a cart and it was then, I guess, that they found the wound and that I actually had been shot.

The President. Yes. And my main concern, even as I was getting to the hospital, was that -- and I voiced this several times to them -- that the more I tried to breathe and the deeper I tried to breathe, it kept seeming as if I was getting less air -- and you know that panic that you can get if you're strangling on something. I almost had the feeling that it was going to diminish to the place where I wouldn't be getting any. And then they shut me up by sticking a pipe down by throat and oxygen on, and that's when I had to start writing notes -- [laughter] -- because I couldn't talk with that pipe in there.

The President. Well, actually, I don't think I'd be doing anything different. And I'm just going to, you know, I'm going to do it my way. It's convenient this way, because there still are calls by the doctors who want to come and check. There is the convenience of being able to get up and, for example, the telephone calling that I've been doing, which I'd be doing from the office, but I can get up in the morning without bothering to get dressed yet, put on a robe, and sit and do the calls.

So this, you know, with the Congress on recess, I don't think there'd be anything different or I'd be doing anything different than I've done other than possibly some appearances that have been scheduled and which had to be canceled or which George Bush substituted for me. But other than that I've been doing what I'd be doing. Remember, the schedule actually called for me to be in California for a few days.

The President. No, I really don't. As I say, the Congress is on recess. I'd be doing the same thing, telephoning them while they're back there, with things that I think might be helpful in meeting their constituents. There isn't anything more that we could do in pushing up on the Hill. So, no, I think everything's going along all right.

The President. Well, they vary from day to day. Usually we start with a staff meeting, and we do that -- which was normal before. Yesterday I had a series of meetings, finishing up with almost an hour's meeting with those Governors who came to see me. We have security briefings.

So, that some days -- now, today, for example, has been -- well, there`s been some sizeable amount of paper signing and so forth that went on, and then mainly after the staff meeting, the telephone calling, which I've been doing. And that will continue, because you don't get them the first call.

The President. The only routine that I'm continuing is an afternoon nap. And that was never -- in spite of some stories to the contrary -- that was never a habit of mine. As a matter of fact, I've never been one who naps very well in the daytime. Everybody else sacks out on the plane and everything else, and I don't.

The President. Well, of course, you know, I had 8 years of a job that was similar enough that there hasn't been any great surprises to me in this. But I'm enjoying it, to be able to deal directly with the things I've heretofore talked about. I enjoy doing that.

The President. Well, again, you get -- maybe this is part of it -- that you get a little used to it. In all those 8 years and those hectic times when I was Governor, I was aware that there were constant threats. And I could usually tell when there was a slight difference in the security precautions and the normal -- something new must have been suggested. And in the two campaigns, having had national-type security, Secret Service, no, I've been -- you're aware of that.

The President. Well, yes, the feeling is I hope, indeed I pray, that he can find an answer to his problem. He seems to be a very disturbed young man. He comes from a fine family. They must be devastated by this. And I hope he'll get well too.

We have the laws now. Granted that all States aren't uniform. But I don't know of any place -- there may be some -- but I don't know of any place in the country where it is now not against the law to carry a concealed weapon. Now, we've found that that can't prevent someone. Your District of Columbia here has such a law. But a man was carrying a concealed weapon. So, I don't see where we believe that adding another law that probably will be just as unenforceable as this one is going to make a difference.

In fact, if anything, I'm a little disturbed that focusing on gun control as an answer to the crime problem today could very well be diverting us from really paying attention to what needs to be done if we're to solve the crime problem.

The President. Well, I do think we're showing the results of several decades of growing permissiveness, unwillingness to hold individuals responsible for their misdeeds, blaming society instead. In other words, quicker, more effective justice.

The President. Oh, you bet. And I think all of us -- as I say, when I finally did learn that three others had been hit, including the agent who deliberately placed himself between me and the gunman -- but Jim, of course, was the most serious, and I am so gratified by the optimism about his recovery that that's a daily prayer.

The Congress of the United States established the United States Holocaust Memorial Council to create a living memorial to the victims of the Nazi Holocaust. Its purpose: So mankind will never lose memory of that terrible moment in time when the awful spectre of death camps stained the history of our world.

When America and its allies liberated those haunting places of terror and sick destructiveness, the world came to a vivid and tragic understanding of the evil it faced in those years of the Second World War. Each of those names -- Auschwitz, Buchenwald, Dachau, Treblinka and so many others -- became synonymous with horror.

The millions of deaths, the gas chambers, the inhuman crematoria, and the thousands of people who somehow survived with lifetime scars are all now part of the conscience of history. Forever must we remember just how precious is civilization, how important is liberty, and how heroic is the human spirit.

Like the genocide of the Armenians before it, and the genocide of the Cambodians which followed it -- and like too many other such persecutions of too many other peoples -- the lessons of the Holocaust must never be forgotten.

Days of Remembrance as a national, civic commemoration of the Holocaust, and to encourage and sponsor appropriate observances throughout the United States. This year, the national Days of Remembrance will be observed on April 26 through May 3.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 22nd day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

From the Boston Post Road to the Pony Express to the golden spike that joined together the transcontinental railroads . . . from the flight at Kitty Hawk and the appearance of the first horseless carriage to the advent of jet travel and the development of the interstate highway system . . . transportation in America has played a vital and historical role in our development as a Nation.

Among the Americans who contribute to transportation are the hundreds of thousands who build machines, construct the facilities, operate and maintain the equipment, and provide the services that make our transportation systems work. Countless others labor to make transportation better and to meet the needs of our changing times.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-second day of April in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

As the leader in world trade and the principal military power of the free world, the United States conveys goodwill through its Merchant Marine, serving the cause of international peace. The Merchant Marine also stands ready to provide logistical support in military emergencies.

The burden of delinquent debts owed to the Federal Government continues to grow every year and is contributing to our problems of inflation. More that $25 billion of the $175 billion in debts owed the Federal Government is either delinquent on in default. The interest on the delinquent debt alone, at a 15-percent rate, is almost $10.3 million per day. This abnormally high delinquency rate is another example of the abuse and mismanagement in the Federal Government. Allowing uncollected debt to grow increases the cost of government and adds to the inflation that hurts every one of us.

We must make it clear that debts owed to the Federal Government must be repaid. These debts are due from all segments of our society: college graduates whose tuition was paid for by Government loans; homeowners who have defaulted on loans from the Veterans Administration, Farmers Home Administration, and Federal Housing Administration; businesses who have used Government funds to finance export sales; farmers who have used Government loans to finance farm operations; and individuals and businesses who have not settled their tax accounts with the Internal Revenue Service.

We must immediately pursue the current overdue debt to reduce that $25 billion burden. We must institute better Federal credit management to prevent debt delinquencies and defaults and use more aggressive debt collection practices to recover the delinquencies that do occur.

I am directing the heads of Federal agencies and departments to institute more effective debt collection practices and better credit management. I am asking them to designate an official in each agency or department who will have direct responsibility for debt collection. Additionally, I am calling for a detailed review of the current overdue debt and asking for a plan to collect those debts. Each agency and department must also provide a plan for improved credit management and debt collection in the future.

A progress report on the results of the detailed review of backlogged debt, along with the credit management plans, will be due by September 30, 1981. As a further step in establishing better discipline in this area, an annual report on debt collection will be due every September when the Federal budgets are being reviewed.

Administrative action alone is not enough to solve this massive problem. Accordingly, this administration will support legislation to facilitate debt collection and allow the Federal agencies and departments to practice better credit management.

We must institute better credit management to prevent debt delinquencies and defaults and use more aggressive debt collection procedures to recover the delinquencies that do occur. We must take firm action now to reduce that portion of the $25 billion debt backlog that is collectible.

As first steps, I am directing you to designate an official with responsibility and authority for debt collection and submit the name of this official to the Office of Management and Budget by May 15, 1981. Additionally, each department and agency is to complete a review of their agencies debt situation and prepare a detailed plan and schedule for resolving identified problems. This is due by June 15, 1981 to the Office of Management and Budget.

To slow the expansion of delinquent debt, each agency and department will provide a plan for improved credit management and more efficient debt collection. A progress report on the results of your reviews and the development of credit management plans will be due by September 30, 1981 to the Office of Management and Budget. Hereafter, an annual report on debt collection will be submitted in September.

As in all wars, the brunt of the conflict was borne by the soldiers, sailors, airmen, and marines who served in our Armed Forces during that time, particularly the millions who saw duty in Vietnam. Beyond the 57,000 who died during the Vietnam war, we have among us millions of veterans who have yet to receive the full measure of thanks for having accepted the call to arms when such service was not popular with all Americans. More than 300,000 of these were wounded in Vietnam, many suffering permanent disabilities.

The cold statistics are empty, however, unless we keep in mind the individual and personal drama which accompanies each Vietnam-era veteran and casualty. Much has been said about the sacrifice made by those who served, but full recognition of the Nation's debt of gratitude to them is long overdue.

Veterans Day was proclaimed pursuant to a joint resolution of the Congress. I believe it is appropriate again to recognize and commemorate those men and women who did their duty in a time of crisis. No one should doubt the nobility of the effort they made.

In these times of economic hardship and budget restriction every citizen should be aware that showing our gratitude to the Vietnam veteran will take more than leaving it up to the Federal Government to provide money and programs. Each of us must do his or her part in reaching out in a personal way to these brave men and women. This recognition will mean much to the Vietnam veterans who never received the thanks they deserved when they originally returned home from war.

National Day of Recognition for Veterans of the Vietnam Era. I urge my fellow citizens to observe this day with appropriate programs, ceremonies, and activities dedicated to those issues of concern to Vietnam veterans.

I call upon officials of the Government to display the flag of the United States on all Government buildings and grounds on that day in testimony of our respect for the contributions of Vietnam veterans.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 23rd day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

I am today lifting the U.S. limitation on additional agricultural sales to the Soviet Union as I promised to do during last year's Presidential campaign. My administration has made a full and complete study of this sales limitation, and I reached my decision after weighing all options carefully and conferring fully with my advisers, including members of the Cabinet and the National Security Council. We have also been consulting with our allies on this matter.

As a Presidential candidate, I indicated my opposition to the curb on sales, because American farmers had been unfairly singled out to bear the burden of this ineffective national policy. I also pledged that when elected President I would ``fully assess our national security, foreign policy, and agricultural needs to determine how best to terminate'' the decision made by my predecessor.

This assessment began as soon as I entered office and has continued until now. In the first few weeks of my Presidency, I decided that an immediate lifting of the sales limitation could be misinterpreted by the Soviet Union. I therefore felt that my decision should be made only when it was clear that the Soviets and other nations would not mistakenly think it indicated a weakening of our position.

I have determined that our position now cannot be mistaken: The United States, along with the vast majority of nations has condemned and remains opposed to the Soviet occupation of Afghanistan and other aggressive acts around the world. We will react strongly to acts of aggression wherever they take place. There will never be a weakening of this resolve.

I hereby direct that you, in consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture and other appropriate officials, immediately terminate the current restrictions on the export of agricultural commodities and products to the Soviet Union imposed under authority of the Export Administration Act pursuant to the Presidential Memorandum to the Secretary of Commerce of January 7, 1980. I also direct that you terminate restrictions imposed on the export of phosphate rock and related commodities by virtue of the regulations of the Department of Commerce published on February 7, 1980.

I have today directed the Secretary of Commerce, in consultation with you and other appropriate officials, to immediately terminate the current restrictions on the export of agricultural commodities and products to the Soviet Union imposed under authority of the Export Administration Act pursuant to the Presidential Memorandum to the Secretary of Commerce of January 7, 1980. I have also directed that the restrictions be terminated which were imposed on the export of phosphate rock and related commodities by virtue of the regulations of the Department of Commerce published on February 7, 1980.

Over one hundred years ago, Memorial Day was established to commemorate those who died in the defense of our national ideals. Our ideals of freedom, justice, and equal rights for all have been challenged many times since then, and thousands of Americans have given their lives in many parts of the world to secure those same ideals and insure for their children a lasting peace. Their sacrifice demands that we, the living, continue to promote the cause of peace and the ideals for which they so valiantly gave of themselves.

Today, the United States stands as a beacon of liberty and democratic strength before the community of nations. We are resolved to stand firm against those who would destroy the freedoms we cherish. We are determined to achieve an enduring peace -- a peace with liberty and with honor. This determination, this resolve, is the highest tribute we can pay to the many who have fallen in the service of our Nation.

I also request the Governors of the United States and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico and the appropriate officials of all local units of Government to direct that the flag be flown at half-staff during this Memorial Day on all buildings, grounds, and naval vessels throughout the United States and in all areas under its jursdiction and control, and I request the people of the United States to display the flag at half-staff from their homes for the customary forenoon period.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-fourth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

But, Bob, I'm sure your fellow correspondents have already praised you or will soon do so for your year in office. Mark Twain is supposed to have said there's nothing harder to put up with than the annoyance of a good example, and you certainly have been that to the White House press corps.

Among these people are many of your Cabinet Secretaries. There's only really one that I think is very noticeable by his absence. I haven't seen Secretary Haig. I wondered if you've been watching television tonight. We are a little worried who's in the Situation Room and who's in control.

The President. Well, if I could be serious for just a moment, there's someone who isn't there tonight and yet, in a sense, I'm sure in all our hearts is. And I'd like to give the phone to Nancy for a moment to say something, and you'll understand when she does.

Mrs. Reagan. Sarah, you remember those days in the hospital when you and I had many conversations. And we both agreed that you and I, from now on, had a bond that was very special and that nobody could ever break. It was just something between you and me that was ours. And I want you to know that you've never left my thoughts and my prayers, and all my love and all my prayers are with you as they always have been. And I know that both our fellows are going to make it, and I send you and Jim all my love.

Mr. Evered is a petroleum engineer and geologist, currently geotechnical division manager for CER Corp., an energy resource consulting and project management company based in Las Vegas, Nev. He joined CER in 1978. His responsibilities included management of the firm's oil and gas consulting business, as well as management of a multimillion dollar research program in unconventional natural gas supply.

In accordance with the Impoundment Control Act of 1974, I herewith report six revisions to previously transmitted rescission proposals. Three of the revisions decrease the total amount proposed for rescission by $3.7 million. The other revisions to proposed rescissions make technical changes to appropriation language which do not affect the amounts proposed for rescission. In addition, I am reporting two new deferrals totaling $6.4 million and revisions to five previously reported deferrals.

The revisions to rescission proposals affect programs in the Departments of Agriculture and Energy, as well as ACTION and the National Science Foundation. The new deferrals and revisions to existing deferrals involve programs in the Departments of Agriculture, Commerce, Energy, Health and Human Services, and Transportation, as well as the Board for International Broadcasting and the International Communication Agency.

Mr. Sawyer began his business career as a cost accountant for Cone Brothers Contracting Co. in Tampa, Fla. He then became the advertising manager of Newsmonth magazine and joined the display advertising staff of the Sarasota Herald-Tribune & Journal. He later became the commercial manager of WSPB Radio in Sarasota.

I want to congratulate and express sincere appreciation to Chairman Domenici and his colleagues on the Senate Budget Committee upon completion of work on the first budget resolution for fiscal year 1982. Their vote is a welcome display of a strong bipartisan spirit and puts our economic recovery program firmly on track. Together with the reconciliation instructions passed by the Senate on April 2, this resolution will provide the basis for achieving the budget savings and the tax relief needed for the revitalization of the nation's economy.

I look forward to working with the Members of both the House and the Senate, of both political parties, as they proceed with additional actions necessary for recovery. Together we can accomplish the things the people elected us to do. And today we have no greater task, no more important job, than putting America's economic house in order. I thank Senator Domenici and the other members of the Senate Budget Committee for taking this important and constructive step.

April 29, 1981By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation Older Americans, a resource of talent, knowledge and judgment, are essential to our effort for national renewal. As a Nation, we should recognize our debt to older Americans and the leadership they can provide for the future.

As we move into this era of renewal, we must remember that all Americans are interdependent. We must maintain our commitment to the integrity of the Social Security system. We must work together for economic recovery, mindful that while our economic ills hurt us all, their burdens fall most heavily on those with fixed incomes. We must ensure the dignity of our Nation's older citizens through programs such as Medicare, aging services and the Older Americans Act.

In addition to recognizing the vital importance of older Americans to our society, we must acknowledge the voluntary efforts of millions of citizens, young and old alike, to enhance the lives of older Americans.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-ninth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

I feel a little unnecessary, because I don't know that anyone could say anything that would add to those words that we've just heard. It is a particular pleasure for me to be here with you today. This ceremony has meaning not only for people of the Jewish faith, those who have been persecuted, but for all who want to prevent another Holocaust.

Jeremiah wrote of the days when the Jews were carried off to Babylon and Jerusalem was destroyed. He said, ``Jerusalem weeps in the night and tears run down her cheeks.'' Today, yes, we remember the suffering and the death of Jews and of all those others who were persecuted in World War II. We try to recapture the horror of millions sent to gas chambers and crematoria. And we commemorate the days of April in 1945 when American and Allied troops liberated the Nazi death camps.

The tragedy that ended 36 years ago was still raw in our memories, because it took place, as we've been told, in our lifetime. We share the wounds of the survivors. We recall the pain only because we must never permit it to come again. And yet, today, in spite of that experience, as an entire generation has grown to adulthood, who never knew the days of World War II, and we remember ourselves, when we were younger, how distant history seemed, anything that came before our time -- and so the signs do exist: the ugly graffiti, the act of violence, the act of terrorism here and there, scattered throughout the world and not quite large enough in dimension for us to rally as we once did in that war.

I'm horrified today when I know and hear that there are actually people now trying to say that the Holocaust was invented, that it never happened, that there weren't 6 million people whose lives were taken cruelly and needlessly in that event, that all of this is propaganda. Well, the old cliche that a picture's worth a thousand words -- in World War II, not only do we have the survivors today to tell us at first hand, but in World War II, I was in the military and assigned to a post where every week, we obtained from every branch of the service all over the world the combat film that was taken by every branch. And we edited this into a secret report for the general staff. We, of course, had access to and saw that secret report.

And I remember April '45. I remember seeing the first film that came in when the war was still on, but our troops had come upon the first camps and had entered those camps. And you saw, unretouched -- no way that it could have ever been rehearsed -- what they saw, the horror they saw. I felt the pride when, in one of those camps, there was a nearby town, and the people were ordered to come and look at what had been going on, and to see them. And the reaction of horror on their faces was the greatest proof that they had not been conscious of what was happening so near to them.

And that film still, I know, must exist in the military, and there it is, living motion pictures, for anyone to see, and I won't go into the horrible scenes that we saw. But it remains with me as confirmation of our right to rekindle these memories, because we need always to guard against that kind of tyranny and inhumanity. Our spirit is strengthened by remembering, and our hope is in our strength.

There is an American poem that says humanity, with all its fears and all its hopes, depends on us. As a matter of fact, it was the Pope, at the end of World War II, when the world was so devastated, and yet, we alone remained so strong, who said: America has a genius for great and unselfish deeds, and into the hands of America, God has placed an afflicted mankind.

The hope of a ceremony such as this is that even a tortured past holds promise if we learn its lessons. According to Isaiah, there will be a new heaven and a new earth and the voice of weeping will be heard no more. Together, with the help of God, we can bear the burden of our nightmare. It is up to us to ensure that we never live it again.

Theodore Roosevelt said that the Presidency was a bully pulpit. Well, I, for one, intend that this bully pulpit shall be used on every occasion, where it is appropriate, to point a finger of shame at even the ugliness of graffiti, and certainly wherever it takes place in the world, the act of violence or terrorism, and that even at the negotiating table, never shall it be forgotten for a moment that wherever it is taking place in the world, the persecution of people, for whatever reason -- persecution of people for their religious belief -- that is a matter to be on that negotiating table, or the United States does not belong at that table.

Mr. Stearns was appointed secretary of the Agriculture and Services Agency and a member of the Governor's cabinet in 1972 by Governor Ronald Reagan. Prior to his appointment as a cabinet officer, Mr. Stearns served as director of the State Department of Conservation. Mr. Stearns served as county supervisor for Modoc County in 1951 - 67. In 1965 he served as president of the Supervisors Association of California, following terms as president of the Northern California County Supervisors Association and the western regional district of the National Association of Counties. Mr. Stearns was member and vice chairman of the California Klamath River Compact Commission.

Mr. Stearns attended Oregon State University, leaving to enter World War II service as a flight instructor. He holds a commercial pilot's license. In connection with his farming operations near Tule Lake, Calif., he flew for a crop-dusting firm.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Edward L. Rowny to be Special Representative for Arms Control and Disarmament Negotiations. General Rowny will serve as the Chief Negotiator and head of the U.S. Delegation for Arms Control Negotiations. The President also announced his intention to nominate General Rowny to have the rank of Ambassador while serving in this capacity.

In the early stages of the Korean conflict, he helped plan the Inchon invasion and acted as official spokesman for Geneal MacArthur. During the final stages he commanded the 38th Infantry. Altogether, he fought in seven Korean campaigns.

In recognition of the importance of the American merchant marine, the Congress, by joint resolution of May 20, 1933, designated May 22 as National Maritime Day and requested the President to issue annually a proclamation calling for its appropriate observance. The date was chosen to commemorate the same date in 1819 when the SS Savannah departed Savannah, Georgia, on the first transatlantic steamship voyage.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 1st day of April in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Americans have always enjoyed the outdoors and are fortunate to have a multitude of sports and recreational activities that serve to refresh the body and spirit. For many of our citizens, the most popular form of recreation is boating.

It is essential for those involved in recreational boating to recognize the paramount importance of safety in the operation of small craft. Boating offers a myriad of wonderful opportunities for the whole family, and these experiences can be enhanced by careful attention to rules of safety. In fact, it is the responsibility of boating participants to make sure they are fully conversant in all matters involving safety.

All Americans who utilize our waterways for recreational purposes should be well versed in water safety rules and techniques for their own protection and that of their friends and loved ones. I urge those who engage in recreational boating to take advantage of the many safe boating courses which are sponsored by governmental and private organizations. I particularly urge those who are inexperienced operators of small boats to enroll in these educational programs. Learning the fundamentals of safe boating will add to the potential pleasure and excitement of recreational boating.

The President. Oh, well, no. It was just -- I recall that back in 1967, at that time he had told me that periodically it might be well to check, and we do have regular physicals, as you know. And so we were -- and we'd been intending to move the physicals up, and so with this opportunity and -- it was just a slight discomfort, and it followed one of those fly-around-the-country trips that I was doing a few weeks ago. And there were just a few days of discomfort. So, I took advantage of it, had the examination, and everything is just perfectly normal and fine.

The President. Well, we had our routine physical before with the doctors at Bethesda. This, however, was an opportunity for the doctor who had been on hand in 1967 and who is a good friend who was going to be in the area, and he joined us.

In a statement issued by Deputy Press Secretary Larry M. Speakes earlier the same day, it was announced that the President would visit the medical center for a routine medical examination after he had experienced slight discomfort in the urinary tract several weeks ago. The President had decided to visit Bethesda when his personal physician, Dr. Burton Smith of Los Angeles, Calif., could be in the Washington area. Dr. Smith, Dr. Daniel Ruge, Physician to the President, and medical center physicians conducted the examination.

May as Older Americans Month. The proclamation concerning Older Americans Month has been issued every year since 1963, and each time it becomes more meaningful, because the number of older Americans is increasing every year.

Since 1970, for example, the national mortality rate has dropped 2 percent each year. Scientific advances in the medical profession have increased both the length and quality of life for our older citizens. Today, a typical 65-year-old will live another 16 years. And in the next decade, the median age of our country is expected to increase by another 3 years.

As our older population increases, we must remain alert to the needs and vulnerabilities of this very special segment of our population. The double-digit inflation of the last decade took a particularly heavy toll on older Americans. People who had worked so hard all their lives helplessly watched as the value of their savings shrank beyond all expectation. The progress that we've made in the battle against inflation during our 14 months here in office has already had considerable impact on these people.

I might add that older Americans currently dependent on social security did not see this program touched by our efforts to cut spending increases in our battle against inflation. In fact, while they make up only 11 percent of our population, elderly Americans will receive 28 percent of the Federal budget in this present fiscal year.

This year's proclamation reminds us that older Americans possess a reservoir of experience and a depth of knowledge that is a great national resource. Today, I'm taking this opportunity to announce my support for legislation that will make better use of this resource. I will back legislation which eliminates mandatory retirement requirements in government and private industry based solely on age.

When it comes to retirement, the criterion should be fitness for work, not year of birth. Our studies suggest that ending forced retirement based solely on age will have minimal consequences on the employment of other groups and will help to erase the unjust perception that persons over 70 are less productive than their fellow citizens. We know that many individuals have valuable contributions to make well beyond 70 years of age, and they should have the opportunity to do so if they desire.

Seventy-five percent of current employees and more than two-thirds of business executives oppose mandatory retirement on the basis of age. And of all U.S. adults, 90 percent oppose a mandatory retirement age.

Our proclamation suggests that we owe a special debt of gratitude to our older citizens. I have said before of my generation that that generation of Americans has fought harder, paid a higher price for freedom, and done more to advance the dignity of man than any people who have ever lived on this Earth. And now as they're reaching those older years, the contributions they make to today's America should not be cast aside. With that said, I shall now sign the proclamation.

Q. Before you answer, sir, would you consider saying it in front of the microphone? We weren't able to pick up anything that you said. [Laughter] And in fact, it was said so well, if you would consider repeating some of it -- [laughter] -- we might get it on the news.

The President. I never usually walk by a microphone. [Laughter] But I was so anxious to get at that proclamation and, as Bill Plante asked, why did I speak so feelingly? -- oh, I just have a certain prejudice about that particular subject.

I will back legislation which eliminates mandatory retirement requirements in government and private industry based solely on age. When it comes to retirement, the criterion should be fitness for work, not year of birth. And I would add that many individuals have valuable contributions to make well beyond 70 years of age. They should do so if they so desire. And some of us have already reached a certain chronological age which others thought should keep them from their jobs. I've been told that. And so our proclamation suggests that we owe a special debt of gratitude to these older Americans.

A nation derives its soul, strength, and character from the sum of the creative efforts of all its citizens. While we are a nation of more than 230 million individuals, we are one people -- interdependent on each other for our accomplishments and our future.

We owe a special debt of gratitude to our older citizens, who have enriched, and continue to enrich, our great nation. Older Americans from all walks of life have played a major role in creating the bounties of life that bless us all.

As we have come to appreciate the reservoir of experience and depth of knowledge possessed by our older citizens, we must recognize the importance of continuing to draw on them. Older Americans have much to give, both through employment and volunteer work. In paying homage to the contributions and continued potential of older Americans, we also recognize there are those among them who require assistance from others to enhance the quality of their golden years.

As a nation, we are aging together. Opportunities and support we can provide to older Americans today will benefit all of us tomorrow. I urge all Americans to join in this call for intergenerational action that will make more meaningful the lives and potential of older Americans and our society as a whole.

We have made clear to the Government of Argentina that we deplore use of force to resolve this dispute. We have called on Argentina to cease, immediately, hostilities, and to withdraw its military forces from the Falkland Islands.

Security Council, made yesterday on behalf of the Council. We fully endorse the Council's call for the exercise of utmost restraint at this time, the avoidance of the use or threat of force in the region, and for the continuation of the search for a diplomatic solution.

Mr. Speakes informed reporters that the President telephoned the President of Argentina last night and spoke with him, through interpreters, for approximately 50 minutes. The President learned of the invasion this morning, shortly after 7 a.m., and received continuous updates throughout the morning.

This Order prescribes a uniform system for classifying, declassifying, and safeguarding national security information. It recognizes that it is essential that the public be informed concerning the activities of its Government, but that the interests of the United States and its citizens require that certain information concerning the national defense and foreign relations be protected against unauthorized disclosure. Information may not be classified under this Order unless its disclosure reasonably could be expected to cause damage to the national security.

Persons who only reproduce, extract, or summarize classified information, or who only apply classification markings derived from source material or as directed by a classification guide, need not possess original classification authority.

The Archivist of the United States shall have the authority to review, downgrade and declassify information under the control of the Administrator of General Services or the Archivist pursuant to sections 2107, 2107 note, or 2203 of title 44, United States Code. Review procedures developed by the Archivist shall provide for consultation with agencies having primary subject matter interest and shall be consistent with the provisions of applicable laws or lawful agreements that pertain to the respective presidential papers or records. Any decision by the Archivist may be appealed to the Director of the Information Security Oversight Office. Agencies with primary subject matter interest shall be notified promptly of the Director's decision on such appeals and may further appeal to the National Security Council. The information shall remain classified pending a prompt decision on the appeal.

I have today signed an Executive order that improves our government's system for classifying information vital to our nation's security. The order enhances protection for national security information without permitting excessive classification of documents by the Government.

It is essential for our citizens to be informed about their government's activities, but it is also essential to protect certain sensitive information when disclosure could harm the security of all our citizens. This order establishes improved standards and procedures to achieve the proper balance between these two important objectives and permits the Government to classify only that information whose unauthorized disclosure could reasonably be expected to damage America's security. Limiting classification to the minimum necessary to protect the national security will enhance our ability to protect information that is properly classified.

The order expressly -- and properly -- prohibits use of classification to hide violations of law, inefficiency, or administrative error; to prevent embarrassment to a person, organization, or agency; to restrain competition; or to prevent or delay the public release of information that does not require national security protection. Basic scientific research information not clearly related to the national security may not be classified, nor may information the Government does not own or control. Wherever possible, documents will be prepared in a manner that does not require classification.

The order also simplifies declassification. It maintains a modified system for the regular review of classified information, requiring our archivists to examine historically valuable classified records to make them available to historians and other researchers when no longer sensitive. In addition, the order retains a mandatory review system that permits citizens to request review of classified documents to determine if the documents may safely be disclosed.

Oversight is critical to an effective information security program, and the order I have signed today requires heads of relevant agencies to monitor this program closely and to train their employees in its requirements. The Information Security Oversight Office will continue its governmentwide monitoring and will report to me through the National Security Council to keep me apprised of the effectiveness of our oversight program.

Members of Congress, and representatives of concerned private organizations. The recommendations of all these persons and groups were extremely helpful. Protection of the security of the United States and all its citizens is the first and most solemn duty of every President. This order will improve my ability to meet this constitutional obligation, and I am grateful to all who assisted in its preparation.

This year marks the tenth anniversary of our country's commitment of major resources to the control of cancer through the National Cancer Program. While progress against this dread disease has been slow, each step forward can save thousands of lives since statistics show that one out of four Americans now living will become a victim of cancer.

Research has demonstrated that lifestyle and environment play a crucial role in the development of cancer. Reports issued by the Surgeon General increasingly link cigarette smoking with cancer of the lung and other parts of the body. We have developed greater understanding of the effects of exposure to carcinogens and radiation in the workplace and have also learned the importance of diet and nutrition as factors in the development and prevention of cancer. Advances in biochemistry, microbiology, and other basic research have improved our comprehension of the cellular events that lead to cancer formation, but researchers still seek a clearer understanding of the cause of cancer as they strive to halt the progress of this disease more effectively.

Improved surgical procedures, new discoveries in recombinant DNA and hybridoma technology, and developments on the frontiers of immunotherapy hold out the possibility not only of better treatment, but also of the significant breakthrough long prayed for. With continued advances, this ancient scourge may yet pass from mankind.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 2nd day of April in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

I'd like to take a few minutes of your time to talk about some of the problems we face in this blessed land of ours and what I feel we should do about them. I can't cover all that territory in 5 minutes, so I'll be back every Saturday at this same time, same station, live. I hope you'll tune in.

These aren't easy times for a great many of you. Yesterday we were told that unemployment has gone up another two-tenths of 1 percent -- equal to the unemployment rate we had in 1975 as we began to come out of that recession.

We can, however, take some comfort from the fact that 99\1/2\ million of our people are employed. Now, I know that's no comfort to those who want to work and can't find a job. And it's no comfort to farmers, independent business people, auto dealers, realtors, and building contractors who see themselves going out of business. These people want answers -- and so do you -- about what we can do to get our economy back on track.

The last recession before this one came in 1980. And by the time our administration took office, unemployment had almost reached 8 million, the prime rate had reached 21\1/2\ percent -- the highest in more than a century -- and inflation was at 12.4 percent. According to the polls, inflation was the number one problem in everyone's mind. All of us associated it with the high interest rates and rightly so. A lender must charge an interest rate high enough to cover inflation as well as give a return on his or her money.

We proposed a program of economic recovery based on the belief that high taxes had deprived people and business of incentive to the point that we'd lost much of our ability to produce. Those high taxes had fueled a rate of increase in government spending that reached 17 percent in 1980 alone. Even high taxes couldn't keep up with that. In the few years between 1976 and 1981, Federal tax revenues increased by $300 billion -- but we had $318 billion in deficits.

Unfortunately, the interest rate stayed up even though we began to reduce inflation. People couldn't afford to buy automobiles on time. Few could or would take a mortgage to buy or build a home at those rates. Lay-offs in the automobile and construction industries increased, and farmers who borrowed to plant and repay at harvest lost money even on bumper crops. By mid-July, we were back in, if we were ever out of, a recession. But for the first time in the many recessions that have taken place over the recent years, we had a plan ready to go.

The Congress had agreed to a budget that cut the rate of increase in spending nearly in half. And it passed a tax cut program which increased depreciation allowances for business and began a 25-percent cut in income tax rates for individuals, to be phased in over 3 years.

All of this only began last October 1st. Even so, interest rates have been reduced by 20 percent, but that's not nearly enough. They have to come down more, and they should, because our greatest success has been in conquering inflation. It's no longer double digit. For the last 5 months, it's been running at 4\1/2\ percent.

By all the rules of the game, interest rates should be down around 9 or 10 percent. Unfortunately, the increase in unemployment increased government costs and reduced revenues. More money had to be spent on unemployment insurance and other benefits. Fewer people working meant fewer people paying taxes. Up went the projected deficit for 1983, and up went the concern in the money market that this would lead to an increase in inflation, as it has in all those past recessions.

The answer to the recession lies in bringing interest rates down. To do that, a signal must be sent that, while the political process always requires some compromise, government this time intends to stay the course; that we're going to make further reductions in spending and hold to a steady consistent growth in the money supply -- in short, that we're going to come out of this recession not with a temporary, quick fix that leads to another recession down the road, but with a solid economic recovery based on increased productivity and jobs for our people.

You've also been told our program hasn't worked. Well, of course it hasn't; it hasn't really started yet. Our 5-percent cut in October was almost wiped out by the January increase in the social security tax called for in the 1977 tax bill. The reduced budget spending and the 10-percent tax cut in July will be the real beginning of our program.

The President. I couldn't answer that until we have to, by law, go up shortly in the next couple of weeks -- I can't remember the exact date -- and present an updated project. As I've said so many times, we do this; we comply with the law. I don't have the greatest faith in those projects, because I think there are too many imponderables both ways that -- to make them really something that we should -- be -- depend on.

The President. Well, the increase -- as the recession goes on and unemployment increases, of course, the deficit increases, because it's -- that's more people who stop paying taxes, and it's more people who then have to receive benefits and unemployment insurance and so forth.

Q. But, Mr. President, in your speech you seem to be saying that unemployment is going up because unemployment is pushing up the deficit and thus keeping interest rates high. That sounds like a cycle that we just can't get out of.

The President. Yes, we can get out of it. And the way out of it is not the way that's been tried on most of the recessions that have taken place in these last few decades: hyping the money supply, artificially stimulating the money supply, stimulating government spending, as if that somehow will be an aid to the economy -- and up, of course, goes inflation when you do that.

What we're trying -- and the difference between our plan and what's always been tried before is the long-range plan to get the economy back on track, to get America back to where we're the industrial powerhouse that we always were. And to do that, that requires the tax cuts both for business and for individuals to stimulate the economy, reduce the percentage of the gross national product that the government is taking in taxes and that the government is spending. And all of these things I think our plan will do. And it is the only way.

It isn't an instant fix, but it also is a way out that simply solves the problem by broadening the base of our economy, providing the jobs that our people must have, being able to compete once again with the other industrial nations, which we haven't been able to do very well for quite some time now.

Note: The exchange began at approximately 12:15 p.m. in the Oval Office at the White House. It followed the President's reading of several portions of his radio address for the benefit of reporters, photographers, and television cameramen, who were not present during the actual broadcast.

Emergency medical care is as effective as the support it receives from our citizens. When we contribute to the lifesaving capabilities of rescue workers and other health professionals, we help to assure our own prospects for continued good health.

About forty million Americans are afflicted with medical problems which are difficult to identify in an emergency situation. One simple but important step that people with special medical problems can take to protect themselves and to enhance the effectiveness of emergency medical care is to register with a medic alert service.

For nearly 25 years, these special identification and information services have been helping health and rescue personnel meet the unique emergency needs of people with diabetes, heart conditions, epilepsy, allergies and other hidden medical problems. The medic alert tag that the victim of a medical emergency wears and the information service with which that person is registered can spell the difference between survival and death. Each year, medical alert identification and emergency information systems save the lives of more than two thousand people who have hidden medical conditions.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 3rd day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Q. Mr. President, would you support -- would this government support Britain's efforts to free its hostages in the Falklands in exchange for Mrs. Thatcher's support for freeing American hostages in Iran?

It's a very difficult situation for the United States, because we're friends with both of the countries engaged in this dispute, and we stand ready to do anything we can to help them. And what we hope for and would like to help in doing is have a peaceful resolution of this with no forceful action or no bloodshed. And to that extent, we support the resolution that's already in the United Nations, that there be a withdrawal of forces and we resolve this at the U.N.

Q. Mr. President, Britain -- the British Government has threatened to use force if diplomacy fails, and it's regarded as a serious threat in Britain. What would your position be, sir, if diplomacy did fail?

I think there's been quite a drumbeat of criticism that has gone largely unanswered by us with regard to some of the programs that I've advocated, and of course, there is the unhappiness that exists for all of us in the present recession. But as I've said, I think the polls are only as good as -- at the time they're taken.

The President. As I've said, finally there are meetings that have been going on, and I've had people from my staff up there in the place of observers or witnessing or hearing what is being proposed between the legislators, both Democrat and Republican. It so far has not reached a point in which it comes to me with any concrete proposals of one kind or another.

However, the basic program of upgrading and building weapons systems that we need in order to close the window of vulnerability, I will -- I would have to oppose that. We can't send that kind of a message.

But let me make one point about this. The idea is that we must have a deterrent. Our goal is peace. And to have peace, we must have a deterrent that would prevent someone from adventuring agressively in the world using nuclear weapons. And for one point, with regard to our inferiority, we are presently negotiating that in Geneva, the fact that the Soviet Union has 300 intermediate missiles with 900 warheads aimed at Europe and can hit the Middle East and North Africa, and there is nothing to counter them. And our allies have asked us for cruise missiles and Pershings as a deterrent to be stationed in those countries in Western Europe, to be deployed there. And we have agreed to do that.

The President. I think that at the moment, on the strategic intercontinental ballistic program and our Triad, I think that we do. Those people who say that, well, we have something of a deterrent now, yes, I think so, too.

Their missiles are aimed at our silos, our ballistic missiles, land-based missiles. But would our retaliation result in further devastation to the United States? So, I think I made it clear -- look, I'll tell you something; let me give you the answer.

Q. Mr. President, on the economy, your own Labor Department said last Friday, in analyzing the new unemployment statistics, the unemployment rate going up, that this was evidence of further deterioration in the economy. You have said that we are -- that recovery is just around the corner.

The President. Well, not that. I've said we're in the trough, the bottoming out of a recession. And one of the characteristics of being in the trough is -- if you'll look back at all the other recessions we've had since World War II, you will find that one of the characteristics is that employment lags behind, and very often in that trough there is a continued increase in unemployment for a while.

The President. Not have a budget until -- we haven't had a budget for 2 years really. No -- and we're not that far behind schedule. As a matter of fact, we've presented this budget earlier than we did last year. And I look forward to progress being made as soon as they come back from the Easter recess. That's why we're negotiating so fast.

Let me just say in closing, though -- since we can't take any more questions here, and we were on that very big subject of nuclear weapons and all -- I, as you know, in June, early June, will be going to Europe for a meeting with the European Economic Council, the leaders, the heads of state of European countries. I will be meeting with the Pope in Rome, and then I will be returning.

And at the same time, you know, in June and early July, the United Nations is having its meeting on arms control. And I will be returning and addressing that conference at the United Nations myself. And I hope very much that President Brezhnev will be on hand to do the same thing and address the same group. I think that this whole idea that I've been talking about since back in the campaign, of arms reduction, arms control, is one of the most important things that is facing us.

The President. Well, the imagery that you bring up with that, whether that means a full-blown summit conference -- no, I think that if he is here and we both address that subject, I think it would be well if he and I had a talk.

The President. You know, these are going to do one thing, if you'll all remember it. I leave every press conference, as I told you before, with a great feeling of guilt about the unrecognized hands that have been up and haven't been called on. So, maybe with doing this weekly we can rotate a little.

There was someone else outside this hotel last year who did something I'll always remember. He personally helped bring down the man who was accused of doing the shooting. He's almost as old as I am -- all 5 feet 2 inches of him -- almost, but not quite, and his heroics landed him in the hospital. But I understand that he's here today, stronger than ever. And, Al Antenucci, where are you? Would you mind standing up? Where is he? [Applause] Well, everyone else is standing up.

Antenucci, when you think of the warmth and support that always pour forth in our times of trouble, it brings home something awfully important. There are many blessings in this good world, but surely the greatest is the one that we all share: We're Americans.

It's been said that courage is the one quality that guarantees all others. America faces a challenge of courage in the months ahead that will be decisive. We're in a tough period. No one has felt its pain any worse than the members of the building trades. And I want you to know that our highest domestic priority is to revive this economy, to spur employment in hard-hit industries like housing and construction, your stock in trade.

We are in a worldwide recession. The great thing is that -- tragedy is that it might have been avoided, or at least curtailed, if the first phase of the tax cut was not so little and so late. Personal taxes actually went up by about $41 billion in 1981, which I think helped drag down the economy.

There's good reason to believe the recession is bottoming out. We're on the verge of a major victory over inflation -- a disease which has sapped our economic strength, driven up interest rates, and ruined the dreams of homeownership for millions of families. If we stick together and finish the job the bipartisan coalition in Congress began last year, we will soon have that victory.

John F. Kennedy wrote: ``The courage of life is often a less dramatic spectacle than the courage of a final moment, but it is no less a magnificent mixture of triumph and tragedy. A man does what he must in spite of personal consequences -- obstacles, dangers and pressures -- and that is the basis of all human morality.'' Well, last year, with the support from the people, we began to do what must be done: attack the monumental problems blocking our progress that had built up for years.

And here's what we were up against: double-digit inflation; 21\1/2\-percent interest rates -- the highest in more than a century -- personal savings and investment rates that had plunged lower here than in any major industrial nation; a trillion-dollar debt, despite the highest tax burden in our peacetime history; a military machine so neglected that many ships couldn't sail and fighter planes couldn't fly for want of spare parts; and a foreign policy wavering in weakness, apologetic for our past, incapable of responding to terrorist attacks on our people, property, and the desecration of our flag.

We knew that climbing out of that swamp wouldn't be easy. We knew there would be strong pressures from many interest groups -- yes, and including some within organized labor -- to resist the steps we felt had to be taken. And that's why it has meant so much to me that some labor leaders have had the courage to set aside partisan differences, roll up their sleeves, look for the areas where we could agree, and then work together for the good of the country.

This is a special brand of courage, the quiet kind that flows from confidence and inner peace and strength. Bob Georgine, Bill Konyha, Harold Buoy -- I thank you for your leadership. Bob is working with our survey on cost control group, and Bill and Harold are working on the productivity advisory committee. They're all giving us important support to cut back redtape impeding growth and new jobs.

Let me just say something here about the initiative of Bob Georgine. You know, one of the values we're trying hardest to save in this country is self-reliance, taking care of our own. And what better example could there be than 15 building and construction trades unions taking one-half billion dollars of their hard-earned pension funds and investing that money to create more jobs for your workers? This country will owe you all a debt of gratitude, and with initiatives like yours, we can and we will rebuild America.

We're trying to help. Last week we announced a series of actions that include moving within the limits of fiduciary responsibility to free up critically needed funds for housing from pension funds such as your own. We're going to modify the Mortgage Revenue Bond program to loosen arbitrage restriction and broaden our definition of distressed areas. And we'll ease existing guidelines to expand the number of potential homebuyers qualifying for FHA mortgages. I spent enough years in my own union to know that when workers have the opportunity to work, and when they're properly and fairly paid for their work, they can provide for themselves without having to hold out their hands to anybody.

Unions represent some of the freest institutions in this land. Too often, discussions about the labor movement dwell only on disputes or corruption or strikes. Well, I know that makes for good headlines. The point is, thousands of good agreements are reached and put into practice every year that benefit unions, management, and the country. So, wouldn't it be nice if sometimes we could hear about that, too. It also might be nice for once if we could hear about the thousands of hard-working, honest, union officials who have done so much to improve your movement and raise the standard of living for all Americans.

Presidents have observed that of all the meetings in the Oval Office, the most frank and memorable have been with the leaders of organized labor. And I think I know what they mean. I pledge to you today that there will always be an open door to my office for your leadership. We want your counsel and your participation as we tackle these tough problems that face the Nation.

I believe with all my heart that providing people incentives to pull themselves up is the best path to human progress. I believe that faith in God, love of freedom, family, work, and neighborhood are what made America strong and will keep her free. I think you and I have a lot in common, even though, as Bob said, we can't always agree on all issues. But what we can do, I hope, is seek out areas of possible compromise that don't violate fundamental principles.

We're working hard with a bipartisan group in Congress to obtain revisions of that act that will help create jobs while maintaining our commitment to clean air. We appreciate your support on this and hope that House Resolution 5252 will move as rapidly as possible.

May I reassure you today on legislation of importance to your own organization: I believe there have been abuses of the Davis-Bacon Act, but as your President, I have not and will not seek repeal of that act.

Now, there are three areas where we cannot retreat on fundamentals: a need to restore the strength and credibility of America's foreign policy, genuine relief for overburdened taxpayers, and a reduction in the bankrupt growth of Federal spending of the past decade.

Now, some in this country say, ``Freedom is fine for us, but we can't worry about it for everyone else. Let's not stick our necks out anywhere.'' Have they forgotten that freedom was not won here without the help of others? Have they forgotten that people who turn their backs on friends often lose what they cherish most for themselves? Have they forgotten that freedom is never more than one generation away from extinction? Your presence at this conference proves that democracy and freedom are alive and well. So, we'll just keep it that way.

I don't think you've forgotten. You've had to live too often the meaning of struggle, perseverance, and unity. An American, a compatriot of yours once said, ``The role of American labor in the struggle for the preservation of human freedom and decency is decisive.'' No one ever put it better than George Meany did 30 years ago. And he lived up to the responsibility that he gave you.

Today you are needed more than ever to support and sustain the struggle of others whose sacrifice is greater than our own. In Poland, where citizens must meet in secret to resist military tyranny, courageous workers still struggle underground. Recently they published a plea for continued resistance. ``So that our children do not have to be ashamed of us.'' they said. So that their children will have a chance to grow up as free and courageous people.

The Polish authorities want the West to close its eyes, accept martial law. The American people will not accept martial law. They demand that Lech Walesa and the political -- and the prisoners of Solidarity be set free.

Francis Bacon wrote that ``In this theater of man's life, it is reserved only for gods and angels to be lookers on.'' America will not drift through the 1980's as a spectator. Liberty belongs to the brave. We will stand up for our ideals, and we will work for peace.

Never again will we shrink from denouncing the terrible nightmare totalitarianism has wrought: occupation of an entire section of Europe, genocide in Cambodia, boat people in Vietnam, a bloody invasion of Afghanistan, and everywhere the suppression of human rights and growing want from economic failure. We will not remain silent when, in Afghanistan, yellow rain is dropped on innocent people, solemn agreements are flagrantly broken, and Soviet helicopters drop thousands of ``butterfly'' mines, which maim and blind Afghan children who pick them up thinking they're toys. We will condemn these crimes and work for international repudiation.

And we will speak and work for democracy. Winston Churchill said that it was ``the worst form of government in the world, except for all the others that have been tried.'' Yes, we have our warts and our imperfections. But we can be proud that there's so much to love in this land. No nation has worked harder for peace or done more to lift up the downtrodden than the United States of America.

Treasury Secretary Don Regan recently told the students at Bucknell University, ``We have brought light where before there was darkness, heat where once there was cold, medicines where there was sickness and disease, food where there was scarcity, and wealth where humanity was living in squalor.'' We provide more food assistance each year to developing nations than all the other nations of the world combined.

America has a secret weapon; it's called ``trust the people.'' We're not afraid of free enterprise or free trade unions or freedom of thought. We depend on them, because only when individuals are free to worship, create, and build, only when they're given a personal stake in deciding their destiny and benefiting from their own risks -- only then do societies become dynamic, prosperous, progressive, and free.

Our democratic dream of human fulfillment through individual equality and opportunity is still the most exciting, successful, and revolutionary idea in the world today. But don't take my word for it. Look at Poland, where Solidarity captured the hearts and minds of the people. Look at Afghanistan, where courageous freedom-fighters are battling a 100,000-man army, a Soviet war machine to a standstill. Look at Vietnam, where 500,000 boat people have escaped since we left.

And look at brave El Salvador, where, in one of the most inspiring demonstrations of personal courage in modern history, 1 million citizens -- a greater percentage of their electorate than turn out for our own elections -- risked their lives to go to the ballot box, so they could vote to give freedom a chance.

They've built up and deployed a military arsenal unequaled in all history, capable of confronting our allies in Europe and Asia and threatening the free world's source of oil. We cannot allow this dangerous momentum to continue. But even after our buildup, spending on defense will take a smaller share of our budget than it did 20 years ago, when the world was a far safer place. The bulk of the buildup will be for basic manpower, maintenance, and readiness.

Now, some would have us get at the deficit by reducing defense spending. I'm sure that savings can be made in any government program just by improved efficiency, and we have a plan to do that, but not by eliminating needed weapons systems -- planes, tanks, and missiles. If we canceled outright all the major weapons systems we plan to order in fiscal year 1983, we'd only reduce next year's budget by $6\1/2\ billion. But we would also send a dangerous signal to the world that we were unilaterally disarming. And I don't believe that American labor wants us to do that.

Now, this doesn't mean that we shouldn't work for eventual reductions in the weapons of mass destruction. A freeze in the arsenals of these weapons is not good enough. We want to go one better -- mutual and verifiable reduction.

Courage to stand up for American ideals, to work for peace, to defend our freedom, and courage to follow through on the bipartisan economic recovery program begun last year -- courage to seize the opportunities in this time of challenges. There was a famous French diplomat, Talleyrand, who once said, ``Women sometimes forgive a man who forces the opportunity, but never a man who misses one.'' [Laughter] Well, let me take this opportunity to say again, I want nothing more than to work with Members of the Congress to reach an agreement on the budget that is fair, compassionate, and bipartisan.

Let us have the courage to recognize what needs to be done, and let us do it. We won't get this economy moving again by adding to the highest tax burden on American workers in our peacetime history. Taxes went up by more than 300 percent in the last 10 years, but all we got out of that were higher deficits and higher interest rates. Why? Because the cost of programs we all agree are important were zooming out of control.

The cost of food stamps went up by 16,000 percent in the last 15 years. Medicaid and Medicare -- again, essential programs -- have increased by more than 500 percent in the last 10 years. We don't have a trillion-dollar debt because you aren't taxed enough. We have a trillion-dollar debt because government spends too much.

As government took more and more of our income, savings on the part of individuals and investment by industry dropped lower and lower. So, we haven't had the capital pool we need to make funds available for the mortgages and investment that will sustain and create new jobs for your members.

We pretended we could hang on to prosperity by going deeper and deeper into debt. Now common sense dictates that we must slow the dangerous increase in spending and taxes so more resources are available for people to produce and save. This is all we're trying to do. And, far from being radical, our program will lead us back to safety without sacrificing compassion.

Medicare, the Federal Government will pay for the medical care of 99 percent of those Americans over the age 65. Twenty-eight percent of all Federal spending will go to the elderly -- an average of $7,850 per senior citizen in payments and services. The Federal Government will still subsidize approximately 95 million meals per day -- 14 percent of all the meals served. And about $2.8 billion will be spent on job training and employment.

I think that fairness also means going to the mat for a 25-percent tax rate reduction, indexing of tax rates, and strong new incentives for retirement savings -- the first decent program for working, middle-income taxpayers since John Kennedy's tax cut nearly 20 years ago. Fairness is saying you don't raise taxes on American workers who had to take cuts in their paychecks just to keep their jobs. And fairness is insisting that when business gets its tax cut, you have no right to turn around and take the people's tax cut away.

Let me tell you why tampering with the third year of the tax cut and indexing should set off alarm bells in your heads and send shivers up your spines. It would increase the tax bill of your members by hundreds of dollars a year. It would prevent us from realizing the increase of $260 billion in private savings which we expect by 1984, which is essential for job creation. And it would further weaken the competitive position of U.S. labor in the world economy.

One of the least reported stories in this country is the way government-imposed higher tax rates have pitted labor against management and undermined the competitive position of both. Many median-income workers now face tax rates of up to 44 percent on added income, up from just 30 percent in the late 1960's. They're being pushed into tax brackets formerly reserved for the wealthy.

High tax rates make it harder for workers to increase their take-home pay, and they make it more expensive for management to compensate them for an increase in the cost of living. It now costs firms $1.70 to compensate a worker for every dollar increase in the cost of living. No wonder we're not competitive with other industrial nations.

Instead of workers and management trying to solve the dilemma of high tax rates by opposing each other, it's time you joined forces and told government to get off your backs so you can get on with the task of rebuilding our economy. Saving American jobs and raising the standard of living for all our people -- that's part of the job.

In 1963 President Kennedy said, ``The most urgent task facing our Nation at home today is to end the tragic waste of unemployment and unused resources. It has become increasingly clear,'' he said, ``that the largest single barrier to full employment and to a higher rate of economic growth is the unrealistically heavy drag of Federal income taxes on private purchasing power, initiative, and incentive.'' What was becoming increasingly clear then should be crystal clear by now. We cannot compromise on fundamental principles without compromising ourselves.

Now, I'm not going to stand here today and promise you that all your concerns will be swept away in the near future. But I can tell you that we're on the verge of a major breakthrough against problems considered impossible only a year ago.

I don't believe for a minute that America's best days are behind her. I don't believe anyone here doubts that. With the tools and incentives to do the job, America's working men and women are every bit as dedicated, skilled, and productive as their German and Japanese counterparts.

America's greatest moments have come when America dared to be great -- when we believed in ourselves, in our values and our courage, and when we reached out to each other to do the impossible. I believe we still can. And because I believe in you, I know we will.

In recent years, the shape of family life has been changing. Increasing numbers of mothers have added outside paid employment to their traditional roles, and, similarly, fathers in increasing numbers are sharing home responsibilities with them.

Mothers nourish and support bodies, minds and souls; encourage good health; nurse illness; overcome discouragement and cheer success. They create and sustain an atmosphere that helps children and families thrive.

Mother's Day gives all of us an opportunity to thank our own mothers for their devotion and to acknowledge that every mother is essential to her family -- the social unit on which our society is built.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 5th day of April in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Small business is the cornerstone of our free enterprise system and since the birth of this country has represented opportunity, independence, and the fulfillment of dreams for generations of Americans.

Combining the dynamic forces of individual initiative with an alertness to consumer needs, small business increases the flexibility of our economic system and is a leading source of innovation and technological advancement for much of our industry.

We are indebted to small business for its contributions to our success as a nation and dependent on its progress and vitality for our economic well-being. Small firms employ over half of the labor force and are leaders in employment creation and innovation; they also play an important role in expanding economic opportunities for women and minorities.

While small business is at the heart of our competitive system, it has been increasingly hobbled in recent years by excessive government regulation and taxation. We are currently addressing these problems through our programs for economic recovery. Our goal is to encourage the entrepreneurial spirit and to help usher in a new era of growth for small business. Toward that end, ``The State of Small Business: A Report of the President,'' was sent to the Congress on March 1, 1982. It outlines key recommendations of this Administration.

Historically, small firms have enjoyed a special relationship with their communities. Now they not only will be leaders in the renaissance of their communities but also will be in the forefront of revitalizing the economy and bringing a new sense of direction to the American people.

The United States recognizes two of its most important responsibilities -- to help restore growth and vitality to the world economy and to assure that all countries participate fully in international development. That is why America is committed to policies of free trade, unrestricted investment and open capital markets.

We also recognize that the international economic system can expand and improve only on a foundation of sound domestic policies in all countries. That is why this Administration is working so diligently to promote the economic well-being of the United States.

For these reasons, the United States remains firmly committed to a liberal world trading system and an active role in future world trade negotiations. In such negotiations, the United States adheres to the principle of reciprocal trade concessions and commitments -- a principle embodied in the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade that has served the mutual interests of all trading partners.

Government can set the framework for expanded trade, but government cannot make trade flourish. This enormous power lies with private enterprise. When American private citizens act to increase trade, all America will benefit.

In this the birth month of Thomas Jefferson, author of the first American manual on parliamentary practice, it is fitting that we reflect upon the importance of parliamentary procedure in the meetings of our private and public organizations. These procedures protect individual rights and majority rule and they assure orderly deliberation.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 6th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Prime Minister Seaga to further the close working dialog opened during the Prime Minister's visit last year. He then continues on to Barbados, where he will meet with leaders of eastern Caribbean countries to discuss regional issues of mutual concern.

President Galtieri and his offer of assistance, the President has directed Secretary of State Haig to continue consultations with the Governments of the United Kingdom and Argentina in the interest of assisting both parties in the search for a peaceful resolution of the dispute in the South Atlantic.

When we met in Washington just after I took office, you told me of the energy, the skills, and the creative genius of your people. You told me of the beauty of this country and the hospitality of its people. Well, Nancy and I are delighted to have your kind invitation to visit Jamaica as so many Americans do each year.

As we agreed in Washington, the United States can best help by expanding the opportunity of your people and those of your neighbors to trade freely with us, to give them a chance to produce and sell their products in a competitive, free market. Trade lies at the heart of the proposals I sent to the Congress on March 17th to begin the initiative that we've been planning for almost a year.

Our discussions here in Kingston will be valuable to me in learning how we can best go forward in carrying out the plans that we've laid. I learned a great deal from our earlier discussions, and I know these will be equally useful.

The success of our venture depends on cooperation, and cooperation is easier between friends who share the same ideals. For this reason we're pleased to find ourselves working together with the leaders of countries with such strong democratic traditions.

Jamaica is known in the United States not only for its beauty but for the courage of its people and the freedom they cherish and staunchly defend. Jamaica is an inspiration to all of us who believe economic development and freedom are compatible and in practice are mutually reinforcing.

I'm looking forward to our meetings with you and your Ministers and discussing the entire range of issues in our relationship. I know they will strengthen the already close ties of friendship between our two countries and continue the progress toward the goals of freedom and prosperity we seek for the Caribbean.

David Rockefeller and Mr. William Sneath, which is serving as a catalyst for the promotion of investment, technical assistance, and tourism. This Committee has so far initiated 46 investment proposals involving U.S. $130 million.

Jamaica's well-established democratic and constitutional traditions, its respect for human dignity, and its strong, just, judicial and parliamentary systems. The President took note of Jamaica's severe economic and social difficulties and pledged the continued support of the United States in helping to overcome these difficulties.

The President congratulated the Prime Minister on the success of the first year of the economic recovery program and agreed with the Prime Minister's statement that this success had in large part been possible because of the determination of the Jamaican people to earn their way out of the problems of the past through investment and trade.

In these respects, the President noted, Jamaica was already giving emphasis to many of the strategies proposed in the Caribbean Basin Initiative. Both leaders agreed that the initiative's strategy to expand domestic production, strengthen the private sector, promote trade and investment, and pursue sound self-help measures was fully consistent with the recovery program being carried out in Jamaica.

Both leaders underlined the need for a concerted comprehensive effort to solve the economic problems of the countries in the Caribbean Basin area. The expanded market opportunities contained in the Caribbean Basin Initiative proposals offered a particularly important stimulus for economic development in the region.

Caribbean, and noted with pleasure that the people of El Salvador have, in the March 28 elections, demonstrated overwhelmingly their commitment to the establishment of free democratic institutions in that country.

It was but a little more than a year ago that myself and my wife, Mitsy, had the pleasure of being guests of our distinguished guests, President Ronald Reagan and his wife, in Washington. It was the occasion of myself and my wife being invited to be the first official guests of the then new government of the United States. And I can recall at that time that we hoped that the day would come very soon when we would have the opportunity of reciprocating the hospitality that we received in Washington. It is our great pleasure today to welcome President Reagan and Mrs.

Our only regret is that their stay here is so short and that by virtue of the brevity of this stay, they will not have the opportunity to personally experience the revival of spirit, the renewal of hope, and the determination of purpose that now characterizes the new Jamaica. If they had the opportunity by virtue of a longer stay, this personal experience, I am sure, they would have felt in their journeys to other areas of the island where they would have had the opportunity to meet with Jamaicans in other walks of life.

I offer, first of all, a toast to him as head of government and state for the extent to which his clarity of conviction and dedication to purpose has enabled a strengthening of U.S.-Jamaica relationships over the past year.

I would like you to look at the record. In that past year, we have had as a part of the strengthened bonds of friendship between our countries the enactment of legislation to allow for conventions to charge their business expenses against their U.S. tax liabilities. We have had the formation of a U.S. businessmen's committee, which has played a critical, catalytic role in initiating new investment for Jamaica. We have had the purchase, barter, and exchange of bauxite for the strategic mineral stockpiles by the General Services Administration of the United States.

Knowing well the rigors of the legislative and congressional procedures in the United States, it is nothing short of very impressive that all this has been accomplished in one year. It speaks highly of the level of positive leadership which you, Mr. President, have given to the implementation of your programs, a characteristic for which you are both well known and admired throughout the world.

I want to offer next a toast to you as a friend of the Caribbean. I recall the initial discussions which we had in Washington on the occasion of my visit with you as your guest, out of which was born the germ of the idea of the Caribbean Basin Initiative which has flowered today. I commend and congratulate you on bringing to the stage of formulation in one year a most comprehensive program of far-reaching benefits for the entire Caribbean Basin area.

Finally, Mr. President, I would like to toast you not as a distinguished guest, not as a head of state or government, not as a friend of the Caribbean, but as an American. The journalists in particular often put the question to me about the degree of friendship which exists between Jamaica and the United States. I have tried in many ways to say to them that this friendship is not just a friendship of governments. Governments come and go, but the people remain forever. And in this case we are dealing with a case of friendship among the people of the two countries.

In our case we have documented that friendship. A distinguished professor of the University of the West Indies has over the years tested by polls the reaction of the Jamaican people to various policy questions which involve the relationship of the people of Jamaica to the United States. And I have compiled from those polls of Dr. Carl Stone the responses of the people of Jamaica, which is in this volume which I have as a surprise presentation to you tonight, Mr. President. And those polls are very revealing.

I will cite from a few of them the reactions of the people of Jamaica to questions that have been posed to them which bring into question the relationship and friendship between our people and your people.

And I'm sure, Mr. President, that you will be very pleased with the next poll: foreign leaders most admired. I am very glad to report to you, Mr. President, that in this election you have won hands down in Jamaica by a vote of three to one over your nearest competitors.

Irregardless of what governments think, the people of Jamaica have their own views. And irrespective of the government in power, the people of Jamaica had these views through the last regime in power and through the present, and they have not changed. And it is a wise government that listens to the voice of the people. And when politicians, by artful contrivance, seek to separate us, they can separate governments if they may, but they can never separate the people.

States, to the words of one of the most revolutionary heroes of the day, one of the most outstanding thinkers and statesmen, John Adams, second President of the United States of America, who envisioned the relationship between the United States and the islands of the Caribbean and who envisioned the difficulties and the contrivances by which politicians and others would try to separate us, when he said, and I quote: ``The commerce of the West India Islands is a part of the American system of commerce. They can neither do without us nor we without them.

Mr. President, I have the greatest pleasure in presenting you with this bound volume of these polls and that quotation. And so that lost in the archives in which this volume may be placed, these words may not fail to have their impact, we have by calligraphy reproduced them in the quotation -- in this framed presentation to you -- of the second President of the United States; not from me, but from the people of Jamaica to the people of the United States.

Nancy and I thank you from the bottom of our hearts for the warm and gracious welcome that you've given us here in Jamaica. In the hours of flying down here today and seeing many of the islands for the first time and out over the vast blue of the Caribbean, it seemed as if we were getting a long way from home. It's very funny, but I feel very much at home right now.

It's been said here and it's true, Mr. Prime Minister, you were the first head of state to visit us in the White House after my Inauguration. From the beginning I felt a special sense of closeness and common purpose with you. Your election was only 1 week before my own, and we were both given mandates to restore economic health to our respective nations and to secure the freedom which is so dear to us all.

I followed your progress with great interest and admiration as in my country there's still much to do. But I congratulate you for the significant accomplishments that you've already made since our last meeting. Your courage and optimism have helped turn around a desperate economic situation.

For the first time in 7 years Jamaica has had real growth in its economy, and inflation has been dramatically reduced. You have set your country on a course for economic progress by making the hard decisions first and sticking to them. And I know from 14 months of experience how difficult that can be.

In the long run undeniably all of us in this hemisphere are tied to the same destiny. Today there's a greater common realization of this fact. For us in the United States, observing dedicated men and women only a stone's throw from our shore striving to better their lives and preserve their freedom is dramatic and inspiring. We want to do what we can to help as friends and neighbors.

The Caribbean Basin Initiative was presented to the Organization of American States 6 weeks ago. It is designed to complement the kind of development efforts that you are making here in Jamaica. It is our invitation to you and other Caribbean peoples to join a vast and bountiful market to participate directly on an independent basis in the potential and dynamic of our free enterprise system.

There are those who would follow another road. They rely not on freeing a nation's productive forces, but on usurping them. But the lesson of history is clear: The system of Marxist centralized planning has invariably led to economic stagnation and a loss of political freedom.

The only Caribbean nation which has totally enveloped itself in Marxism, a philosophy alien to this hemisphere, suffers economic deprivation and political repression. Its citizens flee by the thousands at every opportunity, even risking death in the process. The expansion of state control is not the road to progress; it's the road to serfdom. And for every serf, there is a master. Failing miserably to develop its own economy, the Marxist model in this hemisphere has become totally dependent on a dole handed out by a faraway, totalitarian power. The strings attached to that subsidy make a mockery of national independence.

This nation has undertaken large-scale attempts -- not this nation -- I should have said that nation that I'm talking about -- has undertaken large-scale attempts to undermine democracy throughout the Americas, financed by its master across the sea. The turmoil in El Salvador bears the imprint of this interference. And the recent elections there unmasked the lie that there is popular support for Marxism in that country.

Braving bullets, ignoring threats of mutilation and death, the citizens of El Salvador streamed from their homes in the villages and towns, made their way to the ballot boxes so they could register their protest against Marxist tyranny. It was a triumph for democracy and a testimony to the courage of these brave men and women.

You had observers there of that election. We had a team of observers there. They came back and reported to me, and I told some of your people and the Prime Minister this afternoon of a lady standing for hours in the line, waiting for the opportunity to vote. She had been wounded by a ricocheted bullet, and she refused to leave the line and get treatment for her wound until she had gone in and voted her opinion.

Freedom-loving people in this hemisphere must stand shoulder to shoulder when liberty is threatened. There's a link between progress and political freedom. The United States has joined with other countries of the hemisphere to offer new opportunity to nations of the Caribbean Basin. The course we advocate leads to independence, each individual in each country, working through its own efforts in the marketplace to improve the life and well being of family and countryman. That is the real fruit of combining trade, investment, and aid, as we've done in the Caribbean Basin Initiative, and provides the start. But trade and investment activities provide the independence.

Knowing you as I do, Mr. Prime Minister, I'm keenly aware of your concern that economic developments improve the life of the poor and destitute of Jamaica. This passion for social justice has been a recognizable part of your character since you studied and lived with the less fortunate of Jamaica as a student. Your commitment to improving their lives eventually led you to politics, where as a member of Parliament, you represented one of Jamaica's poorer constituencies.

Minister. We both realize that a commitment to social justice must be directed by reason, by economic principles that work, or no one will live a better life. You and I represent two peoples who believe deeply in their democratic traditions and the ideals of the New World. And together, our people can accomplish great, great things.

With this in mind, I ask all of you to join me in a toast to the people of Jamaica, showing the way to freedom and progress. And to you, Prime Minister and Mrs. Seaga, may we accomplish the goals that we have set for ourselves and for our countries.

There are cultural differences making these island nations each unique in its own way, but at the same time I think that all are bound together with a common heritage of a love of freedom. But at the same time all are bound to each other in more ways than that. And I think the meeting here today serves notice on the world that our destiny is democracy, and the defense of that destiny is one that all of us share.

Soviet Union through Cuba and Nicaragua, are attempting to shut the door on democracy for the people of El Salvador. Very effective worldwide propaganda has tried to convince the world that Communist guerrillas and terrorists were freedom-fighters representing and having the support of the people of El Salvador. A week ago Sunday that lie was exposed for what it was, once and for all.

Guerrillas destroyed hundreds of buses, so people walked many miles under the threat of death to reach the polling places and vote. And they voted for democracy and against Marxism and the tyranny that it represents.

El Salvador isn't the only country that's being threatened with Marxism, and I think all of us are concerned with the overturn of Westminister parliamentary democracy in Grenada. That country now bears the Soviet and Cuban trademark, which means that it will attempt to spread the virus among its neighbors.

May I suggest that the Caribbean Initiative offers another and, I believe, quite different course. It aims at securing peace, prosperity, and freedom for the Caribbean nations by providing new opportunities for economic development. It is a series in a long-term commitment to make available to you more of the free enterprise system's dynamic and potential that serve the people of my own country so well. Your views will be helpful to me in working to get Congress to approve that plan.

So, will you join me in a -- and may I say, there's a custom in one city of America that maybe we should follow here today, and that is that in Philadelphia they only stand to toast the dead. So, we won't be toasting the dead; we'll be toasting freedom and the opportunity of those still in this New World. And let us hope that we can all remember the dream we share and the tie that binds us all together here in this Western Hemisphere.

But you did catch me a little by surprise when you started mentioning that previous career of mine. There's one thing about this job now; I'm on prime time in television. For a long time, I've been on the late, late show. [Laughter] And someone once asked me what it was like seeing myself in those old movies on the late show. It's like looking at a son you never knew you had.

But, seriously, we are delighted to be here and for the purpose of our trip. I recognize that while our heritage goes back to about the same starting point, then in recent years, the ties of the Caribbean nations were more to Western Europe than they were to the United States. Any yet now, as we look at each other, we are nations of the Americas, nations of the Western World, and this is what prompted my coming up with what I call the ``Caribbean Initiative.'' But together, because you are our third border for our country, well, that makes us a border of yours.

And I think it is important that we work together, we find ways in which we can better the life for all our people in all our countries, and this is the purpose of the Caribbean Initiative. And so, I was delighted for the opportunity to come down here and meet not only with your Prime Minister, your Governor General, but with representatives, leaders from several of the other countries here. And we today have been able to discuss some of the problems and the fact that we need your help, your advice and counsel on this plan to make it as workable as we think it can and should be.

So, we just want to thank you for a warm welcome. And I can't wait to get back and be dealing with our Congress on the matter of this initiative and tell them of the warmth that I found here, of welcome, the friendship that I found expressed by the people here, of Barbados, and those of the other countries of the Caribbean nations as well. And we just thank you.

Following the reception at Ilaro Court, the President and Mrs. Reagan attended a private dinner at the home of former movie actress Claudette Colbert. They then returned to Casa de Pablo, a private home owned by Paul H. Brandt, president and chairman of the board of A. Brandt Co., Inc., of Ft. Worth, Tex., where they remained overnight.

In all of the wars which America has fought, few of our citizens have been called upon to make the sacrifices and endure the hardships of those who were held captive. The American men, women and children who were incarcerated at Cabanatuan prisoner of war camp in the Philippine Islands during World War II suffered cruel and inhumane treatment, resulting in over three thousand deaths between May 1942 and February 1945.

I'm speaking to you today from Bridgetown, capital of Barbados, the easternmost nation in a chain of beautiful islands in the Caribbean sea that swings south from the tip of Florida in an arc all the way to the shores of South America.

I came down here to discuss with some of the leaders of these island nations what we can do about problems we have in common. Wednesday, in Jamaica, I met with Prime Minister Seaga, the Governor General, members of the Cabinet and of Parliament. Day before yesterday, we flew here to Barbados for meetings with Prime Minister Adams, the Governor General, and leaders of five other eastern Caribbean nations. We took yesterday, Good Friday, off. And tomorrow we'll go to church and then fly back to Washington.

On March 17th, I sent the Congress a proposal for a Caribbean Initiative, a plan for trade, aid, and private investment aimed at strengthening the economies of these islands and the countries of Central America bordering on the Caribbean. We're joined in this effort by Mexico, Canada, Venezuela, and Colombia. I believe our plan is sound and in our best interest as well as theirs.

Because they're both our friends, I've offered our help in an effort to bring the two countries together. Secretary Haig has completed a visit to London and is now in Buenos Aires. We'll do all we can to help bring a peaceful resolution of this matter.

But now I'd like to take a few minutes to talk about a domestic problem. There's obviously a great misconception on the part of many young people with regard to the program of college grants and guaranteed loans and what we're doing with that program in the 1983 budget.

On many campuses, students are being told they may not be able to return to school next year. In some instances, they've even been incited to stage protest demonstrations against what have been called ``Draconian cuts'' in student aid. One columnist has written, evidently without checking, that millions of American youngsters won't go to college next fall because their government is snatching away grants and subsidized loans. Well, a lot of people have simply been misled.

We haven't cut loans. We've cut the cost to taxpayers of making these loans available. Surely no one can quarrel with the reduction in administrative costs that results in more money for needy students.

We've taken steps to provide greater aid for students from lower income families. The percentage of students from families earning $12,000 or less, receiving grants, will increase from 64 percent this year to about 75 percent. And the loans outstanding in the Guaranteed Student Loan program, available to future students, will increase by more than $10 billion next year -- actually 10.1 billion.

In 1983 more than 4\1/2\ million students will receive aid from guaranteed student loans, and that's just one of the programs -- a 22-percent increase over this year. All told, there will be 7 million grants and loans for a student population of between 11 and 14 million if you include even the part-time students.

Asian and Pacific Americans have long shared the dreams common to all Americans and borne the heartaches and triumphs of the American experience. In spite of years of struggle and toil, in spite of exclusion and incarceration and discrimination, peoples whose roots lie in Asia and the Pacific Islands have brought forth myriad contributions to this country -- in the arts and literature, science, industry, commerce, government, and agriculture.

America owes a profound debt to its Asian and Pacific immigrants, who came to these shores to escape poverty and oppression. They brought to America a spirit which renews the hopes and ideals of the American Republic in forming a more perfect Union.

As we celebrate the accomplishments of Asian and Pacific Americans, we dedicate ourselves to overcoming the legacy of the past, knowing that the tasks in the struggle for full participation and equal opportunity remain incomplete. We are grateful to Asian and Pacific Americans for their presence and for their enduring belief in the unalienable right to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 12th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Pilgrims resided in the Netherlands for ten years before they set sail for the New World. During the Revolutionary War, the Dutch people demonstrated their widespread sympathy for the American struggle for freedom.

Today, the United States and the Netherlands share a joint commitment to our common security and the defense of freedom and our shared democratic values through our mutual membership in the North Atlantic Alliance. Our close economic ties reinforce our common philosophic and political goals, and the Netherlands is now the top foreign investor in the United States.

In recognition of this long and fruitful relationship between our two countries and peoples, I do hereby designate April 19, 1982 as Dutch-American Friendship Day and call on all Americans to observe such day with appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Well, welcome to the White House. I almost didn't get up here. I'm so used to being an after-lunch speaker that -- [laughter] -- before lunch as a speaker threw me. I have just some brief remarks here, and then after we get through eating, why, we'll have something of a dialog instead of a monolog.

We just celebrated the happiest and holiest holidays of the Christian faith, and we're in the sixth day of the eighth day of Passover, a reminder of our nation's Judeo-Christian tradition. Today America's in the midst of a period of reevaluation about the role of our fundamental institutions, what functions are within the proper sphere of government, which of those should be left at State and local levels, how much can government tax before it infringes on our citizens' freedom and damages the economy's ability to grow and prosper.

For some time now I've been convinced that there is a great hunger on the part of our people for a spiritual revival in this land. There is a role for churches and temples that -- just as there has been throughout our history. They were once the center of community activity, the primary source of help for the less fortunate, with the churches that ran orphanages, homes for the elderly, other vital services. As late as 1935, at the depth of the Great Depression, a substantial portion of all charity was sponsored by religious institutions. And today, as we all know, the field seems to have been co-opted by government.

The story of the Good Samaritan has always illustrated to me what God's challenge really is -- the injured pilgrim lying by the roadside, those who passed by, and then the one man, the Samaritan, who crossed over to help him. He didn't go running into town and look for a caseworker to tell him that there was a fellow out there that needed help. He took it upon himself. Today, we've become so used to turning to government rather than taking the personal time and effort required to help those in need. Some even confuse charity as being the money that is given for lobbying to get more social programs passed.

I realize there is apprehension in the religious community about budget cuts, fear that we're trying to dump responsibility on others, including the churches, and I understand that concern. While we've quite justly, and out of economic necessity, cut some budgets, we have not, contrary to what seems to be the perception, abandoned America's commitment to the poor.

Critics notwithstanding, overall social spending on the part of government is up. For example, the budget for Health and Human Services will total $274.2 billion in 1983, an increase of 8 percent or $20 billion over 1982. And that's $53 billion more than the defense budget. Our budget for Health and Human Services alone is larger than the national debts of all the countries in the world -- or any other country in the world, except the United States and the Soviet Union. It provides increases for Head Start, social security, Medicare, and other safety net programs.

By and large, when people speak about budget cuts, what they're actually referring to is the trimming of projected increases in spending. Well, there've been some cuts in some programs, programs that were inefficient, top-heavy with bureaucracy, or not coming close to accomplishing what they set out to do. Government spending, in general, and social spending, in particular, got out of hand during the last decade. The Federal budget tripled, even though defense spending, in real dollars, was decreasing. I mention defense, because most of the critics of the budget seem to want to draw that comparison as to what we're doing in that regard. But with this growth in government came double-digit inflation, economic stagnation, and high levels of unemployment.

Accomplishing this is not simply a matter of raising money; it's not just reaching into our pockets but reaching into our hearts. I've established a Task Force on Private Sector Initiatives, chaired by Bill Verity, who is with us here today. It's coordinating a broad-range program that's beginning to have a tangible impact.

I appreciate that your presence here represents something of a commitment to provide the leadership necessary to build stronger working partnerships to tackle community problems throughout the country. But I'm not suggesting, nor have I ever suggested, that churches and other voluntary groups should pick up the dollar-for-dollar cost of reduced Federal programs. I just believe it would be a good thing for the soul of this country to encourage people to get involved and accept more direct responsibility for one another's health, happiness, and well-being, rather than leaving it to the bureaucracy.

When someone starts talking about accepting more responsibility, I know that many in organizations whose budgets are already pinched get a queasy feeling. Well, we all know the study of the 5,000 who were fed from what today would probably have been called a brown paper bag lunch -- a few loaves and fishes. But somehow, God can take our limited resources and solve larger problems if we're willing to share and to have faith. Today I'm convinced that with God's help the American people are capable of great things and that we'll be blessed beyond all expectation if we only try.

Church. In the early seventies this church was in decline. It was losing membership and attendance. And then a few members realized that you only gain your life by giving it away. So, some of them started a food program. At first, it was just sandwiches at lunch for the needy of the neighborhood. Now it runs 7 days a week and serves up to 600 people a day. The church has also opened a building to an educational program for high school dropouts, which is jointly run by a nonprofit organization, the local school system, and members of the community. The church, incidentally, has grown tremendously in membership.

At this time of Passover we can be reminded of the wisdom of the Talmud, which says, ``These are the things for which there are no prescribed limitations: the corner of the field for gleaners, the giving of the first fruits and the deeds of loving kindness. The fruit of these deeds is for them in this world, while the principle remains in the world to come.'' God's treasures surround us and are waiting for those willing to do His work.

Our task force on private initiatives, chaired by Bill Verity, has challenged the corporate community to double its philanthropic contributions. Today, while private citizens and corporations contribute $47 billion annually, 94 percent of U.S. corporations do not contribute more than $500 annually.

Now, contributions need not be in money. Companies can sponsor volunteer programs for their management and employees or even volunteer the use of their equipment. Prudential Insurance Company, for example, has the largest corporate van-pool system in the United States to bring their employees to and from work. Between office runs, their fleet of vans in Union County, New Jersey, is used to transport the elderly and the underprivileged. The potential for community projects like Prudential's van fleet is limited only by our imagination.

I suspect that those who manage corporations would be pleased to speak with the delegation of the local clergy with an idea of bettering the community. We must remember that many of those who run Americans' business do sit each week in church or synagogue here and there in the country.

There are four prisons located in that city, and when families of the prisoners came to visit, many had to sleep in the park or under bridges. These two women of different faiths mobilized churches across the State, headed up a committee, and raised $46,000 from churches and individual members to buy an old rooming house three blocks from one of the prisons.

Individual churches took responsibility for renovating and furnishing the dozen rooms in the house and for the continued support of its operation. Mrs. Webb says, ``Our sole purpose is to provide'' -- and I hope I'm pronouncing this right; I realized when I read the word I had never said it aloud -- ``agape, God's unconditional love to prisoners and their families.'' And so they named it the Agape House. They provide a bed and bath, but something deeper -- the certainty that someone cares. This is the kind of spirit we need to draw upon.

In Chicago, Father Clements started the one-church-one-child program aimed at finding adoptive parents for minority children with special needs, handicapped children, children with learning disabilities, older children. The program, as its name suggests, asked each church to take responsibility to help one lost and lonely child find a home. In a year's time, 159 churches have responded to Father Clements' challenge, and he's taking the idea out of Chicago and going nationwide.

The black clergymen represent a noble tradition in this country. Their struggle to aid the poor, help the sick, and counsel the troubled has always been a real part of their ministry. I sincerely believe they have much to teach all of us about what can be accomplished. But today many black churches need a helping hand. If nothing else, I would hope that we see more religious organizations -- black and white, Christian and Jewish -- working together.

There is, for example, expertise in America's churches that could be put to use teaching the unemployed skills that would change their lives. Your churches and synagogues can be the catalyst to convene a strong community partnership that can and will make the difference.

It's time for me to sit down, but I'd like to end with this thought. We have problems in our country, and many people are praying and waiting for God to do something. I just wonder if maybe God isn't waiting for us to do something. And while no one else is capable of doing everything, everyone is capable of doing something.

Thomas Jefferson remains one of the towering figures in American history 239 years after his birth. Statesman, scholar, inventor, farmer, and philosopher, he was, first and foremost, a champion of individual liberty. Throughout his life he was a tireless advocate of free expression and the sanctity of property, for he knew that, to be whole, freedom must be economic as well as political.

Much has changed in the last two centuries, but the principles Thomas Jefferson espoused still lie at the heart of our democratic society. May his 239th birthday be a time of national renewal when we commit ourselves anew to the proud, free heritage Jefferson bequeathed us.

Mr. McManus has been corporate counsel to Pfizer, Inc., a multinational health care company, and general counsel of its international chemicals division. He previously served in the Department of Commerce during the Ford administration.

On the White House staff he will work closely with Mr. Deaver on a wide variety of administrative and other matters. In addition he will be responsible for the planning and coordination of administrative and logistical matters related to the President's trip to Europe this June.

Before taking your questions, I want to offer one or two remarks concerning the situation before us in the South Atlantic. From the outset, we've made clear our wish to assist in finding a basis for resolution of this difficult issue. It was for that purpose that I sent Secretary Haig to both capitals last week. During his travels I've remained in close communication with him, and today have had the benefit of a thorough report on where matters stand.

The situation is most sensitive. Nonetheless, ideas have been presented which are being seriously considered on both sides. Peace is our common cause. In the interest of finding a solution, I've asked Secretary Haig to return shortly to Argentina for further talks. In view of the sensitivity of this situation, I'll have no further comment on this matter. It wouldn't be appropriate at this time, and I will defer all questions until further developments occur.

The President. We are still trying to be a fair broker in this situation and bring peace. And again, things lose translation between here and when someone may hear them on either side. That's why the safest thing is to not comment.

The President. Well, this is a tragic affair. Obviously, the individual who perpetrated that horrible deed at the temple is deranged, and now for this to lead to the great unrest, yes, it's a great tragedy.

The President. The discussions that are going on, and of which we're not -- I'm not participating, are discussions that are exploring every avenue of what can be a package that, hopefully, can bring about a bipartisan move to meet the problems, deficit problems that we face this year. And I have not been party to any of the many alternatives, both with regard to revenues and regard to cuts in spending that have been made.

And what will happen is the leadership on both sides -- myself on this side and the Speaker and others on the other, Congressman Wright -- when the discussions have led to something that they think is a package that now has reasonable success of being negotiated out, then we'll treat the thing in the whole, the whole package. So I'm not going to have any comments on consideration on any of these things that are being talked about.

Q. Mr. President, you're not -- there are those who feel, because of your strong stand for tax reduction, that the surcharge has, sort of, automatically been ruled out. You're not doing that, are you, here?

The President. I'm neither ruling out nor ruling in, because, as I say, I'm on the sidelines until those who are carrying on the discussions -- and they're not negotiations, they are discussions -- feel that they have something that has a possibility of success with both sides, and then I will see it.

The President. Again, this would be commenting in a way that could be detrimental to the process that's going on. I'm just going to say that what he's doing -- I think we should all be hoping, and we should all be praying. And he's working extremely hard, as you know, on this.

The President. He's there, but mainly he's there observing and listening and, as I say, it is not -- it's been portrayed as negotiations; they're not. So, he's there with my encouragement to go forward with this process.

The President. Well, again, you've asked me -- well, I'm just not going to comment while they're going forward. I want them to complete their discussions, and then I'll look at the package as a whole.

Q. You haven't said anything about whether the U.S. is supplying any intelligence information to the British. But could you comment on reports that the Soviets are supplying intelligence information to the Argentinians?

The President. Yes, but now, you see, you've just made my case for me. You've just indicated that there's no way to comment on these things without running the risk of saying something or creating some perception that will make it more difficult for Al to do what he's doing. So I just can't do it.

Q. Ed Rollins says that Republicans on Capitol Hill who don't support your program should be disciplined. Do you agree? And if so, what's the difference between the Democrats last year who supported your program? Shouldn't they have been disciplined?

The President. Well, no, I don't agree. And I intend to support as many Republican candidates as I can in the coming election year. And I've never used that -- in spite of all the inferences in the many meetings that I've had with legislators on the issues that have come up and the votes, and so forth -- I have never used anything or attempted anything but to try and persuade them to my viewpoint. And there's never been any club held over any of them.

I won't make the mistake I made last week; I'll say my few words up here. Last week I sat down where I was to sign, then said the few words, and then was reminded by all the gentlemen with the cameras that they hadn't heard anything because I wasn't in front of the microphones.

The White House press corps seems to have an interest in any facts and figures that I use, so I hope they report on the numbers I'm about to give, because you simply won't hear any figures more important than these. Nearly 50,000 people were killed on our highways last year. Now, out of this statistic comes an even more chilling one. Drunk driving. Drunk drivers were involved in 25,000 of those fatalities, in addition to 750,000 injuries a year. In other words, half of all automobile deaths involve drunk drivers.

During this short ceremony at least one person will be killed by a drunk driver. I'm afraid to think who it may be. All of us have heard the tragic stories about the young mother with her new baby, the grandmother out with her grandchildren, or the father and son going to Little League practice killed by a drunken driver.

Americans are outraged that such slaughter of the innocent can take place on our highways. Our anger and frustration are matched only by the grief of those who have lost loved ones in such accidents. But there are useful preventive measures we can take. The highway safety campaign that we're launching is aimed at the areas where a little prevention can pay big returns in saving lives and reducing injuries.

First, we intend to hit hard at the major threat on our highways, the drunken driver. So, today I am announcing the formation of a commission to lead this effort and to act as a catalyst for grassroots action, for even though drunk driving is a problem nationwide, it can be solved only at the State and local level. Yet the Federal Government also has a role to play. John Volpe, the former Secretary of Transportation, himself has agreed to be the Chairman of this important panel. With his leadership and that of the rest of the commission, we will advocate a strong approach to reducing drunk driving accidents across the country.

About half of all the people who die in passenger cars, light trucks, or vans could have been saved if they had been wearing seatbelts. Think of it -- half. They could have been saved with just one little click of the buckle. And so, the second part of our traffic safety program is to make motorists more aware of the importance of safety belts and their effectiveness in saving lives.

When I was Governor of California -- and I can hear my staff now saying, oh, no, no, here we go again -- [laughter] -- but back when I was Governor of California, about 25 percent of all Americans used safety belts. Today only 10 percent of our people are wearing them. We're going to get that percentage back up there where it was and then go higher.

What is already heartening about this effort to make our highways safer in the support of organizations -- or is the support, I should say, of organizations of the private sector. Citizens at the grassroots are organizing to help State and local authorities expand their fight against the drunken driver.

The mood of the Nation is ripe to make great headway against this problem, and that's exactly what we intend to do. By working together we can look forward to creating greater safety on our streets and highways.

The rule of law is fundamental to the preservation of the democratic principles and ideals that law-abiding Americans cherish. Our commitment to criminal justice goes far deeper than our desire to punish the guilty or to deter those considering a lawless course. We must never forget that our laws represent the collective moral voice of a free society -- a voice that articulates our shared beliefs about the rules of civilized behavior, and reflects our basic precept that men and women should be treated as free individuals, responsible for the consequences of their actions.

When we countenance the suffering of innocent victims of crime, we thus threaten to undermine the faith of our citizens in a legal system that lies at the heart of much that is unique and precious about our Nation itself.

We cannot afford for law-abiding Americans to lose that faith. At a time when crime remains a serious national problem, we must be ever-more zealous in our pursuit of law and justice. In that pursuit, we must never forget that the victims of crimes are not merely statistics on a police blotter; they are our friends, relatives, neighbors and fellow citizens. They are entitled to better treatment, and it is time to do something about it.

The plight of innocent citizens victimized by lawlessness deserves immediate national attention. I have, therefore, decided to establish a Presidential Task Force on Victims of Crime, to be composed of members of the public with particular knowledge and expertise in the area of victims' rights, that will evaluate current national, state and local policies and programs concerning this important issue and recommend executive and legislative action to improve our efforts to assist and protect victims of crime.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 14th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Hyde and Dan Rostenkowski here with me today. I know that Congressman Hyde and I have shared a relationship in our interest in social causes that are of interest very much to the Catholic community. And I have to say that Dan Rostenkowski has been such a stalwart in our attempts to resolve our budget problems in Washington in a bipartisan manner. And I'm grateful to him for that.

Before I begin talking about some of the things that I think are of immediate concern to you in this kind of a meeting, could I just say to those who obviously and very sincerely are motivated by a deep desire for peace in the world that I share that desire. And whatever we're doing in Washington today in this regard is aimed at one purpose and one only: to make war impossible and never again have to bleed a generation of young Americans into the battle --  -- [applause].

Now, I'm sure you realize that it's something of a risk for any government official to appear in public on income tax day. [Laughter] I'm delighted to have this opportunity to be among leaders and educators in the Catholic community, a community of Americans who have done so much to bring sustenance and fulfillment to people around the world. I'm grateful for your help in shaping American policy to reflect God's will; for your efforts to allow Americans to provide direct aid to the people of Poland. And I look forward to further guidance from His Holiness Pope John Paul II during an audience I will have with him in June.

But I have come to speak with you today about other subjects of mutual concern -- about the strength and the future of American families, about the education of their children, and about the increasing strains placed on both by current levels of taxation. I believe that working Americans are overtaxed and under appreciated, and I have come to Chicago to offer relief. I have come to propose further restoration of the incentives and the choices that were our inheritance and that encouraged our people to build the greatest nation on Earth.

But to give you an idea of what we're up against, that tax cut will barely offset the increases that had already been built into the system. Despite all the moaning you've been hearing in Washington about huge tax cuts running up the deficit, our tax reduction program has not meant that government revenues are going down. The United States Treasury is still taking in more money every year than the year before. In 1981 personal taxes actually went up by about $41 billion.

Raising taxes is no way to balance the budget. History proves it doesn't work. Taxes went up by more than 200 percent in the last decade, and we still had the largest string of deficits in our history, because, you see, while taxes were going up 200 percent, spending was increasing over the same period by over 300 percent. If people are serious about balancing the budget they must cut spending. Suggestions to repeal the third year of our tax cut would stifle our recovery and hike the tax bill for working families.

I believe the working families you see every day are already weary and overburdened, so I've come to Chicago to propose another tax bill that would allow them to keep a little more of their own money. I have come to propose a tuition tax credit for parents -- [applause] -- thank you very much. Thank you. Thank you. Maybe I should have saved that for last. [Laughter] But this tax credit will be for parents who bear the double burden of public and private school costs.

Now I know you've heard promises before. Politicians in the past promised tax credits and broke those promises. But this administration is different. We're a bunch of radicals. We really intend to keep our promises, and we intend to act on the will of the people.

In 1980, while campaigning, I promised to base this administration's policies on the primacy of parental rights and responsibility. I pledged to expand education opportunities by supporting a tuition tax credit plan that would permit parents to take a credit on their income tax for each child they have in private school. And today, as your President, I keep that pledge.

Equity Act. Our bill will be aimed at the middle- and lower income working families who now bear the double burden of taxes and tuition, while still paying local taxes to support the public schools. Working families would be able to recover up to half the cost of each child's tuition. Our proposal is fair, equitable, and designed to secure the parental right to choose.

Key elements of our draft proposal include a limited coverage provision that would restrict credit to parents of children in private, nonprofit elementary and secondary schools -- I wish we could include college as well, but you know the budgetary constraints that face us today that we're working under, so I look forward to a day when we can expand this bill -- a phase-in of the credits beginning in 1983 to be completed in 1985, a maximum credit of $500 per child, an income cap proposal to ensure the benefits go to working families, and a policy of nondiscrimination to ensure that credits are not available to parents sending their children to schools which discriminate on the basis of race.

Now, it's important to understand that we do not propose aid to schools. This bill will provide direct benefit to individuals. It's proposed as a matter of tax equity for working, taxpaying citizens. We don't seek to aid the rich, but those lower and middle-income taxpayers who are most strapped by inflation, oppressive taxation, and the recession that grips us all.

I'd like to think that we're offering help to the inner-city child who faces a world of drugs and crime, the child with special needs, and the families who still believe the Lord's Prayer will do them less harm in the schoolroom than good.

In 1979 a majority of all parents who had children in private elementary and secondary schools had incomes of $25,000 or less. Secondary school parents pay average tuition costs of $900, while also supporting their community public schools through local taxes. Our proposal is intended to relieve, as I've said before, that dual financial burden threatening to usurp the traditional right of parents to direct the education of their children.

Today, more than 5 million American youngsters attend thousands of religious and independent schools because of emphasis on values or the type of teaching available. Their parents have made that choice at great cost and sacrifice. They've made it because the education of their children is their greatest concern.

Senator Patrick Moynihan, Democrat of New York, said a few years ago -- [applause] -- I'll tell him you responded to that -- [laughter] -- ``It's time that we acknowledged the ordinary family's insistence on providing its children with the best obtainable education results in costs that the Federal Government should help it to bear -- not by giving it a handout or a gift, but simply by allowing it to keep a bit more of the money it earns for itself.'' Well, I wholeheartedly agree, and I think most of you do as well.

It's no accident that we who are the freest people on Earth have an educational system unrivaled in the history of civilization. We know that knowledge and freedom are inseparable, and we also acknowledge the right of every individual to both. They cannot be arbitrarily apportioned according to race, station, or class.

The Pledge of Allegiance, now missing from too many of our classrooms, concludes with the affirmation that we are ``one nation under God . . . with liberty and justice for all.'' America embraces these principles by design and would abandon them at her peril.

Private education is no divisive threat to our system of education; it is an important part of it. Our public schools offer quality education to our children and are the heart of our communities. We must ensure that their classrooms continue to provide the finest education possible. But alternatives to public education tend to strengthen public education. Taken together, public and private institutions sustain the diversity that has made our culture rich.

Excellence demands competition among students and among schools. And why not? We must always meet our obligation to those who would fall behind without our assistance. But let's remember, without a race there can be no champion, no records broken, no excellence -- in education or any other walk of life.

America's reputation for excellence in education. Unfortunately, the high plane of literacy and the diversity of education we have achieved is threatened by policymakers who seem to prefer uniform mediocrity to the rich variety that has been our heritage.

Washington. It doesn't even begin with State or local officials. Education begins in the home, where it's a parental right and responsibility. Both our public and our private schools exist to aid our families in the instruction of our children, and it's time some people back in Washington stopped acting as if family wishes were only getting in the way.

This city of Chicago is a good example of the strength that pluralism and freedom of choice have provided our people. Chicago has long been a magnet for immigrants who have come to this country to make a better life. For them, education was not simply another part of American society -- it was the key that opened the golden door. It was the best path to progress for their families. And it's been an indispensable part of the growth of our nation and the prosperity of all our people.

Many of your Catholic schools were first opened to serve these new Americans. Today, generations later, they serve other Americans who find themselves at a disadvantage. The Nation's largest black Catholic school stands in the middle of one of Chicago's poorest neighborhoods. It imposes strict academic and religious requirements, and yet it still receives 1,000 more applicants a year than it can accept.

Well, those Americans have not forgotten what education and freedom can do. They know that freedom is the only truly essential possession we have, and education is freedom's guide. These are not easy times for a great many Americans, but the future looks dark only for those who've lost faith in our people and in the promise of individuals who are educated and free. The rest of us should welcome the future, knowing that with God's help it is ours to shape.

Together with your colleagues in other independent and public schools, you are molding each rising generation. You're working with parents to fill young minds with the knowledge and young hearts with the morality, the understanding and compassion that they will need to live in happiness and fulfillment. In the meantime, we in Washington must make sure that freedom, the other half of education, is still secure when your students graduate.

We must make sure that the incentives to use their education are not destroyed by an oppressive taxation. We must be sure the Federal Government doesn't soak up the lion's share of our gross national product, that regulations don't choke off technology, and that interest rates don't ruin the dream of self-employment.

As your boys and girls become adults and they marry, we must have an economy which will permit them to own their own homes. The values of work and family and neighborhood must not become things of the past. A job must be there for every American who wants one, and inflation must be controlled so that wages have real meaning.

And after your students have spent their lives turning your theories into reality, earning a living and providing for their families, we must have a society that will reward them with security. In short, we must end the excessive taxes and spending that has wrecked our economy and mocks the ambition of our poor and middle classes. We must open the way for more productivity and more employment. We must generate new jobs and new opportunities for all our citizens. At the same time, we must realize there are some among us who cannot help themselves. Our hungry must be fed, our elderly must be cared for, and those who are cold must be clothed and given shelter. No one must be left behind in our drive for progress.

But let me set the record straight: Our massive budget cuts have only reduced the size of the increase in Federal spending to less than it was the previous year. Or, I should say, forgive me, we have never proposed reducing Federal spending to less than it was the previous year.

Now, these are just some examples of what is in the 1983 budget that some are charging is an inhumane denial of help to America's needy. Perhaps our greatest program for the poor, the needy, and those on fixed incomes, however, has not been a subsidy, it has not been more welfare, and it didn't arrive in the form of a government check. We have increased the purchasing power of our people.

After an unprecedented 2 years of back-to-back double-digit inflation, we achieved in the first year of this administration an inflation rate of -- single digit -- 8.9 percent. But during the last 6 months, inflation has averaged only 4\1/2\ percent.

Now, I don't think Americans value a handout nearly so much as a hand up. Past policies have locked millions of our people in place on the bottom rung of our economic ladder. We must be sure that our government never again stands in between our families and prosperity. We must aid those who need us, but we must not hinder those who need only a chance.

The immigrants who came to Chicago, the poor in our inner cities, the middle classes stuggling to make ends meet -- these Americans still believe the American dream. They still yearn for prosperity and still sacrifice so that their children will enjoy it. They mark progress by the level of education reached by members of their families. Parents who never finished high school send their children to college. Each generation stands upon the shoulders of the one before as our nation and our people reach for the stars.

We must keep those dreams alive. We must provide the learning, shape the understanding, and encourage the spirit each generation will need to discover, to create, and to improve the lot of man. But we must also preserve the freedom they will need both to pursue that education and to use it.

Together, with God's help, we must ensure that in Abraham Lincoln's words, our children and our children's children to a thousand generations will continue to enjoy the benefits that have been conferred upon us. It is a sacred trust.

Mr. Sheppard. Mr. President, I'd like to have you meet our teacher of our eighth grade here, [Deborah Bray, eighth grade homeroom teacher] and the eighth grade students at St. Peter's School. President Reagan, we're very, very pleased to have you with us, and here are our students.

The President. Well, I'm pleased to see all of you. I'm very pleased. Someone once said that civics class -- that's where you study what you read in the paper the day before. But I know better than that, having been in civics classes myself.

We don't have very much time here together. So, I think better than me trying to make any kind of a speech to you, what we should do is get to a dialog and a back and forth. I just came from speaking to a great meeting of teachers and educators there in Chicago and told them about our proposal in Washington for a tuition tax credit for parents of children going to schools like this.

The President. The benefit of the tax credits? Well, we're going to phase it in. It would start -- if, of course, the Congress passes the legislation we're presenting -- it would start being phased in in '83, that's next year, and be completed by '85. We have to kind of take it easy to start with, because of our budget deficits and the problem we're trying to solve on that.

The President. Well, this will not allow any government interference in any way in education, because the aid is going directly to the parents of children who are going to the schools. So, this will not lead to any government direction or interference in any way in education, if that was the meaning of your question.

The President. There were some who have been taken back and were hired back because they were able to establish that they were pressured into leaving. And now, the needs are being met very rapidly in the towers with applicants and trainees who are training to become air controllers, and I don't think there will be any further move in that direction.

The law provides that anyone who is discharged from government service is ineligible. We gave a waiver that they could get jobs -- a waiver to that law so that they could get other jobs in government if they wanted, but we had -- our loyalty had to go to those who stayed in and kept the airlines flying.

The President. Well, we've already begun doing it. Inflation was 12.4 percent when we began our administration and -- it's figured every month and then it's averaged over the year -- so it ended the year of 1981 with an average of 8.9 percent, down from 12 percent. But in the last 6 months, now, inflation has been running at 4\1/2\ percent or less. And so the answer to it is, of course, now resolving this recession and getting people back to work and all. But I look for inflation to continue down and getting even less, and, of course, the ultimate is to get it to zero. So, it is very much under control.

Now, do you all understand, really, what inflation means to your families and to all of you in purchasing power? I'll bet you do, because you're in the civics class here. But inflation -- really, we think about it as high prices -- actually, the high prices are just a reflection of the lowered value of the money. It means when it was 12.4 percent that at the end of the year the dollar would buy 12.4 percent less than it would buy at the beginning of the year. Well, now the dollars are only shrinking by 4\1/2\ percent -- cents out of the dollar, so we'll do better.

The President. More jobs for people? The answer to that has to be making it possible for the ecomony to expand, and by that I mean with this great unemployment, we're down now to where many industries are only working at a fraction of their capacity to produce. And this has been, I think, because the government over the years has been taking an increasing amount out of the earnings of the people and the gross national product. It reduces the ability of the private sector to expand and produce the jobs that we need for our people.

Now, unemployment, unfortunately, is the last thing that gets resolved when you come out of a recession; it's the last thing that catches up. But it does catch up. This was why we passed our tax program last year, that we phase in three installments of taxes -- 5 percent last October 1st; there will be a 10-percent cut in the income tax in July and another 10-percent cut next year. And at the same time, we cut the taxes for business with regard to their ability to modernize their plant and equipment, to keep up with modern technology.

Today, one of the reasons that we're not so competitive as we could be, and used to be, with other countries like West Germany and Japan is because they have invested and they are producing with much more modern equipment. I have been in steelplants in Taiwan and in Japan and here in our own country, and I have seen the difference. It isn't that their workers are any better; it's that they've got better tools.

Now, I think that the program that we're embarked on -- reducing of government spending, reducing of taxes at the same time -- is going to lead and is leading now to a recovery where there will be this modernization. And that's the only way to provide jobs for our people.

They're absolutely independent under the law. And it's true that they have had a policy over recent years of treating recessions like this with variations of the money supply, releasing a lot of money into the market, and then inflation went up as well as interest rates and so forth. I have to say right now, they're holding to a very sound policy of the normal increase in the money supply to keep pace with our own natural growth.

The interest rates are up now simply because of the fear on the part of the money markets that inflation won't stay down where it is, that as it's done in the past, it'll go back up again. And we're trying to convince them that isn't so. And I think pretty soon, when we announce -- when we can announce a bipartisan agreement on what we're going to do with regard to spending and taxes and so forth in '83, that maybe they will then get the confidence to come down.

Here's why inflation pushes interest rates up. If you have money to lend -- and when I told you a little while ago about the dollar losing its value, if you're going to lend money, say, on a mortgage over 20 years, and every year your dollar is going to lose a little of its value to where at the end of 20 years it's only worth about that much of what it was when you loaned it, you would have to get enough interest to compensate for that loss in the value of the dollar, and then on top of that, get the normal rate of interest as a return on your lending the money.

Well, now, that's down to 4.5. By all rules, the interest rates should be down much lower than they are. But, as I say, they're just fearful, and until we can convince them that we really mean it, to stick with our program, they won't come down.

Although, the other day, a banker in a little town in Indiana did something I recommend to a lot of bankers. To help the automobile dealers, he put $2 million of the bank's money up for loan and lowered the interest rates 4 percent below what the market rate is today, provided they borrowed the money to buy automobiles. And people are flocking there to get those loans at the lower interest rate and buy automobiles.

No, it's basically a theory I -- my degree in college was in economics. And I remember studying how the classic economist back at the turn of the century always believed that these cycles of recession and hard times and so forth came when government took too much out of the private sector. Well, now, government has been doing that, as I said before.

What we are doing is trying to reduce government spending to where we stop having the constant deficits that are just built into our system. When the Federal Government has to go into the money market and borrow a lot of money to pay the deficit -- that it's spending more than it takes in -- then that helps push interest rates up, just from supply and demand. There are more people out there wanting to borrow than there is money to borrow when the government is taking the biggest share of it.

The President. Support Catholic education of schools? No, this is ruled to be the separation of church and state that they can't do that, but this is why we're proposing a program that we think will help, by getting the aid through the tax credits directly to the parents and that this will help solve the problem.

The President. Oh, yes. And I'll tell you, when I was Governor in California, the Governor had the right of what's known as line item veto, and so you could veto parts of a bill or even part of the spending in a bill. The President can't do that. The President must take the bill as it comes to him and either veto the entire bill. So, there's grown up in the Federal Government a little device whereby they hang an amendment of something that you really wouldn't want -- someone particularly wants it, they want it -- they hang it on a bill that you just cannot veto, some very necessary bill, and thus they get it passed.

But our program has been quite misunderstood -- of loans and grants to college students of demonstrated need, who could not otherwise go. And that program has in it something in the neighborhood of $12 billion. The Federal Government is providing some 7 million loans and grants for the roughly 11 million college students that there are in the country. And all a student has to do is prove that they have -- that otherwise they couldn't go. And in proving that need, it will not only depend on the family's income but also the number of children in the family to be educated, whether there are any unusual medical problems, and so forth. So, there is that kind of aid. But in addition, there are all kinds of other scholarship programs and even independent loan programs.

There was no such thing as a Federal program when I went to school, but I had to work my way through school; in fact, I washed dishes in a girls' dormitory. [Laughter] And I also had to borrow before I got out, but I borrowed from a private foundation that was set up where people contribute the money to a foundation just to lend, and then you pay the money back after you get out of school.

But I believe in California that we took the path of gun control that was best. I don't believe there's any way you can keep the criminal from getting a gun, just as you can't keep them from trying to steal anything they want. Now, the law that we passed in California, I heartily recommend to any society. We passed a law that said if a criminal is convicted of a crime and had in his possession a gun at the time he committed the crime, whether he used it or not, add 5 to 15 years to the prison sentence. And on top of that, then passed another law that said no judge can find a prisoner guilty who had a gun in the commission of a crime, and then give him probation.

England was always very proud of the fact that the English police did not have to carry guns. And the reason they didn't have to carry guns -- and this sounds very cruel, and I'm not recommending this, but I just point out what that kind of a threat can do. In England, if a criminal carried a gun, even though he didn't use it, he was not tried for burglary or theft or whatever he was doing, he was tried for first-degree murder and hung if he was found guilty. They said that the fact that he carried the gun meant that he had premeditated using the gun to kill someone if necessary. And so the criminal stopped carrying guns, and the police didn't have to carry guns, and it all worked out very well until they eliminated capital punishment and changed things.

Now, the method of computing how this can work is that it seems the Bureau of Labor Statistics computes employment figures on a 5-year basis, making projections ahead. So, they projected an increase of more than 600,000 for April-March, and they predicted a decrease of unemployment of about 200,000. So, when the actual figures of the increase in employment wasn't as big as their projection, they called that a decline of a couple of hundred thousand. And when the decrease in unemployment wasn't big as their projection, even though it decreased, they called that an increase in unemployment.

The President. No; I was just saying that this discussion process -- I want it to go forward and keep on going. And I think it's the only way we're going to arrive at a point at which we can then, maybe, come up with a bipartisan agreement.

During the conversation, President Reagan said that he was wholeheartedly committed to a peaceful resolution of the dispute. He said that a conflict in the hemisphere between two western nations would be a tragedy and would leave a bitter legacy. President Reagan also asked for flexibility and restraint by all parties in the days ahead. With that, he said, we should be able to get through this together. We still have a ways to go, he added, but he is hopeful that we can find a just and peaceful solution to this very serious matter. The President also said that Secretary Haig [Secretary of State Alexander M. Haig, Jr], his personal representative, would be arriving in Buenos Aires in a few hours to continue the efforts of the United States.

Thank you very much, and I understand there's been a change of signals here. Evidently, they don't think you've had enough briefing so far this morning, so I'll be a before-lunch speaker instead of an after-lunch speaker. And then after lunch we'll have a dialog and have questions and answers.

So, good afternoon and welcome. We're delighted to have you here. I know, as I say, that you've been briefed, and I'll try not to plow the same ground twice and then, after lunch, questions. But first let me just say the United States has and will continue to do everything possible to help head off hostilities between Great Britain and Argentina. We believe a war would not only be tragic for both sides but dangerous for world peace, and we won't falter in our efforts to help prevent that.

We're also working for a budget compromise that doesn't alter or weaken the focus of our economic program. As you know, there've been intensive bipartisan talks over the last several weeks between representatives of the Congress and the White House over the budget. And I'm following those talks with certain amount of interest. They are approaching a climactic stage, and I want to express today my strong hope that they succeed.

We've tried to approach the undertaking in a constructive and conciliatory spirit. We'll continue to do so in the days ahead. It's not just the Congress. It's not just the White House. It's the country as a whole -- millions upon millions of hard-working Americans who need a sound budget. And we must join together to bring down deficits, bring down interest rates, and revive the economy.

I think our program, which is barely 6 months old, goes to the heart of the most deeply ingrained economic problem, that we inherited. Government has been spending and taking too great a percentage of the gross national product for itself. It's been like a ball and chain on economic growth, with taxes so high that personal savings in America have been the lowest of all of the industrial states. So, we haven't had the capital pool we need to fund spending by government and make capital available for home mortgages, for business investment, and so forth.

The one sure way to reduce projected deficits, bring down interest rates, and still encourage growth is to reduce government's share of the gross national product. In other words, reduce the increase in both government spending and taxing. We must shrink Uncle Sam's appetite for credit without preventing the taxpayers from producing and saving more to get our economy moving again.

Tampering with the third year of the tax cut or saying, ``All right, we'll keep that third year, but then we'll increase taxes again in the fourth year and every year after that,'' would inflict major damage on the economy. It would increase the tax bill of families by hundreds of dollars and prevent us from achieving the $260 billion increase in private savings that our tax program is designed to bring about and that we expect by 1984. And it would further weaken the competitive position of U.S. products in the world economy.

We hear so many judgments made about compassion -- who has it and who hasn't. Our administration, I think, has compassion for those in need, but where was the compassion in those bankrupt spending policies that brought the pain of high inflation and interest rates to so many people? Where's the compassion now in raising tax rates again on our people, making it even harder for them to work and compete? For all the talk about our so-called massive tax cut, it will barely offset tax increases that were already built into the system, including the social security tax increases that were passed in 1977. Another installment on that increase went into effect last January, and there are more to come in the years ahead. And they will end up with a great percentage of our working people paying more tax in social security than they are paying in income tax.

Another point -- our tax cut is said by some to favor the rich. Well, that simply isn't true. 74 percent of the tax savings goes to the lower and middle class, who presently are paying 72 percent of the tax. The old system of pushing everyone into higher tax brackets only chased the wealthy into tax shelters and encouraged the growth of the underground economy. By reducing tax rates, we provide incentives to get more Americans back in the mainstream paying taxes again. And we're thinking about having some people going around to encourage them to do that.

When people are permitted to choose between Federal spending cuts or increasing taxes to reduce projected deficits, a big majority, 77 percent in the most recent NBC/AP poll, invariably choose spending cuts. I think the people are sending a message of common sense if we'll just listen.

That's the only way to restore confidence in the money markets for long-term lending. Bring interest rates down more and then keep them down. We've brought them down from 21\1/2\ percent to about 16 percent, but that's not good enough. Inflation has dropped from double digits to an annual rate of 4\1/2\ percent for the last 6 months. And wholesale prices even registered a net decline for the past 2 months.

Our progress on inflation means the cumulative increase in America's purchasing power, which has received little attention. It far outweighs the impact of budget restraint in various programs, which has received so much attention. With cooperation from the Congress on spending, I think we can have a strong recovery.

To all of you in the business you're in and that I started my life out in, I just have to tell you that one lesson I learned very early back then has come in very handy in the years since and even in government. You'll remember, well, not all of you, but some of you back in a day when there was no tape and transcriptions were relatively new, and you put on a drama on radio, the soundman didn't have tape sounds. He had a great big cart on wheels equipped with all sorts of things to make all sorts of sounds. And at the rehearsals of the drama, he would then be experimenting with what would make the sound effect necessary to the drama.

And in WHO, Des Moines, one time in about 2 or 3 days of rehearsal for a radio drama, we watched the sound-effect man, who had to have at one point, an important point in the story, the sound of water falling on a board. And he tried rice on a drum; he tried dried peas on cardboard boxes; he tried everything you can imagine. And finally, desperately, he tried water on a board.

American architects have historically expressed through their work the richness of our heritage and the vitality of our national spirit. They have combined advances in building technology with design innovation to give exciting new forms to our cities. The architectural profession, through its Institute, has been especially vigilant in its stewardship of many of the Nation's architectural treasures, including the monuments, buildings, majestic avenues and green spaces of the Federal City of Washington, D.C.

The President. It's a particular privilege for me to sign this year's proclamation of Law Day, marking the 25th annual observance of the rule of law in America. Any progress that our generation has brought to our people and to the world rests on the foundation of law and justice laid by earlier generations of Americans, beginning with those courageous, far-sighted individuals who two centuries ago had the faith to believe that men and women could live in freedom under law. They also had the wisdom and judgment to craft a system of government in which that faith would not only survive but flourish. In our courts, our Congress, our Federal and State attorneys general and in the private bar, we see daily that law remains the cornerstone of the freedom that we've been given. And we bear a solemn obligation to preserve it.

Our Constitution proclaims that to establish justice shall be among the first of our priorities. And our history since has been replete with great men of law from Webster to Lincoln, Marshall to Holmes, who've played such major roles in our public life.

So, this is the heritage that we honor on May 1st of this year, as we have on the first of May for a quarter of a century. In other parts of the world, May 1st is used for a different kind of celebration -- a forced, unnatural observance of a system that promises a freedom it systematically denies, proclaims justice while practicing tyranny, and uses what it calls law as little more than a thin veneer for the edicts of a totalitarian elite. We can and should be grateful to God that such is not true in America.

The President. I don't know whether any reports have come in yet this morning. I haven't been in the office; I've been over there at another affair that's going on in the State Dining Room. So I'll go in and be finding out now.

The United States serves the world as a model of representative democracy, individual freedom and equal justice for all. These three goals of our Nation, guaranteed by the Constitution and the Bill of Rights and guarded by the dedication of our people, ensure that the United States will continue to be a beacon of liberty to oppressed peoples around the globe.

May 1, 1982, as Law Day U.S.A. and invite the American people to mark the observance with programs that stress the importance of the Constitution to our individual freedoms and our form of government.

I call upon students and teachers at all levels to study and teach the events and documents that led to the adoption of the Constitution in 1787 and its ratification on June 21, 1788, so that the 200th Anniversary of our Constitution might be marked by learned discourse on the history and purpose of this great Charter of Freedom.

Since the end of the Civil War, Memorial Day has been the time when we honor the American men and women who gave up their lives on the field of battle. We do this in recognition of the enormous sacrifice they have made to preserve our liberty and, also, of the responsibility we bear to transmit liberty to future generations.

Memorial Day is an opportunity to remember that those who died in the defense of our country were serving an even higher cause. For all through our history, America has been a beacon to other peoples, serving as a source of political inspiration, a haven for the poor and oppressed, and a friend to nations in distress. Today, as so often in the past, we stand as a guarantor of peace. In full accord with our national ideals and responsibilities, we are prepared to assist countries threatened by economic upheaval or international violence. And we stand ready to work together with other nations to remove the sources of conflict and insecurity and build a firm foundation for peace in the future.

In recognition of those Americans to whom we pay tribute today, the Congress, by joint resolution of May 11, 1950 (64 Stat. 158), has requested the President to issue a proclamation calling upon the people of the United States to observe each Memorial Day as a day of prayer for permanent peace and designating a period on that day when the people of the United States might unite in prayer.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 16th day of April in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Agriculture, America's oldest and most important industry, once required much of the time of most of our people. No more. Now each farm or ranch worker provides enough food and fiber for himself and 77 others here and around the world.

We are blessed with abundance, but we have no guarantees for the future. If we are to be ready to meet expanding markets and world needs for the products of our agricultural bounty, we must search for still better farming methods. We must find ways to control such factors as accidents that erode our productive capacity in agriculture.

While difficult jobs and adverse conditions are a part of farming, accidents need not be. Most farm accidents and occupational illnesses can be prevented or reduced through safe work practices, use of protective equipment, and attention to safety in the rural home, in transportation, and in recreation.

I call upon those who live and work on the nation's farms and ranches to commit themselves to the safe conduct of all their activities, both on and off the job. Also, I urge the people and organizations allied with agriculture to help turn this commitment into reality by supporting personal, group, and community safety efforts in every possible way.

Washington. On this occasion, he expressed his deep personal sorrow and that of all Americans over last Sunday's violence at the hands of a deranged individual in an area sacred to three of the world's great religions.

He reiterated his conviction that the peace of the holy places of Jerusalem must be maintained and confirmed the dedication of the United States to encouraging the conditions necessary for the well-being of all those who draw their spiritual inspiration from that city.

Q. Mr. President, you recently were critical of network coverage of some of your programs, and since we're all in the news and journalism business, I thought maybe you could respond to the question: Is this some sort of a beginning of an attack or an assault on the media?

The President. No, and the thing that you've just asked about -- out in Oklahoma I had met with a group, the publisher and some others from the paper out there, and we were sitting around having a conversation about this. And what I actually protested was that I felt that the news media in general was just creating such a drumbeat of pessimism in this time of recession; that I've always felt that there is a psychological factor in recession, and that if you just keep hammering at this, you add to the recession. You have people that suddenly say, ``Well, I won't buy this or that,'' or ``I won't do what I was going to do because of the fear of it.'' And actually, I think some of this pessimism is -- it can't really be justified as news to constantly, day after day, go out and find some individual, tragic as it is for anyone who's lost a job or is laid off, but to dwell on that and on the individual problems of someone instead of a balanced picture of what is the situation.

For example, bad as this recession is -- and let me say, no one in this room can claim any more of a traumatic feeling about the unemployed than I can, because I was looking for my first job in 1932 in the depths of the Great Depression. And I saw my father lose his job, opening an envelope on Christmas Eve. So, I know the tragedy of unemployment.

But how many people know, for example, that today the basic strength of our economy -- which is going to have to be the factor that brings us back to normal -- is such that today we are almost at a record high in the percentage of people of working age who have jobs in this country? The record was 59 percent, and today 57 percent of the people of working age have jobs, in spite of the high unemployment.

Part of the unemployment is not as much recession as it is the great increase in the people going into the job market and, ladies, I'm not picking on anyone, but because of the increase in women who are working today and two-worker families and so forth.

And that was what I was criticizing. Let's have a little optimism. Let's have some stories, for example, about the ad on the air last night of the automobile dealer here in the vicinity, who's himself, lowering the interest rates to 9\1/2\ percent for people that buy cars at his place. I think free enterprise has got muscle left that can still help.

Q. Mr. President, the U.S. State Department has -- [inaudible] -- Cuba's intervention in the drug, international drug trafficking. Do you think it's possible, Mr. President, to deal with a country, with a government that is dealing in drugs and sending guerrillas to other countries and violating human rights in Cuba?

The President. Well, I don't think we are helping someone who's -- or dealing with someone who's sending guerrillas to other countries and the violation of human rights. I think if that is aimed at the El Salvador thing, I think there are countries there that we're not dealing with who are sending aid and personnel into El Salvador to help that movement. I think the election kind of straightened the record out on El Salvador and what the people there want, and we want to help them get that.

On the drug traffic, this is much more difficult. We are working in cooperation with many governments, countries where we know they are the source of the drug. And they are cooperating with us in trying to stop that traffic. There we have to recognize that our own country does not have completely clean hands. There is a great deal of marijuana produced in the United States. So unless we could be 100 percent able to find and apprehend or do away with that, we would be as much of an offender as some country that is trying as hard as it can to eliminate the drug traffic from its country.

And let me also say this about the drug traffic. We're launching a program here, and have got it started, more than we've ever done before. But I am still of a belief that, while you do your utmost to intercept the drugs, we're not going to lick that problem in our country until we take the customer away from the drugs. The most effective answer is if we can get our young people, particularly, and be successful in convincing them they don't want to go down that road. Instead of trying just to take the drug away from the customer, let's turn the customers off so they don't want the drug.

Q. Mr. President, I'm from South Carolina, and my question relates specifically to that. Recently, your Secretaries of Energy, Commerce, and State sent a letter to Mexico inviting officials there to participate with the United States in a privately owned, nuclear-fueled reprocessing center. Now experts tell us that such a facility is only feasible at the Barnwell facility in South Carolina. So, do you favor using Barnwell in a federally funded or a privately funded nuclear-fuel reprocessing facility?

Q. Two questions. The first one, as you send more money back to the States to be divided up, are you intending to put any strings on it to see that they are divided up on a per capita basis? In North Carolina, for instance, on some of the cuts, they are being distributed per town units.

They're disproportionate on a per capita basis, even though the money is being collected on a per capita basis. And the second one, on the subject of the tuition tax credit that you announced yesterday, how are you going to prevent that from being used to cause functional segregation?

The President. Well, we have a proviso in the legislation we're going to send up that it cannot be used in any way to promote segregation, to answer the last question first. But we recognize also that, as you say, functional could take place. We've discussed this at our own table here.

I don't really believe that's going to turn out to be a problem, because first of all our tuition tax credit is proposed for the lower- and middle-income people. There will be a cap on earning level above which there will be no tuition tax credit.

Second, the overwhelming majority of students in the main private schools or the parochial schools, the religious schools in America, the overwhelming majority come from families with incomes of $25,000 or less. In Chicago, for example, 40 percent of the students in the Catholic schools of Chicago are black. And there seems to be a greater urge on the part of our minority citizens to get that kind of education, because in too many areas the public school system apparently is just not doing the job that they want done for their children. So, we'll make very sure that it cannot be distorted.

The President. Oh, per capita and so forth. I don't know whether -- there are so many categorical grants, block grants, and so forth. And if we're talking about federalism, every provision is going to be made for a pass through from the State level, and it would have to be based on the needs of the various areas. That's being worked on as we continue, and the federalism program isn't dead.

The President. Well, let me say this was also discussed at the table here. I am going to discuss this, because I believe on trips that I make -- I don't know that we could make special trips just to have a news meeting -- but I would think that it would make a great deal of sense when you're in an area to have a press conference in which the national press is not barred -- they can attend -- but limit the questioning to the local and the regional press, who don't ordinarily get the opportunity they get here in Washington.

Falklands, what position that would put us in? You've asked a question that I just can't answer for the simple reason that these negotiations -- now Alexander Haig has arrived; he is down there now in Argentina -- and they're so delicate, and everyone is watching every word that's said, that for me to answer in any way a question of that kind just might upset things that are going on. I'm just going to keep my fingers crossed, and we're making every effort we can to have a peaceful solution to that problem down there. And I just really can't make a statement of any kind that might be misinterpreted or resented by someone involved in the negotiations.

So now -- [applause] -- she'll get mad at me; I just can't do it. I'm sorry. Let me just say, the next time we do this, I'm going to overrule those people that thought I ought to make some remarks, and we'll just give it all to question and answer so we can get all those in.

Corps, and the Secretary of Transportation on behalf of the Coast Guard, to plan for appropriate observances each year, with the Secretary of Defense responsible for soliciting the participation and cooperation of civil authorities and private citizens.

I invite the Governors of the States, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and other areas subject to the jurisdiction of the United States, to provide for the observance of Armed Forces Day within their jurisdiction each year in an appropriate manner designed to increase public understanding and appreciation of the Armed Forces of the United States.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 16th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Throughout our history and particularly in recent years, America's taken on an ever-increasing role as peacemaker -- taking the initiative time after time to try to help countries settle their differences peacefully. I don't need to recite the list of diplomatic efforts spanning all administrations in which we've been instrumental in ending war and restoring peace.

Soviet Union? Well, let us ask them, which country has nearly 100,000 troops trying to occupy the once nonaligned nation of Afghanistan? Which country has tried to crush a spontaneous workers' movement in Poland? And what country has engaged in the most massive arms buildup in history? Or, let's put the question another way. What country helped its World War II enemies back on their feet? What country is employing trade aid and technology to help the developing peoples of the world and actively seeking to bring peace to the Middle East, the South Atlantic, and to southern Africa?

The answer is clear, and it should give us both pride and hope in America. Today, I know there are a great many people who are pointing to the unimaginable horror of nuclear war. I welcome that concern. Those who've governed America throughout the nuclear age and we who govern it today have had to recognize that a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought.

So, to those who protest against nuclear war, I can only say,``I'm with you.'' Like my predecessors, it is now my responsibility to do my utmost to prevent such a war. No one feels more than I the need for peace.

Throughout the first half of my lifetime, the entire world was engaged in war, or in recovering from war, or in preparing for war. Since the end of World War II, there's not been another world conflict. But there have been and are wars going on in various other parts of the world.

This stretch of 37 years since World War II has been the result of our maintaining a balance of power between the United States and the Soviet Union and between the strategic nuclear capabilities of either side. As long as this balance has been maintained, both sides have been given an overwhelming incentive for peace.

In the 1970's, the United States altered that balance by, in effect, unilaterally restraining our own military defenses while the Soviet Union engaged in an unprecedented buildup of both its conventional and nuclear forces.

As a result, the military balance which permitted us to maintain the peace is now threatened. If steps are not taken to modernize our defense, the United States will progressively lose the ability to deter the Soviet Union from employing force or threats of force against us and against our allies.

It would be wonderful if we could restore our balance with the Soviet Union without increasing our own military power. And ideally, it would be a long step in ensuring peace if we could have significant and verifiable reductions of arms on both sides. But let's not fool ourselves. The Soviet Union will not come to any conference table bearing gifts. Soviet negotiators will not make unilateral concessions. To achieve parity, we must make it plain that we have the will to achieve parity by our own effort.

Many have been attracted to the idea of a nuclear freeze. Now, that would be fine if we were equal in strategic capability. We're not. We cannot accept an agreement which perpetuates current disparities.

Since World War II, the United States has attempted to get Soviet agreement to such reductions countless times. We began back when we alone had such weapons. We were never able to persuade the Soviet Union to join in such an understanding, even when we proposed turning all nuclear material and information over to an international body and when we were the only nation that had nuclear weapons.

We're preparing a new arms reduction effort with regard to strategic nuclear forces and are already in negotiations in Geneva on intermediate-range missiles threatening Europe. Our objective in these talks is for the elimination of such missiles on the strategic nuclear forces. We will aim on those at substantial reductions on both sides leading to equal and verifiable limits.

Two weeks ago, President Reagan expressed his sincere hope that President Brezhnev would join him this June in addressing the United Nations Special Session on Disarmament. President Reagan also said that he would look forward to a meeting with President Brezhnev in that context.

This visit couldn't take place at a more appropriate moment. Today marks the 200th anniversary of the establishment of diplomatic relations between our countries. We're delighted that you honor us with your visit, Your Majesty, a visit that coincides with this historic occasion.

The bonds between our two peoples represent the longest unbroken, peaceful relationship that we have had with any other nation. When we were seeking our independence 200 years ago, your country was one of the first to which our forefathers turned. At that time the Netherlands was a bastion of freedom and tolerance on the European continent, having fought its own long and costly war for independence.

John Adams, who later was to become our second President, was dispatched to your country and reported, ``The origins of the two republics are so much alike that the history of one seems but a transcript from that of the other.'' This parallel course did not end with the birth of our Republic.

Today we recognize not only the 200th anniversary of our relations but also the lasting imprint your country has made on America. Your Majesty, who can forget that New York was first New Amsterdam? Later, Dutch families helped settle the frontier, and investors from the Netherlands played an indispensable role in producing the American economic miracle. Even today, our citizens build upon this heritage, remaining a major source of foreign investment capital for each other, interacting peacefully and constructively in mutually beneficial commerce.

Few nations have had the good will that is the hallmark of the relations between the United States and the Netherlands. Our shared values extend beyond the commercial vigor that built our standard of living that developed in both our countries -- a respect for the rights of the individual, a recognition of human dignity more valuable than wealth generated by commerce industry, and a desire for peace more powerful than a tyrant's threat.

In only a few places on this planet do people enjoy the treasures of liberty and tranquility. Those who do must be ever mindful of the cost of such well-being. If totalitarian nations are permitted to achieve military superiority, liberty and peace will depend only on the good will of tyrants.

Your Majesty, as we stood and heard the cannons welcome you a moment ago, I couldn't help but think back to the early years of our fledgling Republic. In 1776, shortly after we'd declared our independence, a tiny American fighting ship sailed into the Dutch port of St. Eustatius in the Windward Islands of the Caribbean, our new nation's flag flying proudly on the mast. No powerful government had yet recognized us. But the cannons of the Dutch fort bellowed out the first foreign salute to the American flag flown by a naval vessel. Today we return the honor.

In a certain sense, we can regard our visit as a milestone on a journey that started some 200 years ago, the end of which is not yet in sight. Many Dutch people have also taken part in this journey to the New World. Hundreds of thousands have come to this great country to settle and build up a new future. Others have come to seal the bonds of friendship. My grandmother did so in 1942, when our countries were joining hands to preserve freedom for the world and human dignity for mankind. In 1952 my mother came here to pay tribute to what the United States had done for us during the Second World War and in the subsequent period of reconstruction.

Now, as we jointly celebrate 200 years of uninterrupted diplomatic relations, we pause to reflect on the support our peoples have given each other since the very beginnings of this great and proud nation, both in times of danger and in times of joy. We have looked forward to this official visit, which we realize will be altogether too short to cover such a vast area as the United States of America. We welcome the opportunity to become better acquainted with the American people later this year when my husband and I will be touring, in an official visit, to mark the bicentennial and celebrate, again, our very good relations.

Day. It marks the beginnings of our state visit today, a promising beginning and an appropriate moment to dwell on the value of our lasting friendship, of the very good ties between the United States and the Netherlands in the past, in the present, and in the future.

On January 22, 1981, I directed Executive departments and agencies to reduce obligations for advisory committees by five percent for 1981. I am pleased to report that this effort achieved a reduction of ten percent during the past year. Believing that there are further opportunities for more cost-effective management of advisory committees, I plan shortly to direct actions throughout the Executive Branch which will result in additional savings of approximately ten percent for 1982.

The President today announced that he has appointed Melvin L. Bradley to be Special Assistant to the President. Mr. Bradley has been serving as Senior Consultant to the Office of Policy Development. His primary responsibility will be to work with the Office of Policy Development staff to assure that policy analyses for the President are sensitive to the needs and priorities of the minority and disadvantaged communities. He will report directly to the Assistant to the President for Policy Development, Dr. Edwin L. Harper.

Assistant to the President. Mr. Gunn will serve as Assistant Director for Commerce and Trade within the Office of Policy Development. He will also serve as Executive Secretary of the Cabinet Council on Commerce and Trade.

He was a member of the Republican National Committee's Advisory Council on Economic Affairs and Subcommittee on Tax Policy and Monetary Affairs. He is a member of the board of directors of the New Coalition for Economic and Social Change and a member of the advisory board of the Lincoln Institute for Research and Education.

Assistant to the President. Mr. Baroody is Director of Public Affairs at the White House, with responsibility for public affairs coordination between the White House and various domestic departments and agencies, as well as the operation of a central information and research center to serve the White House staff. The Public Affairs Office is part of the Department of Communications at the White House.

During the Presidential transition, Ms. Bistany was deputy to the administrator of the transition team. Prior to that she served in a variety of capacities in the Reagan/Bush campaign and the Reagan for President campaign, dating back to October 1979.

Ms. Bistany received her M.A. from the University of Kentucky and completed extensive postgraduate study at the University of Cincinnati and the Neuropsychiatric Institute, UCLA, in the area of clinical behavior management. She was born and raised in New York City.

The history of our two countries will undoubtedly record that on this date, the 200th anniversary of our diplomatic relations, the Queen of the Netherlands was our guest at a state dinner in the White House. We thank the Dutch people for sharing you with us. You're the third successive Queen of the Netherlands to grace our Nation's Capital. We look forward to many such visits from you and from your heirs, because if any friendship is lasting and true, it is the one between our two peoples.

When thinking of this, images come to mind of Henry Hudson, in 1609, sailing up the river that now bears his name, of pilgrims embarking at Delfshaven bound for America after living 12 years in Holland, of the Dutch West India Company buying Manhattan Island and laying the foundation for a magnificent city of commerce, and of sturdy Dutch pioneers breaking ground for new farms in our Midwest.

Your Majesty, three American Presidents were of Dutch ancestry. And I'll bet that doesn't surprise you, either. Martin Van Buren, Theodore Roosevelt, and Franklin Roosevelt. Their contributions are well known. But countless lesser-known men and women of Dutch ancestry composed the building stones of America. If we were successful in creating a free and prosperous society of which we're rightfully proud, we must be thankful for the part played by our kindred spirits from the Netherlands, people who believed in hard work and who valued freedom. That's the spirit that built America, a spirit that citizens of Dutch ancestry helped instill in the American character.

Rembrandt, one of your great artists, showed the world new uses of light to add depth and meaning to painting. Similarly the Dutch, with uncompromising devotion to liberty, have been a light and inspiration to Americans, even in the depth of their darkest hours.

Our friendship, cemented in time and blood, is not taken lightly here. On this 200th anniversary of our fraternity, let us again pledge that we will meet the future together -- two nations dedicated to peace, faithful to the cause of human liberty, and confident that right will prevail.

The Queen. Mr. President, my husband and I would like to thank you most sincerely for your warm words of welcome. We greatly appreciated the cordial reception given to us by your country, which has highlighted the special nature of the ties of friendship uniting our two nations.

The theory that a people could liberate themselves from their sovereign if he abused his powers was clearly formulated when the Dutch rose in revolt against their king, the King of Spain, in the 16th century. This was the conviction which was echoed in your historic Declaration of Independence two centuries later.

In 1780 we allied ourselves with you in your fight for freedom, alongside France and Spain. We were the second country to officially recognize the United States of America -- not entirely without self-interest, I'm afraid -- Dutch bankers provided you with the financial aid so desperately needed -- [laughter] -- in the period of rehabilitation following the War of Independence.

Netherlands, felt oppressed in the Old World and set their hopes on the New. It was their hard work and resourcefulness, coupled with the efforts of the descendants of the early colonists, that soon made the United States one of the strongest powers of the world.

The memory of that great statesman with his sense of social justice is cherished and honored by innumerable Dutch people. Nor do they forget what they owe to his courageous successor, President Truman, and to President Eisenhower.

It was also your country that helped us restore our shattered economy. I have in mind, of course, the Marshall plan, that brilliant example of American statesmanship -- statesmanship, above all, because the plan did not seek to impose a pattern of its own but respected the values cherished in Europe, and because it was based on the understanding that helping others to help themselves is in the long run the most effective form of aid, thereby serving best the purposes of both donor and recipient.

We in the Netherlands undoubtedly owe a great deal to the United States. The spirit of enterprise, of daring, of constant innovation is a feature of American life that has always been an inspiration to others.

Let us set our sights on the ideal of a just and humane society for all mankind. We cannot achieve this without standing up for freedom and respect for human rights. These ideals should constitute the theme underlying our mutual cooperation.

I need hardly add, however, that it is only natural, in view of our long and eventful histories, that our two nations should play the theme in different variations. While recognizing that the stress should be on unity, especially in times of adversity, I regard pluraformity, also within our North Atlantic partnership, as natural and meaningful.

The partnership would not benefit from uncritical, mutual admiration. Assuming that the dialog between the countries is inspired by honest motives and based on mutual trust, we must continue to listen to one another.

Whatever our differences, there is infinitely more that binds our peoples together. We have become partners of our own free will. Above all, let us not underestimate the strength that can emanate from a union that succeeds in safeguarding both external and internal freedom.

May I ask you all to raise your glasses and drink to the health and happiness of the President of the United States of America and Mrs. Reagan, to the good fortune and prosperity of the American people, and to our good relations and centuries-long friendship.

Good afternoon, and welcome to the White House. And I just said outside -- before I make the remarks that I have intended to make, it might be appropriate to mention I received yesterday an Easter greeting -- small, obviously handmade, and artistically done -- and particularly when you consider that it probably had to be done in secret, and then smuggled out of where it was done. It was from internees in one of the prison camps in Poland today. And it contained a message of thanks to us for what we're trying to do in their behalf. And I thought it was a pretty good reminder at this particular season that the things that bring us together here are still possible in the world.

I understand many of you just arrived in here from the [Capitol] Rotunda. Our gatherings today -- at the Rotunda, here in the White House, and in meetings across the land -- reflect the magnitude of what has brought us together. Thirty-seven years ago, as the conflagration in Europe drew to a close, our eyes were opened to a new tragedy of such proportion that even now we can't grasp the horror of it. There were millions of victims of the Holocaust. Such vast figures have a way of blinding us to the humanity behind the numbers.

Today, perhaps for a moment, we should think of those who are not with us. We miss these people, though we were never permitted to know them. God understands how different, I'm sure -- and only God -- our lives would be had they been permitted to live.

Marrisha Eisenstadt was the daughter of a director of the Warsaw Synagogue. We're told her voice was so beautiful that she was called the ``Nightingale of the Ghetto.'' And she was killed during the liquidations, and we'll never know the comfort of her song.

And Hana Senesh, originally from Hungary, made it safely to Israel. And she courageously parachuted back into Hungary in hopes of saving others, and instead she, herself, was a victim. She left behind some of her poetry. But not enough -- not nearly enough.

And then there was Moses Flinker, a 16-year-old Dutch boy. His diary tells us that while he was in hiding he decided he would become a statesman in Israel when the war was over. He wrote that after making the decision to go into politics he decided to study Arabic. Why? Well, he knew that Israel would have to live in peace with its neighbors, and he wanted to possess the skills necessary to help in that task.

We fervently pray that the return of the Sinai will be accepted for what it is -- a magnificent act of faith by Israel for the sake of peace. It's a noble expression by a people who've suffered so much.

The United States is grateful for this step which reinforces our firm commitment to Israel's security. Today we're reminded that we must be sensitive to the history of a people whose country was reborn from the ashes of the Holocaust -- a country that rightfully never takes its security or its survival for granted. With this in mind, all peace-loving people should applaud Israel and Egypt for what they have done.

We of today must choose how we will respond to the Holocaust. Let us tell the world that we will struggle against the darker side of human nature; that with God's help, goodness will prevail and those who lost their lives will not be forgotten.

During the dark years when the world began to realize what was happening, there were those among us -- heroes who risked their lives trying to save people, often total strangers from the camps. In Assisi, Italy, for example, almost the entire population risked their lives hiding Jews throughout the town.

And some years ago when I was in Denmark to celebrate the Raybill's Society Fourth of July celebration, the largest celebration of the Fourth of July, our American holiday, outside the United States, and I learned there how in the Nazi occupation of Denmark, when the order came out for the Danes to turn in their Jewish neighbors, the next day every Dane appeared on the street wearing a Star of David.

But the one man who I think must be remembered above all was Raoul Wallenberg. One such man, at incredible risk, saved tens of thousands. And on this day of remembrance let us especially recall this man, and if he's alive, as some suggest, let his captors know they'll be forgotten long before Raoul Wallenberg is forgotten.

Let us also bear in mind on this special day that the entire human family now faces the threat of a different kind of holocaust -- a nuclear holocaust. May the remembrance of past victims of man's inhumanity to man strengthen our resolve to seek a just and peaceful world for ourselves and our posterity.

It's my fervent plea that -- and hope that from these meetings there will soon come a balanced, bipartisan package that will help to revive our economy. And I think the economy is now poised for a recovery. Inflation has fallen sharply, and I hope we'll have more good news on that front this Friday. There's also evidence that interest rates are softening. I know of nothing that would be a greater tonic for the economy right now than for the Congress and the White House to come together on a plan that would lower the deficits and create new jobs.

This morning I met with the Republican leadership in the Congress and then later spoke by phone with Speaker Tip O'Neill. To both of them I delivered the same message: So long as we can reach consensus on a budget plan that is balanced and commands bipartisan support, I'm personally prepared to go the extra mile.

The President. Well, those are the very things that I know the group is discussing, but I am going to reserve the position I think I should -- and that is not to comment on the specifics in what they're talking about until they come with a consensus on a balanced program.

Q. But, Mr. President, how can you agree to any kind of tax increases without violating your ``no tax increase'' pledge, even if it's a surtax combined with a minimum income tax or some kind of energy tax?

The President. Well, now, wait a minute. I think, if you'll remember, always I pointed out that there were areas for changes in the taxes, government revenue, that we would seek, that in some instances were correcting unjustified tax breaks and so forth. And I've always emphasized that what I'm talking about is that tax program of ours which is based on providing an incentive, both for individuals and business -- the business tax cuts, the across-the-board, 3-year cuts in personal income tax.

Secretary Haig has been working almost around the clock for all these days since we sent him down there to Argentina and doing a magnificent job of trying to bring these -- to bring about a position that both countries could subscribe to. The Argentinians made some proposals that were then forwarded to the United Kingdom -- some changes in things that had been discussed before.

The President. I have never suggested that our party members should stop giving to that fund. I think that fund is an essential if we're going to maintain our lead in the Senate and have a majority in the Senate. And I'm not punishing or disciplining anyone. I want the contributions made to that committee.

Q. Sir, if Speaker O'Neill refuses to meet with you and a compromise is not forthcoming, would you be willing to submit your budget package as it stands before the House for a straight up-or-down vote?

The President. Well, it could come to that if they refuse to cooperate on the other side. But I think that the best answer that we could give today that would reinstill confidence in the people and in the money market would be to come with a balanced program that both sides could subscribe to. And that's why, as I've indicated when I said ``go the last mile,'' that I am willing to meet on that basis because of the value that I think there would be in that.

Democratic representatives who have been a part of this discussion group, and he's meeting with them this afternoon. And, of course, I can always hold him to the clock. He told me once that after 6 o'clock we're friends, so I might just invite my friend over.

The President. No, it is not. He's done a magnificent job. And let me just lay one thing to rest now regarding some of the rumors that have gone on. This idea of whether or not we've endangered any prestige of ours in doing what we've done -- I think we would have lost prestige if we had not been willing to undertake this job of trying to broker an agreement between these two parties and forestall violence. And however it may turn out, my only regret would be if it didn't work.

The President. Well, I don't think that it's a case of one of us asking the other or not. I think -- and there's no way to project whether it'll be this week. It's when that group that is meeting comes to both of us and says that they have a consensus on a package that they believe is balanced and merits now our taking a look at it from the standpoint of getting together.

The President. I have to be heart and soul in sympathy with the people that are talking about the horrors of nuclear war and the fact that we should do everything we could to prevent such a war from happening. As a matter of fact, it's my understanding the leader of Ground Zero, however, does not believe in the freeze.

I would hope that some of these people, however, who are insisting on some of these things would realize that I'm with them as to the need to do something to lessen the possibilities of nuclear war. But I would also ask them to consider that no matter how sincere and well intentioned, only in this position do you have all the facts necessary to base decisions on action.

And, therefore, I would ask their trust and confidence that feeling as sincerely as I do, the same as they feel, that they would allow us to take the actions that we think are necessary to lessen this threat.

Now, with regard to Mr. Brezhnev, I would still hope that he would come, because it is arms reduction that is being discussed at the United Nations in June. And I would hope that he would find it possible to be there and that we could have a meeting -- but not in any sense that that would replace a later summit meeting, full summit meeting, in which there would be adequate preparation on both sides for such a meeting.

The President. Well, whatever the time is. We'll just wait. So far all we know is what he said in the paper. And, you know, not speaking of the American press, but that foreign press -- sometimes you have to worry about whether they can be depended on.

Appropriation Authorization Act, 1979. That section requires me to provide the Congress with my conclusions with respect to the survivability, cost effectiveness, and combat effectiveness of any new ship requested for the combatant forces; a recommendation whether the ship should be nuclear or conventionally powered; and the reasons for my conclusions and recommendations.

The ships are considered to be cost effective in relation to the various missions they are to perform. In determining cost effectiveness, consideration is given to several factors, including alternative power systems and alternative weapons systems that may be used to accomplish the missions of the ship and the fact that it is difficult to prorate the total cost of a ship among all of the missions it is designed to perform. Cost effectiveness is considered acceptable for the continuing programs requested for fiscal years 1983 and 1984 because the ships can accomplish their primary missions and because nonrecurring costs have been incurred and production is underway. The Amphibious Assault (LHD - 1) Class ship will be based on the LHA - 1 Class hull design, of which five are in the Fleet. Conventionally powered propulsion systems are planned for the AEGIS Cruiser (CG - 47), the Fleet Guided Missile Frigate (FFG), the LSD - 41, and the LHD - 1 Class ships since these systems are adequate for these ships to accomplish their missions and have lower procurement costs.

Compared to the ships now in the Fleet, class for class, the ships in this authorization request are more survivable. Survivability in this sense is measured by the ability of each ship to defend itself as well as the ability to withstand hits when confronted with existing and projected threats.

Nuclear power is proposed for three of the ship types for which authorization is requested. They are the submarines and the aircraft carriers. In view of sizing requirements and the higher investment cost of nuclear powered ships, I believe that nuclear power should be limited to those ships for which clear benefits are derived. Hence, I recommend that these ships be nuclear powered and that the others be conventionally powered.

Science and technology are essential to the accomplishment of the goals of this Administration and the needs of the American people for jobs, enhanced national security, increased international competitiveness, and better health and quality of life. The continued advancement of both theoretical and applied scientific knowledge is of vital importance to continued human progress and the resolution of the complex problems facing the world in the years ahead.

This Report emphasizes the important role of the Federal government in supporting our scientific enterprise. But it also emphasizes that some things can best be done by the private sector. I believe that together we will be able to harness science and technology to meet the needs and aspirations of all our people.

The culmination of your naval career as Deputy Director of Central Intelligence has been especially significant for my administration. Your leadership and wise counsel in our efforts to rebuild the U.S. Intelligence Community have been instrumental in the successes we have achieved.

You leave the Intelligence Community in a strengthened and enhanced posture, far better equipped to deal with the many emergencies we face as a nation than when you assumed your position. I am sincerely grateful that you consented to serve and thank you for a job well done.

As you know, because of the expressed need for my experience in helping Director Casey organize, re-orient and begin rebuilding the capabilities of the CIA and the rest of the Intelligence Community, I reluctantly accepted your request last year that I serve as the Deputy Director of Central Intelligence. I believe that initial challenge has been met and that it is now time that I move on to fresh challenges. Accordingly, I would be grateful if you would accept my resignation from assignment as the Deputy Director of Central Intelligence.

Subject to your desires, I will remain in place until my successor has been confirmed, but would hope, for family reasons, that that process can be completed prior to the end of the summer. In the absence of another active duty assignment, which I do not anticipate, I will separately request retirement from military service via the Secretary of the Navy, effective on the first of the month following confirmation of my successor.

Community over the years ahead will rank as one of the major contributions of your first term. I count myself fortunate to have had a small part in that undertaking. I have every confidence that you will sustain the necessary flow of people and resources to complete the rebuilding in the years ahead. You and Director Casey have my best wishes for continued success.

Mr. Conn. Mr. President, I want you to note that we brought this discus with us. It was used by the U.S. Paralympic team during the first competition of the U.S. team in Rome in 1960. We would be very honored, sir, on the occasion of this kickoff, if you would sign it for us at your leisure, and we would like to have it permanently ensconced in the National Wheelchair Athletic Hall of Fame.

Paralympic Board of Directors we are honored and pleased that you have accepted the honorary chairmanship of the VIIth Paralympic Games to be held at the University of Illinois in 1984. These games are traditionally held in the same host country as our able-bodied games are. They have been since 1960. Your endorsement and support lends meaning and purpose and certainly encourages the thousands of men and women that compete in wheelchair sports. These men and women are truly athletes in the true sense of the word, and for this I'm honored and privileged to present to you this scroll in your role as honorary chairman of the VIIth Paralympic Games.

I know something about and have heard about the prowess of our basketball players here in the first two of the Paralympics, and I'm very pleased that they finally are going to be held here. I did not understand at the time that they were always held in the same country as the other Olympics.

Wheelchair Athletic Association and what the Paralympics have done and achieved so much and done it without relying on government support or even suggesting such a thing. And I know how many of those who've performed in these athletic contests have gone on from this to challenging jobs.

Thank you, Jane and Dr. Hardison and friends of the Folger. I don't know; you've brought back a little nostalgia. I could date myself completely and tell you that once in college I played in ``Taming of the Shrew'' done in modern costume, and my wardrobe was plus-four knickers.

In the ``Merchant of Venice,'' Shakespeare wrote of a small candle and of how far it throws its beams. And as we look about us in this troubled world, with its tensions and complexities, a collection of literature and art -- however rare and great -- may seem a very small candle indeed.

This light that you sustain throws its beams across our land, adding to the perspective, understanding, and character of our people. All Americans can be proud that the finest collection of Shakespeare's work is on this side of the Atlantic. It belongs to mankind, but it's possessed and cared for by us, through the Folger Library. Henry and Emily Folger's gift of 50 years ago is today a priceless treasure which must be preserved and enlarged, as the inheritance of Americans, in generations to come.

You've worked hard and contributed much so that the Folger may maintain its high standards despite growing financial pressures, and for that the country thanks you. But just as important has been your dedication to sharing the Folger treasures with all of our people -- the constantly changing exhibits of the library and the excellence of Folger Theatre productions serve not only Washingtonians but the thousands of our countrymen who visit here every year.

Your decision to take exhibits on tour around the country, however, represents perhaps your finest undertaking. As your collection moves from one of our cities to the next, millions more will be able to share at firsthand this wealth that is their heritage.

It's been said that a true classic enriches the human mind, augments its treasures, and pushes mankind forward another step. Think of the riches bound in the volume upon volume of classics in your charge.

Someone once pointed out to me that all the complexities and the troubles of the world -- and yet there at hand, simply by opening the covers of books, we could find from the past the answers to every one of the problems that beset us, if we would only turn to them and heed those words.

I'm grateful for the honors that you have given me this afternoon and wish you continued success in bringing another 50 years of insight and enlightenment to our people. And, Jane, even if it isn't pure gold -- [referring to the key to the library] -- if it was, Dave Stockman would have gotten it by now -- [laughter] -- this ensures that I can keep it, and I thank you all very much. Thank you.

Sec. 4. General. (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other Executive order, the responsibilities of the President under the Federal Advisory Committee Act, as amended, except that of reporting annually to the Congress, which are applicable to the Task Force established by this Order, shall be performed by the Attorney General in accordance with guidelines and procedures established by the Administrator of General Services.

John Ashbrook was a man of courage and principle. He served his constituents and his country with dedication and devotion, always working toward the betterment of his fellow man. His patriotism and deep belief in the greatness of America never wavered, and his articulate and passionate calls for a return to old-fashioned American values earned him the respect of all who knew him.

I'd like to talk about three items today, beginning with taxes. About 10 days ago we all kept our rendezvous with the Internal Revenue Service and anted up our income tax. If it'll help ease the pain, let me remind you that in about 2 months, on July 1st, you'll start paying 10 percent less income tax on what you earn.

But that won't mean anything to a growing group of citizens who've already given themselves a tax cut. It's estimated that about $95 billion in income tax is not being paid. That's enough to balance the budget.

Now, if your first reaction was that these are big money operators using tax shelters -- and there are some doing that -- I'm not talking about them. The $95 billion is tax owed on an estimated $450 billion in, for want of a better word, the underground economy. The people in this economy are, I'm sure, honest people in most of their activities; they just have a double standard where taxes are concerned. They can be the friendly neighborhood fix-it man, a mechanic, craftsman, or a member of the professions. They have one thing in common -- they prefer to be paid in cash.

Item two: A short time ago, I announced I was asking Congress to pass a bill allowing a tuition tax credit for families sending children to independent or parochial schools. The credit would be for half the tuition up to a ceiling of $500 per child. That ceiling wouldn't apply until 1985. It would be lower to start with and would only apply to families with adjusted gross incomes below $50,000 a year. It would also only be for tuition to elementary and secondary schools. I wish it could be for college, also, but maybe we can do that later when we've solved a few problems.

The public school lobby has protested that this is an attack on the public schools for the benefit of students attending exclusive finishing or prep schools. Well, the overwhelming majority of so-called private schools are church-supported -- Catholic, Protestant, and Jewish. The majority of students are from families earning less than $25,000. In some of our large cities, 40 percent of the parochial school students are from minority neighborhoods. Their families pay their full share of taxes to fund the public schools. How high would those taxes go for everyone if those parents decided to send their children to public schools? I think they're entitled to some relief since they're supporting two school systems and only using one.

And now item three: A couple of weeks ago, I told you of how high interest rates were holding back recovery, that a lender must get a return on his money, plus the rate of inflation. For 6 months, inflation has been running at an annualized rate of only 3.2 percent. And, as you know, last month it actually went down three-tenths of 1 percent, the first time in 17 years.

Two industries vital to economic recovery have been especially hard hit by high interest rates -- automobiles and housing. But it seems not everyone out there in the marketplace is afraid. The Automobile Dealers Association of Eastern Ohio asked some banks to lower interest rates for new car purchases. The rates were lowered from a 16- to 18-percent level down to 12.9 percent for a 2-week period, March 1st to 13th. The response was so overwhelming they extended the period to March 20th. In the first 3 weeks of February, car dealers of the Youngstown-Warren area had only sold 344 cars and trucks. In those first 20 days in March, they sold 2,200.

Disney, chairman of the First National Bank and Trust, lowered interest rates almost four points for loans to buy cars and trucks, making $2 million available for that purpose. His offer has met with the same overwhelming response. Mr. Disney says the offer is good as long as the $2 million lasts.

I have no way of knowing how far this idea has spread. But one of the major automobile companies which has its own lending operation is now advertising that until May 31st the interest rate on loans for their cars and trucks will be 12.8 percent. And just the other day, the news reported something similar had started in home mortgages.

Peninsula and the reestablishment there of full Egyptian sovereignty. The President believes that withdrawal represents a truly major sacrifice by Israel, and he admires its courage in taking the great risks which true peace requires. He admires as well the courageous Egyptian initiative without which peace with Israel would not have been achieved.

Israel and Egypt, peaceful relations which should be taken by us all as the model for the future in that troubled region. The President is determined that the United States, together with Egypt and Israel, will continue to pursue the course of peace, under Camp David, with renewed vigor and dedication. It will not be an easy task but, with the example of Egypt and Israel before us, it can be achieved.

U.S. Chamber under his leadership, together with your State and local chambers. Thank you all for all you're doing. Our administration deeply appreciates your decisive contributions to helping us as we try to get this country back on track.

Now, some may wonder, what does an organization do for an encore after it increases its membership fivefold in 7 years, creates an army of grassroots support, sets up its own magazine, newspaper, and radio and television shows? Well, if I could make a suggestion, our administration has a few unfinished small problems -- about $400 billion worth on Capitol Hill we'd love to have your help on. I think you will help us, just like you did before.

What you are doing here, the tremendous growth that you've recently enjoyed, all underscores a truth too often ignored in Washington: The most powerful force for progress in this world doesn't come from government elites, public programs, or even precious resources like oil or gold. True wealth comes from the heart, from the treasure of ideas and spirit, from the investments of millions of brave people with hope for the future, trust in their fellow men, and faith in God.

But the societies which achieve the most spectacular progress in the shortest period of time are not the most tightly controlled, the biggest in size, or the wealthiest in material resources. They are societies that reward initiative and believe in the magic of the marketplace.

Trust the people -- that's the secret weapon. Only when people are free to worship, create, and build, only when they can decide their destiny and benefit from their own risks -- only then do societies become dynamic, prosperous, progressive, and free.

America has always done well when we had the courage to believe in ourselves, our values, and our capacity to perform great deeds. We got into trouble when we listened to those who insisted that making government bigger would make America bigger. Big government, they told us, was the wave of the future, and anyone who stood in their way was a reactionary.

Thomas Jefferson was no reactionary, he was a true progressive when he warned, the only safe depository of the ultimate powers of society are with the people themselves. The 10th amendment tells us the Federal Government will do only those things called for in the Constitution, and all others shall remain with the States or with the people.

We've strayed much too far from that noble beginning. The whole purpose of our Revolution -- personal freedom, equality of opportunity, and keeping government close to the people -- is threatened by a Federal spending machine that takes too much money from the people, too much authority from State and local governments, and too much liberty with our Constitution.

Winston Churchill said that some see private enterprise as a predatory target to be shot, others as a cow to be milked, but few see it as the sturdy horse pulling the wagon. Well, this administration believes the workers, savers, investors, and entrepreneurs of America have been milked and shot at long enough.

With your help, we're ending a long night of government blundering and making an historic new beginning. Yes, we are in a painful recession. The unemployed are living a tragedy. I want nothing more than to see them working again, and I'm convinced the course we've embarked on offers the best hope. I certainly won't accept the idea that a program which began after the recession was already underway is somehow responsible for that recession.

I hope we can reach a fair and bipartisan budget compromise. And I'll go an extra mile to reach an understanding with Members of the Congress on both sides of the aisle, as long as there is a commitment to three essential priorities as maintained: continued rebuilding of our national defense; continued commitment to tax incentives; and a long-term effort to reduce the Federal Government's share of the gross national product. This means getting this budget under control once and for all.

Those who are participating in the budget discussions will be meeting again early this week. I hope they'll continue to put aside partisan advantage and strive for what is necessary and what is right. A fair and bipartisan budget package, agreed to by Speaker O'Neill, Majority Leader Baker and I, will help speed our economic recovery. And I think we should get on with it.

Our administration promised a program of tax incentives so industry could retool and families could save again for their future. We've kept that promise with the first decent tax reduction in nearly 20 years.

To those who say our tax cut will significantly increase projected deficits, let me point out: Our tax cut first has to offset the tax increases already built into the system, including the social security tax increases, the largest single tax increase in our history. Americans now shoulder the highest tax burden in peacetime history, and there are a couple more increases in that social security payroll tax yet to be applied.

If higher taxes are the key to reducing deficits, why did a $300 billion tax increase between 1976 and 1981 leave us with $318 billion in deficits? I think you know why. We didn't pile up a trillion dollar debt because we're not taxed enough, we have that debt because government spends too much.

And what specifics can be given to support the repeated charge that our tax cut favors the wealthy? Seventy-four percent of the tax savings goes to the lower and middle-class who presently pay 72 percent of the tax. May I just say, in the quest for economic literacy, high tax rates don't soak the rich, they only create more tax shelters or an outright capital drain. Reducing high tax rates provides incentives to get more people paying taxes again. Just as important, we preserve one of the few systems left on Earth where people at the bottom of the ladder can still get rich. That's what America should be all about. From now on, more of what people earn belongs to them.

Now, it's true that our program, just 6 months old, has not solved all the economic problems we inherited. As Don Kendall pointed out, our administration did not have the luxury of starting out with about 6-percent interest rates, such as we had back in 1977. We were left with interest rates of 21\1/2\ percent, the highest in more than a century. And inflation in '77 was only about half what it was running in January of '81.

Now, some in the media have been telling us here in the trenches that the business community questions the wisdom of our program. I'm sure you can understand how hard this is on our morale. [Laughter] Since the Chamber represents a great cross section of the business community, I wondered if I might ask you a few questions?

Would you agree that by trying to hold down runaway spending, by trying to control those so-called budget items we've been told are uncontrollable, that we are doing the right thing and should stick with it? [Applause] Thank you.

Every time personal tax rates go higher, it becomes more difficult for firms to compete in world markets. It now costs $1.70 just to compensate a worker for each dollar increase in the cost of living. Instead of workers and management trying to solve this problem by opposing each other, why not join forces and help us get government off your backs so you can get on with the task of saving American jobs, rebuilding our economy, and raising the standard of living of all our people?

With your personal initiative, ingenuity, and industry and responsibility, we can make America work again. You know we can. But as we rebuild this blessed land, we'll need that extra dimension of faith, friendship, and brotherhood that makes us good neighbors, good people, and makes America a great country.

I believe standing up for America also means standing up for the God who has so blessed this land. We've strayed so far, it may be later than we think. There's a hunger in our land to see traditional values reflected in public policy again.

To those who cite the first amendment as reason for excluding God from more and more of our institutions and everyday life, may I just point out, the first amendment of the Constitution was not written to protect the people of this country from religious values -- it was written to protect religious values from government tyranny.

One of America's greatest strengths is our tradition of neighbor caring for neighbor in times of trouble. We've launched a nationwide campaign to encourage citizens to join with us to determine where need exists and then organize community volunteer groups to meet those needs. A great challenge, and all the more reason to have as Chairman of our Task Force on Private Sector Initiatives, an individual we both know is an outstanding leader -- Bill Verity, your own chairman a year ago.

Now, Bill and I aren't asking you to take over the social welfare system. We're just asking that you give generously of your time, your know-how, and your imagination to help Americans help themselves. Many of you already do. When we say Chamber of Commerce, what comes to mind?

National Bank & Trust of Plainfield, Indiana. They recently lowered the interest rates on new car loans, which were between 16 and 18 percent, to between 12\3/4\ and 13 percent, and committed between them millions of dollars to these programs. In the first few weeks, the sale of new cars increased to several times what had been the monthly average. The bankers involved said, ``The financial sector has to pitch in and help,'' so we can get the economy moving again.

America. But as you know, America is more the exception than the rule around the globe. Now, some in this country say, ``Well, freedom is fine for us, but we can't worry about it for everyone else.'' Well, freedom wasn't won here without the help of others. [Wherever freedom is lost,]{Editorial insert per advance text of the President's address} it's diminished everywhere, and freedom is never more than one generation away from extinction.

Francis Bacon wrote, ``. . . In this theater of man's life it is reserved only for gods and angels to be lookers on.'' America cannot afford to drift through the 1980's as a spectator. We're deeply committed to seeking peaceful resolution of conflicts in the world. World peace and our own interests continue to be threatened by regional conflicts.

Israel's historic withdrawal from the Sinai Peninsula. In a region beset by doubt, the Israeli withdrawal is an expression of the faith in a more peaceful future and a triumph for peaceful diplomacy with few historic parallels.

The vision of Israel and Egypt sets an example for all nations to follow. My administration will continue to pursue peace within the Camp David framework, through renewed efforts to complete an agreement on autonomy for the Palestinians of the West Bank and Gaza. That vital next step offers the best hope for maintaining the momentum of the peace process, a process that can lead to a triumph of shared humanity over age-old hatred.

Atlantic. While the situation is increasingly difficult and time is surely running out, we remain determined to do all we can to help Britain and Argentina resolve their differences without further conflict.

This task is immensely difficult, and we can no more solve the world's problems than we can isolate ourselves from them. But the search for peace is the surest way to preserve all that we cherish and avoid the nightmares that we fear.

Another very important way the United States can contribute to world peace is by helping stimulate international trade. The assistance of the United States Chamber and your international division in developing new markets, more exports, and encouraging lower trade barriers will continue to be invaluable.

Soviet Union has deployed a military arsenal unequalled in all history. The American people will no longer tolerate a mere facade of security. They expect our planes to fly, our ships to sail, and our helicopters to stay aloft. There will be no retreat in the commitment of this administration to make sure that they do.

Guadalcanal, on Tarawa, Omaha Beach, Anzio, or Bastogne? Every penny we spend on defense is for one sacred purpose: to keep young Americans from having to shed their blood in a war that could have been prevented.

I don't believe for one minute that America's best days are behind her. I don't believe any of you doubt that with the right tools and incentives to do the job, American workers can and will be every bit as skilled, dedicated, and productive as are our German and Japanese counterparts.

Mr. McMahon holds two distinguished intelligence medals, the Intelligence Medal of Merit and the Certificate of Distinction, awarded by the Central Intelligence Agency. For his service with the Intelligence Community staff, he was awarded the Intelligence Distinguished Service Medal.

The 1981 International Year of Disabled Persons, a celebration of the achievements and strengths of disabled persons the world over, has now concluded. In that Year, we were made aware of the many accomplishments of disabled people, and we rejoiced at the number of lives that were made richer and more productive through education, rehabilitation, and employment.

The impetus gained during this celebration must not be lost. We must seize the opportunities afforded by the International Year of Disabled Persons to increase our national awareness of what remains to be done in order to assure all disabled Americans full and active participation in our society.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 26th. day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Well, welcome to the White House. I can't think of a group more representative of good citizenship than this gathering today. So, when I say, ``Welcome,'' it's more than a greeting; it's also an expression of thanks for all the many things that you and your organizations are doing to better this country and improve the lot of those in need.

A hundred and fifty years ago, as a young French nobleman, Alexis de Tocqueville traveled throughout our new country chronicling the observations in his now well known book, ``Democracy in America.'' The American way of life captured his imagination, especially the vitality with which our forefathers went about solving problems.

Well, it was this spirit of direct action, of unbridled optimism, of compassion and freedom that made America great and unique among the nations. It's a tradition that you represent and a spirit that, with God's help, we can build upon.

There are, of course, some who believe the vigor observed by de Tocqueville is fading. Well, now, don't you believe it. We're witnessing a rebirth of concern and involvement that historians may describe as a reawakening of the American spirit. For the first time in decades, people are starting to realize they have an important role to play and that they can make a difference. This is the purpose of our Task Force on Private Sector Initiatives, established last December.

Bill Verity, Chairman of the Task Force, is here with us today. And, Bill, I have just left a meeting of the Associated Builders and Contractors -- their leadership, at least, who came to see me in the Oval Office, and -- you might be interested to know that this is an association of the small, the independent contractors, 17,000 of them nationwide -- and they have just voluntarily voted to increase their dues 30 percent, because they now have a program in which they're training and educating and teaching people who want to learn how to become builders and contractors and craftsmen and so forth in that business.

I'd like to clear up one point, speaking about this Task Force. By encouraging private actions we are not inferring that government's role should be eliminated. On the contrary, the budget we've proposed for Health and Human Services for 1983 is increasing 8 percent or $20 billion over 1982. And that budget, for just that one agency in our country, will total over $274.2 billion, which is $53 billion bigger than the defense budget and is larger than the entire budget of any country in the world except the United States itself and the Soviet Union. And while some programs have been reduced, in general what are described as budget cuts are simply efforts to slow down the runaway growth in spending.

When I entered office, getting control of spending was an absolute necessity. We were on the edge of an economic abyss. Everyone would be worse off today if we had permitted inflation to keep going at the rate it was before the 1980 election. At that rate a family of four on a fixed income of $15,000 would today be over $1,000 poorer in purchasing power. Putting America's economic house in order meant changing attitudes, particularly the dangerous tendency to turn to government to solve every problem.

After being told for decades that government is the answer, some people's reluctance to try a different approach is understandable. What if, for example, the Boy Scouts of America were a government program instead of a voluntary activity? Well, someone's worked out what the answer to that would be. It's been estimated that just doing what the Boy Scouts are doing now, in the way they're doing it, if run by the government, would cost about $5\1/2\ billion a year. And yet as an efficient, nongovernment activity, scouting costs a total of only $187 million a year.

But beyond the financial savings, everyone involved -- scouts, scout leaders, parents -- everyone is having a more meaningful experience because of the time and resources voluntarily contributed to scouting.

The Jaycees, a group that's always close to my heart, have responded to the call for direct involvement with all of the enthusiasm and gusto for which their organization is famous. The Jaycees national leadership has committed the full resources of their 7,000 local clubs and 280,000 members toward a bold effort to establish a public foundation on voluntarism in every community where a Jaycees club exists. The potential value of this project alone is enormous. And Bill Verity tells me that you'll be hearing more about it shortly, so I won't take any more of your material, Bill.

Washington we think of the cherry blossoms. In Midland, Texas, they think of helping the elderly and handicapped people fix up their homes. Since 1973, thousands of volunteers working through the ``Christmas in April'' program have repaired the dwellings of Midland's less fortunate, disabled, and elderly.

The list goes on and on, especially for programs aimed at America's young people, such as the work done by black fraternal organizations in providing tutoring for ghetto young people -- offering them a chance for a better future. And then there are the many programs sponsored by service clubs to combat drug abuse.

I wish all those who claim our greatest days are past could grasp the energy and vitality in grassroots America today. Henry Luce, the founder of Time magazine, saw this. He spent a lifetime watching and recording it. And his reflection in 1962 was not so different from that of de Tocqueville. He said, ``We're the country of the endless frontier,'' he wrote, ``of the big sky, of manifest destiny, of unlimited resources, of `go west, young man,' of opportunity for all, of rags to riches, mass production, `nothing to fear but fear itself,' technical know-how, `a chicken in every pot,' gung ho and can do.'' Well, it may sound a little corny but Henry Luce was absolutely right.

When I was inaugurated, I said that our people have a potential for greatness, and they've proven it when it counted. Today I need your help to encourage them to put that potential to work directly on some problems that we've let sit too long. After you leave today, I'm asking you for a renewed commitment. Talk to your boards of directors, your members. Identify, take on a new project and a private sector initiative, and put the full resources of your organization behind it.

What we're trying to build in this country is a new bond between the public and the private sectors. Bill Verity calls this ``a new coalition, a community partnership,'' and I'm sure you'll be hearing more from him about how much can be accomplished.

I don't -- this thing that I'm just going to say to you might sound now as if I'm being militant or something, and I'm not. I happen to believe that the foreign policy of this country must have one goal and one only, and that is world peace. And I want to do everything I can to bring about a reduction in armaments worldwide, to bring that dream closer. I say that because I'm going to use an example about one of the men in our military.

American volunteer spirit for our military. And I'm proud and happy to say today that the enlistments are up and, oh, sure people can say, ``Well, that's because of the recession.'' Well, the recession couldn't be responsible for the esprit de corps, for the morale of those young men and women that are in our armed forces -- their pride, again, in their country.

The freedoms we enjoy as Americans have evolved in great measure from the richness and strength of our Judeo-Christian heritage. The diverse cultural and religious traditions which our forefathers brought to America's shores are deeply embedded in our democratic values and ideals.

American Jewry has made significant and lasting contributions to every facet of American life and has brought dignity and distinction to every field of American endeavor. Our Jewish citizens have contributed greatly to our economic and moral growth as a Nation and have fought bravely throughout the world in defense of our freedoms.

This Spring, as in the past, American Jewry remembers its struggles, celebrates its achievements, and renews its dedication to the challenges that remain. From the observance of Passover, which recalls that historic passage from bondage to freedom and rekindles the hope for all who are oppressed, through the remembrance of the Warsaw Ghetto uprising and the memorial commemorating the victims and survivors of the Holocaust, Jews all over the world pay tribute to their past and give hope to the future. It is the time of celebration of Israel's Independence Day, Jerusalem Day, and Solidarity Day for Soviet Jews. It is a period when Jewish people in the United States renew their common heritage with Jews throughout the world and with all people of goodwill.

In recognition of the significance of this time of year to American Jewry, in tribute to the significant contributions made by the Jewish community to our society, and in appreciation and understanding of the cultural diversity of the American people, the Congress of the United States, by joint resolution, has requested the President to proclaim April 25 through May 2, 1982, as Jewish Heritage Week.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 27th. day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Now that many wives and mothers are enlarging their family responsibilities by working outside their homes, fathers are also adding to their family roles by assisting with child care and household tasks. Fathers thus help provide the continuity and stability that ensure the quality of family life.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 27th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

I can't tell you how much I appreciate -- I know how busy your lives all are and that you're willing to come here and spend this time with us. But I think the subject is an important one, one that can help to shape the history of our hemisphere in a positive way for many generations to come. The magic of the marketplace, as all of us know, has made the United States the economic wonder of the world. And I'm convinced it can be used to bring a freer, more abundant life to our neighbors in the Caribbean Basin region.

McPherson, and other senior administrative officials, so I will try not to steal any of their lines, use any of their material. But I can't stress enough how strongly I feel the potential for good, for human betterment, and for our own national interest is tied to what we've called the Caribbean Initiative.

More than 2 years ago, when I announced my candidacy for President, I spoke of an ambition to bring about an accord with our two neighbors of the North American continent. And I used the word ``accord'' deliberately. I wasn't thinking of any rigid, new arrangement, but rather of strengthening and renewing the natural ties that unite the freedom-loving peoples of the Americas.

I realize that some of our citizens may have been a little skeptical at first -- why us? and why now, with all our troubles? and why the Caribbean Basin? Well, the answer, it seems to me, is as clear as it is urgent. Our neighbors in the region, some two dozen countries of the Caribbean and Central America, are not unfamiliar names from some isolated corner of the world far from home.

The Caribbean region is a vital strategic and commercial artery for the United States. It's literally our third border. Almost half of our trade -- our import and export trade and two-thirds of our imported oil -- over half of our strategic materials pass through the Panama Canal or the Gulf of Mexico. It's in our own vital interest to help our Caribbean friends to protect themselves from hostile, foreign-inspired forces that would impose an alien ideology through the use of violence and terrorism. One of those islands has already been influenced and pretty much guided by Cuba, and lately the reports that we get are of military buildup beginning on that island. It certainly can't be for defense against its neighbors.

Elements of our assistance program address this problem, I think, and they are crucial to the success of our broader hopes for peaceful economic development. But security assistance alone is only part of the picture. To me the most exciting and promising aspect of the Initiative is our economic program, a program that can plant the seeds of prosperity, freedom, and stability for the average citizens of the region by fostering the free flow of goods, ideas, and technology in a free-market setting.

Just to give you an idea of the difficulties they face, in 1977 1 barrel of oil was worth 5 pounds of coffee or 155 pounds of sugar. To buy that same barrel of oil now these small countries must provide five times as much coffee or more than twice as much sugar. This is consuming their money reserves and credit, forcing thousands of people to leave for other countries -- and a great many of them leave illegally for the United States. It's shaking even the most established democracies down there, and as always happens, economic disaster has provided fresh openings for the foes of freedom, national independence, and peaceful development. So, the economic threat to the region is also a political and a human one.

Now, last year I went to the Cancun summit of developed and developing countries and offered a fresh view of the development process. I recall that I was advertised in advance very widely throughout the country as going down where I would be burned in effigy -- if not actually in person -- and it didn't turn out that way. For the past 15 years the world has been led to believe that the road to development is paved with massive aid transfers and centralized international institutions. Well, the historical record shows that those countries that have succeeded have used chiefly their own resources and pursued policies which emphasize trade, investment, and the role of the private sector. And that is what I talked about at Cancun -- the idea of our willingness to help them get on their feet and have the kind of economies that could provide jobs and a good living for their people and that they wouldn't have to become boat people, trying to find someplace where they could live.

Now, in consultation with other governments of the Americas and with leaders of the Basin region, we have come up with a balanced package of trade, investment, and foreign assistance, offering practical examples of the view that I presented there at Cancun. If our program works -- and our own experience suggests that it can -- the Caribbean Basin Initiative can change the course of development around the world. It can usher in a new era of more free-market policy in many countries which, since their recent independence, have often marched to a different drummer.

Your role -- the private sector role -- is critical. From the very outset we've stressed that to work, our initiatives aid package must be complemented by trade and investment to help the peoples of the Caribbean Basin region earn their own way to self-sustaining growth. Our aid will encourage private sector activities instead of displacing them.

States. Currently some 87 percent of these exports already enter U.S. markets duty free, many under the Generalized System of Preferences. But these exports only cover a limited range of existing products, not the rich variety of potential products these talented and industrious people are capable of producing under the free-trade arrangement that we've proposed.

Under our program, exports from the area will receive duty-free treatment for 12 years. Now, thus, new investors will be able to enter the market knowing that their products will receive duty-free treatment for at least the payoff lifetime of their investments. The only exception to the free-trade concept will be textiles and apparel and sugar. In these cases, our immediate neighbors will receive quotas as liberal as are consistent with our domestic and international obligations under law.

The impact of this free-trade approach will develop slowly. The economies we seek to help are small. Even as they grow, all the protections now available to U.S. industry, agriculture, and labor against disruptive imports will remain. And growth in the Caribbean will benefit everyone with American exports finding new markets.

Basin countries. And we're also asking for economic support funds to provide direct aid to these countries to help them overcome balance of payment problems and also to help those who cannot be really open to investment until there has been something done about their lack of infrastructure -- power, sewage facilities, things of that kind.

Second, let me encourage you to make available to these agencies, should they request it, some of your highly qualified midcareer people who can bring a realistic perspective to these government programs. At AID, Peter McPherson is developing a new private enterprise bureau. That bureau needs investment specialists to advise on making our aid programs more helpful in creating the infrastructure that is needed to support private investment.

Third, reconsider the prospects for your companies to invest in the Caribbean. Take another look at this region in light of the commitment which this government and other governments of Mexico, Canada, Venezuela, and Colombia have undertaken to encourage private sector development in the Caribbean.

Nearly a century ago, a great citizen of the Caribbean and the Americas, the Cuban poet and statesman Jose Marti, wrote that ``Mankind is composed of two sorts of men: those who love and create, and those who hate and destroy.'' Our own history proves that the forces of freedom and economic vitality can unlock what is best in human nature. In this country, we've made freedom work. And with your help, our friends in the Caribbean Basin can do the same thing for themselves.

I recently made a trip down there. It was widely heralded as a vacation. I did take a day and a half off to go swimming and then found out, the second day I went swimming, that even the natives didn't go in when the water was that rough -- that I shouldn't have gone in. [Laughter] But I made it back to shore. So, I was told by officials I met down there with -- and Prime Ministers of half a dozen of the Caribbean nations -- met with Prime Minister Seaga on Jamaica, and we spent the rest of our time on Barbados there with their very fine Prime Minister, and the others came there for the meetings that we held. I was told, by these officials, that I would find, there on those islands, that there was a great love for America. And, unlike some of the places where we've had to go and ignore the graffiti on the walls, it was true.

I never have felt such warmth on the part of just the rank-and-file citizenry. They went out of their way. They waited, sometimes hours, just for you to go by so they could yell, ``We love you.'' And I am convinced -- they're also -- they haven't been spoiled by as much welfare as we have in our country.

There has evidently been a news story, which I haven't seen but which I've heard about, critical of this -- critical also of the program for Jamaica. And I'm going back and read that story, because I think it's time for a statement to be made and I want to make that statement. I conceived the idea of doing something for Jamaica when Seaga won the election and took that country back from Communist rule. But already under that Communist rule the economy had been virtually destroyed and devastated.

And I turned to the private sector and asked -- and asked David Rockefeller to be chairman of a group -- if they would, as a task force, go and see how we could use private enterprise to help restore the economy and make sure that this course that had been set out by Prime Minister Seaga would work. And this they did. And already, the results -- not completely home-free -- but the results have been amazing.

A once great resort area which had dropped to 40-percent occupancy of its resort hotels saw in this last season a hundred-percent occupancy. And it was from this that I conceived the idea of the Caribbean Initiative. And once having named that, we found that in addition to helping with the original task force -- Canada, Venezuela, other countries -- that Mexico, Canada, Venezuela, Colombia have all said they want to be a part of the Caribbean Initiative.

I think all of us here are old enough to remember World War II when down in that area tankers and freighters -- the Wolf Pack submarines in World War II were destroying them within sight of land, and it brought Winston Churchill to the lowest point in his feeling about whether we could be successful in World War II. And then we found an answer to the Wolf Pack submarines. Well, I think right now that the same national security interest is a part of what we're talking about here.

And therefore I'm going to do what the little girl in her letter to me said when she told me all the advice she could give me about what to do as President and then added a P.S. and said, ``Now get back to the Oval Office and get to work.'' [Laughter] I'll do that, and Elizabeth Dole is going to come up here, and I know you have a program then that has been set for the afternoon.

The safe and efficient disposal of nuclear waste is an issue of profound concern to all Americans. I am pleased and encouraged by the reports of bipartisan Congressional activity regarding waste legislation.

I, and all my Administration, stand ready to work with you to proceed on a bipartisan and timely basis on this most important matter, so that the Federal Government can fulfill its responsibilities for safe and efficient disposal of nuclear waste.

I believe that we all agree that first and foremost in any consideration of this issue is the fundamental need to protect the health and safety of all our citizens. We must also mitigate possible harm to our environment. With these prerequisites in mind, I urge early legislative action so that we may clear the way for continued development of peaceful uses of nuclear energy.

Alternatively, if vitrification facilities are not yet in operation, the Federal Government will take title to encapsulated spent fuel. This will fix responsibility and provide a firm basis for construction and operation of facilities for nuclear waste storage and disposal financed from user revenues.

These federal actions are consistent with our basic effort to encourage private sector reprocessing in order to provide access to significant remaining fuel value for future generations as well as significantly reduce the volume of high-level waste.

The American people desire the safe disposal of nuclear waste. The necessary technology is available and scientific and engineering expertise exists to accomplish this goal. Federal legislation is required to assure a safe, effective solution for the disposal of nuclear waste at the earliest practicable time. I urge early consideration by both Houses of Congress and prompt enactment of legislation that will allow us to move ahead and deal with this issue in a timely and responsible manner.

President Habib Bourguiba when he visited the United States privately earlier this year. It's a special pleasure to meet with the leader of a country with which our relations have been and are characterized by continuing trust and friendship.

I'm proud that the United States has been able to play a role in the outstanding economic growth and development of Tunisia. And I have told the Prime Minister that he can count on us as Tunisia faces the external threats that have emerged in the past few years. He and I renewed our hope for an increased level of trade and commerce between our nations as a means of benefiting our peoples and sealing our friendship.

The Prime Minister. I had the honor to be received this morning by President Reagan, to whom I brought the very friendly greetings of President Bourguiba and to whom I expressed our thanks for the efforts that the United States has made to contribute to the social and economic development of Tunisia.

The contribution of the United States began right at independence and has assumed different forms and has been carried out at different levels. I'm very happy and very satisfied to note that as a contribution to the success of our Sixth Plan, Tunisia can continue to count on the assistance of the United States.

I was happy to listen to the views of President Reagan on a number of issues effecting world peace and the situation in different regions of the world, especially the Middle East -- the situation on the Iraqi-Iranian border and the situation in the Mediterranean. We exchanged information. We exchanged viewpoints. It was a very interesting meeting.

In conclusion, I should like to express my full gratification at the very warm and friendly welcome which was extended to myself and to my colleagues who traveled with me. We received a very warm welcome not only from President Reagan and members of his Cabinet and the senior officials of his government but also from Members of the Senate and the House of Representatives.

I'm not going to take too much time with a monolog here, because I think it would be far better for all of us to get to a dialog. But I think you've probably had some briefings and I would just like to tell you of our pride in some of the things that have been accomplished, particularly in inflation -- the fact that for 6 months it's been running at 3.2. It started at 12.4, and last month when, for the first time in 17 years, it actually dropped below zero, and we had a decline in the prices.

The savings, personal savings -- and this is one of the reasons why inflation is so important and why our economic program is so important -- with the deficits that continue to run, although we're determined that we are going to bring them to that point where we end deficit spending in this country, and balance the budget. But in the meantime, part of our interest rate problem, as we all know, is government having to go into the capital market and compete with private industry, private borrowers for the Federal funds. Well, the savings rate rose from 4.9 percent to 5.7 percent in February and March, and we estimate that as our program goes forward, that probably by 1985, there will be a $260 billion capital pool, which is far in excess of what the government would need to borrow, and we'd have adequate capital for industrial expansion for home mortgages and so forth.

The unemployment which is the last symptom of recession to disappear, I'm sorry to say -- because having lived through and sought my first job in the very depths of the Great Depression in 1932, I have a kind of a traumatic feeling anytime with regard to the unemployed. But I think it's interesting to note that even in the depths of this great recession, there are 332,000 more people working than there were when we took office. The total percentage -- I think we're going to find that we have a problem over and beyond recession with regard to employment when we have finally resolved this recession. And perhaps it is the great influx of people of a working age moving into the job market, people who heretofore were not a part of that job market.

There are 57 percent of the working-age people of America who are presently employed in spite of the horrendous unemployment that we have. The alltime record for that figure is 59 percent, set just a few years ago, because those figures are far above what has been over the years the normal for the percentage of working-age people who are actually in the job market.

Q. Mr. President, in contrast to that reaction, our newspaper did a survey this week of people living in our area, which is a heavily Republican area. And we found that there's been a slippage of about 30 percent in the favorable ratings on your treatment of the economy. I wonder how that would affect your political dealings with Congress in terms of the budget passing, if that's widespread.

The President. Well, I know that there'd been that kind of slippage, and I think in a recession of this kind, you have to expect it -- the people who are having their personal troubles and all. Of course, sometimes it depends on how the question is asked also.

But no, I think that -- I've just met with some Congressmen; that's why I was late getting over here today -- we're going forward with a budget that we believe is necessary to get us on the path of reducing the deficits, and, at the same time, putting them on a reducing scale so that we can look ahead a few years to a balanced budget. And maybe that'll -- I prefer the poll, recently taken, that said that 77 percent of the people want us to balance the budget by cutting spending; only 13 percent want us to balance it by raising taxes.

Q. Mr. President, David Stockman [Director of the Office of Management and Budget] told us this morning in a special briefing that this extraordinary effort between yourself and Tip O'Neill had failed because of unbridgeable, philosophical differences, and left us with the impression, or at least this reporter, with the impression, that you and Tip O'Neill are not going to be talking very much in the next weeks ahead. How can the people of Detroit and the Midwest, who are in economic disaster, expect to get some kind of help from this part of the country if the Speaker of the House and the President have reached a point where they can't talk to one another?

No, there is a great philosophical difference. I would have to say of the Speaker that he truly believes in the philosophy of over these past decades that government must be the answer, that government spending stimulates the economy and, therefore, you don't cut the budget. And somehow the deficit just seems to be invisible where he's concerned. He doesn't think that counts.

Congressmen. And I'll be meeting with others -- and of both parties in the next few days, the first of the week. No, we continue now to -- the parameters have kind of been set as to where we differ. And as I said last night, I think I proved yesterday that I was -- or the day before yesterday -- that I was willing to make some concessions and try to find a common meeting ground. And our leadership has gone out in the House and the Senate to start on that process.

Senators in the Senate Budget Committee will go to work now and work out what they believe is a presentable budget. I'm sure the same thing will be going on on the House side, where the other party dominates. And then all of us together will have to come together in working out what they feel they can get passed in their two Houses and what I'll sign, if it is passed.

Q. That may not be able to be done, Mr. President, because David Stockman was very belligerent this morning about Tip O'Neill. And he kept saying, ``I want to be fair and objective,'' but then every other word was how terrible Tip O'Neill was in one framework or another. I mean, he didn't sound like he was, or you were, willing to negotiate.

The President. Well, I can understand that, because in the meeting that we had the Speaker was just -- there was no give whatsoever, even suggestion or hint, of negotiating. And this is why the meeting ended with nothing accomplished. But he's got to -- he has to deal with the various factions in his House among his own party.

The President. Well, as I say, he has to be guided also. In other words, he is no more of a dictator than I am. He can't order the Democratic majority in the House to do something. They will meet in their committees, and they will come up with what they believe are reasonable solutions. And he'll have to cooperate with that.

Q. Mr. President, quarter after quarter we have been looking for some kind of a significant upturn in the economy, and now most of the analysts agree that this latest deadlock is going to further depress the economy, or at least slow down its recovery, particularly in terms of interest rates coming down. Given the fact that some polls do show slippage in support for your economic policy, how much time do you think the administration has left to get the economy turned around?

The President. Well, I happen to believe that if we had been able to walk out and say, ``We have arrived at a bipartisan agreement, and here's what's going to happen,'' I have a hunch that the interest rates would have almost instantly started down, because there is no other reason than psychological for the interest rates staying where they are. Interest rates are high when you have an inflation rate and the lender must get back in his interest that depreciating value of his money and then the return -- the earnings on his money -- on top of that.

When we started, 12.4 was the inflation rate. A lender had to get 12.4 percent in interest and then he was only breaking even -- and then had to get an interest rate on top of that. Now the interest rates have come down about 20 percent since we started inflation down. They are holding where they are now only because of the fear in the marketplace that it won't be permanent, that more of the Congress will act as Tip O'Neill did -- and that therefore inflation -- they can look forward to inflation going up again. But we're determined that's not going to happen.

So, I believe that when we show the money market that we have agreed upon a budget -- and that process is coming and is going forward now; started as of last night -- when we show them that we actually are going to reduce the spending and perhaps enhance the revenues, as even I suggested myself, without affecting our basic tax program, which is aimed at providing incentive for expansion, I believe then there will be some confidence.

As a matter of fact, out there where all of you come from, there are many signs that the free marketplace is taking care of that. There are areas where bankers have gotten together and made money available for automobile loans at several points below the market interest rate to stimulate auto sales. And it has worked. There has been a sudden surge. As a matter of fact, General Motors has just called back 2,000 workers from layoff. But it's also happening in the real estate market.

We're seeing and -- here, just looking at the local papers in the real estate section -- housing developments, where the holders of those -- the construction companies that own those housing rates are offering 1 percent down and interest rates about 4 or 5 percent below the market. And I think this is a beginning sign that they recognize that there's no excuse. By all rhyme and reason interest rates today should be below 10 percent on the basis of inflation.

The President. No, I don't see any possibility of that. And we're still hopeful that before action takes place, that there still may be a diplomatic settlement. We've gone as far as we can go in that regard. There's nothing more that we can propose. We stand ready -- and both sides know it -- to help if need be.

The President. I haven't heard any response to that statement as yet. It was only just made this morning. That would only be in keeping with our treaties, bilateral treaties that we have with England by way of the North American [Atlantic] alliance. And we've had -- at this moment we've had no request for any such help from the United Kingdom.

But I think what the Secretary was saying is, we must remember that the aggression was on the part of Argentina in this dispute over the sovereignty of that little ice-cold bunch of land down there, and they finally just resorted to armed aggression, and there was bloodshed. And I think the principle that all of us must abide by is, armed aggression of that kind must not be allowed to succeed.

The President. What it would take is Fidel Castro, recognizing that he made the wrong choice quite a while ago, and that he sincerely and honestly wants to rejoin the family of American nations and become a part of the Western Hemisphere and the American nations again. And it would take more than words. I think there are some deeds that if he performed those deeds it would prove his sincerity. And no one would welcome him more than we would.

I have determined that import relief in this case is consistent with our national economic interest. The domestic industry is threatened by serious injury because of increased imports. I have maintained that I would enforce our trade laws where necessary and where such actions are consistent with our international obligations.

Trade Act of 1974, I have determined that granting import relief is consistent with our national economic interest. Therefore, I will proclaim the USITC five-year import relief remedy with one modification. I will impose tariff increases of 45 percent ad valorem in the first year, declining to 35, 20, 15 and 10 percent above scheduled rates in subsequent years. Imposition of these tariff increases should allow the heavyweight motorcycle industry to adjust to the threat of injury caused by increased imports, which have raised inventories to twice their normal level.

I also direct you to keep the issue under close review so that, should the U.S. motorcycle industry no longer need this level of relief, you may, in consultation with the Trade Policy Committee, obtain other necessary advice and propose changes in the terms of relief. If no earlier review is initiated by such conditions, you are to undertake such a review in two years. The objectives of this review would be to assess the effectiveness of import relief and Harley-Davidson's trade adjustment efforts.

This week as American families draw together in worship, we join with millions upon millions of others around the world also celebrating the traditions of their faiths. During these days, at least, regardless of nationality, religion, or race, we are united by faith in God, and the barriers between us seem less significant.

This week Jewish families and friends have been celebrating Passover, a tradition rich in symbolism and meaning. Its observance reminds all of us that the struggle for freedom and the battle against oppression waged by Jews since ancient times is one shared by people everywhere.

Jesus 1,950 years ago. Tomorrow, as morning spreads around the planet, we'll celebrate the triumph of life over death, the Resurrection of Jesus. Both observances tell of sacrifice and pain but also of hope and triumph.

As we look around us today, we still find human pain and suffering, but we also see it answered with individual courage and spirit, strengthened by faith. For example, the brave Polish people, despite the oppression of a godless tyranny, still cling to their faith and their belief in freedom.

Recently, an East German professor, his wife, and two daugthers climbed into a 7-foot rowboat and crossed the freezing, wind-whipped Baltic to escape from tyranny. Arriving in West Germany after a harrowing 7-hour, 31-mile journey past East German border patrols, the man said he and his family had risked everything so that the children would have the chance to grow up in freedom.

In Central America Communist-inspired revolution still spreads terror and instability, but it's no match for the much greater force of faith that runs so deep among the people. We saw this during Pope John Paul II's recent visit there. As he conducted a Mass in Nicaragua, state police jeered and led organized heckling by Sandinista supporters. But the Pope lifted a crucifix above his head and waved it at the crowd before him, then turned and symbolically held it up before the massive painting of Sandinista soldiers that loomed behind. The symbol of good prevailed. In contrast, everywhere else the Holy Father went in the region, spreading a message that only love can build, he was met by throngs of enthusiastic believers, eager for Papal guidance and blessing.

In this Easter season when so many of our young men and women in the Armed Forces are stationed so very far from their homes, I can't resist recounting at least one example of their sacrifice and heroism. Every day I receive reports that would make you very proud, and today I'd like to share just one with you.

Wednesday, its crew heard of terrible brush fires sweeping two Australian States. More than 70 people were killed and the destruction was great. Well, the crew of this American ship raised $4,000 from their pockets to help, but they felt that it wasn't enough. So, leaving only a skeleton crew aboard, the 100 American sailors gave up a day's shore leave, rolled up their sleeves, and set to work rebuilding a ruined community on the opposite end of the Earth. Just Americans being Americans, but something for all of us to be proud of.

United States will remain a force for good, the champion of peace and freedom, as their parents and grandparents before them have done. And if we live our lives and dedicate our country to truth, to love, and to God, we will be a part of something much stronger and much more enduring than any negative power here on Earth. That's why this weekend is a celebration and why there is hope for us all.

On behalf of the American people, I send astronauts Paul Weitz, Karol Bobko, Story Musgrave, and Donald Peterson our proudest congratulations on the launch of the Challenger. Today you are among the few people of this planet who have crossed into a domain and experienced a dimension those of us here on the ground can barely imagine. You are no longer earthbound.

They could not then know how dramatically that friendship would flourish, and how closely mingled the fates and fortunes of the two lands would become. During the nineteenth century, thousands of Swedes joined the great current of Scandinavian migration to the United States.

Once there, they helped push the frontier westward, achieving great successes in agriculture and industry. Their achievements constitute proud monuments to the Swedish-American heritage and to the development of our country.

Democratic ideals, a belief in ingenuity and hard work, concern for the individual, and free trade are among the many values and principles both countries share. Because of the extensive commerce and interchange of persons and ideas between Sweden and the United States, we have long enjoyed a deep understanding of each other.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Nation's children. Their physical suffering and emotional anguish challenge us, as parents, neighbors, and citizens, to increase our attention to their protection and intensify our efforts to prevent their maltreatment.

Children may be endangered by physical battering, denial of the basic necessities for life and health, sexual abuse and exploitation, or emotional cruelty. Public concern can help prevent maltreatment and help protect children. Action taken after cruelty has occurred is often too late.

Prevention of abuse requires that neighborhoods and communities be attentive to the problems of families in their midst and be willing to help when help is needed. It requires the active concern of educational, medical, mental health, law enforcement, and social service professionals, and the efforts of volunteers and private citizens.

Mayor of the District of Columbia; the heads of voluntary and private groups; and the offices of local, State and Federal government to join in this observance. I also urge them to encourage activities whose purpose is to prevent and treat child abuse and child neglect.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 4th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

For the last fifty-two years, the proclamation of an annual Pan American Day has brought to the attention of the world the unique harmony of ideals inspiring the nations of the western hemisphere. These common goals of peace, prosperity, and freedom serve as the foundation for the Organization of American States, which is charged with upholding and defending these principles.

The OAS has succeeded admirably in maintaining and strengthening the traditional bonds of friendship among the peoples of the Americas. At the same time, the peacekeeping mechanisms forged by the OAS member nations have proved effective in preventing the level of conflict that has afflicted other areas of the globe.

The commitment of the Pan American nations to work together to solve their problems has prompted the creation of several specialized inter-American agencies. These agencies, along with the major councils of the OAS, have been instrumental in promoting the economic, social, scientific, educational, and cultural development of the Pan American nations. The Inter-American Human Rights Commission also has made a significant contribution to strengthening respect for basic liberties throughout the hemisphere.

Cooperation among Pan American nations is predicated on mutual respect for the individual character and culture of each people. Pan American Day commemorates this high mutual regard and salutes the great progress that has been made within the OAS framework.

Each year, for more than 100 years, we have gathered on Memorial Day to pay tribute to those men and women who have fallen in battle, sacrificing their lives to preserve our freedom and world peace. In doing this, we are reminded that neither peace nor liberty is guaranteed, and that our national ideals remain threatened by global conflict, economic crises, violence, and aggression.

Throughout our history, America has been a symbol of hope for all people. We must always accept the many responsibilities that this requires. Thus, we are prepared to assist other nations in their struggle for economic progress; to help those in other lands who suffer from political repression and injustice; to deter aggression by strengthening democracy around the globe; and to work tirelessly toward a world without war.

I herewith transmit for the consideration of the Congress proposed legislation ``To amend and reauthorize the Export Administration Act of 1979,'' together with a section-by-section analysis and supporting justification.

The Export Administration Act provides authority to the President to control exports for reasons of national security, foreign policy, and short supply, and to oppose foreign boycotts. The amendments that we are proposing to this Act provide a balance between strengthening our efforts to protect our national security and foreign policy interests and our efforts to ensure that the business community is not unreasonably constrained in its operations by export controls. In addition, these amendments are intended to improve the administration of the provisions of the Export Administration Act through the reduction of controls where appropriate and through the enhancement of the violation sections of the Act.

Section 1. Establishment of Board. There is established, effective immediately, a board of three members to be appointed by the President to investigate this dispute. No member shall be pecuniarily or otherwise interested in any organization of railroad employees or any carrier.

Sec. 2. Report. Within 30 days after creation of the board the parties to the dispute shall submit to the board final offers for settlement of the dispute. Within 30 days after the submission of final offers the board shall submit a report to the President setting forth its selection of the most reasonable offer.

Sec. 3. Maintaining Conditions. As provided by Section 9A(h) of the Act, as amended, from the time a request to establish a board is made until 60 days after the board makes its report, no change, except by agreement, shall be made by the parties in the conditions out of which the dispute arose.

The President announced today the creation of Presidential Emergency Board No. 201 to investigate and make recommendations for settlement of a current dispute between the Long Island Rail Road (LIRR) and employees represented by nine labor organizations.

Following the release of the report and recommendations by Emergency Board No. 199, the parties unsuccessfully continued their attempts to resolve their differences. The statutory period allotted for this process expires on April 5. Section 9A of the Railway Labor Act provides that either party to the dispute may require the establishment of a second Emergency Board if the dispute is unresolved, and MTA made such a request. The parties will now submit their final offers to Emergency Board No. 201 within 30 days, and the Board will report its selection of the most reasonable offer within 30 days thereafter. During this 60-day period, and for 60 days after the submission of the report, the parties must maintain the status quo and refrain from engaging in self-help.

The President today announced his intention to nominate E. Pendleton James to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Communications Satellite Corporation until the date of the annual meeting of the Corporation in 1986.

One year ago I appointed a public commission with a 12-month mandate to combat the drunk driving problem in our country. That Commission, chaired by former Secretary of Transportation John Volpe, and with broad private sector support, has performed a valuable and highly effective public service in promoting greater highway safety.

In its interim report the Commission has proposed a three-pronged approach to the problem of drunk driving, consisting of improved educational, legislative, and enforcement programs. Many of these efforts are already underway. For example, more than 500 separate pieces of legislation dealing with the drunk driving problem have been introduced in State legislatures in the 1983 sessions. Thirty-eight laws were actually enacted during the 1982 legislative sessions and, if we remember the resistance such laws encountered in the past, that's a remarkable record.

To date, three States have raised the legal drinking age. Because of the correlation between the number of drunk driving fatalities and liberal drinking-age laws, the Commission has recommended that every State set 21 as the minimum legal age for drinking alcoholic beverages.

The results of our collective efforts to date have been highly encouraging. California, for example, reported a 12-percent drop in highway fatalities during 1982, to the lowest level in 6 years. The commissioner of California's Highway Patrol attributes that very encouraging reduction in death and injuries to the tougher drunk driving laws that went into effect in January 1982. Minnesota, a State which has long been a leader in innovative programs to combat drunk driving, reports a 30-percent decrease in alcohol-related fatalities since 1981.

The members of the Commission, responding to the outcry of individual citizens and private organizations concerned by the heavy toll drunk driving takes on our society, have worked zealously with State and local governments to reduce drunk driving. To maintain the momentum that has been established and to continue the excellent work that is underway, I have signed an Executive order extending the term of the Presidential Commission on Drunk Driving to December 31, 1983.

We have not yet cured the problem of drunk driving completely, but, together, we have developed and prescribed effective legislative medicine. In true American fashion, we have heard and heeded the pleas of families demanding greater protection from the drunk driver and surer justice for his crimes. Through a concerted national effort, the threat of the alcohol-impaired driver on our highways is shrinking, and with our full and continued support, more of those who travel America's roadways will enjoy safer and longer lives.

This bill would settle claims of the Mashantucket Band of the Western Pequot Indian Tribe to approximately 800 acres of land in the town of Ledyard, Connecticut. In settling the claims, the legislation would generally: (1) extinguish any aboriginal title and any tribal claims for damages or possession of the land and natural resources; (2) establish a $900,000 Federal claims settlement fund to compensate the Indians for extinguishment of the claims; and (3) extend Federal recognition, with all attendant benefits and services, to the Western Pequot Indian Tribe.

State of Connecticut, which sold the Indian land, and against the present owners of the lands concerned. However, the costs of the settlement provided in this bill would be borne almost entirely by the Federal Government.

Given the concerted effort that has already been made to develop a mutually satisfactory settlement for the Western Pequot's land claims, I agree that the most desirable approach to resolution and extinguishment of these claims is through agreements negotiated among the parties concerned and ultimately ratified by the Federal Government. However, this process must recognize certain principles if equity and fairness to all parties are to be achieved. Unfortunately, I find S. 366 violates several of these principles.

First, even if Federal participation in this settlement is warranted, sufficient information does not exist to determine the validity of the claim or the appropriateness of the proposed $900,000 settlement. This settlement is not based on the formula for Eastern Indian land claims settlements supported by my Administration. The Administration formula is based on the difference between land value and compensation received at the time of the land transfer (in this case 1855), plus interest. If the type of valuation for land claims settlements contemplated by this bill were applied across the board to all potential claims of this nature, it could require payment by the taxpayers of billions of dollars.

Second, S. 366 provides for an unacceptably low level of State contribution to the settlement -- only 20 acres of State land with an estimated value of about $50,000. The Administration has urged that an affected State should pay for at least one-half of settlement costs in claims such as this, which are not against the Federal Government but against the State and private parties who would be the primary beneficiaries of any settlement.

Finally, the Tribe may not meet the standard requirements for Federal recognition or services that are required of other tribes. The Federal Government has never entered into treaties with this Tribe, and the Bureau of Indian Affairs has never provided services to them or exercised jurisdiction over any Indian lands in Connecticut. The government-to-government relationship between the Western Pequot Tribe and the Federal Government that would be established by this bill is not warranted at this time, pending further study by Interior. Extending Federal recognition to the Tribe would bypass the Department of the Interior's administrative procedures that apply a consistent set of eligibility standards in determining whether or not Federal recognition should be extended to Indian groups.

However, this will require (1) verification of the claim, including the amount of any monetary settlement based on the formula I have outlined above, (2) completion by Interior of its administrative procedure for determining whether or not Federal recognition of the Tribe is appropriate, and (3) payment by the State of Connecticut of at least one-half of any settlement costs.

I am directing the Secretary of the Interior to enter negotiations with the parties at interest in this case to determine an acceptable settlement, consistent with the Administration's principles, and report his recommendations to me and to the Congress.

With regard to defense spending, the President said that it might be possible to find additional savings as a result of lower inflation and lower fuel costs. He also said he expects to receive a report from the Scrowcroft commission in the next few days and that there may be additional savings to be found as a result of its recommendations. The total savings that might thus be obtained on defense was not specifically discussed.

At the conclusion of the meeting, Senator Domenici informed the President that he did not think he then had the votes to pass the President's full defense request, but said he wanted to continue consultations with all parties.

Tomorrow morning, the President will meet with Senators Domenici and Lawton Chiles, ranking minority member, of the Senate Budget Committee prior to the President's departure for Pittsburgh. The budget committee plans to begin its markup later in the day.

Frederick R. Livingston will serve as Chairman. He is an attorney in New York City specializing in labor relations. He is also chairman of the board of the American Arbitration Association. He is married and has one child.

I'm deeply aware of the heartache and the pressure many of you have experienced in the last few years. Economists tell us that our country is going through a basic technological transition, and that, along with the stagnation of recent years, has created a large-scale unemployment problem.

Now, it's not easy on you or your families, but the commitment you've made by being part of this program represents all the difference in your lives and, I might add, in a better economic future for our country.

The future certainly would be bleak if our response to technological advances was fear and negativism. Undeniably, change is an unavoidable disruption and a major challenge to a society, just as it is to individuals. But we as a people have never balked at change. And that's why the United States has always been on the cutting edge of progress and why our standard of living is the envy of the world. And don't let the pessimists tell you anything else. The future will be ours as well, just so long as we're willing to work for it.

This is not the first time we've had to cope with major technological changes. If I may draw from personal experience -- and I know this really does date me -- I lived as a boy, a very young boy, in a small Midwestern town and saw a livery stable become the town garage -- from horses to horsepower. And in the years that followed, later on I saw silent movies begin to kill off vaudeville, which was pretty standard in almost every community in America. But with sound pictures, those vaudevillians found a home and jobs in Hollywood or in radio, which was a brand new industry. Out of nowhere, it became a major industry almost overnight. Most, undaunted by the changing times, did well. Some who didn't make it in front of the camera, when they got their jobs in Hollywood, became directors and developed into members of the other facets of the entertainment business.

Although it seemed unbearable at the moment, when all the dust settled, it was the best thing that ever happened to many of those individuals. That's just one, small example. But we've seen successful transitions in American history, beginning with this country going from a tiny, coastal trading and plantation economy to a transcontinental industrial giant, unequaled by any other single nation.

Depression. Being unemployed for any reason is one of the most painful experiences, I think, that anyone can have. And believe me, we're doing everything we can to offer legitimate retraining programs like this one to cope with those, like yourselves, who are victims of structural unemployment.

Setting this right, putting our economic house in order, has been the top priority of this administration. But we're getting the job done. The economy is coming around, and I'm confident there's a brighter future ahead. That's especially true for those of you who've taken this opportunity to upgrade your skills.

Now, maybe we can have some dialog. Now I want to hear from you, and I want to know if you're optimistic about the future and about the future of our country. You know, they say I'm too much of a Pollyanna, that I'm overconfident about these things. But I'm convinced that America's best years and yours still lie ahead. So, with that done, let's get to the questions.

Q. Okay, Mr. President, my name is Ray Raeff. I've spent 4\1/2\ years training for a trade and craft to develop a broader base of employment skills. Now I find myself retraining to develop my skills further. Presenting the concept of retraining is great, but without a long-term commitment from industry and government to make my training worthwhile, am I wasting my time here, or will there be a market for my job skills when I'm done?

The President. I'm confident there will be. And a little later, when I have to make a talk at a council that is gathered together of local and State leaders from around the country, from business and industry leaders, labor and all, at that council, I'm going to mention a few ads, help wanted ads that I have found in your newspaper here in Pittsburgh. And these ads -- I don't even understand the ads, I'll have to read them. But they're typical. When you stop to think of the scores of pages of help-wanted ads that usually appear in the Sunday paper, the weekend paper, in a time when there are 11 million people unemployed, but when you look at the ads, you can understand that this doesn't mean that there are people not looking for jobs. It means there are employers now in new businesses and industries looking for workers, and they don't have the talent. And many of those jobs have to do with the very things that you're learning here.

Q. My name is Albert Kapella and, Mr. President, what incentive do you propose for American industries to keep American jobs and services here in America? In other words, what will happen to the phrase, ``Made in America'' when the governments themselves purchase foreign computers?

The President. It's true the government has some foreign computers, but this is because -- two factors that figure into this. One of them is that our government procurement is based on competitive bidding, and under the -- what's called GATT -- this is the general tariff and trade treaties that we have with our trading partners -- we assure them that they will be allowed to compete in competitive bidding with our own domestic companies but, in return, our companies enjoy the same privileges in their countries. In other words, it's an example of free and open trade.

And we are continuing in our negotiations. And in Williamsburg, Virginia, in May, in our summit meeting, economic meeting with our trading allies and friends, we're doing everything we can to break down those evidences of protectionism that have sprung up -- and everyone's a little guilty of that -- to keep not only trade free but fair. If we're to have that two-way street -- and remember, this country probably exports and sells abroad more than most of those countries or all of them put together, so it is a two-way street. And it is just in that competitive bidding that they have won the right to sell something.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Robert Pitkins. American industry is in a depressed state because of the open door trade policy. Even though we're being retrained in a high-tech field, what guarantee can you give us that these jobs won't be exported, too, and I'll have to be retrained in another 10 years?

The President. Well, we're doing everything we can to make sure that won't happen. We don't want to export jobs and, of course, I did just speak about the advantages that I think exist in free trade and fair trade. And we're continuing to work on that. And we've made great progress with our friends and allies in that field.

The other thing that we're doing -- and we've worked very hard at, and against great opposition from many areas -- and that is tax breaks for business, removing onerous taxes that were making it -- because you know business doesn't pay a tax, business collects a tax for government. But if you make business collect too much tax in the price of the product, because the people end up paying the tax, then you make them noncompetitive. And this has happened to us over the years in a great many market areas.

So, we're trying to correct that at the same time that we're trying to take off the back of business a horde of unbelievable and unnecessary regulations that bureaucracy over the years in government has spawned. I believe in an old rule that ``if it ain't broke, don't fix it.'' And government's been trying to fix things too long that weren't broke.

And so I think with those -- plus, I have signed legislation recently, that has come to me, that has created a place for market export companies to increase the ability of smaller businesses and industries that never thought they could get into the export business, to make it possible for all of business in America to get into the export market.

Q. Mr. President, my name is John Belmonte, and my question is, even though the United States is moving into a high technology era, why is our industrial community being forced into such a rapid transition? And won't our country's defensive capabilities be compromised by this administration's failure to aid heavy industry?

The President. No. I think I understand, and let me make it specific. The idea that this transition could mean that the smokestack industries disappear in America -- there's no way that a country like ours, for example, could say, ``Well, we'll no longer be in the steel industry.'' That's just not going to happen. We're not going to let it happen.

There will be transitions. There are businesses that disappear and others that come up. And we haven't been standing by doing nothing. We have had over a hundred meetings of our Trade Representative, our Department of Commerce, with our trading partners in the world on that one single industry of steel. We've resolved some 44 complaints already. We have others that are pending and under discussion. The Japanese last year reduced their export of steel to the United States by 34 percent. The European Community has reduced theirs, and we have treated with them on the dumping thing, of them selling a subsidized product here in competition with our unsubsidized.

But no, there's nothing in our book that says we're going to let the heavy industry of America disappear. Be changes, yes, alterations. But one of the things that government taxing policies and government regulations, excessive regulations, did to these heavy industries -- and did to steel, particularly -- was make it impossible for them to modernize and keep pace with some of the foreign building which did take advantage of modern technology and built more modern plants than we have. And we were trying to compete with, I think, the best workers in the world, but we weren't giving them the proper tools.

Q. Good afternoon, Mr. President. My name is John Schmidt. Sir, with all the Federal and State money being spent in plans for retraining programs, will there be any funds available to provide ourselves and our families with medical protection? The majority of us will shortly, or have already, exhausted our unemployment benefits and medical benefits. How are we to provide for our families without some type of financial aid while we strive to successfully complete this retraining program?

The President. We are looking at several things that have been suggested. In fact, some of us here were talking about this before we got here. There are several alternatives. Some have suggested -- not anyone present here -- some have suggested creating a medical program that would be in the form of a new entitlement program. I think this would be self-defeating. First of all, you wouldn't get such a program into action in time to be of help in the immediate future. Second, you would have created a costly medical program and, believe it or not, government-paid medicine is the most expensive medicine in our country today.

But we are looking at things, at a short-term, a bridge, bridge programs that can be used. Also, several States already have taken it upon themselves to resolve this problem, and we're looking at that and where the Federal Government can cooperate on that.

Also, there has been a movement on the part of the private sector -- doctors and hospitals -- to get together and provide medical care for the unemployed. Now, there's a limit to how much or how far they can go without help, and we're going to look at that for where we can cooperate with them in that. But we're certainly not going to stand by and see that people, because of the misfortune of unemployment, are going to be denied necessary medical care. So, we will find an answer to that. You bet.

But I just want to say, this is such an example of hope and effort and self-help, and I want to congratulate all of you and tell you that I don't know of any problem that is more on our minds than this problem of the involuntarily unemployed in our country today.

And personally, as I mentioned earlier, a personal experience, I don't know of anything that is more traumatic where I'm concerned because, as I say, I grew up in the depths of the Great Depression. I saw my father get his notice that he was without a job on Christmas Eve. And I'm not going to rest until we have an economy, and I think this is what we're striving for and what we're succeeding in.

We've had recessions before, seven of them before this one since World War II. And the government has always turned to the kind of quick-fix, artificial stimulant, flood the money supply. And up has gone inflation, and about 2 years later, we have a recession that's worse and more unemployment than we had the previous time.

This time, we've trying to do it for real, a real recovery that will put American industry back to work, put the people that are unemployed back into the jobs that they want and need, and have a recovery that won't, just 2 years from now, result in another recession. That's our goal, and we're doing our darndest to bring it about.

Pittsburgh in computer installation, maintenance, and repair. Before completion of the 8-month training program, students were taught job search skills and efforts were made to place the graduates in entry-level positions in the data processing market.

But I came here today to talk to you about our unemployed citizens. First, I want to say how instrumental you are to this effort of helping displaced workers find jobs. You -- the business leaders, union officials, agency heads, educators, and members of various councils -- are great resources, and I'm so glad to see you joining together to exchange ideas. You can help those frustrated steelworkers, some of whom are across the street venting their confusion and anger as we meet. And it's no wonder they're confused. The economy is getting better, but they don't see their prospects improving.

Yes, there are lots of jobs in this paper and in papers all across the country. But the skills needed for the jobs don't always match the skills of those who need the work. The permanently laid-off steelworker has never had the training even to understand what these want ads mean, let alone to apply for the position. And I can tell you right now, I don't know what they mean.

And many of the jobs are not around here but in Florida or Virginia or beyond. I could have brought more newspapers with more ads, but they're in areas far from the homes of Pennsylvania's unemployed. And it's this mismatching of skills and geography that has brought all of you together.

As you know, cyclical unemployment results from changes in the business cycle, the ups and downs of the overall economy. About half of our current unemployment is the direct result of the recession. Now, the best cure for this is to get the economy moving, and we're doing just that.

And if you count our men and women in uniform as employed, and they should be, the rate is 10.1 percent. I just found out recently that we haven't been counting them, but when they leave the service, we count them as unemployed. So, there's 2 million of them or so that are in uniform, and most of them seem to like their jobs very well.

But with the help of Senators Heinz and Specter and Congressmen Clinger and Ridge here, we've tried to ease the transition for some of the unemployed with a $4.6 billion jobs and humanitarian relief package. This legislation will increase job opportunities by speeding up public works and construction projects that were already on the books but were scheduled for later implementation.

And it also provides extra funds for social service and health assistance. But, to be honest, this aid will help only to a limited extent. An improving economy is the quickest, best, and most potent antidote for those citizens who were laid off because of the recession.

We've fought hard for this recovery, and we're not going to see it shattered. The so-called alternative budget recently passed by the House of Representatives, on the other hand, calls for a $315 billion tax increase over the next 5 years and an almost $200 billion increase in domestic spending. It provides for recovery all right -- the Congress' recovery of money that belongs to America's wage earners and taxpayers. It's a reversion to politics as usual, taxing and spending more and more of your money. It would cancel both the third year of the tax cut and indexing, which protects the wage earner from being kicked into higher and higher tax brackets. And more than three-fourths of the tax relief and indexing will go to lower and middle-income earners. To those who would consider changing those tax laws, I'm sleeping with a pen under my pillow, ready for veto.

I have two direct and moral questions for every Congressman who voted for this alternative budget. How can you justify hitting the median American family with a $3,550 tax increase over the next 5 years? And how can you support a budget that would threaten the recovery just as it's getting underway? I've never seen a budget proposal with a more flagrant disregard for its consequences. And those consequences would be more unemployed Americans, higher interest rates, more government spending, and a recession worse than the one we're just emerging from.

There's been a lot of talk on Capitol Hill about multibillion dollar make-work programs as an answer to recession. Those responsible for the alternative budget support this idea. It's not a cost-effective idea, and it certainly is no road to permanent economic recovery.

Now, structural employment is not the result of temporary slumps in the economy, as we've just been discussing. It's caused by deep and lasting changes in science, technology, competitiveness, and skills. And you just can't cure that with a quick-fix solution.

When I signed the Job Training Partnership Act last October, I pledged it wouldn't be another bureaucratic boondoggle but would provide real help. And I stand by that promise. Our aim is to train up to a million unemployed Americans each year in skills useful in the private sector. And to that end, we're requesting over $3\1/2\ billion for this program in 1984.

The vital difference between this program and the failed ones of the past is that this time, private employers will take the lead, not the Federal Government. Private employers will work with State and local officials to ensure positive results.

Too often in the past, the bulk of funds set aside for government job training programs was used to pay bureaucrats rather than to help those without jobs. In recent years under CETA, only 18 percent of the money was actually used for training the unskilled. No one knows better than private employers the skills and training needed by today's employees, and that's where we're putting our emphasis and our efforts.

Recently we sent to the Congress a package of new proposals providing incentives for businesses to hire the long-term unemployed. Under our proposal, a worker who's been unemployed for an extended period could convert his unemployment benefits into job vouchers which would entitle his new employer to a tax credit. The overwhelming majority of those who've been unemployed for long periods would gladly trade their benefits for a job, if they could only find one. Well, this voucher gives them a better chance to do just that.

We also want to more than double the money for that part of the Job Training Partnership Act that helps displaced workers. This program offers grants to the States for retraining, job search, and relocation assistance to dislocated workers. And we also propose allowing States to use up to 2 percent of their unemployment insurance tax revenues for reemployment assistance. Now, this could mean another several hundred million dollars.

The old cliche that you can't get a job until you have experience and you can't get experience until you have a job really is true for too many of our young people, especially minorities. One of the main reasons many teenagers have difficulty finding jobs, especially their first job, is the current minimum wage. Employers simply can't afford to pay this set amount to kids with no work experience. So to help young people find jobs, we've proposed a youth opportunity wage 25 percent below the regular minimum of $3.35. Young people, of course, don't have to accept this amount, and I know many of them will be able to command the regular minimum wage or more.

But this new wage will allow those who don't have any experience to make a start in the workplace. What we're trying to do is get them in the door and give them some experience so they can move up the pay scale. And since the special wage applies only in the summer, there's no danger of displacing current workers with young people at a lesser wage.

Also, working in partnership with the National Alliance of Business, we've been asking employers to set aside summer jobs for kids who really need them. In fact, companies can qualify for tax credits of up to 85 percent of the wages paid to each eligible youngster certified by the Job Service.

Any lasting solution to the problems that we've been discussing today must have the support of the private sector. And here, too, the news is encouraging. Let me tell you about one displaced workers program right here in Pennsylvania. In 1980 the Crucible Steel plant in Midland, Pennsylvania, started laying off hundreds of experienced workers. Soon after, the Crucible management and Local 1212 of the United Steelworkers union joined together to help the employees. With technical assistance from Federal, State, and local governments, they formed what they called a Job Search Club. The employees learned what jobs were a logical extension of their previous work experience. And then they learned how to write a resume and interview for that job and, if need be, where to go for training. Although a relatively small group of 125 employees participated, the club worked. Many found new jobs in steel, as well as in other industries. The workers also acquired new confidence and skills that will enable them to get better jobs as the economy expands. Well, we want to duplicate the success of the Crucible Steel case across the country, and we're working with the NAB, the AFL - CIO, the Labor Department, and the private sector to do just that.

You know, I receive all kinds of letters from our unemployed citizens. Some are full of pain and a loss of self-respect. Some are determined and hopeful. Some are confused and angry. But I think the most perplexed are those letters from displaced workers. Most of these men and women have been in one industry, if not one company, for the better part of their working lives. The mill or the plant had always been open, perhaps even since their father's or their grandfather's day, and they assumed it would always be that way. Their employers represented America's strength and vitality as an economic power. How could the major employer in the town, the very lifeblood of the town, close its gates and lock its doors? This was as inconceivable as the town itself closing down.

But we know the plant can close no matter how essential it is to the employees and the townspeople. We know that America's economic strengths change and grow in different directions, sometimes without regard to the people who serve the old industries. This is called the free market, and it's what gives our children and their children an economic future.

I believe that we as a nation owe an obligation as well as a helping hand to those who pay the price of economic readjustment. Government -- Federal, State, and local -- should provide support for job training and reemployment assistance. Business and labor, working in partnership, also have a responsibility to ease this transition and prepare their employees and members for the future. Educators, as well, are challenged to tailor their curriculums to the employment needs of the future. In one way or another, we all have a positive role to play.

I came here today to tell you I support your efforts wholeheartedly, and I'm trying my hardest to make real changes in Washington that will help get our people back to work. As I've often said, we want real work for our citizens, not make-work. We want an economic future based on growth, not on fighting over smaller pieces of prosperity. I believe in what you're doing and, even more importantly, I know those that you've helped believe in it. Together, we can make America and the American dream the inspiration they were always meant to be.

The 2-day conference was sponsored by the National Alliance of Business and 12 other organizations and was attended by approximately 500 policymakers and leaders from private and public organizations with an interest in labor market transition efforts.

Prior to his participation in the conference, the President attended a Republican leadership reception at the hotel. Following his remarks at the conference, the President returned to Washington, D.C.

Turkish Cypriots during the period. The talks were delayed due to the presidential elections held by the Government of Cyprus in February. In those elections President Kyprianou was returned to office for a second five-year term.

Movement in New Delhi. The UN General Assembly is likely to take up the Cyprus problem in late April or early May. After that meeting the talks can proceed to address the substantive issues separating the two communities.

President Kyprianou and Turkish leader Denktash remain supportive of the intercommunal talks as the best vehicle for progress toward eventual solution of the Cyprus problem. Ambassador Gobbi is positive about the Secretary General's good offices role in the talks and will attempt to move the discussions forward as soon as possible.

Our Embassy in Nicosia as well as our officers in the State Department remain in close contact with both parties to the intercommunal talks and continue to urge efforts for progress. Visits to the island by our diplomatic officers and by Congressmen emphasize the interest residing both in this Administration and in the Congress in seeing a fair and lasting settlement to the problem.

We Americans have come to share a vision of the Nation we want to be: A Nation in which sex, race, religion, color, national origin, age, or condition of disability do not determine an individual's worth. We can be justly proud both of the progress we have made toward realizing that ideal -- and of our recognition that progress remains to be made.

Commission can play in assuring that we, as a Nation, keep our statutory commitments to fairness and equity for all Americans -- and the necessity that the Commission not be allowed to expire, as current law provides, at the end of 1983. In recognition of these goals, the legislation I am transmitting would continue the Commission's important work through 2003.

The twenty-year extension I propose today would be the longest in the Commission's history. I believe we must assure the continuity of the Commission's mission, while preserving the original Congressional intent that the Commission have a specified purpose and duration.

Finally, I am proposing that the Commission's current authorities and procedures be continued intact. Since the Commission's founding, the existing statutory provisions have enabled the Commission to fulfill its unique function while avoiding duplication of activities performed by the EEOC, Department of Justice, and other line agencies.

Motherhood is both a great responsibility and one of the most rewarding and pleasurable experiences life has to offer. Mother's Day presents a special opportunity to appreciate our mothers -- to consider all they have done, and all they continue to do, in fostering children's physical and emotional growth, nursing illness, encouraging success, easing failure, maintaining family life, supporting their spouses, contributing vitally to the economy through their accomplishments at work, and serving their communities. The quality and scope of their activities, as well as their overriding concern for the well-being of their families and our country, inspires and strengthens us as individuals and as a Nation.

Since time is short, I'll jump right to the educational package that our administration has put together. I believe it addresses the challenge of restoring opportunity to our children and excellence in our schools. And first -- and our first piece of legislation -- we need tuition tax credits.

Their families pay their full share of taxes to fund the public schools, as well. And I just don't think that's fair. I think they're entitled to some relief, since they're supporting two school systems and only using one.

I can tell you it was, as I said before, one of the first bills that we sent up to the Congress this year. And the first meeting I had was with congressional leaders to push specific legislation, and it was on tuition tax credits. And I want this legislation to move as quickly as possible through the Congress.

We're also proposing a voucher system to help parents of disadvantaged children. We want to give the States or individual school districts the option of using certain Federal educational funds to create vouchers so that those parents can choose which school, private or public, they want their children to attend. If anyone realizes the need for free parental choice, it is the Catholic community. This measure is designed to give the disadvantaged people a choice. They want it, they deserve it, and with your help, they'll get that choice.

Now let me mention one more aspect of our package. We're proposing a system of educational savings accounts to help families save for their children's college education. Parents will be able to save -- what we're proposing is $1,000 per year per child with no tax on the interest. And when the money is finally withdrawn, it must be for the purpose of sending a child to college.

Now, I believe these proposals will expand the opportunities for our children. It will also increase healthy competition among schools. At any time that we ever settle for a monopoly on education, then we settle for the evils that go with a monopoly. And certainly that does not include academic freedom. In the long run, what we're proposing means a better and more diverse educational system for all of our children, and that's why I wanted to come over here today and tell you about it.

The President. Well, listen, the Challenger proves again the quality of our technology, and the versatility of the space shuttle serves as a symbol, I think, of our commitment to maintain America's leadership in space. But all of it would be without any merit at all if it wasn't for men that we have like all of you, Commander Weitz, and your pilot Karol Bobko, and your missions specialists Story Musgrave and Donald Peterson. And I know that while one of you has been out in space there in connection with the space platform, with the others this is your maiden voyage.

Commander Weitz. Well, thank you, sir, and we appreciate that. I know it's an old and well-used saw, but, yes, we just get the glory. We really get to stand on the shoulders of giants when we participate in this program.

Now, I know that I shouldn't keep you too long because you're kind of anxious to make that space walk out there, and we'll be all watching for that down here. And just please know that all of us, the American people, are very proud of your service to your country and what you're doing.

And we wish you well on the continued flight and on the space walk. [Laughing] I can't say I envy you. But we are very proud of all of you. Good luck to you on the rest of your mission, and God bless you.

The President is deeply disappointed by the Senate Budget Committee's vote on budget authority for the Department of Defense. It is his hope that a majority of the committee will find a way to reconsider their action.

Note: By a vote of 17 to 4, the committee approved a 5-percent increase in military spending authority after accounting for inflation. The President had requested a 10-percent increase after accounting for inflation.

Cancer is a major concern to the American people because statistics demonstrate that at least one out of four Americans now living will become a victim of this disease. However, it is important to recognize that we are making progress against this dread killer -- in basic research, in prevention, and in bringing the fruits of cancer research to the community.

Recent empirical studies and basic research are bringing us close to an understanding of how best to prevent, diagnose, and treat cancer. Such scientific advances as the discovery of the oncogene, or cancer gene, have provided fresh insights into the molecular process of this disease. Also on the horizon are positive developments in several areas that enhance our ability to deal with this disease syndrome: e.g., the utilization of hyperthermia, improved immunotherapeutic techniques that include the use of monoclonal antibodies and new vaccines, and approaches to surgery that, while less severe in nature, remain a major weapon in our arsenal.

We continue to gather information indicating that life-style and environment play a significant part in the incidence of cancer. Today there is a growing awareness of carcinogens and radiation as causative factors in cancer development. We recognize more fully the importance of diet and nutrition as factors in the development and prevention of this disease. As we evaluate the incidence of cancer among various groups of people, we may be able to identify substances that can have a chemopreventive effect on the population as a whole.

A concerted effort has begun to bring the latest advances in cancer care and treatment to the community at large in a more effective way than ever before. We hope that with the good-will, determination, and support of the American people, our continued progress will eventually lead to the control and prevention of this tragic disease.

For too many years, the scales of justice -- the very hallmark of our free society -- have been out of balance. Too often innocent victims of crime turn to their government for protection and support only to find that the criminal justice system seems unable to achieve two of its fundamental purposes -- protecting those who obey the law and punishing those who break it.

Victims and their families must bear the physical, financial, and emotional impact of the crime. It is unjust and inexcusable when they are ignored or mistreated by this system. Victims called for help, and they needed our assistance. Frequently, their pleas have been unheard and their needs have gone unattended.

These were the conclusions of the President's Task Force on Victims of Crime that I established last year. The Task Force conducted hearings around the country, taking testimony from professionals within and outside the system and, most importantly, from victims themselves. The Task Force concluded that the neglect and mistreatment of crime victims are a national disgrace.

I asked the Task Force for recommendations to restore balance to our system. It submitted 68 specific recommendations directed to the Executive Branch and the Congress, State and local legislative bodies, law enforcement officers, the judiciary, prosecutors, defense attorneys, parole boards, bar associations, the religious community, schools, hospitals, the mental health professionals, and the private sector.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 7th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

From Maine to Hawaii, from the Alaskan border to the Gulf of Mexico, America is a land unified, strengthened, and enriched by transportation. We enjoy a mobility unparalleled anywhere in the world. Our transportation systems -- land, water, and air -- enable us to work where we choose, travel where we please, and ship the products of our farms and factories across the country and around the world.

Nation, led to innovations in other industries, contributed significantly to the expansion of our country, and strengthened our defense and the vitality of our economy. Transportation has become one of America's greatest and most valued assets, and the people of the transportation industries are an essential segment of our society.

Erie Canal boats to today's vast inland waterway system; from the clipper ship to the container ship; from yesterday's primitive Lancaster turnpike to our modern 42,000-mile network of interstate highways; from the ribbons of rail that fused a continent to a national rail complex that carries one-and-a-half billion tons of cargo a year; from the first fledgling flight at Kitty Hawk to a national system serving 300 million passengers and hundreds of thousands of general aviation flyers a year; from horse-drawn transit vehicles to today's sleek urban rail cars and buses. America and its transportation industries have grown and prospered, providing employment, security, safe and efficient mobility for all Americans, and opening avenues to the future with such visionary projects as NASA's space shuttle program.

The United States is firmly linked with other nations in the global economy by mutually beneficial international trade. Exports now account for more than 16 percent of the total value of all goods produced in this country. Two of every five acres of farmland produce for export, and one of every eight jobs in manufacturing depends on overseas trade. Indeed, four of every five new manufacturing jobs are export-related.

As the world's largest trading Nation, the United States has much to gain from the continued expansion of world trade and much to lose if it is diminished. As a country that has been built on economic freedom, America must be an unrelenting advocate of free trade.

As an integral part of the marketplace, the free flow of goods and services across international borders serves to raise the living standards and promote the well-being of people throughout the globe. It inspires private initiative and the entrepreneurial spirit which leads to more open markets, greater freedom, and serves as a boon to human progress. In an interdependent world made smaller by modern communications, free trade is even more essential for the continued economic growth and advancement of both industrialized and developing nations. America must not be tempted to turn to protectionism, but lead the way toward freer trade and more open markets where our producers and training partners can compete on a fair and equal basis.

Despite the high volume of our international trade, we still are far from matching the international sales efforts of our leading competitors. Only ten percent of our firms export, and only seven percent of our gross national produce finds its way into foreign markets -- less than half the percentage of our major trading partners.

In this increasingly interdependent world, American business must focus more of its efforts on exporting our goods and services. A promising new tool is now available to increase export participation: the Export Trading Company Act of 1982. This law will help American businesses, particularly small and medium-sized companies, to organize themselves for stronger export efforts with considerably less hindrance by government regulation.

President Reagan. Well, our very cordial and productive talks today covered a broad range of issues. As two countries strongly committed to democratic government, we are heartened by the obviously favorable trend toward democracy in Latin America. And I would be remiss if I did not express here my personal admiration for President Hurtado's courageous leadership in this area and his firm resolve to hold free national elections next year.

The President and I also spoke today about the serious economic difficulties facing many countries in this hemisphere and the importance of working closely together to overcome these problems. Such cooperation is vital to our mutual interest in peaceful and democratic change.

Our two governments have worked closely to resolve differences that may arise between us. We were pleased to reach an accord last month on restrictions for certain Ecuadorean fish exports to the United States and welcomed Ecuador's willingness to discuss practical solutions to the fisheries issues.

Our discussions today were carried on in a spirit of openness and mutual respect as befits two countries with many shared values, including our commitment to democracy, freedom, and human rights. I have very much appreciated the opportunity to have President Hurtado as my guest, to benefit from his perceptive views, and to reaffirm the warm and abiding friendship that the peoples of our two countries have long enjoyed.

However, the efforts that my government and our people can carry out will not be sufficient if we do not find the understanding and the aid of the industrialized countries of the North, as well as the collaboration of multinational finance institutions and international, private banking groups.

In the conversations that we have held during these past few days with the representatives of all these organizations, and especially in the conversations maintained with President Reagan today, we have found a very high degree of understanding with reference to the problems that afflict Latin America and that these will lead us to finding solutions.

The conversations that we have maintained during these days have had always as a common horizon the will of the two countries in maintaining the ideals that are shared by both countries -- ideals of liberty and of deep respect for human rights.

Like Federal employees, taxpayers also work for the Government -- they just don't have to take a civil service exam. Here in America, land of opportunity, governments at all levels are taxing away 40 percent of our nation's income. We've been creeping closer to socialism, a system that someone once said works only in heaven, where it isn't needed, and in hell, where they've already got it.

We know that the secret of America's success has been our drive to excel, a spirit born and nutured by our families. With their dreams and hard work, they've built our nation, made her great, and kept her good. Everything we've accomplished began in those bedrock values parents have sought to impart throughout our history -- values of faith in God, honesty, caring for others, personal responsibility, thrift, and initiative.

But families cannot prosper and keep America strong if government becomes a Goliath that preys upon their wealth, usurps their rights, and crushes their spirit. For too many years, overgrown government has stood in your way, taking more and more of what you earned, no matter how hard you tried.

Make no mistake, the thousands of small businesses and the workers in steel, autos, and housing who have suffered so badly from the recession didn't lose their jobs by chance. Years of confidence -- or excuse me, I should say, well-intentioned but strongheaded policies plundered their earnings and crippled their ability to produce and compete. By 1981 double-digit inflation and excessive regulations had driven up the price of their products. Record interest rates made it too difficult for their firms to borrow money to modernize their equipment, and record tax increases sharply increased the price of their labor in the marketplace.

It's taken us 2 years to reverse that damage, get productivity growing again, and foster a recovery that's starting to bring people back to work. We've done it by reducing inflation from 12.4 percent to only four-tenths of 1 percent for the last 6 months, by chopping in half that towering prime interest rate, and by passing the first comprehensive tax rate reduction for all Americans who earn and save since the Kennedy tax cuts in the 1960's.

On July 1st, you'll receive the final installment of your 25-percent personal income tax rate reduction. It's not as much as we wanted, but it's the most we could get given the tremendous opposition to any tax reduction by the spending lobbies in Washington.

Here's what it means to you: A median-income family of four, which earned $26,000 in 1981 and has kept pace with inflation, will owe about $700 less in Federal income taxes in 1983 than if our tax program had not been passed. In fact, because of our tax cuts, that family can earn $3,000 more in 1983 than it did it in 1981 and it will still owe less in Federal income taxes. That's progress and that's what we mean by incentives. If you work or save more tomorrow than you did today, your reward will be greater than it was. More of every dollar of your added earnings and interest will be yours to keep. Then, in 1985, our program will index your tax rates so you won't be shoved into higher tax brackets when you receive cost-of-living raises. This will be a protection we never had before.

Many other features of our tax program were designed to help your families. For working wives and mothers, we've reduced the marriage penalty and increased the child care credit. For family farms and family-owned businesses, we've dramatically reduced the estate tax. For small savers, we've deregulated financial institutions to give you a higher rate of return than you received before. For all of you trying to put money aside for later years, we have introduced strong new incentives for individual retirement accounts, extended IRA's to participants in employer-sponsored pension programs, and doubled maximum Keogh contributions. Further tax breaks for savers will be coming up in 1985, when 15 percent of interest income, up to $450 for single taxpayers and $900 for married couples, can be excluded from taxes.

Taken together, this is the most sweeping program of incentives ever passed to help American families and give them real hope for their future. But just as our program is beginning to mesh and deliver what we promised, with personal savings and spending up, productivity up, auto and steel production and housing construction all recovering, workers being called back, the stock market hitting an all-time high, and consumer confidence surging -- just as the recovery is gaining strength -- a plan is afoot that would wreck the progress we've made.

Democrats in the House of Representatives want you to pay more -- much more. They want to increase taxes on median-income families by $3,550 over the next 5 years. Nothing could be more unfair. And I promise you this: I will veto any attempt to take away the third year of your tax cut or the indexing which benefit low- and medium-income families the most.

But a recent special report put out by the Democratic study group makes plain they are considering many other options to raise your taxes. You should know that these options include capping mortgage interest deductions, eliminating deductions for State and local taxes -- in other words, you'd pay a tax on a tax -- limiting charitable contributions for nonitemizers, taxing part of the capital gains on home sales, taxing fringe benefits, and on and on and on.

Kennedy, who said in 1963, ``The largest single barrier to full employment and to a higher rate of economic growth is the heavy drag of Federal income taxes on private purchasing power, initiative, and incentive.'' His words are just as true today.

The President. Let me just say a few words about that. Some radical elements of the PLO have introduced some changes in the proposals that have been made and the policy that we've been trying to follow with regard to Middle East peace. Those changes are unacceptable to King Hussein; they are unacceptable to King Fahd; they are unacceptable to me. And I have been in touch with King Fahd and King Hussein and am going to be in touch with other Arab leaders about this.

The President. Oh, we're all very hopeful, because as I say, we're all in agreement about these other proposals that have been made. And I have their assurance that they want to proceed with what we've been doing. We've made great progress so far, and King Hussein has made great progress.

The total cost of arthritis must be counted not only in terms of socioeconomic losses, but also in terms of human suffering and disability. Uncontrolled arthritis has major negative social, psychological, and economic impacts not only on the patients who suffer from arthritis, but also on their families and on our society in general.

We have learned a great deal through research, but as yet these disorders are not fully understood and are not adequately controllable. We must meet the critical need for new research ideas and productive research studies upon which advances in the area of arthritis treatment and prevention can be based. Our goal continues to be the eventual elimination of arthritis as a cause of human suffering and economic burden to our Nation.

Month. I urge the people of the United States and educational, philanthropic, scientific, medical and health care organizations, and professionals to support appropriate efforts to discover the causes and cures of all forms of arthritis and to alleviate the suffering of victims of these disorders.

Communication Links and Other Measures to Enhance Stability. I believe that the proposals in this report, which was prepared in accordance with Public Law 97 - 252, are fully consistent with our goal of reducing the risk of nuclear war.

The Department of Defense report recommends a number of new measures. Of special note are those measures proposed to improve communications and build confidence between the United States and the Soviet Union. They include: addition of a high-speed facsimile capability to the Direct Communications Link (Hotline), which would permit the transmission of full pages of text and maps and graphs; the establishment of a Joint Military Communications Link, which would be a high-speed facsimile link between the U.S. National Military Command Center and its Soviet counterpart; and the upgrading of existing diplomatic communications channels with higher speed data transmission capability. Also included is a proposal for an agreement, open to all states, which would call on the signatories to consult with each other in the event of a nuclear incident involving a terrorist group.

The Department of Defense recommendations complement the arms reductions proposals which the U.S. already has made to the Soviet Union in both Strategic Arms Reduction Talks and the negotiations on Intermediate Nuclear Forces.

The initiatives also complement the confidence-building measures the United States already has proposed to the Soviet Union in the START and INF negotiations. Those measures would reduce the danger that nuclear war could ever arise from accident, misinterpretation, or miscalculation.

They include proposals that the two sides notify each other in advance of all launches of intercontinental, submarine-launched, and land-based, longer range intermediate-range ballistic missiles. Additionally, they would require each party to provide advance notice of major military exercises involving nuclear forces and to exchange information of unprecedented breadth and detail about their strategic and intermediate-range ballistic missiles.

Your Majesty, the American people are deeply impressed by what you've achieved. Since you assumed leadership, your country's progress -- economically, socially, and politically -- has established your reputation as a compassionate leader who can get things done. In an inspiring commitment to the long-run interest of your people, you've built a modern education system of which any country would be proud. Similarly, the level of health care available to your people is testimony to the humane character and businesslike efficiency of your leadership, and your building the infrastructure of a modern economy, fulfilling the prerequisites for progress for your people.

Your Majesty, we're pleased that as your friends we were able to make some small, but we hope significant, contribution to your bold endeavors. In your 1980 National Day address, you put forth a goal to your people. You said, ``Self-reliance is to be the keystone of all our plans for the future.'' With this as a guidepost, you have moved forward to diversify your economy. Now the people of Oman are able to rely on agriculture, mining, industry, fishing, and other commercial endeavors, in addition to oil, to support an acceptable quality of life. We applaud this farsighted approach and hope that we can continue to play a helpful role.

We and our allies depend on oil originating there, much of it moving close to your shores through the Straits of Hormuz. Yet, unlike another world power which encourages and exploits conflict, the United States sees its interests fulfilled in regional peace and stability. We are thus committed to work with those in the Middle East who need our help to secure peace and to deter outside aggression. To this end, we've made rapid progress in recent years, developing the capability of coming to the assistance of our friends, wherever they may be.

I'd like to take this opportunity to thank you, Your Majesty, for your support of our efforts to deter aggression. The brutality we've witnessed in Afghanistan -- the attempt to suppress an entire population, the debasement of its religion and the use of chemical weapons and other crimes against civilization -- suggests that our concerns are well founded.

In recent years you've made many laudable contributions to peace. We appreciate, for example, your continued support for peaceful accommodation between Israel, Egypt, and its other Arab neighbors. The United States remains morally committed to further progress in the direction of peace and security for all the peoples of the Middle East.

The plan I outlined on September 1st last year is still on the table. While there may be bumps along the way, we will not be deterred from our long-term objective, which is a broad-based settlement firmly grounded on United Nations Security Council Resolutions 242 and 338 and consistent with the Camp David framework.

Hussein of Jordan to join the peace process. The choices facing the Palestinian leaders are clear -- either the status quo and the continued frustration of their people's aspirations or a bold and courageous move to break the deadlock. For our part, we will not permit the forces of violence and terror to exercise a veto over the peace process.

Commenting about the conflicts surrounding Israel, you recently observed, ``People now want to see the problem solved once and for all in every respect.'' Your Majesty, that is certainly our desire. And I can assure you, we will spare no effort to put an end to the killing and to bring this dreadful chapter in Middle East history to a conclusion acceptable to all sides. I look forward to discussing this problem and other important matters relating to Middle East peace with you today.

Lasting peace will come when individuals of good will, though in disagreement at times, work together to prevent conflict. We have followed with interest your own efforts to foster regional cooperation, particularly the improvement in your relations with South Yemen. We wish you continued success in your attempts to eliminate the causes of tension and instability in the Gulf.

Your Majesty, we're proud to be on your side in your quest for a better life for your people and your search for peace and stability. Relations between our two peoples have spanned a century and a half. I am confident that your visit today will serve to further strengthen the bonds between us.

Mr. President, I greatly appreciate the warm and generous words with which you have welcomed me to your great country today. It gives me particular pleasure that this, my first state visit, should so happily coincide with the 150th anniversary of the establishment of those friendly relations which have remained constant between our two countries to the present day.

That these relations should have stood the test of time with which constancy is hardly surprising, for our two peoples share common and deeply cherished traditions which lie at the very foundation of our national existence. Indeed, it was these profound beliefs in tolerance, justice, and determination to defend freedom and to uphold the sanctity of human rights which provided the great impulse which brought men from many parts of the world more than 200 years ago in a pilgrimage to this beautiful land to realize their dream of a new life and to found a nation which would enshrine those principles forever.

Mr. President, over the years the United States of America has striven unceasingly to make this world a better place for humanity, but nothing you have achieved has surpassed the example of your steadfast championship of those principles often at great sacrifice and in the face of the most daunting obstacles. I and my people who have, ourselves, fought through many bitter years of struggle to maintain our country's freedom -- and will do so again should the need ever arise -- are deeply conscious of this, for we know from our own experience that peace must go hand in hand with dignity and freedom; that life, if it is to be worth living, can only be founded on justice and respect for humanity and that these prizes are not easily won or preserved.

I believe that the world has never stood in greater need for these values than it does today. In recent years, the forces of aggression, intolerance, and lawless ambition have increasingly sought to impose their will on mankind. The world has had no respite from the continuing threat of instability.

Nowhere has this threat been more acutely felt than in our own region of the Middle East, where we and our brother states of the Gulf Cooperation Council have pledged ourselves to work together in the closest accord to safeguard our peoples and our ancient culture.

Mr. President, I welcome the constructive understanding your country is showing of the problems which confront our region. And I am convinced that the measures you have taken will greatly contribute to the maintenance of peace and security there. I also warmly commend the endeavors you have made to help bring about an honorable solution to the strategic Middle East situation, endeavors which, as you know, Oman has unswervingly supported. It is imperative that efforts to achieve this solution continue not only in the cause of common humanity but because so long as the present situation persists, then so long will it present a continuing threat to world peace and provide the opportunity for those forces which exploit the misery and dissention it perpetuates to further their own ambitions.

Mr. President, I am sure that my visit will not only serve as a reaffirmation of the cordial relationship that has for so long existed between our two countries but will further strengthen the mutual confidence and understanding upon which that relationship rests.

Those ancient orders of chivalry, however, tend to associate grace, decency, and other majestic qualities with the past, often the very distant past. But here, Your Majesty, on this side of the Atlantic we look for such traits in those around us because we seek first and foremost to build a better tomorrow. And it's clear that leaders like yourself -- proud, yet humane individuals -- will, indeed, make tomorrow a better age for mankind.

In my welcoming remarks this morning, I touched on a few of your many wonderful accomplishments. These were not products of a faint heart or indecision. Modern education systems, sophisticated health organizations, the infrastructure for economic progress don't just spring into existence, especially in so short a time. These advances are the result of hard work and good government. They reflect on extraordinary level of leadership; they reflect values which are deeply cherished here and reaffirm our high regard for the people of Oman and for you as an individual.

The Sultan's enthusiasm for building a well-functioning, modern country is a legend, but how many are aware of his enthusiasm for horses? Your Majesty, you probably know I enjoy riding, myself. With all your pressing responsibilities, I'm sure you agree that there is nothing so good for the inside of a man as the outside of a horse. [Laughter] I also understand you have an appreciation for Gilbert and Sullivan, an interest that's shared by many here in America. Well, we can all be grateful that the Sun will never set on Gilbert and Sullivan.

But as much as Americans admire and identify with horsemanship and music, Your Majesty, we revere your personal courage and commitment even more. We're keenly aware that the progress you've made for your people was done in spite of a Communist-inspired, externally supported insurrection early in your reign. But you are not a man who is easily deterred.

It is, indeed, a pleasure for me to visit your great city of Washington again. And this time to do so as a formal expression of the friendship and understanding which exists between our two countries.

As I am sure you are aware, the past decade has made heavy demands on Oman. Not only have the most sustained and intensive efforts had to be made in our determination to provide a better life for our people, but at the same time, we have fought to preserve our independence from foreign-inspired aggression.

Today, happily, that aggression has been defeated, and great strides have been made in the improvement of the quality of life of our people. But we are under no illusions. We realize that the important geopolitical position we occupy at the mouth of the gulf and the unstable situation that exists in the region make it imperative that we develop our country and its defenses to the maximum of our ability. This we are doing and shall continue to do.

We do not expect others to shoulder these burdens for us. We fight our own battles. But we realize that in the present state of the world no country can act in isolation, that a concerted effort must be made by the free world if freedom itself is not to be extinguished. We, therefore, look to our friends for their support, just as we offer ours to them in the trials and dangers that jointly face us. This is, therefore, Mr. President, why I particularly welcome this opportunity to acknowledge the valuable contribution which the United States has made and continues to make to the development and the interests of Oman.

The expert technical and other resources upon which we have been able to draw and the sustaining good will with which they have been provided has been of the greatest assistance in the work to improve the quality of life of my people and to safeguard the independence and territorial integrity of our country.

Mr. President, the inescapable burdens which lie upon your great country are, indeed, heavy. But your untiring work for peace and your active concern for the oppressed and underprivileged in this troubled world command the respect and admiration of all who place the destiny of humanity above cynical, political manipulation and exploitation. In this, your continued search for an acceptable and honorable solution is vital if the dangerous and intractable situation in the Middle East is to be resolved honorably and finally.

And I believe that our frank and constructive exchange of views has made a real contribution to an understanding of the problems which face our two countries and has been a positive step towards their solution.

This eagerness to solve problems through the creativity and the initiative of the private sector has been instrumental in our nation's advancement. Indeed, distinguished volunteer service has become such an integral part of our way of life that it sometimes does not receive the recognition it deserves.

But at this luncheon today, we're holding our own version of the Academy Awards for volunteer action. And the difference is that for today's awards, the American people are the winners. And that's because, thanks to the efforts and endeavors of our recipients, America's a better and a more generous land.

And we're finally starting to recognize the importance of our volunteers. I'm pleased to announce today that the theme of the 1984 Pasadena Tournament of Roses parade will be ``A Salute to the Volunteer.'' So let me congratulate Don Judson, the volunteer president of the tournament, for letting me make that announcement.

The historian, Daniel Boorstin, has explained how this continent was settled. And although he may not have realized it, he also explained the motivation behind our award winners. He wrote, ``Groups moving westward organized into communities in order to conquer great distances, to help one another drag their wagons uphill or across streams, and for a hundred other purposes.

Candy Lightner founded MADD, Mothers Against Drunk Drivers, after one of her own twin daughters was killed in an auto accident caused by a drunk driver. I know the award that we're bestowing today can't match the fulfillment that the members of MADD must feel in having saved lives, nor should it. But the award is the Nation's way of recognizing your humanitarian contributions and all of our recipients' contributions.

I'm told there's a German saying: ``Two chambers hath the heart, there dwelling live joy and pain apart.'' Well, our recipients today know both the chambers. Yes, you know the pain of the world, and that's what motivates you, but you also know the joy of helping and the deep sense of fulfillment that flows from such voluntary giving. By your generous, unselfish deeds, you dwell in all our hearts. These awards are a token of our gratitude.

Before I present the awards, however, let me thank the National Center for Citizen Involvement and ACTION Advisory Council, as well as the corporate and foundation sponsors for helping to make these honors possible. Bill Verity is sitting there at my table and was the head for a year of the task force that I think did a great deal to inspire and reinvigorate what has been for so many years a tradition of America, and that is, doing things in a neighborly way, not expecting officialdom to come in and do it for you, and appreciate it.

And there's another fellow there that I'd just like to have him stand for a second after I tell something. Over a year ago in Chicago I visited a school, and it was a very unusual school. It was a school that was supposed to close its doors. But its principal lived in the school and refused to give up. And I visited that school down in one of the hardest-hit areas of south Chicago and saw these young people in that school and their spirit and their pride, even though the plaster was peeling off the walls. And it was impossible to believe how they could keep it going. The teachers were giving themselves to the point that when lunchtime came, they were handing out and serving the food in addition to teaching their classes and all. And I was so carried away with what I had seen and the determination of all of them to keep this school opened, that I made a phone call before I left Chicago to Clem Stone -- one phone call. And a little less than a year later, I revisited that school -- no broken plaster, a board of governors that read like the Who's Who of the City of Chicago. And Clem Stone, after one phone call, had set them up. They have a scholarship fund.

Energy Conference and a member of the Atomic Industrial Forum. He currently serves as a member of the nuclear export policy committees of both the Atomic Industrial Forum and the American Nuclear Energy Council.

Taking into account the factors cited in Proclamation No. 4991 and in order to alleviate unnecessary hardships to United States companies that entered into contracts before the decision to suspend most-favored-nation treatment for products of Poland was announced, I find it appropriate to amend Proclamation No. 4991 to permit articles that are exported to a consignee in the United States before June 30, 1983, pursuant to written and binding contracts to purchase executed on or before October 9, 1982, to enter at the column 1 rate of duty.

The story of the Indian in America is a record of endurance, of survival, of adaptation and creativity in the face of overwhelming obstacles. It is a record of enormous contributions to this country -- to its art and culture, its strength and spirit, its sense of history, and its sense of purpose.

When European settlers began to develop colonies in North America, they entered into treaties with sovereign Indian nations. Our new Nation continued to enter into treaties with Indian tribes on a government-to-government basis. Throughout our history, despite periods of conflict and shifting national policies in Indian affairs, the government-to-government relationship between the United States and Indian tribes has endured. The Constitution, treaties, laws, and court decisions have consistently recognized a unique political relationship between Indian tribes and the United States.

In 1970, President Nixon announced a national policy of self-determination for Indian tribes. At the heart of the new policy was a commitment by the Federal government to foster and encourage tribal self-government.

As set forth in the message on Indian policy of January 24, 1983, this Administration honors the commitment made in 1970 to strengthen tribal governments and lessen Federal control over tribal government affairs. To further the principle of self-government, we will encourage the political and economic development of the tribes by eliminating excessive Federal regulation and government intervention, which in the past have stifled local decision-making, thwarted Indian control of Indian resources, and promoted dependence rather than self-sufficiency.

In promoting effective self-government and a more favorable environment for the development of healthy reservation economies, we will take a flexible approach which recognizes the diversity among tribes and the right of each tribe to set its own priorities and goals. The tribes, not the Federal government, will chart the path of their own development. In support of this policy, the Federal government will faithfully fulfill its responsibility for the physical and financial resources it holds in trust for the tribes and their members.

We've celebrated Pan American Day each year since 1931 to draw worldwide attention to the ideals of the Western Hemisphere. And let me say, after 52 years, these ideals are still worth celebrating and remembering.

They advance many fundamental goals of the nations of the Americas -- justice under law, protection of human rights, and economic and social development. Democracy remains the basic bond of our nations. It is our people's permanent aspiration and, for most of them, their way of life. Two-thirds of the members of this organization govern themselves democratically. As you would agree, it is democracy that gives our people their dignity and hope for the future.

A little over a year ago, I had the privilege of appearing in the historic Hall of the Americas to speak about this dignity and this future and to propose a new initiative for the Caribbean Initiative -- or Caribbean Basin, I should say. And just 2 weeks ago, we signed an important agreement which is part of that initiative.

In approving the fiscal year 1982 Caribbean Initiative supplemental appropriation of $350 million, the Congress specified that a portion be set aside for training, part of which will be used for undergraduate scholarships. Because of the OAS fine record of technical cooperation, we've asked the OAS to administer a total of $4.4 million, the largest share of scholarship funds.

Although the amounts are modest, these scholarships will, through a combination of grants and interest-free loans, enable Caribbean students to study subjects crucial to development and democracy in their countries.

Caribbean Basin. It's one more example of the shared goals that inspired Bolivar and which today gives the inter-american system its force. And I now call upon Congress to act rapidly on the trade and tax portions of the CBI so that the entire bill will be in effect.

On this Pan American Day of 1983, would you all extend to your countrymen the warm greeting of the people of the United States and reaffirm our commitment to the spirit of Simon Bolivar and to solidarity among the peoples of the Americas.

On my trip to South and Central America and to the countries that I visited, I said to the heads of state that I met with there, called to their attention the fact that I have mentioned here about the great -- no other section of the world has enjoyed the long term of peace that our countries have enjoyed in these two continents of the Western Hemisphere. And I pointed out that from pole to pole, we worship the same God; we have the same pioneer heritage of having come from mainly European sources to establish all of the nations here, and that it was time for all of us to do even a better job than has been done in the past of the development of not only the resources but the freedom of our people, maintaining the sovereignty of each individual nation, but showing a coalition dedicated to freedom here in this Western Hemisphere. And what a force for good it could be if we could all see each other as partners equal in this effort. And it's my dream also that we continue that kind of a relationship and enhance it and improve it.

Ambassador Kenneth Adelman to be Director of the Arms Control and Disarmament Agency. It's my earnest hope that this positive step will mark the beginning of a new, bipartisan consensus on the vital issue of nuclear arms reduction.

I'm convinced that Kenneth Adelman will prove that the confidence which the Senate has expressed in him today is well founded. Under his leadership, we can look forward to a reinvigorated Arms Control and Disarmament Agency that will make an important contribution to our arms reduction efforts.

As we seek equitable and verifiable agreements with the Soviet Union to reduce the arsenals and the risks of war, we will need the advice and support of the Congress. I'm confident that with full consultation with the Congress and the development of our arms reduction initiatives, the United States can continue to be a force for genuine peace and progress in the world. And if we're met with reciprocal seriousness of purpose from the Soviet Union, 1983 can be a year of historic importance in securing a more solid and stable peace through arms reductions.

Nicaraguan Government is a revolutionary government that took power by force, but with the promise of democratic elections, none of which have taken place. And all of this was under the previous administration. The previous administration, however, did recognize this government of Nicaragua, sought to help it with considerable financial aid, and withdrew that aid, long before we were here, when it became apparent that the government had become completely Marxist, had turned away and thrown out some of the democratic groups that had supported them and fought with them in the revolution to bring democracy to Nicaragua and were, then, no longer a part of the government.

States that it would not attempt to overthrow any other governments in Central America, particularly El Salvador, by helping the insurgents there, the guerrillas, and they violated that promise. And they are still violating it.

And anything that we're doing in that area is simply trying to interdict the supply lines which are supplying the guerrillas in El Salvador. But the picture today is that Nicaragua, with its protests that somehow someone is trying to overthrow them, it, as a revolutionary government, is trying to overthrow the government of a neighboring country, El Salvador, which was a duly elected government and which is going to hold another election before this year is out.

President for National Security Affairs William P.] Clark, have both been talking to him. And you have seen the statement by Barry Goldwater of the Intelligence Committee that is absolutely positive that there is no violation of the law whatsoever. I think that when they pay a little more attention to this, they're going to find out we're not violating the law.

Q. Mr. President, are you willing to say flatly that the United States is not engaging in any activities that a reasonable person could assume could be for the purpose of overthrowing the Nicaraguan Government?

South America -- an army of some 25,000, backed by a militia of 50,000, armed with Soviet weapons that consist of heavy-duty tanks, an air force, helicopter gunships, fighter planes, bombers, and so forth, heavy artillery. And a few thousand Miskito Indians and guerrillas -- I don't think it's reasonable to assume that that kind of a force could nurse any ambitions that they can overthrow that government with that great military force. And I think that people should understand some of these things and ask themselves what is the need for them having the biggest army in all of the region.

Soviet Union may introduce high-performance aircraft or even Cuban troops into Nicaragua. Do you have any information about any impending possibility of this? And, if so, what would be the American response to that move?

The President. Well, no, I think -- I'm not going to answer a hypothetical question with a hypothetical answer. And I only know that that possibility does exist, because the Soviet Union, by way of Cuba, has been engaged already. May I remind you that at the inauguration of the revolutionary government when it took over, Castro was present and a representative of the Soviet Union, and both of them openly hailed Nicaragua as the first Communist country on the mainland of the Western Hemisphere.

The President. We, of course, as I said -- anything that we're doing is aimed at interdicting these supply lines and stopping this effort to overthrow the El Salvador Government. But what I might personally wish or what our government might wish still would not justify us violating the law of the land.

Q. Mr. President, you were successful in your efforts to get a job for Ron Bricker, the bold young man from Pittsburgh who gave you his resume. I understand a lot of other unemployed steelworkers are now flooding the White House with requests for help. Are you planning to help get jobs for these other people, too?

The President. I haven't seen any of those resumes, if they've been sent or anything. I didn't know that. I know there's been talk about up here. If you'll remember, that day Mr. Bricker accosted me and handed me his resume and asked me would I show it to anyone if I had the opportunity, that he was seeking work. And I said, yes, I would. I did. He's got a job.

Now, I didn't expect that all of the unemployed were suddenly going to ask me to be the employment agency individually for them. I think that'd be impossible. But at any time that I can be in any way of help in lining someone up with an employer who's looking for an employee, of course I'd do it, because I think it's a problem on all our minds. And I think -- this digresses from your question, but I think we ought to recognize that throughout this country radio and TV stations that have held job-a-thons have been successful in getting thousands of people put back to work. There are local groups and committees, including right there in Pittsburgh, that are doing the same thing in an effort to help stimulate and move faster, and they have to do it on a basis of individuals. And, we, of course, in our own legislation, with the so-called jobs bill, are doing our part here at the government level. But the main way they're going to go back to work is going to be with the recovery of the economy.

I think any legislation which restricts the relation -- or confines itself to the relationship of a single country, our relationship with a single country, yes, is restrictive on the obligations that the Constitution imposes on the President.

Mrs. Dougan will exercise overall coordinating responsibility within the Federal community for policy formulation and oversight. She will work closely with the Congress and serve as principal liaison with the private sector. Mrs. Dougan will also have major responsibilities for working with senior officials of foreign governments and international organizations.

Mrs. Dougan has served in a number of positions involving telecommunications policy, planning, and programing in both the public and private sector. She recently served in her second Presidential appointment as a Director of the Corporation for Public Broadcasting in addition to her activities as a marketing and telecommunications specialist with Dougan & Associates of Salt Lake City. She has also contributed her services as producer for a number of television programs, including ``The MX Debate,'' which in 1981 won the prestigious Peabody Award for excellence in broadcast journalism. For several years, Mrs. Dougan was CATV marketing and promotion director for TIME, Inc., in New York, where she also did freelance consulting and on-air work in both commercial and cable TV.

She is active nationally in a variety of public service and cultural endeavors, including the national advisory councils of the Center for the Study of the Presidency, Ballet West, the U.S. Committee of the International Institute of Communications, and the board of U.S. Film and Video. She is married to J. Lynn Dougan, an economist, and they have two children.

Chancellor Kohl and other representatives of his government. Our discussions touched on a number of bilateral issues, as well as those general problems confronting our two powerful democratic nations.

As befits one who has just won an impressive election victory, Chancellor Kohl was very positive about the opportunities ahead. I share his optimism and look forward to continuing our close relationship.

The Chancellor and I have many things in common, not the least of which is a deep faith in the strength of Western values. We were able to approach our discussions with a shared appreciation for these values and with an understanding of the many traditions and common interests that link our two countries. The special ties between the German and American people will be expressed this year in the celebration of the tricentennial of German emigration to North America. And I'm especially pleased that President Carstens will be making this event -- or marking it, I should say, with a state visit to our country in the fall.

Summit. And the Chancellor and I agree that we should seek a free and open exchange of views at Williamsburg, with our primary goal being the closest possible cooperation in tackling the problems facing the world economy. Both of us welcome the signs of economic upturn in our countries and will work to assure that recovery is strong and lasting.

As leaders of our respective countries, we call on the Soviet Union to respond seriously to our proposals, proposals which, if given a chance, will strengthen peace and make all mankind a little safer.

President and myself an opportunity to continue our intensive and friendly dialog which we began when I became Chancellor of the Federal Republic of Germany last October. And I would like to take this opportunity once again, here in public, to express the gratitude for the very intensive and friendly consultations that have taken place since that time between our two governments.

We discussed in depth and in great earnest the essential aspects of our joint peace and disarmament policy. In the course of this year, important issues are pending. We are profoundly interested in finding solutions to the issues at hand, if possible, in agreement with the East. And this includes the Geneva negotiations on U.S. and Soviet intermediate-range missiles. We are agreed that the recent Western proposal offers the basis for flexible and dynamic negotiations.

We discussed in detail the CSCE followup meeting in Madrid. We continue to strive for an early and substantial result, which would include an agreement on a conference on disarmament in Europe and make important gains in the area of human rights.

We also discussed the Vienna negotiations about mutual and balanced force reductions. We had extensive discussions about the whole field of East-West relations. And we are agreed that personal contacts with the leaders of the Soviet Union continue to be important.

Another important subject we discussed was the preparation of the economic summit meeting to be held in Williamsburg at the end of May. In this context, we exchanged views about the economic developments in our two countries and about measures to promote economic recovery.

The summit meeting will provide us with an opportunity to intensify the emerging recovery of the international economy through close coordination. In this way we will be able, immediately prior to the continuation of the North-South dialog of the UNCTAD Conference [United Nations Conference on Trade and Development] in Belgrade, to make a contribution towards solving the economic and social problems of the developing countries. Thus, we want to promote genuine independence and genuine nonalignment.

The President and I are agreed that the European Community and the United States together bear a great share of responsibility for the international economy. We are aware that the future development of relations between the United States and the European Community must, and will, live up to this responsibility.

I am leaving Washington firmly convinced that the quality of our relations will also include -- should determine -- our policy of safeguarding peace and, in particular, our common efforts to achieve progress in the Geneva negotiations.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 15th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Mental illness costs this Nation more than $50 billion a year and contributes to declining productivity and rising health costs. Approximately 35 million people a year suffer from a diagnosable mental disorder. In addition, millions more seek professional assistance to alleviate the physical and emotional problems created by excessive stress.

These facts and figures, however, cannot describe the high cost in human suffering from mental illness. Incapacitation -- most often temporary but permanent for some -- may result from severe depression, crippling anxieties, or other manifestations of mental disorders. Yet public fear and misunderstanding of their illnesses place additional burdens on the afflicted and their families.

It is important that the public understand that major advancements brought about by science have made mental illnesses and stress-related disorders greatly amenable to treatment. New technologies have added significantly to the numbers of patients who have improved or recovered following treatment and promise further advances.

In recognition of the importance for our Nation of the treatment, care and support for the mentally ill provided by health professionals, volunteers, and family members, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 52, has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation designating the week of April 10 through April 16, 1983, as National Mental Health Week.

Our Founding Fathers were guided by a belief in the dignity of the individual when they framed our system of government. The Constitution and the Bill of Rights guarantee the blessings of liberty to all, regardless of race, religion, or national origin. These cherished documents bequeath to all Americans the right to equal justice under law and the means to safeguard this right through the legal system.

Americans to reflect on our legal heritage, the rights we enjoy under our democracy, and the role of law in our society. The theme of this year's Law Day observance is ``Sharing in Justice,'' highlighting both the rights and the responsibilities of each citizen as a participant in shaping and protecting our laws and system of justice.

Each new generation of Americans inherits as a birthright the legal protections secured, protected, and expanded by the vigilance and sacrifice of preceding generations. These rights -- freedom of speech, trial by jury, personal liberty, a representative and limited government, and equal protection of the laws, to name but a few -- give every citizen a vested interest in American justice.

Active participation in our system serves to protect these interests and preserve them for future generations. It is participation that begins in our own neighborhoods, at town meetings, and during open sessions of city government. Meaningful sharing and participation in our system of justice must start where one is affected most: close to home. This is the basis and strength of our Federal system. Sharing in justice also means working for objectives within the legal system, voting thoughtfully and intelligently, expressing views to our elected representatives, serving as jurors, and volunteering to make our neighborhoods, schools, and communities better places for all. The continuous involvement of the people with all levels of government makes our system of justice work.

I call upon the legal profession, schools, civic, service, and fraternal organizations, public bodies, libraries, the courts, all media of public information, business, the clergy, and all interested individuals and organizations to focus attention on our Nation's dedication to justice. I also call upon all public officials to display the flag of the United States on all government buildings open on Law Day, May 1, 1983.

Yesterday, April 15th, was tax day, and I know many of you are still recovering. So, I hate to mention taxes again, but there's something I think you should know. It's about misrepresentations surrounding the withholding tax on interest and dividends. People are being badly misled, and that misinformation shouldn't go unanswered.

Americans have been arguing over taxes ever since the Boston Tea Party more than 200 years ago, when an angry band of taxpayers dumped a shipload of tea into Boston Harbor. Well, in the spirit of the Boston Tea Party, I'd like to dump all the misinformation you've been getting on withholding taxes. In fact, I'd almost like to dump overboard some of those who've been spreading this misinformation and scaring people, especially our older citizens, many of whom have written me very frightened.

As you may recall, this whole business started last summer when the Congress passed, and I signed, the law requiring banks and other financial institutions to withhold 10 percent on interest and dividend income.

This withholding, which starts this coming July, is not a new tax. I came to Washington to reduce taxes. And I can tell you, I wouldn't have signed the withholding law if it had been a new tax on our people. It's simply a more effective way of collecting tax money that's already owed, just as employers have been withholding taxes from our paychecks for almost 40 years, a procedure most wage earners accept as both fair and necessary.

Withholding 10 percent on interest and dividends will allow the Internal Revenue Service to recover an estimated $18 billion in otherwise lost revenues over the next 5 years -- and that's without taxing honest taxpayers a penny more than they now pay.

Past experience has proven that withholding is by far the most effective means of combating those who don't pay their tax bill to the government. The only people who stand to lose under this law are those who haven't been paying their taxes in the first place, and what's wrong with that?

While I'm at it, let me expose a few of the myths which may be bothering some of you. First off, withholding will not place burdens on our older Americans or lower-income individuals. The vast majority of older Americans -- 85 percent -- are exempted under the law. And to get that exemption, all they have to do is fill out a form no more complicated than a deposit slip. As for low-income individuals, anyone who paid $600 or less in taxes last year, or married couples who paid under $1,000, are exempt as well. In addition, everyone with small savings accounts with interest payments of $150 or less are also exempt. So, for example, most kids' accounts wouldn't have withholding.

All of this raises an obvious question. If withholding is nothing more than a more effective collection method, what's all the controversy about? Well, some of the banking interests seem to think withholding will inconvenience them. But we've taken measures to make sure this changeover isn't burdensome. And as for savers, it will actually be a real convenience for many of them. For example, withholding will free many taxpayers from the chore of preparing quarterly tax payments. It will prevent other citizens from being faced with a substantial accumulated tax bill on April 15th. Most wage earners already prefer to have tax withheld from their paychecks, rather than having to come up with the whole bundle on that annual day of reckoning.

Well, that just doesn't make sense. Withholding will have a minimal effect on accrued interest. For example, the annual loss on a $1,000 account, earning 9-percent interest, would be less than 50 cents. And such an account would be exempt anyway.

The fact of the matter is that those already paying their taxes can get back all of the amount withheld by reducing their estimated tax payments or by adjusting the number of exemptions on their wage withholding.

Thanks to the pressure from a very busy lobby, however, the Congress is now considering repeal of withholding before it's even gone into effect. This would help no one who's doing their fair share, but it would let all those who are not paying their taxes on interest and dividends off the hook. So, I'm not about to let it happen. Rather than asking those who are paying taxes to pay more, I say that those who already owe taxes should pay them. And I'm carrying my veto pen right behind my ear. If the repeal passes the Congress, I'm all set to veto it, just as I am prepared to protect the July tax cut and indexing with a veto if necessary.

Nations Children's Fund (UNICEF) recently reported that over 40,000 children in developing countries still die every day, victims of malnutrition and disease. This is a tragedy of global proportions and requires a global effort in response.

UNICEF is now pursuing a ``health revolution'' for children in developing countries that involves a new combination of technological and social approaches to health. It is estimated that this combination, coupled with networks of trained health workers backed by government services and international assistance, can save the lives of 20,000 children each day within a decade.

One technological achievement has been the development and distribution of an inexpensive home treatment for diarrhea, a major contributor to deaths among young children in developing countries. This treatment was developed after years of research in the International Center for Diarrheal Disease Research in Bangladesh. The United States has contributed to that institution for more than 20 years. The World Health Organization has also been a focal point for international support and study of diarrheal diseases.

A second element is the development of low-cost vaccines which do not require refrigeration and which can be used in remote areas to protect children from such killers as measles, diphtheria, tetanus, whooping cough, polio, and tuberculosis.

Another factor is the promotion of breast feeding for its nutritional and hygienic value, as well as its immunological qualities. Still another is a simple infant weight chart kept by the child's mother which indicates a child's progress at monthly weighings, making malnutrition quickly detectable.

Its design and use have been improved and tested in United States-supported maternal-child health programs around the world. UNICEF has found that a great portion of malnutrition cases are due to the problem going undetected rather than lack of food in the family.

The American people have always been in the vanguard of support for children's health and well-being. As President of the United States, I am asking the American people to help bring about a health revolution for children during the coming decade by supporting UNICEF's humanitarian program.

Let me begin with a brief statement. As you know, our Embassy in Beirut was the target this morning of a vicious, terrorist bombing. This cowardly act has claimed a number of killed and wounded. It appears that there are some American casualties, but we don't know yet the exact number or the extent of injury.

In cooperation with the Lebanese authorities, we're still verifying the details and identifying the casualties. I commend Ambassador Robert Dillon and his dedicated staff who are carrying on under these traumatic circumstances in the finest tradition of our military and foreign services.

Just a few minutes ago, President Gemayel called me to convey on behalf of the Lebanese people his profound regret and sorrow with regard to this incident and asked me to relay the condolences on behalf of the people of Lebanon to the families of those victims. He also expressed his firm determination that we persevere in the search for peace in that region. And I told President Gemayel that I joined him in those sentiments. This criminal attack on a diplomatic establishment will not deter us from our goals of peace in the region. We will do what we know to be right.

We also remain committed to the recovery by the Lebanese Government of full sovereignty throughout all of its territory. The people of Lebanon must be given the chance to resume their efforts to lead a normal life, free from violence, without the presence of unauthorized foreign forces on their soil. And to this noble end, I rededicate the efforts of the United States.

Seldom are we able to point to one person's work and pronounce it not only good and worthwhile but also a step toward building peace in our time. And today, we enjoy that good fortune and we can measure it sixfold. We're honoring six Americans who have dedicated themselves to the cause of peace -- Americans who have traveled voluntarily to unfamiliar lands to help citizens of developing nations.

I have often spoken about how the spirit of voluntarism moves like a deep and mighty river throughout our own country. I've sensed a real, upbeat joy that Americans feel this spirit is being restored, and they're glad that it's getting stronger.

You know, the Peace Corps appeals to all ages. There's no upper age limit for volunteers. Many are well into their sixties and seventies, and a few Peace Corps volunteers are over 80. Our older volunteers are honored for the wisdom, as you have been told, that they've acquired over a lifetime, especially in some of the developing nations where life expectancy is only about 45. And these senior citizen Peace Corps volunteers are having the experience of a lifetime. I hope more of our older Americans will consider joining the Peace Corps to put their experience to work.

All of us hope and pray for peace. America has no higher aspiration. We're working for something never before achieved in any administration -- to go beyond a limitation to an actual reduction in the numbers of strategic weapons, and that's one great source of hope. Another is what six volunteers do every day.

If each of us could strive to live by their example, our world would be a much better and a far safer place. We applaud the volunteers who are being honored and all the volunteers in their quest for peace and on behalf of the American people thank them during our celebration of National Volunteer Week.

Michael McKenna Bolster. Architect and engineer, expert in Arabic, Michael McKenna Bolster helped restore water sources throughout the mountains after last year's devastating earthquake in Yemen. Accepting the award for Michael is Mr. Joseph Bolster.

Working towards her Ph. D. in speech therapy, Joan LeClair has worked tirelessly to create a trained cadre of speech therapists in Malaysia to carry on after she's gone. Accepting the award is Mrs. Harriette LeClair from Minneapolis, Minnesota.

A biochemistry major from the University of California, James O. Morris established a new fishing station in the remote mountains of Guatemala from which he could encourage farmers to build ponds and raise fish for new sources of money and protein. Accepting the award for James Morris is Mrs. Kathy Morris of Carmel, California.

A highly trained epidemiologist specializing in communicable diseases, Monica Wernette learned several local tribal languages to be able to track down the unusual monkey pox virus in the tropical rain forest of Zaire. Accepting the award for Monica is Mrs. Charles Wernette of Clay City, Kansas.

Having served as a Peace Corps volunteer for 10 years in Ghana, Sister Madeline created a hospital canteen which has made worldwide history, most recently serving thousands of Ghanaian refugees, truly an outstanding effort and sacrifice. Sister Madeline Chorman is accepting her own award.

The Attorney General. Mr. President, last year you appointed a commission on the victims of crime, called the Task Force on the Victims of Crime, to study the problems of victims and to make recommendations to vindicate the rights of victims. That task force completed its work, made 68 recommendations, and those recommendations are now being studied by those of us at the Justice Department and others who are concerned with this problem -- victims being the forgotten people in the criminal justice system.

The Chairman of that commission -- that task force was Mrs. Lois Herrington, a distinguished lawyer from California, who is the acting head of our Office of Justice Assistance, Research and Statistics. And I would like to introduce her to you now. Lois.

Mr. President, when you established this task force, you led the Nation into a new era in the treatment of victims of crime. Never before has any President recognized the plight of those forgotten by the criminal justice system. It is my privilege to introduce to you five citizens who have given invaluable assistance to your task force. They represent hundreds of others who came forward, some at great personal sacrifice, to inform us all of the depth of this problem.

Mrs. Evelyn Blackwell is a widow from Washington, D.C. She has given us a special sense of the problems crime imposes on senior citizens, and she is a model for how those courageous citizens can fight back.

Since 1975 her home has been broken into five times and her limited income has prevented her from replacing most of those things taken from her. Gradually, she came to fear that no place, including her home, was safe. But because of her spirit and a refusal to give up, Mrs. Blackwell has been working to combat crime in her neighborhood, especially crimes against the elderly. In addition, she and a staff of 40 volunteers accompany elderly victims to court to ease the burden of this process on them.

During one robbery, he and two others were held hostage at gunpoint. Mr. Regalia always cooperated with authorities, even though numerous court appearances required that he repeatedly close his business. Eventually, the financial drain on his business, coupled with increasing fear, forced Mr. Regalia to sell the business he and his family had worked to build.

He now works as a pharmacist in San Quentin Prison. And he testified that although he rubs elbows with murderers and convicts now, he feels safer than the neighborhood pharmacist who serves the public.

Mrs. Geraldine Strong is a victim of crime whose injuries were magnified by the callous way she was treated in the legal system. Mrs. Strong was at work one morning at a Maryland public library when an assailant with a long criminal history kidnaped her at gunpoint, held her captive for 3 hours while he raped, robbed, and repeatedly threatened to kill her if she ever testified against him.

All too often the pain and suffering that victims of crime experience continues long after the passage of the criminal event itself. Last year, three men entered the St. Louis home of Harold and Lily Tuthill and savagely beat them both.

Efficient police work led to the quick apprehension of the criminals. But the Tuthills have spent long periods in hospitals recovering from their physical and psychological injuries. The continuing fear that resulted from the attack forced them to move from their home of 40 years. Their lives will never truly be the same.

Mrs. Spencer went to work to improve the system of justice in her State. As a result of her efforts and of citizens like her, more than 20 laws have been changed to better protect and assist victims of crime in Indiana. She has been a true champion of the cause of crime victims, and I'm very proud to introduce her to you.

Standing here in the Rose Garden listening to these dreadful stories of senseless brutality seems almost unreal. But for far too many of our citizens, the threat of violent crime is, as we've heard, all too real.

Mr. Tuthill -- as well as all the citizens who have come forward to help us come to grips with this very serious problem. You've acted in the highest tradition of our country. By your courage and selflessness, you've done your nation a great service.

I think the time has come when we, as a free people, should face up to some hard decisions about crime. The crime epidemic threat has spread throughout our country, and it's no uncontrollable disease, much less an irreversible tide. Nor is it some inevitable sociological phenomenon, traceable to urbanization or modern society. It is, instead, and in large measure, a cumulative result of too much emphasis on the protection of the rights of the accused and too little concern for our government's responsibility to protect the lives, homes, and rights of our law-abiding citizens.

We should be proud that our criminal justice system protects the constitutional rights of the accused. But over the past few years, that system has allowed the safeguards protecting the rights of the innocent to be torn away. This has so complicated the system, clogged our courts, and reduced the chances of conviction -- as well as the level of punishment once a criminal is convicted -- that the criminal element now calculates that crime really does pay.

The suffering of these victims we've met today and the millions of others, as well, is testimony to the inequity and the inadequacy of today's system. Our Task Force on Victims of Crime called the neglect and mistreatment of crime victims a national disgrace. I heartily agree. What we have to do now is move forward to correct this disgrace and, at the same time, to clear away the roadblocks that prevent the authorities from doing their job. But we need your help. Prompt enactment of our anticrime package, particularly the bail reform and sentencing provisions, is needed to protect victims from criminals. The voice of the people must be heard in the Congress.

It will take time and hard work to undo the distortions of our criminal justice system that brought on this wave of crime. But under Attorney General Smith and his leadership, we're moving on these tough questions.

Finally, while Washington is a vital part of tackling the problem, it will also take the coordinated efforts of people in State and local government and in every walk of life to get this situation under control. Without action at the State and local level, our Federal efforts can achieve little.

Ultimately, if we're to succeed, each of us, as citizens, must do his or her part not only through contacting elected officials, though that always helps, but also by watching out for our friends, our families, and our communities. Crime prevention is no longer just a job for the police. Every level of government and Americans everywhere must take an active part. Many neighborhoods have a crime watch program. I would hope that more and more of our citizens take the time and effort to get involved.

Later today, I'll send a report to the Congress which endorses the recommendations of the bipartisan Commission on Strategic Forces, urges prompt congressional action and support. This distinguished panel's recommendations are important for two reasons: The actions they propose will preserve stable deterrence and thus protect the peace, and they will add solid incentives and credibility to our efforts to negotiate arms reductions that can pave the way to a more secure and peaceful future.

On the 23d of March, I spoke to the American people about our program for strengthening this nation's security and that of our allies and announced a long-term research effort to reduce, someday, the threat posed by nuclear ballistic missiles. A week later in Los Angeles, I expanded our efforts to limit and reduce this danger through reliable, verifiable, and stabilizing arms control agreements. Both of these paths lead to a common goal: preventing conflict, reducing the risk of war, and safeguarding the peace.

Every American President has accepted this crucial objective as his most basic responsibility. But preserving the peace requires more than wishful thinking and vague good intentions. Concrete, positive action is required to free the world from the specter of nuclear conflict. And that's why we will continue to work relentlessly to achieve nuclear stability at the lowest possible levels.

Our words, policies, and actions all make clear to the world our country's deeply held conviction that nuclear war on any scale would be a tragedy of unparalleled scope. Time and again, America has exercised unilateral restraint, good will, and a sincere commitment to effective arms control.

Unfortunately, these actions alone have not yet made us truly safer, and they haven't reduced the danger of nuclear war. Over the past year, for example, the Soviets have deployed over 1,200 intercontinental ballistic missile  warheads,  more  than  the  entire Peacekeeper program.

The history of American involvement in arms control shows us what works and what doesn't work. The fact is that in the past our one-sided restraint and good will failed to promote similar restraint and good will from the Soviet Union. They also failed to produce meaningful arms control. But history also teaches us that when the United States has shown the resolve to remain strong, stabilizing arms control can be achieved.

Soviet Union. After the Soviet leadership demonstrated a clear lack of interest, the Congress agreed to fund an antiballistic missile building program. And the result was predictable. Once the Soviets knew we were going ahead, they came to the negotiating table, and we negotiated a treaty. It was formally adopted and remains in force today.

January and directed it to review the strategic program for United States forces with particular emphasis on intercontinental ballistic missile systems and their basing. A distinguished bipartisan panel of Americans who served on the Commission, and those who served as senior counselors, have performed a great service to their country, and we all owe them a debt of gratitude.

Brent Scowcroft, the Commission's Chairman, other Commission members, Harold Brown, and the senior consultants are here today. I want to express my appreciation to you all for a tough job extraordinarily well done.

In the finest spirit of bipartisanship, the Commission unanimously arrived at clear, important recommendations on some of the most difficult issues of our time. During the past 3 months, the Commission held dozens of formal meetings and numerous small conferences. They talked to over 200 technical experts and consulted closely with the Congress. The Commission members sought a common objective: to achieve a greater degree of national consensus concerning our approach to strategic force modernization and arms control.

As the Constitution's [Commission's] report concludes, ``If we can begin to see ourselves in dealing with these issues, not as political partisans or as crusaders for one specific solution to a part of this complex set of problems, but rather as citizens of a great nation with the humbling obligation to persevere in the long-run task of preserving both peace and liberty for the world, a common perspective may finally be found.'' Well, these words guided the work of the Commission. It is my fervent hope that they will guide all of us as we work toward the solution of what has been a difficult and lengthy issue.

The Commission has completed its work and last week submitted its report to me. It was immediately released, as you know, to the public. After reviewing the report, I met with the National Security Council. They endorse the Commission's recommendations, as do all the members of the Joint Chiefs of Staff. And so do I.

First, the Commission urges us to continue the strategic modernization program which I announced in October of 1981. It reaffirms that the need remains for improvements in the command, control, and communications of our strategic forces, and continuation of our bomber, submarine, and cruise missile program.

Second, the Commission urges modernization of our ICBM forces. We should immediately proceed to develop and produce the Peacekeeper missile and deploy 100 in existing Minuteman silos near Warren Air Force Base in Wyoming. At the same time, the Commission recommends that we begin engineering the design for a small, single-warhead missile. If strategic and technical considerations warrant, this missile could be ready for deployment in the early 1990's.

Third, the Commission recommends major research efforts in strategic defense and a thorough research program of hardening, making our land-based missile systems more secure. This modernization effort is the final component of our comprehensive, strategic program. It will mean a safer, more secure America. And it will provide clear evidence to the Soviet Union that it is in their best interest to negotiate with us in good faith and with seriousness of purpose. That adds up to an important incentive for both arms control and deterrence, for peace and security now and far into the future.

Finally, the Commission underscores the need for ambitious arms control negotiations, negotiations that would lead to agreements that are balanced, promote stability in time of crisis, and result in meaningful, verifiable reductions. These are precisely the objectives of our arms control proposals now on the table in Geneva. These are -- well, I want to reemphasize that we're in Geneva seeking equitable, reliable agreements that would bring real reductions.

So, the task before us is to demonstrate our resolve, our national will, and our good faith. That's absolutely essential both for maintaining an effective deterrent and for achieving successful arms reductions. Make no mistake, unless we modernize our land-based missile systems, the Soviet Union will have no real reason to negotiate meaningful reductions. If we fail to act, we cannot reasonably expect an acceptable outcome in our arms control negotiations, and we will also weaken the deterrent posture that has preserved the peace for more than a generation.

Therefore, I urge the Congress to join me now in supporting this bipartisan program to pursue arms control agreements that promote stability, to meet the needs of our ICBM force today, and to move to a more stable ICBM structure in the future.

To follow up on the Commission's recommendations, I have asked Brent Scowcroft in his capacity as Chairman to keep me closely advised as this issue moves toward resolution, particularly as it relates to arms control.

For more than a decade, each of four administrations made proposals for arms control and modernization. Unfortunately, each became embroiled in political controversy. The members of the Commission, the Secretary of Defense, the Joint Chiefs of Staff, and I have all had to take fresh looks at our previous positions. But despite the wide range of views these groups have held in the past, we now have a program that has our unanimous support.

Support by the Congress and the American people for this consensus will unite us in our common search for ways to strengthen our national security, reduce the risk of war, and ultimately reduce the level of nuclear weapons. We can no longer afford to delay. The time to act is now.

Congress regarding the Peacekeeper missile, possible alternatives to the Peacekeeper, and possible alternative ICBM basing modes. The report, which the Commission submitted to me, was delivered to you last week. Attached is a classified report prepared by the Department of Defense submitted pursuant to the provisions of subsection (7) of Title V of the Department of Defense Appropriations Act, 1983, enacted as part of P.L. 97 - 377. The attached document addresses the issues set out in subsection (7).

Finally, I reconfirm that I am fully committed to continue to pursue ambitious and objective arms reduction negotiations with a goal of agreements that are balanced, promote stability in time of crisis, constitute meaningful force reductions, and are verifiable. As you know, our proposals to secure reductions of all types of weapons are before the Soviets in many forums.

I urge the Congress to join me now in this bipartisan effort to settle on a modernization plan for our strategic forces. For more than a decade, each of four administrations has made proposals for arms control and modernization that have become embroiled in political controversy.

Chiefs of Staff, and I have all had to take fresh looks at our previous positions. Despite the range of views these groups have held in the past, we are presenting to you a unanimous view on this vital issue. Your support for the consensus can unite us in taking a major step forward in our common search for ways to ensure national security.

On October 19, 1981, we celebrated the Bicentennial of the Battle of Yorktown, the last major engagement between deployed field armies of the two sides. That event -- though impossible without the courage and fortitude of the footsoldier and sailor -- was nonetheless most memorable as an occasion to recall and appreciate the contribution of our allies and the astute judgement and actions of our joint land and sea commands.

This occasion today is different. The interregnum between Yorktown and this April day two centuries ago was a long one of minor skirmishes and the dull and repetitive duties of men who were justifiably impatient to return to their homes. Yet they stood loyally as the visible expression of the nation's will. Our hearts turn with affection toward them on the anniversary of this day when their Commander announced that further hazard to life and limb was suspended and likely to be recognized soon through formal treaty.

The focus then will be on the diplomatic process. The patient and skillful efforts of our plenipotentiaries in Paris, Madrid, and the Hague -- Benjamin Franklin, John Adams, and John Jay -- and the constant support of the people of this great new land made independence for the American people a reality.

There are further events that merit our continued recognition and celebration. The blessings of independence, which were secured for us on the field of battle, became truly secure only when ensconsed in a viable political structure.

American Jews have made significant contributions to every phase of American life. They have served this Nation by fighting for her freedom, building her industry, working for her goals, and nurturing her dreams. They have brought distinction to every field of American endeavor and have participated in the cultural development, economic growth, and spiritual progress of America.

The Jewish people remain dedicated to ancient and revered traditions which have been severely tested over the centuries. From the observance of Passover, which tells the story of the passage from bondage to freedom and rekindles the hope for all who are oppressed, through the participation in the National Days of Remembrance honoring the victims and survivors of the Holocaust and the anniversary of the Warsaw Ghetto Uprising, Jews pay tribute to their past.

Each spring, the American Jewish community remembers its struggles, celebrates its achievements, and renews its commitment to a future of continued advancement. It is during this time that American Jews renew their common heritage with Jews throughout the world by celebrating such occasions as Israel's Independence Day and Solidarity Day for Soviet Jews. In particular, these Jewish traditions have been honored in 1983 by the American Gathering of Holocaust Survivors.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 19th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

The President. Well, I want to extend to all of you a very warm welcome. Something ought to be warm. [Laughter] But it's especially fitting that so many of us from so many different backgrounds -- young and old, the working and the retired, Democrat and Republican -- should come together for the signing of this landmark legislation.

This bill demonstrates for all time our nation's ironclad commitment to social security. It assures the elderly that America will always keep the promises made in troubled times a half a century ago. It assures those who are still working that they, too, have a pact with the future. From this day forward, they have one pledge that they will get their fair share of benefits when they retire.

And this bill assures us of one more thing that is equally important. It's a clear and dramatic demonstration that our system can still work when men and women of good will join together to make it work.

Just a few months ago, there was legitimate alarm that social security would soon run out of money. On both sides of the political aisle, there were dark suspicions that opponents from the other party were more interested in playing politics than in solving the problem. But in the eleventh hour, a distinguished bipartisan commission appointed by House Speaker O'Neill, by Senate Majority Leader Baker, and by me began, to find a solution that could be enacted into law.

Political leaders of both parties set aside their passions and joined in that search. The result of these labors in the Commission and the Congress are now before us, ready to be signed into law, a monument to the spirit of compassion and commitment that unites us as a people.

Today, all of us can look each other square in the eye and say, ``We kept our promises.'' We promised that we would protect the financial integrity of social security. We have. We promised that we would protect beneficiaries against any loss in current benefits. We have. And we promised to attend to the needs of those still working, not only those Americans nearing retirement but young people just entering the labor force. And we've done that, too.

None of us here today would pretend that this bill is perfect. Each of us had to compromise one way or another. But the essence of bipartisanship is to give up a little in order to get a lot. And, my fellow Americans, I think we've gotten a very great deal.

A tumultuous debate about social security has raged for more than two decades in this country; but there has been one point that has won universal agreement: The social security system must be preserved. And rescuing the system has meant reexamining its original intent, purposes, and practical limits.

The amendments embodied in this legislation recognize that social security cannot do as much for us as we might have hoped when the trust funds were overflowing. Time and again, benefits were increased far beyond the taxes and wages that were supposed to support them. In this compromise we have struck the best possible balance between the taxes we pay and the benefits paid back. Any more in taxes would be an unfair burden on working Americans and could seriously weaken our economy. Any less would threaten the commitment already made to this generation of retirees and to their children.

And these amendments adjust to that progress. The changes in this legislation will allow social security to age as gracefully as all of us hope to do ourselves, without becoming an overwhelming burden on generations still to come.

So, today we see an issue that once divided and frightened so many people now uniting us. Our elderly need no longer fear that the checks they depend on will be stopped or reduced. These amendments protect them. Americans of middle age need no longer worry whether their career-long investment will pay off. These amendments guarantee it. And younger people can feel confident that social security will still be around when they need it to cushion their retirement.

These amendments reaffirm the commitment of our government to the performance and stability of social security. It was nearly 50 years ago when, under the leadership of Franklin Delano Roosevelt, the American people reached a great turning point, setting up the social security system. F. D. R. spoke then of an era of startling industrial changes that tended more and more to make life insecure. It was his belief that the system can furnish only a base upon which each one of our citizens may build his individual security through his own individual efforts. Today we reaffirm Franklin Roosevelt's commitment that social security must always provide a secure and stable base so that older Americans may live in dignity.

And now before I sign this legislation, may I pause for a moment and recognize just a few of the people here who've done so much to make this moment possible. There are so many deserving people here today -- leaders of the Congress, all members of the Ways and Means and Finance Committees, and members of the Commission, up in front here, but it would be impossible to recognize them all. But, first, can I ask Alan Greenspan and members of the Commission -- I was going to say to stand -- [laughter] -- but there are others that are also standing here -- but the other members of the Commission to stand so that we can recognize them. Thank you. And their Chairman, Alan Greenspan.

There are those who would question as to whether or not the social security bill was the most important bill that ever did pass the Congress of the United States. Others would say there were other acts. But I always believed the social security system was the greatest act that ever passed the Congress. It gave respect and it gave dignity to the golden-ager of America.

Government that on occasion we rise above politics; we rise above confrontation; and we address, on a bipartisan basis, the great challenges and issues that confront the Republic. Sometimes it's been on issues of war and peace. Sometimes it has been on issues of the rights and opportunities of minorities and individuals within our country, once on the salvation of the Union itself.

But there's a canny understanding in the American political system that sometimes there are issues that are more important than any of us, or perhaps all of us, taken together. The preservation of the social security system is one of those issues. And in the uniquely American way, those of us who participate in government, Republicans and Democrats together, public and private citizens, gathered together and subordinated our own views to those of the welfare of the majority.

Mr. President, I commend you, sir. I commend the members of this Commission. I commend my colleagues in the Congress, the committees directly involved, and those members who are so intimately involved in this sensitive political issue on a successful conclusion of another chapter in the real greatness of the American political system; that is, the subordination of our own particular political ambition in favor of the greater good.

I know some of you've come long distances just to participate in this ceremony. We have shared an historic moment, for in signing these amendments into law, we've restored some much needed security to an uncertain world.

As a mark of respect for the American diplomats, military personnel and loyal staff members who died violently in the performance of their duty on April 18, 1983, in the tragic bombing of the United States Embassy in Beirut, Lebanon, I hereby order, by virtue of the authority vested in me as President of the United States of America by Section 175 of Title 36 of the United States Code, that the flag of the United States shall be flown at half-staff upon all public buildings and grounds, at all military posts and naval stations, and on all naval vessels of the Federal government in the District of Columbia and throughout the United States and its Territories and possessions through Tuesday, April 26, 1983. I also direct that the flag shall be flown at half-staff for the same length of time at all United States embassies, legations, consular offices, and other facilities abroad, including all military facilities and naval vessels and stations.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 20th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

United States Government delegation to honor the brave men and women victimized by a terrorist attack while serving the United States in Lebanon. The delegation is scheduled to depart Washington on April 21.

While in Lebanon the delegation will meet with the Lebanese leadership, the courageous men and women -- both Lebanese and American -- of the Embassy staff, and the members of the United States Marine Amphibious Unit deployed in the Beirut area. The visit by this high-level delegation will also serve to underscore the depth of our gratitude to and admiration for the brave members of Lebanon's Internal Security Force and military services, some of whom gave their lives in protecting our diplomatic mission.

It's especially an opportunity to help to create a basis for sustainable, noninflationary growth in the world economy and to strengthen the international trading and financial systems and the links between them. The European Community, our largest overseas trading partner, will be essential to that effort.

We agreed also that the United States Government and the Commission must make urgent efforts to find solutions to the differences we have on international trade issues. We're both committed to avoiding any slide into protectionism. We also noted with satisfaction the progress made in various organizations toward a common Western approach on questions on East-West economic relations.

Ladies and gentlemen, I have nothing to add to what the President said. I'm in full agreement with him. But we had a good meeting, and I'm now even more confident than when I came that Williamsburg will be a success, and we'll cooperate in order to make it success.

In a very real sense, this was a grassroots effort, because it was undertaken by local television broadcast stations, the backbone of this country's remarkable system of free television news, information, and entertainment. I'm especially pleased that local broadcasters are receiving this recognition today, because day in and day out these dedicated, hard-working men and women contribute immeasurably to the quality of life in their respective communities.

It is, I believe, clear that the jobs fair efforts of these stations has succeeded beyond anyone's expectations. For example, to date, in the six Taft stations alone, almost 2,000 people have been placed in new jobs as a result of jobs fairs, and the placements are continuing every day. I know that everyone in this room could give exciting and heartwarming examples of the success of these efforts. Let me give just a couple.

In Kansas City a 35-year-old electronics technician who had been unemployed for 6 months was hired by an electronics repair service. He told our WDAF - TV reporter that finding a job took him from a state of desperation to one of optimism. In Cincinnati a 38-year-old unemployed Vietnam veteran is now working as a machine shop supervisor and earning $20,000 a year. That position had been listed with the State employment service for 8 months and went unfilled until WKRC - TV's job fair.

By the way, it's critical to point out that none of this could have happened without the tremendous support and cooperation of businesses, both large and small, who came forward with offers of jobs, and also without the help of the many State and local employment bureaus that worked with us.

Let me very quickly cite what I think are the three primary benefits of the jobs fair effort. First, and, of course, foremost were the people who were put back to work. Second, was the hope that was provided to unemployed people everywhere, the kind of hope that is generated when desperate, dejected people see concrete evidence that someone cares, that somebody's trying to help. And, third, the example that the job fairs provided of the strength and influence of local broadcast stations. It gave us a chance to reaffirm what we have always known and practiced: that local problems can best be solved locally by neighbors helping neighbors; that when the American people are given a chance through the initiative of the private sector to help, they respond unselfishly and enthusiastically.

Mr. President, we thank you for providing the leadership which challenged the private sector to pitch in and help and, specifically, for giving us a chance to help. It was exciting, it was rewarding, it was fun. And, Mr. President, it worked. From all of us, thank you.

The President. Well, welcome to the White House and thank you, Charlie Mechem, for describing what the Taft stations and your other colleagues in the broadcast industry have been accomplishing. And may I say, I have my own story also.

Your efforts in creating job-a-thons have been examples of the finest tradition of community service. And let me just read to you from the clips. In Arizona it was reported that ``some 3,000 unemployed Arizonans are back at work this week not because of any government program, but as the result of an extensive effort made by the State's private sector.'' Jack Londen, who's a good friend of mine, was the moving force behind the job-a-thon televised by KPNX - TV. He persuaded Marcon Incorporated of Phoenix to donate $60,000 worth of material and computer time to create a jobs bank where employers and prospective employees are matched. This was a statewide effort, and I hope that we can see more of them.

In Cedar Rapids, KGAN - TV began the idea by preempting its local and network prime-time programing last summer. Before the show was over and the job-a-thon ended, some 319 jobs were netted. Sally Dale, a housekeeper-babysitter who'd been out of work for months, received a job offer within 60 seconds of her television interview.

There are many more examples of your good work. In communities throughout the country, these job-a-thons, job fairs, and other private initiatives have proven to be successful in matching skillful people with new jobs.

What you've done is one vital step in a process of helping some mighty fine people move through a very difficult period of transition. Last week a well-qualified, former steelworker in Pittsburgh -- was the one that I mentioned earlier about the letter, Ron Bricker -- and asked for help. And, as I say, I wish I could help everyone as we were able to help him. Jim had a hand in that, that did a couple of phone calls before it worked out.

We're trying to do that with an economic recovery program that gets to the root causes of our economic problems, and day by day, we're seeing mounting evidence that that program is working. In the meantime, however, there are hundreds of thousands of hard-working individuals like Ron Bricker who face immediate problems. Fortunately, in this case, we were able to direct him to a job interview. And he took it from there. And, as I say, he now has a job with the Tandy Corporation.

I'd like to be able to take more individual action. But realistically, I have to ask for your assistance and for that of other stations like yours to help fellows like Ron. These job-a-thons are difficult to do, I know. They take the work and coordination of many people. So, I want to add a word of appreciation to all the cameramen and the technicians and the reporters -- some of whom, I know are with us today -- who volunteered their time and skills to help make these job-a-thons a success.

The job-a-thon, of course, is only one of many tools that we have for connecting well-qualified workers with opportunities. We have also supported the creation of job-search clubs that are being organized by the National Alliance of Business in coordination with the Departments of Labor and Commerce. And technical experts and members of our soon-to-be-announced Advisory Council on Private Sector Initiatives will be working with employers to provide displaced employees with basic skills needed to find new jobs.

In short, while coming to grips with the causes of our economic difficulties, we also have to do our best to give individual workers, hurt by the economic downturn and technological changes, a fair shake. It's going to take all of us, in and out of government, to get this done.

Now that I've thanked you for what you've already done, let me leave you with a challenge to double your efforts and do it some more. The job-a-thon, an idea that was born out of the creative thinking and hard work of a few local stations, is just the kind of practical, positive, can-do approach that we need to make important progress. So, I hope you'll all go back and spread the message.

National Volunteer Week. And I know I'm going to get to say hello to each one of you individually down the hall in just a few seconds, so I'll get to that. And I could stand here forever and keep on saying ``thank you'' for all you've done.

I'd like to begin with a few words about the Middle East. The tragic and brutal attack on our embassy in Beirut has shocked us all and filled us with grief. Yet because of this latest crime, we're more resolved than ever to help achieve the urgent and total withdrawal of all American forces from Lebanon -- or, I should say, all foreign forces. I'm sorry. Mistake.

With this in mind, I've asked the Secretary of State to visit the Middle East next week. His primary purpose will be to bring to a successful conclusion the negotiations in Lebanon. We are hopeful that an agreement between Lebanon and Israel can soon be concluded under terms which provide for the security of the borders. I must stress that until all foreign forces are out of Lebanon, that country cannot assert its sovereignty and begin real reconstruction. These are basic goals of our Middle East policy.

I have a second subject. Economic recovery received a big push forward in March, thanks to our continued progress against inflation. Prices rose by only one-tenth of 1 percent last month and by only 3.6 percent over the last year. We've had virtually no inflation in America for the last 6 months, and that's welcome relief for every American family after the double-digit inflation and record interest rates of 1980. We know that zero-inflation cannot last forever. Energy prices have firmed a bit in recent weeks. Nevertheless, evidence indicates that the underlying rate of inflation has fallen below 5 percent, something the experts said couldn't be done.

With inflation down, interest rates down, and workers being called back, this is no time to sabotage the recovery we've worked so hard for with a quick political fix. The battle over the budget now moves to the arena of the Senate floor, and I intend to marshall every resource of our administration to protect the interests of the American people. We're determined to fight unfair and unwise tax increases on the people to restore defense spending to a level that ensures U.S. security and to reduce inflationary domestic spending.

All that really happened was that the effort to persuade Arafat, as a representative of the PLO, to allow Jordan to represent the PLO in the negotiations that will follow the removal of forces from Lebanon -- he came in with an amendment to what had looked like his willingness to do this, calling for measures that Hussein could not agree to, I could not agree to, none of the other moderate Arab States could agree to. And so they told him that until and unless they came up with something different than what they had proposed -- this came from the radical element of the PLO -- why we would, all of us, just have to go our own way.

Q. Mr. President, if I can return to the last part of your opening statement, what you were referring to is the fact that the Senate Budget Committee yesterday voted against your programs on taxes, on defense, and on domestic spending. How do you explain the rejection of, really, your total program by a Republican-controlled committee? And don't you really have to compromise more than you have so far on the budget?

The President. No, what actually happened there was that the only way we could have been victorious in that committee was to get every one of the 12 Republican votes. Even one defector, and we couldn't have gone out. So, it was simply decided to put it out on the floor and take the matter to the floor. And that's what happened.

The President. We have proposed a compromise, but certainly not to the extent that the committee turned out, because that would be very irresponsible. And it would be irresponsible on my part to not call it irresponsible.

The President. I believe that -- well, we're going to seek an increase over the figure that came out of that committee, obviously. We have announced, in the beginning, that there is a willingness; we have found that we can go somewhat below the original figure that we first introduced in the budget. This has come about through the change brought about by the committee on the MX and all, on better progress in inflation, some things of that kind. So there is a compromise figure on that that has been presented to the chairman of the committee, and he knows about it.

With regard to the taxes, no, there's no way that we can give up on this third year of the tax increase [cut], nor can we give up on the indexing, which is strictly for the benefit of those in lower- and middle-income ranges, because they're the only ones who can be shoved into higher tax brackets by cost-of-living pay increases.

Q. Mr. President, the Republican Senate voted overwhelmingly yesterday to reject the administration's plan on withholding. To delay it for 4 years amounts to killing it. And it was Senator Armstrong, we understand, who prevented the members of the Budget Committee, the Republican members of the Budget Committee, from being unanimous. What has happened to Republican unity? Why are you having so much trouble with your own people in the Senate?

But it seems a little strange to me in this great, revved up effort that happened, that that bill was passed without any problem or any protest by both Houses of the Congress to have withholding of interest and dividend income. It is not a new tax. It went through the '82 election, and it wasn't even mentioned or was an issue or not. And then suddenly, a very successful lobbying effort went forward. And the simple fact is that what was voted in the Senate was to allow people to go on cheating on their income tax rather than making them pay their fair share.

Q. Mr. President, with that overwhelming Senate vote and the likelihood of a House vote, perhaps, of similar proportions, are you still planning to veto that bill in light of, perhaps, a veto-proof vote by the Congress?

The President. As I've said many times before, in this case -- I've said an apple can be orange -- in this case, a bad apple might turn out, yet, to be an orange. We'll just wait and see. And I'll make up my mind on that when I see what happens in the House. It might not get through the House.

Q. Well, that's right. But are you predisposed at this time? Because they're trying to give you, as they said, ``wiggle room'' to get out of this thing because it's veto-proof. Would you in light of the overwhelming vote of both Houses, if it should happen, would you veto? Do you feel that strongly about it?

Q. Mr. President, you mentioned a few moments ago about the radical elements of the PLO. We understand that the White House now has intelligence information that not only the Libyans, but also the PLO have been aiding the Nicaraguan Government and the Salvadoran leftist guerrillas.

The President. I can tell you that the report is true. They, like others from the Communist states, have been in there and are in there. And the episode with the Brazilian halting of the planes from Libya the other day, when the aspirin they were supposed to be carrying turned out to be hand grenades and things, is just further evidence of what we've said all the time -- that there are outside forces all, of them principally aligned with or sympathetic to the Communist bloc, who are in there and intervening in the legitimate affairs of those countries.

The President. There has to be a solution to the problem of the Palestinians. Now, no one ever elected the PLO, among the Palestinians. I don't think that what an element of that group is doing should turn us away from trying to find a solution to the problem of hundreds of thousands, millions in fact, of Palestinians who aren't radicals and who simply want something of a homeland.

Q. Mr. President, back on the defense budget, if I might. You asked Senator Domenici to postpone his mark-up for 3 weeks, and I'm wondering if you feel, in retrospect, that if you or your advisers had gone to the Senators in that period of time, you might now be in a different position, that you might not have been able to get the cooperation, those 12 votes you need?

And so all we asked for was time to study and see, could we cooperate with them, could we meet some of their demands on this without setting back the progress that we've made in closing that window of vulnerability? And it's just a different way of looking at things. Up there, they simply looked at the money, as if you could make a percentage cut across the board and it wouldn't have any effect on your military capability.

Q. Mr. President, are you going to be speaking out publicly soon about alleged Soviet violations of current treaties? And if the United States does believe that the Soviets are now violating treaties that we have with them, does that make it very difficult to reach agreement on any new treaties?

Whether I'll be speaking out or not depends on a study that is going on right now on a most recent testing of a missile. There have been evidences in the past when we have had indications that we thought possibly meant a violation of previous agreements. Unfortunately, those previous treaties are so ambiguous that it amounts to loopholes. And when, as in this most recent case, we feel that there is possible evidence that there was a violation, an interagency task force of experts reviews all the findings that we have, and then they report to my own advisers and then to the National Security Council -- all of them looking at this. If there is, then, further evidence that we believe can be obtained from the Soviet Union in asking them directly the answer to some questions, that enters into it. And that's all before it gets to me.

And the problem is it is so ambiguous that it is difficult to establish and have hard-and-fast evidence that a treaty has been violated. This most recent case, for example, is one in which the Soviet Union says that they were testing an improved version of a missile that is already proper under the treaty. The evidence that we thought we had indicated that very possibly this was a new missile, which would be in violation.

But what I've said is we've learned enough since we've been here to know that any treaties that we arrive at with regard to arms limitation or reductions with the Soviets, we're going to make sure they are not ambiguous, that the clauses that are in there are hard-and-fast.

The President. Well, Ken, it's wonderful to see a smile on your face -- [laughter] -- after so many trying weeks and to be able to congratulate you on this happy occasion. And I want you to know we're proud of you.

Of course, your work is just beginning. This position you're assuming is unique within the governments of the world. No other country has an arms control agency with such prominence as ours. In a sense, this is highly symbolic, for ACDA and its mission embody America's highest aspirations.

I know that you'll be an important voice, a true advocate, and a source of energy for our efforts to achieve these great goals through the equitable and effectively verifiable agreements that we're seeking.

And I see, Ken, that you've brought a few friends and colleagues -- [laughter] -- with you in addition to your lovely family up here. You now join a larger family whose entire professional commitment is to be an important resource for me and for you in the search for genuine peace.

While the Arms Control and Disarmament Agency is small compared to other Federal agencies, its importance far exceeds its size. Since its founding in 1961, ACDA has played a key role in some of this country's most important policy decisions. During your tenure, ACDA will often be front and center in that process. One thing your confirmation process clearly did was to highlight this Agency's critical role.

Control and Disarmament Agency under your leadership. I want to assure the dedicated personnel of ACDA that they and you have my full confidence. They should know that I will look to you and to them for counsel in these important days ahead. And I know that I can depend on all of you for strong support.

Mr. President, Mr. Secretary, ACDA staff, family and friends, someone just the other day reminded me, Mr. President, that it's been a quarter of a year since you nominated me as Director of ACDA, and I was kind of startled. But it just goes to show how time flies when you're having fun, you know? [Laughter] But these past 3 months have shown me, more than ever before, that nothing worthwhile ever comes easily. Surely, it's safe to say this in terms of the confirmation process.

It has been worthwhile because of the unquestionable importance of the directorship of ACDA and the fine caliber of the Agency staff. It has been worthwhile because of the unquestionable importance of arms control to you, Mr. President, to us at ACDA, and to the American people. It has been worthwhile because of the critical importance of arms control to our elected officials in the Congress.

Much of the time since my confirmation vote last week has been spent on individual meetings with members of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee and other interested Senators in discussing the depth of our mutual commitment to a strong arms control program. I've gathered a good amount of advice which I will share with you later, Mr. President. This was anticipated, since I spent considerable time with those Senators voicing reservations over the last 3 months. The spirit of bipartisanship and of close consultations has been superb. I look forward to working with the Congress in precisely this spirit.

Similarly for arms control agreements themselves, nothing worthwhile ever comes easily. To accomplish your goals for arms control, including deep and verifiable reductions in nuclear weapons, bringing about enhanced stability, this takes time, energy, tenacity, and imagination.

Your administration has surely chosen the difficult, the bold road on arms control, a road which can lead to agreements which make the world a safer place for all of us, a world with fewer nuclear weapons on both sides, a world wherein freedom can blossom and diversity is widely treasured.

These are the traditional goals of America. These are the goals which inspire all of us in our lives as Americans. These are the goals which I pledge to you to pursue to my fullest as Director of the Arms Control and Disarmament Agency.

On this 13th anniversary of Earth Day, I applaud the progress that this nation has made in protecting and enhancing the quality of the environment. Air quality in the United States today, especially in the cities, is much better than it was 13 years ago. Streams, rivers, and lakes all across the country are becoming cleaner. The Congress has enacted legislation which stringently regulates hazardous waste and has created a special fund to clean up abandoned hazardous dump sites. Expenditures by businesses and government to comply with environmental laws were almost $55 billion last year, or more than $230 per man, woman, and child in the United States. We can be proud of the actions we have taken as a nation to protect the quality of the environment for ourselves and our children.

President Teddy Roosevelt and foresters John Muir and Gifford Pinchot, our nation made a clear commitment to conservation. That commitment continues today. Our national park system has grown to 74 million acres, and almost 7,000 miles of river are included in our National Wild and Scenic River System. We have some 413 wildlife refuges, totaling some 86.7 million acres. This record cannot be matched by any other nation.

Private businesses and public interest groups, Federal, State, and local governments, and private citizens of all philosophical persuasions all recognize that our future is bound up inextricably with our management of the environment. By working together, we can achieve our environmental goals and manage our abundant natural resources wisely. Earth Day provides an opportunity to reaffirm our commitment to the environment.

Administrator of the Agency for International Development (African Affairs), to be a member of the Board of Directors of the African Development Foundation for a term of 2 years. This is a new position.

I am today announcing that we have proposed to the Soviet Union the negotiation of a new long-term grain agreement (LTA). We are taking this step to reaffirm our reliability as a supplier of grain. The present U.S.-Soviet long-term agreement, which originally covered the 1976 - 1981 period, was extended last September for a single year, through September 30, 1983. Negotiation of a new long-term agreement is consistent with United States agricultural export policy and reflects our commitment to reestablish the U.S. as a reliable supplier. Assuming the Soviets accept this proposal, these negotiations will be conducted by the U.S. Trade Representative in close coordination with the Secretary of Agriculture and the Secretary of State.

Many of the world's people depend on American agriculture to fill their food and fiber needs. Yet, the efficiency of American agriculture and the quality of life for those who work on the land are impaired by a high accident rate. Many farm and ranch families, both owners and workers, suffer great personal sorrow and economic loss each year because of serious injuries or fatal accidents.

Although great progress has been made in improving safety on farms, much work remains to be done. It is important that community leaders and public officials continue to contribute their time and effort to promoting accident prevention programs. But real progress in safety must start with the individual. Most farm accidents can be prevented if safe work methods are followed and appropriate protective equipment used. If our farmers and ranchers develop strong safety habits while at work, in the home, in recreational pursuits, and while driving on the road, our safety record will improve further.

I urge all persons who live and work on the Nation's farms and ranches to make safety a daily part of activities on the job, at home or on the highway. I also urge those who work with and service America's farms and ranches to support safety efforts in every way possible. I call upon parents especially to teach their children good safety practices and instill in them a positive attitude toward safety which will serve them well throughout their lives.

I undertake this task in great sadness, but also with a tremendous sense of pride in those who sacrificed their lives in our country's efforts to bring peace to the Middle East and spare others the agony of war. Greater love hath no man. The courage and the dedication of these men and women reflect the best tradition of our Foreign Service, our Armed Forces, and the other departments and agencies whose personnel serve our nation overseas, often in situations of great personal danger.

We don't know yet who bears responsibility for this terrible deed. What we do know is that the terrorists who planned and carried out this cynical and cowardly attack have failed in their purpose. They mistakenly believe that if they're cruel enough and violent enough, they will weaken American resolve and deter us from our effort to help build a lasting and secure peace in the Middle East. Well, if they think that, they don't know too much about America. As a free people, we've never allowed intimidation to stop us from doing what we know to be right. The best way for us to show our love and respect for our fellow countrymen who died in Beirut this week is to carry on with their task, to press harder than ever with our peacemaking efforts, and that's exactly what we're doing.

More than ever, we're committed to giving the people of Lebanon the chance they deserve to lead normal lives, free from violence and free from the presence of all unwanted foreign forces on their soil. And we remain committed to the Lebanese Government's recovery of full sovereignty throughout all its territory.

When I spoke after the bombing to Lebanon's President Gemayel, he expressed his people's deepest regret and revulsion over this wanton act of terrorism. I in turn assured him that the tragic events of this week had only served to strengthen America's steadfastness as a force for peace in his country and the Middle East. To this end, I've asked Secretary of State George Shultz to leave tomorrow night for the Middle East. Secretary Shultz will now add his personal efforts to continue the magnificent work begun by Ambassadors Phil Habib and Morris Draper, bringing about the earliest possible withdrawal of all foreign forces from Lebanon in a way that will promote peace and security in this troubled region.

But along with the tragedy, there were inspiring moments of heroism. We will not forget the pictures of Ambassador Dillon and his staff, Lebanese as well as Americans, many of them swathed in bandages, bravely searching the devastated embassy for their colleagues and for other innocent victims.

We will not forget the image of young marines gently draping our nation's flag over the broken body of one of their fallen comrades. We will not forget their courage and compassion, and we will not forget their willingness to sacrifice even their lives for the service of their country and the cause of peace.

Yes, we Americans can be proud of these fine men and women. And we can be even prouder that our country has been playing such a unique and indispensable role in the Middle East, a role no other single nation could play. When the countries of the region want help in bringing peace, we're the ones they've turned to. That's because they trust us, because they know that America is both strong and just, both decent and dedicated. Even in the shadow of this terrible tragedy in Beirut, that is something to remember and draw heart from. It is also something to be true to.

I know I speak for all Americans when I reaffirm our unshakeable commitment to our country's most precious heritage -- serving the cause of peace and freedom in the world. What better monument than that could we build for those who gave their all that others might live in peace.

Today, the Army Reserve is an integral element of the Army, providing over 30 percent of its tactical support unit requirements and over 25 percent of its general support units. Army Reservists, like the citizen-soldiers of earlier time, stand ready to respond to their country's call and their nation's need. Let us answer their sacrifices and their dedication with our support and gratitude.

There can be no sadder duty for one who holds the office I hold than to pay tribute to Americans who have given their lives in the service of their country. I extend also the condolences of ourselves and our people, through Ambassador Turk, to the families of our loyal Lebanese employees who perished in this tragic event along with their American colleagues.

You here today, the families of these honored dead, I want you to know I speak for all Americans when I say that we share your sorrow and offer you our heartfelt sympathy. We are in your debt and theirs. Your loved ones served their country with talent and energy, courage and commitment. With your sorrow you must feel at the same time a pride -- pride in their dedication.

And the dastardly deed, the act of unparalleled cowardice that took their lives, was an attack on all of us, on our way of life and on the values we hold dear. We would indeed fail them if we let that act deter us from carrying on their mission of brotherhood and peace.

It is written, ``Blessed be the peacemakers.'' And they truly were peacemakers. They knew the road they traveled was hard and fraught with peril. They walked that road with cool professionalism and a deep sense of purpose. They knew at firsthand how an afflicted mankind looks to us for help -- with faith in our strength, our sense of justice, and our decency. And that is the America that your loved ones exemplified. Let our monument to their memory be a preservation of that America.

Let us here in their presence serve notice to the cowardly, skulking barbarians in the world that they will not have their way. Let us dedicate ourselves to the cause of those loved ones, the cause they served so nobly and for which they sacrificed their lives, the cause of peace on Earth and justice for all mankind.

And I remember that I was up at that great installation in the State of Washington where so much was being done with nuclear power. And in one particular building where they were showing me through, why, we put on felt boots and we put on some gowns and then we went through. But then we had to peel all of this off. And there was a slot machine there in which you put your hands and your feet -- [laughter] -- and there were four dials that started ticking away as to the amount of radioactivity that you might have acquired in your extremities. And mine all -- on three of them, stopped. But on my left hand, that dial kept on ticking, and it was getting up there toward where the numbers were red. And I was getting a little concerned. And the manager of the plant looked over my shoulder, and he says, ``Oh, your left hand.'' He says, ``That always happens.'' He said, ``That's the radium dial on your wristwatch.'' [Laughter] I was very relieved.

Well, ladies and gentlemen, that coded message signaled to President Roosevelt that the first demonstration of a sustained nuclear reaction had taken place. The Italian navigator referred to was Enrico Fermi. And on that day, the whole of mankind landed in a new world.

The two individuals that we honor today played significant roles in the early exploration of the atom. I understand Dr. Anderson was present in Chicago at the time of the first sustained reaction. Dr. Neddermeyer was also involved, conducting his research in another part of the country.

This development 40 years ago forever changed the world and our perceptions of the consequences of conflict, which is why 40 years later, we continue to search for surer ways to control and reduce nuclear weapons and, eventually, better ways to defend against them.

While we might speculate on what the world would be like had nuclear weapons never been developed, we can't wish them away. And that's why I have challenged America's scientists and engineers to search for ways by which these weapons systems might eventually be rendered obsolete.

But while we're understandably caught up in our concerns for control of nuclear weapons, we mustn't lose sight of the tremendous peaceful benefits that nuclear science has brought us over the decades. These benefits were also a gift from nuclear explorers like the men we honor today.

Nuclear energy now plays, and will continue to play, an important role in meeting our nation's energy needs. Today, nuclear plants generate more electricity for the American people than oil-fired facilities. I noticed a story in the paper the other day about air pollution in a Colorado mountain resort. Apparently, woodburning fireplaces were used so extensively that this beautiful mountain retreat is developing a smog problem -- a reminder that there is a cost to every form of energy.

We do know that the complete fissioning of a single pound of uranium, a single pound, provides two and a half million times more energy than the burning of a pound of fossil fuel. This form of energy has tremendous potential for mankind. And we plan to move forward prudently and systematically to ensure that the people of the United States are able to use it safely and keep warm, provide light, and to serve as a vehicle for a better life.

Energy production, while one of the most significant uses of nuclear power, is certainly not its only peaceful application. More than 40 million Americans each year receive medical treatment using radioactive isotopes and radiation therapy. In industry, the essential task of nondestructive testing is tied to the use of nuclear material, ensuring the quality of welds and the strength of building materials.

Well, the two men we honor today, like Enrico Fermi, are part of that small band of explorers that discovered, in a new world, a world where potential is limited only by our imagination. They represent the best traditions of American science. They're a tribute to our freedom and to our security. We're proud of them. And it is with great pleasure that I will present the awards.

For his pioneering collaborations with Enrico Fermi in demonstrating the emission of neutrons in fission at Columbia University; for his essential role in constructing the first chain-reacting piles; for his work on production and determination of the properties of tritium and helium-3; for his collaboration with Fermi in detecting the first hadronic resonance at the University of Chicago; and for his continuing contributions to understanding the nature of strong and weak nuclear forces.

Dr. Anderson. Thank you, Mr. President. It's an honor for me to receive this award. This award, the Enrico Fermi Award, has a special significance for me. Fermi was my teacher, and he was a friend. And we worked together, almost on a daily basis, for 15 years.

Columbia -- when Fermi first arrived in this country -- in which we discovered that neutrons were emitted in the fission of uranium, until the day in Chicago when we saw the first nuclear chain reaction go, and then finally in Los Alamos, where we had an opportunity to see how the nuclear energy could be used, also, to end the war, which was pressing on us at that time -- all these experiences were a great adventure to me. And I'm terribly pleased to have this occasion to be acknowledged by you, Mr. President.

For participating in the discovery of the positron; for his share in the discovery of the muon, the first discoverer of the subatomic particles; for his invention of the implosion technique for assembling nuclear materials; and for his ingenuity, foresight, and perseverance in finding solutions for what at first seemed to be unsolvable engineering difficulties.

The two discussed the INF negotiations and the close and continuing allied consultations that have led to the alliance's strong unity behind the U.S. proposal. Both men agreed on the need for the alliance to remain steady on its deployment course if a concrete agreement with the Soviets is not reached.

The President and the Secretary General also discussed the NATO Economic Committee's study of the security implications of East-West economic relations. The President told the Secretary General that the study is an important part of the overall allied effort to develop a comprehensive Western approach to East-West economic relations.

Herrington received her LL.B. and J.D. degrees at the University of California, Hastings College of the Law, San Francisco, Calif., in 1965. Mrs. Herrington practiced law for 10 years as a private attorney before joining the Alameda County district attorney's office in Oakland, Calif., as a deputy district attorney in 1976. During her time as a deputy district attorney, her responsibilities included work on misdemeanor and felony trial staffs, handling a broad cross section of cases from petty theft to murder. In addition, she supervised arraignment departments, law and motion case readiness calendars, felony preliminary hearings, and superior court juvenile division actions.

Mrs. Herrington was a member of the office of felony task force, with primary responsibility for case evaluation and charging and supervision and training of newer deputies. In addition to her general duties, she screened all sexual assault and child abuse cases.

Conference; a coordinator for probation and courts for domestic violence diversion programs; a participant in the National Juvenile Conference of Juvenile Justice and Judge's Seminars; a coordinator of the drug diversion and education program, where she received the outstanding Community Service Commendation awarded by the Concord Policy Department; and was a member of the Contra Costa County Child Development Council. In addition, Mrs. Herrington has had advanced studies in psychology at the University of California; has served as a senior vocational counselor at Pacifica High School in Pittsburg, Calif.; has been a member of the Citizens Coordinating Committee for the city of Walnut Creek; a member of the drug education training program in the Orinda School District; a representative to the American Field Service Selection Committee; and a senior adviser to the Bay Area Chapter of the U.S.O. In addition, Mrs. Herrington has been employed as a senior girls counselor at the city and county of San Francisco Juvenile Hall and has worked as a probation officer in San Joaquin County, Calif.

Regular, vigorous physical activity is essential to good health and effective performance of our daily responsibilities. In addition, physical activity and sports programs can provide rich sources of personal pleasure and satisfaction.

Many individuals, families, communities, and others are increasingly concerned about physical fitness, and there is a growing recognition that physical activity is an important part of daily life for people of both sexes and all ages. Americans who are not reaping the benefits and pleasures of physical activity and sports should develop a personal physical fitness program in accordance with their capability.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 26th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

I could have been introduced as the late President of the United States. [Laughter] And I won't look to certain individuals here on my left. I was in a meeting with some Members of the Congress, and somehow the schedule always breaks down after I have met with some Members of the Congress. [Laughter] But it's an honor to meet again with the National Commission members and guests.

When Secretary Bell and I first discussed a plan of action to deal with the declining quality of education in America, we agreed that it was imperative to assemble a panel of America's leading educators, an assembly of such eminence that the Nation would listen to its findings. Well, today you've issued your report. And I'm confident that America's students, parents, teachers, and government officials will join me in listening closely to your findings and recommendations.

You've taken a long, hard look at America's educational system and found that quality is lacking, but not because today's students are any less capable than their predecessors. You've found that our educational system is in the grip of a crisis caused by low standards, lack of purpose, ineffective use of resources, and a failure to challenge students to push performance to the boundaries of individual ability -- and that is to strive for excellence.

When I first addressed this Commission at its inaugural meeting in October of 1981, I pointed out that there are few areas of American life as important to our society, to our people and our parents and families as our schools and colleges. And I also noted a parallel between a decline in our education and a decline -- or our economy, I should say, and a decline in education. In both cases, serious problems had grown worse because of neglect and because too many people viewed the world the way they wanted it to be rather than the way it really is.

Today we're calling attention to the way things really are in education. And this year our country will spend $215 billion for education. We spent more on education at all levels than any other country in the world. But what have we bought with all that spending?

I was interested to see that you noted the almost uninterrupted decline in student achievement in the scores during the past two decades, decades in which the Federal presence in education grew and grew. Today's high school graduates score almost 40 points below their 1963 counterparts on standard mathematic tests and 50 points lower on verbal tests. Last year's gain on SAT scores will have to be repeated for more than a decade before we achieve the levels of the mid-sixties again.

About 13 percent of our 17-year-olds are considered functionally illiterate, and for minority youth, the figure may be as high as 40 percent. In our public 4-year colleges, remedial math courses now compromise -- or comprise, I should say -- ``compromise'' is on my mind; that was a Freudian slip. [Laughter] They now comprise one-fourth of all the math courses that are taught in our colleges. We can no longer afford to pass students who fail to learn from one grade to the next simply because they've come to the end of the year. We can't afford to waste the valuable resources of higher education to remedy problems that were ignored in our elementary and high schools. Four-fifths of our 17-year-olds can't write a persuasive essay. Two-thirds can't solve mathematical problems involving more than one step. And nearly 40 percent can't draw inferences from reading.

Despite record levels of educational spending, America's students came in last in 7 of 19 academic tests compared to students of other industrialized nations. We never placed first or second. More than half of our country's gifted and talented students failed to match performance with their tested ability.

Thomas Jefferson warned us, ``If a nation expects to be ignorant and free, it expects what never was and never will be.'' It's not too much to say that what began as our unique vision -- human progress through individual opportunity -- will grind to a halt in America if we fail to meet our educational challenges in the eighties. I welcome your challenge to the parents of America to hold elected officials responsible for carrying out those reforms.

Your report emphasizes that the Federal role in education should be limited to specific areas, and any assistance should be provided with a minimum of administrative burdens on our schools, colleges, and teachers.

Your call for an end to Federal intrusion is consistent with our task of redefining the Federal role in education. I believe that parents, not government, have the primary responsibility for the education of their children. Parental authority is not a right conveyed by the state; rather, parents delegate to their elected school board representatives and State legislators the responsibility for their children's schooling.

In a 1982 Gallup poll, the majority of those surveyed thought Washington should exert less influence in determining the educational program of the public schools. So, we'll continue to work in the months ahead for passage of tuition tax credits, vouchers, educational savings accounts, voluntary school prayer, and abolishing the Department of Education. Our agenda is to restore quality to education by increasing competition and by strengthening parental choice and local control. I'd like to ask all of you, as well as every citizen who considers this report's recommendations, to work together to restore excellence in America's schools.

We're entering a new era, and education holds the key. As sunrise industries grow, they bring us technological advances, offering opportunities and challenges. Rather than fear our future, let us embrace it and make it work for us by improving instruction in science and math, retraining our workers, encouraging the continued education, retooling our factories, and stimulating investment in new areas of growth. We can do that. We can compete and meet the challenges of the marketplace. We're still the world's technological leader. But to be stronger, we have to get smarter.

Q. I think a lot of Americans wonder if you are getting us into another Vietnam. I think that's the general worry there -- something that's secret, and we quietly slip in before we realize we're there.

The President. No. And there is no comparison whatsoever in this situation and Vietnam. And I will be speaking more about this tomorrow night to the Congress. But there is no, and never has been any thought or discussion of sending troops any place here in the Americas, nor are they asked for or wanted. And three-fourths or more of all the aid that has gone down there has been economic aid, and less than one-fourth of it has been military aid.

Q. But Vietnam started similarly in our country, saying that we had no intention of sending any troops there; we weren't going to get into it. And because of all the debate over secret operations, I think there's a great concern. Do you think there's a point where you can tell Americans more about what we're doing in Nicaragua, for example?

The President. Well, no, look what we had in Vietnam. We had a place that wasn't even named that. It was named French Indochina, and it was part of the decolonizing that began after World War II. And at a meeting of the leading nations, the Western World, in Geneva, it was decided that there would be a North Vietnam and a South Vietnam, and the two countries were created.

All sorts of provisions were made as to how they could determine where they wanted to go and so forth. And the people of one country or the other were supposed to be allowed to change if they wanted to. North Vietnam -- when a million people crossed over into South Vietnam, preferring that to the Communist rule that existed under Ho Chi Minh in North Vietnam -- they shut the borders, contrary to the agreement, and so forth.

But you had there an assault on one country by another. But the advisers that were in there were in there because it was a new country, South Vietnam. They were, for the first time, going to have to have things like their own defense, there own military, and so forth. And we were simply in there trying to help them establish all the things that go with being an independent state. And the invasion from North Vietnam really started -- while most people portrayed it as a Vietcong, a domestic revolution it wasn't at all. We know now that they were sent in deliberately; they were North Vietnamese forces.

Q. But it's the situation in Nicaragua that, I think, right now is causing so much concern because of the secrecy of what's going on there. Do you think there's a point tomorrow night or some point along where you can describe more fully what we're doing there, beyond the trying to intercept the arms?

The President. Well, no, what I think I will point out is that the difference between El Salvador and Nicaragua is that Nicaragua is a revolutionary government that by force took over the governing of Nicaragua. But then you had the internal fight in which many of the revolutionaries were cast aside, and the promises that had been made as being the goals of the revolution were never carried out.

Our country had tried to do -- been trying to get along, negotiate with Nicaragua. But our interest there is because the arms and the training and even the direction of guerrilla military movements are all centered in Nicaragua. The arms are coming into El Salvador by way of Nicaragua. We know that the operations of the Salvadoran guerrillas are directed by radio from the capital of -- near the capital of Nicaragua.

Q. Well, you said in your last press conference that we wouldn't do anything to violate the Boland amendment. How would you feel if the guerrillas themselves said that their intentions are to overthrow the government there?

Q. I'll jump for a minute to taxes, another of your favorite subjects. Howard Baker said yesterday that -- I think it was earlier today -- that he thought that the Republicans would have to go from about $8 billion to $10 billion in new taxes in order to save the third year of your tax cut and your indexing. If they structured that in such a way that it wasn't an income tax, do you think you could buy it?

The President. I just have to say that I think that right now, with this recovery at the stage it has reached, no one should be talking increased taxes. This would be a good way to set back or cancel out the recovery.

Q. Mr. President, could I ask you about the -- your Commission on Educational Excellence today made a report saying that there was a tide of mediocrity sweeping American schools. And implicit in what they said, I think, is that there will have to be more money spent for longer class hours, better paid teachers, and so forth. Would you be inclined to support more Federal aid to education if that's what it took to have the kind of crash program that they're talking about?

The President. Well, yes, we've talked about that, but providing there would not be any increase in Federal administration of those funds. We think there is a parallel between the Federal involvement in education and the decline in quality over recent years. What is more needed than just throwing money at education -- we're right now spending more money than any other country in the world; we're spending $215 billion on education in this country. We think what has happened is -- well, the report speaks for itself, that we have let up, we are not actually taking the students to the limit of their ability. We think we need more required courses. This is what the Commission has come up with.

Q. Mr. President, in connection with your visit with the newspaper publishers tomorrow, yesterday Senator Moynihan told the publishers they should ``roar like a tiger,'' I believe he told them, over press restraints on coverage by Congress and the administration. Do you think the press has anything to roar about in terms of covering Washington in your administration?

Secret Agents Act. He referred to the appellate power of the Supreme Court. He referred to several incidents, and he said there is a montage of restraint, and the press should be more vigorous and noisy about protecting its political coverage.

The President. I don't see that, and I don't think so. I think the press is free to print those things that should be printed. I think to suggest that we should declassify things with regard to national security would be ridiculous. I think the press would feel that way, too.

Q. You've said before, frequently, that one of the reasons that you're not getting as much support as you should on some of your policies is because the public doesn't understand them. Do you think the public is not getting a full account of them?

The President. Oh. Well, yes, I think there has been a perpetuation of an image, of a perception, that somehow defense is the cornucopia from which you can get all the revenues you need for anything else that you want to do, and that it doesn't have any bearing on our national security.

And what I guess I suggested recently was that to talk about defense spending, the defense budget, and to talk about -- ``Well, let's take $5 billion off or let's take $10 billion off of the budget'' -- there is no way that you can budget militarily that way.

Q. Do you think, then, that the public generally just doesn't understand this process? Because the polls still show that -- even though you gained some back in recent weeks on this defense spending issue, the polls still show that people believe there can be -- that they want a defense buildup, but not necessarily as much as a defense buildup that you want.

The President. But they've been told that over and over again. Do you realize that when I was campaigning, during the campaign, it was exactly the opposite? Everyone in this country was prepared to believe, and did believe, that our defenses had, as they have, been neglected, and that we were in a very risky situation. In fact, much of it was obvious. When ships couldn't sail, naval vessels, because they didn't have enough crew or didn't have spare parts for the machinery, the public knew something was wrong.

Since that time, I think the constant drumbeat about charging that there is excessive spending is the thing that has turned the public around. They've been told over and over again that there is waste and extravagance.

Q. Well, your own -- your Senate Budget Committee, run by your Republicans, think that the point has come where we have to go for a little bit less of an increase -- not a decrease, I understand that -- but less of an increase than you want.

The President. Well, I'm going to wait, before I make any comment of that kind on whether I'll veto or not, till I see what eventually arrives out of the Legislature. But the plain truth of the matter is, this is not a new tax. It's a tax that people are presently paying. And all that we wanted to do, the same as we do with wages, with withholding, was to be able to head off several millions of people who are cheating on their income tax and are escaping payment by not paying on dividend and interest earnings.

The President. Well, I don't know that I've seen that carried very much. I think I've seen the news carried of the lobbying, the news carried of the resentment of this, but I've never really seen an explanation of it.

The President. The editorials. But then, as we all know, only 10 percent of the readers read the editorials -- [laughter] -- but 90 percent were reading something else in the same papers. No, I was surprised at many of the papers that normally don't editorialize in my favor who were in this one.

White House he told some friends in the Republican National Committee that during the lunch you had leaned over and said to him, ``Don't worry. I'm going to go again.'' And I was just wondering if he was telling the truth. Have you told anybody that?

Q. In that connection, Mr. President, you have commented that there's an imbalance of bad news over good news. Lately, since the economic news has been brightening, I haven't sensed that feeling quite as much. Do you feel that the news has gotten better or the coverage has gotten better?

The President. Well, for one thing, the news has gotten better. But, no, I think I was probably speaking more there of the media, the TV news, that I think sometimes is interested in -- well, you know, show business is based on the audience having an emotional experience, and so the sad stories were appealing, and so forth, and there seemed to be a great emphasis on this.

For example, just the other day, though -- let me -- the use and non-use of figures. The other day, there was a little note -- and I can't recall, so I'll be honest, I can't recall whether it was a columnist or whether it was a news story -- to the effect that someplace they were setting a record of 500 businesses going belly-up every year, and this year there will be 500, and so forth. But no mention was made of the fact that new businesses are setting records in starting; that in the same period when several thousand businesses were reported as closing, I guess in the year of 1982, 600,000 businesses started up.

And the same was true for a long time. Every week, faithfully reported, was how many people signed up for unemployment insurance. But each week, the same source of information gives the number of people that go off unemployment insurance. Now, admittedly, maybe not all of those go back to work, maybe they just come to the end of their term. But for many weeks, the number of people leaving unemployment insurance has been greater than the number of people going on.

The President. Yes, I am disturbed about it, and I think there, again, this comes under the subject, generally, of leaks. And I think it's time to put a stop to what I think is incorrect information. If leaks are honest, that's one thing. But incorrect information has added to this whole atmosphere.

Q. Is it incorrect, the reports that Clark and Weinberger or Clark and Weinberger and Baker or -- is it incorrect that, for instance, the defense people and Jim Baker and his staff are not communicating as well as they should?

The President. Well, whether someone in a lower-down echelon thinks they're doing a service for their own shop in putting out this kind of talk or not, that's what I aim to find out. But, no, I think some of the attacks that I have seen recently, both ways, are reprehensible and do not portray the situation.

The President. No. Maybe some of this comes from the way I chose to do business. It's the way I did it in California for 8 years. I understand that in the past, Cabinets, for example -- each person had his own turf and no one else in the Cabinet would talk about a decision affecting the turf of that one Cabinet member.

I don't do business that way. Ours is more like a board of directors. I want all the input, because there are very few issues that don't lap over into other areas. Can you talk about farm exports without being involved with the Department of Commerce, and the Treasury Department, and so forth.

So, I want everybody's input. I want to hear all the views and all the input, and then I make the decisions. The only thing different from a board of directors is I don't take a vote. I know that I have to make the decision.

The President. No, what really happened was I had asked for more time to see if, number one, if the Commission that was studying the MX and all -- they had not come in -- whether what they came in with might change the figure that we had put in in the budget. Also, the swift drop in inflation, we thought, had made some changes. And it takes time.

And the committee was in markup and meeting. And I asked for more time again, and they wouldn't give more time. And the only reason I was asking for more time was it took longer than we thought. They were working on it over at the Pentagon. And they came in with a figure, and it was a lower and a compromise figure. But it was too late. They had passed their figure. Now we're going to try to get our figure -- which isn't as low as theirs -- we're now going to try to get it considered.

Motors who said yesterday that this thing shouldn't be left hanging, that it could have a powerful effect on Wall Street, you know, the way they perceive what's going to happen here to the Federal Reserve.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to make a pitch that you and your associates consider sending your message on leaks and news coverage to the convention of the American Society of Newspaper Editors. I expect you don't want to visit with two newspaper groups in 2 weeks, but we hope somebody from your administration can visit with us, and I'll leave this with Mr. Speakes.

My hat is off to New York and its police force for their dedicated and often thankless battle against crime. And I congratulate the New York Daily News for caring enough about its community that it sponsors the New York Crime Fighters Award program. I understand that more than $60,000 in those prize moneys that Mr. Wieghart mentioned have been given out so far, and that's quite an investment in our collective peace of mind.

By working together, the city and the Daily News are another example of how our public and private institutions can be made even more effective in improving the quality of our lives. But most of all, I want to thank these citizens here for -- they're everyday Americans -- thank them for their courage in unexpected circumstances and for their becoming heroes they were. You know, someone once said that a hero isn't braver than anyone else. He's just brave 5 minutes longer.

They certainly haven't been flipping through the pages of the New York Daily News lately. I wish all our people could read, as I have, the accounts of your individual acts of heroism. In each case you seem to think you acted as anyone else would have in the same situation. And you spoke from your hearts about how we all depend on one another.

Alvin Torres said, ``I just hope people will realize that we must all work together, citizens and police. If somebody needs help, we should try to help out. You've got to try.'' Well, when you read how the Torres brothers chased down a purse-snatcher wielding a knife; how Mrs. Keneally, a grandmother, collared a pickpocket by his neck scarf and gave him the back of her hand until the police arrived -- I liked the picture of that one more than anything -- [laughter] -- and how Rabbi Rosenfeld immobilized a mugger armed with a machete; you realize there's nothing very average about the average American.

Sometimes I've accused some of our political opponents of referring so much about the common man, and I prefer to think that most Americans are pretty uncommon. Here in New York's teeming streets and boroughs and in towns and cities across America, our people do care about each other. And they're ready to help. From cabbies to construction workers to youths to grandmothers and an airman from Brooklyn, the people of New York are leading the way in what has become a national citizens campaign to restore security to our streets and neighborhoods.

New York City. I'll tell your story wherever I go, because I know your courage will inspire others. In the meantime, your fellow citizens are grateful that you've made the world a little safer, a little more free, and filled with a great deal more hope.

But I thought today I'd see to it that you did get one up on your reporters and editors. You know, when I was the Governor in California, addresses to the publishers associations always seemed to follow a pattern: A public official would have to put in a few lines about the importance of a free press and the first amendment as our way of life, and then he'd go on to pitch whatever program or policy he might have been advocating that week. So, I thought maybe today we could do what we used to do there to break the boredom in California: give those of you who pay the bills and meet the payroll a chance to ask me some of the questions that perhaps some of your employees haven't gotten around to asking yet in the press conferences.

But before we get to that, I couldn't entirely pass up the opportunity to mention a few items that I think should be brought to your attention. I suppose you could call them ``good news'' items, but whatever label you put on them, I think they're worth a few moments.

The recovery is widely acknowledged, but I'm sure some of its dimensions may not be fully appreciated. Take some of the key economic indicators for example: Auto production is up 40 percent in the last quarter over the same quarter a year ago; new home sales were up in February by 49 percent; building permits were up in March by 71 percent over the same time last year; and building starts are up by 75 percent. Consumer confidence has had its best monthly gain in 9 years -- all the way to 77 percent as measured by the Conference Board. And it doesn't stop there.

We now have the lowest prime interest rate in 4\1/2\ years. And inflation for the last 6 months is averaging one-half of 1 percent, which is a bit better than the double-digit figures of a few years ago. In fact, it's the lowest 6-month period of inflation in more than 20 years. And I don't have to tell you the stock market is healthy again. As a matter of fact, I don't know whether there'll be some profit taking before it closes this afternoon, but right now it's up about another 8 or 9 points over yesterday's record-breaking high.

Washington or, maybe, even an editor now and then wants an editorial suggesting that raising taxes and increasing domestic spending might be the way to prosperity. We're all glad that recovery is underway. But I think the generosity and the compassion of most Americans toward those who suffered during the recent recession deserves a little more news coverage than it's received.

Forty-six percent of all Americans volunteer their time, and they give an average of 17 hours per month. Corporate giving as a percentage of profits is also up significantly. More than $3 billion was donated.

I've been especially pleased by the new partnership that's being developed between the private sector and the public-interest groups. Here in New York, for example, the American Express Company has put to work, as part of their communications network, severely handicapped people who are confined to their homes, but can still operate computer keyboards. There are public-private partnerships taking hold in the south Bronx in an attempt to upgrade some of the dilapidated tenement buildings.

These are just examples of what's been taking place all around the country in an attempt to meet some of our critical social problems. For instance, to combat unemployment, local radio and television stations have sponsored more than 30 job-a-thons throughout the country.

Or, to take another major social problem, I know all of us were relieved to see recently that crime had actually declined by 4 percent in 1982, the sharpest decline in 5 years. The Director of the FBI, William Webster, has suggested that these new figures may well show that volunteer action through citizen crime prevention groups is having an impact on the problem.

And lest some of you are peering closely and thinking that might be an early campaign button, I just this morning met with one of those crime groups. And they kind of gave me an honorary member[ship] in the Crime Stoppers.

And the group that I met with were a number who had been awarded by the Daily News, which is collaborating with the city police and with this group and provides cash awards to them for their heroic deeds. And to see this group of people, you could go down and just throw a rope around 40 people or so on the street, and it would be the same typical American mix.

Every one of them had performed an heroic deed at the risk of his or her life: a grandmother who had seized a robber by the scarf and was backhanding him until the police got there to rescue him from that -- [laughter] -- two young Hispanic Americans who had chased down an armed robber; a rabbi who had assaulted and captured the robber whose weapon was a machete. And it went on and on. And yet you looked and you said, ``This is just Americana.'' There must be something right about this society of ours.

American voluntarrism, the spirit of neighbor helping neighbor, visitors have been astonished by the kind of gumption and get-up-and-go of American volunteers. I have to admit the other day I was a bit astonished myself. I was out in the Rose Garden, privileged to present the Peace Corps Volunteer Awards to a number of Americans, one of whom was a quite elderly and very tiny nun, Sister Madeline. She runs a hospital canteen in Ghana, in Africa. And as I handed her her certificate of award, she leaned over and everyone was surprised to see she was whispering something to me. And they were more surprised when I whispered something back.

Well, she was still working. She whispered to me that they really had a problem about the lack of flour in the canteen with the great hunger they're faced. And I whispered back to her that I'd see what we could do about it. And before the afternoon was over, a volunteer was taking care of it.

This is a story that's typical of America's volunteer programs. And I also think that all of this is of interest to the public, even newsworthy. It's true that one approach to news is the man-bites-dog principle. If it's unusual, bad, or bizarre, then its newsworthy. Maybe there's another kind of news as well, the kind that lifts our spirits by providing insights into the kind of people we are and the kind of society that we live in.

Now, as you know, I caused a bit of a flurry when I suggested recently that newsmen were overlooking some pretty remarkable stories about what's right with our society as well as what's wrong. But I have to admit it was gratifying to see on one of the networks last week the story of a Cambodian girl who had been in a Communist labor camp until she was 5 years old. Her father died in that camp. Suffering from malnutrition, he was too weak to work, so he was executed.

I hear a lot about them. But I think it's also good for us to remind ourselves and others that our society makes it possible to contend with the recession and crime even while we offer hope to a Linn Yann and to all those living in oppression and tyranny.

We're not accustomed to thinking very much about that region, not accustomed to worrying about possibly a military threat in our own hemisphere. We've almost taken for granted the friendly, independent neighbors that we have. But we can no longer ignore that there's a fire started and burning in our front yard. And we must respond with both unity and firmness of purpose.

The peoples of the hemisphere, this hemisphere, are all Americans, and all of us share a vital stake in the future of democracy and freedom. We have it within our power to act now to keep the situation manageable, and it's in this spirit that I shall speak to the Congress and to the Nation tonight.

There has never been a discussion in the White House about this. The appointment, as I understand it, comes up in August. There has been no consideration or talk of any kind about that or about whether there'd be reappointment or new appointment or what. We just haven't considered it, and we've got too much on the plate right now to consider it before we get closer to the day.

There have been leaks. And I am disturbed about many of the leaks. There has also been over-classification. But our administration, just as we've been reducing regulations and reducing taxes, we have also been campaigning and working to reduce unnecessary classification.

But I can tell you that there have been incidents that are very serious. I don't know what is in the mind of the person that will leak something of a classified nature, that suddenly finds you having to get on the phone or start the cables back and forth, because actually they have endangered our relationship with some other country. This has taken place in this 2 years and few months that I have been here.

